

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Born and raised in New Orleans, he'd been out of the flooded city for a
week. He looked about seventeen but told me he was twenty-three. He and
his family had waited forever for the evacuation buses; when they didn't ar­
rive, they had walked out in the baking sun. Finally they ended up here, a
sprawling convention center, normally home to pharmaceutical trade shows
and "Capital City Carnage: The Ultimate in Steel Cage Fighting," now
jammed with two thousand cots and a mess of angry, exhausted people be­
ing patrolled by edgy National Guard soldiers just back from Iraq.
The news racing around the shelter that day was that Richard Baker, a
prominent Republican congressman from this city, had told a group of lob­
byists, "We finally cleaned up public housing in New Orleans. We couldn't
2

do it, but God did." Joseph Canizaro, one of New Orleans' wealthiest devel­
opers, had just expressed a similar sentiment: "I think we have a clean sheet
to start again. And with that clean sheet we have some very big opportuni3

ties." All that week the Louisiana State Legislature in Baton Rouge had
been crawling with corporate lobbyists helping to lock in those big opportu­
nities: lower taxes, fewer regulations, cheaper workers and a "smaller, safer
city"—which in practice meant plans to level the public housing projects
and replace them with condos. Hearing all the talk of "fresh starts" and
"clean sheets," you could almost forget the toxic stew of rubble, chemical
outflows and human remains just a few miles down the highway.
Over at the shelter, Jamar could think of nothing else. "I really don't see it
as cleaning up the city. What I see is that a lot of people got killed uptown.
People who shouldn't have died."
He was speaking quietly, but an older man in line in front of us overheard
and whipped around. "What is wrong with these people in Baton Rouge?
This isn't an opportunity. It's a goddamned tragedy. Are they blind?"
A mother with two kids chimed in. "No, they're not blind, they're evil.
They see just fine."
One of those who saw opportunity in the floodwaters of New Orleans was
Milton Friedman, grand guru of the movement for unfettered capitalism
and the man credited with writing the rulebook for the contemporary, hypermobile global economy. Ninety-three years old and in failing health,
"Uncle Miltie," as he was known to his followers, nonetheless found the
strength to write an op-ed for The Wall Street Journal three months after the
levees broke. "Most New Orleans schools are in ruins," Friedman observed,
"as are the homes of the children who have attended them. The children are

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

5

now scattered all over the country. This is a tragedy. It is also an opportunity
to radically reform the educational system."

4

Friedman's radical idea was that instead of spending a portion of the bil­
lions of dollars in reconstruction money on rebuilding and improving New
Orleans' existing public school system, the government should provide fam­
ilies with vouchers, which they could spend at private institutions, many run
at a profit, that would be subsidized by the state. It was crucial, Friedman
wrote, that this fundamental change not be a stopgap but rather "a perma­
nent reform."

5

A network of right-wing think tanks seized on Friedman's proposal and
descended on the city after the storm. The administration of George W.
Bush backed up their plans with tens of millions of dollars to convert New
Orleans schools into "charter schools," publicly funded institutions run by
private entities according to their own rules. Charter schools are deeply po­
larizing in the United States, and nowhere more than in New Orleans,
where they are seen by many African-American parents as a way of reversing
the gains of the civil rights movement, which guaranteed all children the
same standard of education. For Milton Friedman, however, the entire con­
cept of a state-run school system reeked of socialism. In his view, the state's
sole functions were "to protect our freedom both from the enemies outside
our gates and from our fellow-citizens: to preserve law and order, to enforce
6

private contracts, to foster competitive markets." In other words, to supply
the police and the soldiers —anything else, including providing free educa­
tion, was an unfair interference in the market.
In sharp contrast to the glacial pace with which the levees were repaired
and the electricity grid was brought back online, the auctioning off of New
Orleans' school system took place with military speed and precision. Within
nineteen months, with most of the city's poor residents still in exile, New Or­
leans' public school system had been almost completely replaced by pri­
vately run charter schools. Before Hurricane Katrina, the school board had
run 123 public schools; now it ran just 4. Before that storm, there had been
7

7 charter schools in the city; now there were 31. New Orleans teachers used
to be represented by a strong union; now the union's contract had been
8

shredded, and its forty-seven hundred members had all been fired. Some of
the younger teachers were rehired by the charters, at reduced salaries; most
were not.
New Orleans was now, according to The New York Times, "the nation's
preeminent laboratory for the widespread use of charter schools," while the

6

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

American Enterprise Institute, a Friedmanite think tank, enthused that "Katrina accomplished in a day . . . what Louisiana school reformers couldn't do
9

after years of trying." Public school teachers, meanwhile, watching money
allocated for the victims of the flood being diverted to erase a public system
and replace it with a private one, were calling Friedman's plan "an educa­
tional land grab."

10

I call these orchestrated raids on the public sphere in the wake of cata­
strophic events, combined with the treatment of disasters as exciting market
opportunities, "disaster capitalism."
Friedman's New Orleans op-ed ended up being his last public policy recom­
mendation; he died less than a year later, on November 16, 2006, at age
ninety-four. Privatizing the school system of a midsize American city may
seem like a modest preoccupation for the man hailed as the most influential
economist of the past half century, one who counted among his disciples
several U.S. presidents, British prime ministers, Russian oligarchs, Polish fi­
nance ministers, Third World dictators, Chinese Communist Party secre­
taries, International Monetary Fund directors and the past three chiefs of the
U.S. Federal Reserve. Yet his determination to exploit the crisis in New Or­
leans to advance a fundamentalist version of capitalism was also an oddly fit­
ting farewell from the boundlessly energetic five-foot-two-inch professor
who, in his prime, described himself as "an old-fashioned preacher deliver­
ing a Sunday sermon."

11

For more than three decades, Friedman and his powerful followers had
been perfecting this very strategy: waiting for a major crisis, then selling off
pieces of the state to private players while citizens were still reeling from the
shock, then quickly making the "reforms" permanent.
In one of his most influential essays, Friedman articulated contemporary
capitalism's core tactical nostrum, what I have come to understand as the
shock doctrine. He observed that "only a crisis—actual or perceived—produces
real change. When that crisis occurs, the actions that are taken depend on the
ideas that are lying around. That, I believe, is our basic function: to develop al­
ternatives to existing policies, to keep them alive and available until the politi­
cally impossible becomes politically inevitable."

12

Some people stockpile

canned goods and water in preparation for major disasters; Friedmanites stock­
pile free-market ideas. And once a crisis has struck, the University of Chicago
professor was convinced that it was crucial to act swiftly, to impose rapid and
irreversible change before the crisis-racked society slipped back into the

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

7

"tyranny of the status quo." He estimated that "a new administration has
some six to nine months in which to achieve major changes; if it does not
seize the opportunity to act decisively during that period, it will not have an­
other such opportunity."

13

A variation on Machiavelli's advice that injuries

should be inflicted "all at once," this proved to be one of Friedman's most
lasting strategic legacies.
Friedman first learned how to exploit a large-scale shock or crisis in the midseventies, when he acted as adviser to the Chilean dictator, General Augusto
Pinochet. Not only were Chileans in a state of shock following Pinochet's vi­
olent coup, but the country was also traumatized by severe hyperinflation.
Friedman advised Pinochet to impose a rapid-fire transformation of the
economy—tax cuts, free trade, privatized services, cuts to social spending and
deregulation. Eventually, Chileans even saw their public schools replaced
with voucher-funded private ones. It was the most extreme capitalist make­
over ever attempted anywhere, and it became known as a "Chicago School"
revolution, since so many of Pinochet's economists had studied under Fried­
man at the University of Chicago. Friedman predicted that the speed, sud­
denness and scope of the economic shifts would provoke psychological
reactions in the public that "facilitate the adjustment."

14

He coined a phrase

for this painful tactic: economic "shock treatment." In the decades since,
whenever governments have imposed sweeping free-market programs, the allat-once shock treatment, or "shock therapy," has been the method of choice.
Pinochet also facilitated the adjustment with his own shock treatments;
these were performed in the regime's many torture cells, inflicted on the
writhing bodies of those deemed most likely to stand in the way of the capi­
talist transformation. Many in Latin America saw a direct connection be­
tween the economic shocks that impoverished millions and the epidemic of
torture that punished hundreds of thousands of people who believed in a dif­
ferent kind of society. As the Uruguayan writer Eduardo Galeano asked,
"How can this inequality be maintained if not through jolts of electric
shock?"

15

Exactly thirty years after these three distinct forms of shock descended on
Chile, the formula reemerged, with far greater violence, in Iraq. First came
the war, designed, according to the authors of the Shock and Awe military
doctrine, to "control the adversary's will, perceptions, and understanding
16

and literally make an adversary impotent to act or react." Next came the
radical economic shock therapy, imposed, while the country was still in

8

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

flames, by the U.S. chief envoy L. Paul Bremer—mass privatization, com­
plete free trade, a 15 percent flat tax, a dramatically downsized government.
Iraq's interim trade minister, Ali Abdul-Amir Allawi, said at the time that his
countrymen were "sick and tired of being the subjects of experiments. There
have been enough shocks to the system, so we don't need this shock therapy
1

in the economy." ' When Iraqis resisted, they were rounded up and taken to
jails where bodies and minds were met with more shocks, these ones dis­
tinctly less metaphorical.
I started researching the free market's dependence on the power of shock
four years ago, during the early days of the occupation of Iraq. After report­
ing from Baghdad on Washington's failed attempts to follow Shock and Awe
with shock therapy, I traveled to Sri Lanka, several months after the devas­
tating 2004 tsunami, and witnessed another version of the same maneuver:
foreign investors and international lenders had teamed up to use the atmos­
phere of panic to hand the entire beautiful coastline over to entrepreneurs
who quickly built large resorts, blocking hundreds of thousands of fishing
people from rebuilding their villages near the water. "In a cruel twist of fate,
nature has presented Sri Lanka with a unique opportunity, and out of this
great tragedy will come a world class tourism destination," the Sri Lankan
government announced.

18

By the time Hurricane Katrina hit New Orleans,

and the nexus of Republican politicians, think tanks and land developers
started talking about "clean sheets" and exciting opportunities, it was clear
that this was now the preferred method of advancing corporate goals: using
moments of collective trauma to engage in radical social and economic en­
gineering.
Most people who survive a devastating disaster want the opposite of a
clean slate: they want to salvage whatever they can and begin repairing what
was not destroyed; they want to reaffirm their relatedness to the places that
formed them. "When I rebuild the city I feel like I'm rebuilding myself," said
Cassandra Andrews, a resident of New Orleans' heavily damaged Lower
19

Ninth Ward, as she cleared away debris after the storm. But disaster capital­
ists have no interest in repairing what was. In Iraq, Sri Lanka and New Or­
leans, the process deceptively called "reconstruction" began with finishing
the job of the original disaster by erasing what was left of the public sphere
and rooted communities, then quickly moving to replace them with a kind
of corporate New Jerusalem —all before the victims of war or natural disaster
were able to regroup and stake their claims to what was theirs.

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

9

Mike Battles puts it best: "For us, the fear and disorder offered real prom­
20

ise." The thirty-four-year-old ex-CIA operative was talking about how the
chaos in postinvasion Iraq had helped his unknown and inexperienced pri­
vate security firm, Custer Battles, to shake roughly $100 million in contracts
21

out of the federal government. His words could serve just as well as the slo­
gan for contemporary capitalism—fear and disorder are the catalysts for
each new leap forward.
When I began this research into the intersection between superprofits
and megadisasters, I thought I was witnessing a fundamental change in the
way the drive to "liberate" markets was advancing around the world. Having
been part of the movement against ballooning corporate power that made its
global debut in Seattle in 1999,1 was accustomed to seeing similar businessfriendly policies imposed through arm-twisting at World Trade Organization
summits, or as the conditions attached to loans from the International Mon­
etary Fund. The three trademark demands—privatization,

government

deregulation and deep cuts to social spending—tended to be extremely
unpopular with citizens, but when the agreements were signed there was
still at least the pretext of mutual consent between the governments doing
the negotiating, as well as a consensus among the supposed experts. Now the
same ideological program was being imposed via the most baldly coercive
means possible: under foreign military occupation after an invasion, or im­
mediately following a cataclysmic natural disaster. September 11 appeared
to have provided Washington with the green light to stop asking countries if
they wanted the U.S. version of "free trade and democracy" and to start im­
posing it with Shock and Awe military force.
As I dug deeper into the history of how this market model had swept the
globe, however, I discovered that the idea of exploiting crisis and disaster has
been the modus operandi of Milton Friedman's movement from the very
beginning—this fundamentalist form of capitalism has always needed disas­
ters to advance. It was certainly the case that the facilitating disasters were
getting bigger and more shocking, but what was happening in Iraq and New
Orleans was not a new, post-September 11 invention. Rather, these bold ex­
periments in crisis exploitation were the culmination of three decades of
strict adherence to the shock doctrine.
Seen through the lens of this doctrine, the past thirty-five years look very
different. Some of the most infamous human rights violations of this era,
which have tended to be viewed as sadistic acts carried out by antidemo­
cratic regimes, were in fact either committed with the deliberate intent of

10

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

terrorizing the public or actively harnessed to prepare the ground for the
introduction of radical free-market "reforms." In Argentina in the seventies,
the junta's "disappearance" of thirty thousand people, most of them leftist
activists, was integral to the imposition of the country's Chicago School poli­
cies, just as terror had been a partner for the same kind of economic meta­
morphosis in Chile. In China in 1989, it was the shock of the Tiananmen
Square massacre and the subsequent arrests of tens of thousands that freed
the hand of the Communist Party to convert much of the country into a
sprawling export zone, staffed with workers too terrified to demand their
rights. In Russia in 1993, it was Boris Yeltsin's decision to send in tanks to set
fire to the parliament building and lock up the opposition leaders that
cleared the way for the fire-sale privatization that created the country's noto­
rious oligarchs.
The Falklands War in 1982 served a similar purpose for Margaret Thatcher
in the U.K.: the disorder and nationalist excitement resulting from the war al­
lowed her to use tremendous force to crush the striking coal miners and to
launch the first privatization frenzy in a Western democracy. The NATO at­
tack on Belgrade in 1999 created the conditions for rapid privatizations in the
former Yugoslavia—a goal that predated the war. Economics was by no
means the sole motivator for these wars, but in each case a major collective
shock was exploited to prepare the ground for economic shock therapy.
The traumatic episodes that have served this "softening-up" purpose have
not always been overtly violent. In Latin America and Africa in the eighties,
it was a debt crisis that forced countries to be "privatized or die," as one for­
22

mer I M F official put it. Coming unraveled by hyperinflation and too in­
debted to say no to demands that came bundled with foreign loans,
governments accepted "shock treatment" on the promise that it would save
them from deeper disaster. In Asia, it was the financial crisis of 1997-98—
almost as devastating as the Great Depression—that humbled the so-called
Asian Tigers, cracking open their markets to what The New York Times de­
23

scribed as "the world's biggest going-out-of-business sale." Many of these
countries were democracies, but the radical free-market transformations
were not imposed democratically. Quite the opposite: as Friedman under­
stood, the atmosphere of large-scale crisis provided the necessary pretext to
overrule the expressed wishes of voters and to hand the country over to eco­
nomic "technocrats."
There have, of course, been cases in which the adoption of free-market
policies has taken place democratically—politicians have run on hard-line

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

11

platforms and won elections, the U.S. under Ronald Reagan being the best
example, France's election of Nicolas Sarkozy a more recent one. In these
cases, however, free-market crusaders came up against public pressure and
were invariably forced to temper and modify their radical plans, accepting
piecemeal changes rather than a total conversion. The bottom line is that
while Friedman's economic model is capable of being partially imposed un­
der democracy, authoritarian conditions are required for the implementa­
tion of its true vision. For economic shock therapy to be applied without
restraint—as it was in Chile in the seventies, China in the late eighties, Rus­
sia in the nineties and the U.S. after September 11, 2001—some sort of ad­
ditional major collective trauma has always been required, one that either
temporarily suspended democratic practices or blocked them entirely. This
ideological crusade was born in the authoritarian regimes of South America,
and in its largest newly conquered territories —Russia and China —it coex­
ists most comfortably, and most profitably, with an iron-fisted leadership to
this day.

Shock Therapy Comes Home
Friedman's Chicago School movement has been conquering territory
around the world since the seventies, but until recently its vision had never
been fully applied in its country of origin. Certainly Reagan had made head­
way, but the U.S. retained a welfare system, social security and public
schools, where parents clung, in Friedman's words, to their "irrational at­
tachment to a socialist system."

24

When the Republicans gained control of Congress in 1995, David Frum,
a transplanted Canadian and future speechwriter for George W. Bush, was
among the so-called neoconservatives calling for a shock therapy-style eco­
nomic revolution in the U.S. "Here's how I think we should do it. Instead of
cutting incrementally—a little here, a little there —I would say that on a sin­
gle day this summer we eliminate three hundred programs, each one costing
a billion dollars or less. Maybe these cuts won't make a big deal of differ­
ence, but, boy, do they make a point. And you can do them right away."

25

Frum didn't get his homegrown shock therapy at the time, largely because
there was no domestic crisis to prepare the ground. But in 2001 that
changed. When the September 11 attacks hit, the White House was packed
with Friedman's disciples, including his close friend Donald Rumsfeld. The
Bush team seized the moment of collective vertigo with chilling speed—not,

12

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

as some have claimed, because the administration deviously plotted the cri­
sis but because the key figures of the administration, veterans of earlier disas­
ter capitalism experiments in Latin America and Eastern Europe, were part
of a movement that prays for crisis the way drought-struck farmers pray for
rain, and the way Christian-Zionist end-timers pray for the Rapture. When
the long-awaited disaster strikes, they know instantly that their moment has
come at last.
For three decades, Friedman and his followers had methodically exploited
moments of shock in other countries—foreign equivalents of 9/11, starting
with Pinochet's coup on September 11, 1973. What happened on September
11, 2001, is that an ideology hatched in American universities and fortified in
Washington institutions finally had its chance to come home.
The Bush administration immediately seized upon the fear generated by
the attacks not only to launch the "War on Terror" but to ensure that it is an
almost completely for-profit venture, a booming new industry that has
breathed new life into the faltering U.S. economy. Best understood as a "dis­
aster capitalism complex," it has much farther-reaching tentacles than the
military-industrial complex that Dwight Eisenhower warned against at the
end of his presidency: this is global war fought on every level by private com­
panies whose involvement is paid for with public money, with the unending
mandate of protecting the United States homeland in perpetuity while elim­
inating all "evil" abroad. In only a few short years, the complex has already
expanded its market reach from fighting terrorism to international peace­
keeping, to municipal policing, to responding to increasingly frequent natu­
ral disasters. The ultimate goal for the corporations at the center of the complex
is to bring the model of for-profit government, which advances so rapidly in
extraordinary circumstances, into the ordinary and day-to-day functioning of
the state — in effect, to privatize the government.
To kick-start the disaster capitalism complex, the Bush administration out­
sourced, with no public debate, many of the most sensitive and core func­
tions of government—from providing health care to soldiers, to interrogating
prisoners, to gathering and "data mining" information on all of us. The role
of the government in this unending war is not that of an administrator man­
aging a network of contractors but of a deep-pocketed venture capitalist, both
providing its seed money for the complex's creation and becoming the biggest
customer for its new services. To cite just three statistics that show the scope
of the transformation, in 2003, the U.S. government handed out 3,512 con­
tracts to companies to perform security functions; in the twenty-two-month

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

13

period ending in August 2006, the Department of Homeland Security had
26

issued more than 115,000 such contracts. The global "homeland security
industry" —economically insignificant before 2001 —is now a $200 billion
27

sector. In 2006, U.S. government spending on homeland security averaged
$545 per household.

28

And that's just the home front of the War on Terror; the real money is in
fighting wars abroad. Beyond the weapons contractors, who have seen their
profits soar thanks to the war in Iraq, maintaining the U.S. military is now
29

one of the fastest-growing service economies in the world. "No two coun­
tries that both have a McDonald's have ever fought a war against each other,"
boldly declared the New York Times columnist Thomas Friedman in De­
30

cember 1996. Not only was he proven wrong two years later, but thanks to
the model of for-profit warfare, the U.S. Army goes to war with Burger King
and Pizza Hut in tow, contracting them to run franchises for the soldiers on
military bases from Iraq to the "mini city" at Guantânamo Bay.
Then there is humanitarian relief and reconstruction. Pioneered in
Iraq, for-profit relief and reconstruction has already become the new
global paradigm, regardless of whether the original destruction occurred
from a preemptive war, such as Israel's 2006 attack on Lebanon, or a hur­
ricane. With resource scarcity and climate change providing a steadily in­
creasing flow of new disasters, responding to emergencies is simply too hot
an emerging market to be left to the nonprofits—why should U N I C E F re­
build schools when it can be done by Bechtel, one of the largest engineer­
ing firms in the U.S.? Why put displaced people from Mississippi in
subsidized empty apartments when they can be housed on Carnival cruise
ships? Why deploy UN peacekeepers to Darfur when private security com­
panies like Blackwater are looking for new clients? And that is the postSeptember 11 difference: before, wars and disasters provided opportunities
for a narrow sector of the economy—the makers of fighter jets, for in­
stance, or the construction companies that rebuilt bombed-out bridges.
The primary economic role of wars, however, was as a means to open new
markets that had been sealed off and to generate postwar peacetime
booms. Now wars and disaster responses are so fully privatized that they are
themselves the new market; there is no need to wait until after the war for
the boom —the medium is the message.
One distinct advantage of this postmodern approach is that in market
terms, it cannot fail. As a market analyst remarked of a particularly good
quarter for the earnings of the energy services company Halliburton, "Iraq

H

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE
31

was better than expected." That was in October 2006, then the most violent
32

month of the war on record, with 3,709 Iraqi civilian casualties. Still, few
shareholders could fail to be impressed by a war that had generated $20 bil­
lion in revenues for this one company.

33

Amid the weapons trade, the private soldiers, for-profit reconstruction and
the homeland security industry, what has emerged as a result of the Bush ad­
ministration's particular brand of post-September 11 shock therapy is a fully
articulated new economy. It was built in the Bush era, but it now exists quite
apart from any one administration and will remain entrenched until the cor­
porate supremacist ideology that underpins it is identified, isolated and chal­
lenged. The complex is dominated by U.S. firms, but it is global, with British
companies bringing their experience in ubiquitous security cameras, Israeli
firms their expertise in building high-tech fences and walls, the Canadian
lumber industry selling prefab houses that are several times more expensive
than those produced locally, and so on. "I don't think anybody has looked at
disaster reconstruction as an actual housing market before," said Ken Baker,
CEO

of a Canadian forestry trade group. "It's a strategy to diversify in the

long run."

34

In scale, the disaster capitalism complex is on a par with the "emerging
market" and information technology booms of the nineties. In fact, insiders
say that the deals are even better than during the dot-com days and that "the
security bubble" picked up the slack when those earlier bubbles popped.
Combined with soaring insurance industry profits (projected to have reached
a record $60 billion in 2006 in the U.S. alone) as well as super profits for the
oil industry (which grow with each new crisis), the disaster economy may
well have saved the world market from the full-blown recession it was facing
on the eve of 9 / 1 1 .

35

In the attempt to relate the history of the ideological crusade that has culmi­
nated in the radical privatization of war and disaster, one problem recurs: the
ideology is a shape-shifter, forever changing its name and switching identities.
Friedman called himself a "liberal," but his U.S. followers, who associated lib­
erals with high taxes and hippies, tended to identify as "conservatives," "clas­
sical economists," "free marketers," and, later, as believers in "Reaganomics"
or "laissez-faire." In most of the world, their orthodoxy is known as "neoliberalism," but it is often called "free trade" or simply "globalization." Only since
the mid-nineties has the intellectual movement, led by the right-wing think
tanks with which Friedman had long associations —Heritage Foundation,

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

15

Cato Institute and the American Enterprise Institute—called itself "neoconservative," a worldview that has harnessed the full force of the U.S. military
machine in the service of a corporate agenda.
All these incarnations share a commitment to the policy trinity—the elim­
ination of the public sphere, total liberation for corporations and skeletal so­
cial spending—but none of the various names for the ideology seem quite
adequate. Friedman framed his movement as an attempt to free the market
from the state, but the real-world track record of what happens when his
purist vision is realized is rather different. In every country where Chicago
School policies have been applied over the past three decades, what has
emerged is a powerful ruling alliance between a few very large corporations
and a class of mostly wealthy politicians—with hazy and ever-shifting lines
between the two groups. In Russia the billionaire private players in the al­
liance are called "the oligarchs"; in China, "the princelings"; in Chile, "the
piranhas"; in the U.S., the Bush-Cheney campaign "Pioneers." Far from free­
ing the market from the state, these political and corporate elites have simply
merged, trading favors to secure the right to appropriate precious resources
previously held in the public domain—from Russia's oil fields, to China's col­
lective lands, to the no-bid reconstruction contracts for work in Iraq.
A more accurate term for a system that erases the boundaries between Big
Government and Big Business is not liberal, conservative or capitalist but corporatist. Its main characteristics are huge transfers of public wealth to private
hands, often accompanied by exploding debt, an ever-widening chasm be­
tween the dazzling rich and the disposable poor and an aggressive national­
ism that justifies bottomless spending on security. For those inside the bubble
of extreme wealth created by such an arrangement, there can be no more
profitable way to organize a society. But because of the obvious drawbacks for
the vast majority of the population left outside the bubble, other features of
the corporatist state tend to include aggressive surveillance (once again, with
government and large corporations trading favors and contracts), mass incar­
ceration, shrinking civil liberties and often, though not always, torture.

Torture as Metaphor
From Chile to China to Iraq, torture has been a silent partner in the global
free-market crusade. But torture is more than a tool used to enforce unwanted
policies on rebellious peoples; it is also a metaphor of the shock doctrine's
underlying logic.

16

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Torture, or in CIA language "coercive interrogation," is a set of tech­
niques designed to put prisoners into a state of deep disorientation and shock
in order to force them to make concessions against their will. The guiding
logic is elaborated in two CIA manuals that were declassified in the late
nineties. They explain that the way to break "resistant sources" is to create vi­
olent ruptures between prisoners and their ability to make sense of the world
around them.

36

First, the senses are starved of any input (with hoods,

earplugs, shackles, total isolation), then the body is bombarded with over­
whelming stimulation (strobe lights, blaring music, beatings, electroshock).
The goal of this "softening-up" stage is to provoke a kind of hurricane in
the mind: prisoners are so regressed and afraid that they can no longer think
rationally or protect their own interests. It is in that state of shock that most
prisoners give their interrogators whatever they want—information, confes­
sions, a renunciation of former beliefs. One CIA manual provides a particu­
larly succinct explanation: "There is an interval—which may be extremely
brief—of suspended animation, a kind of psychological shock or paralysis. It
is caused by a traumatic or sub-traumatic experience which explodes, as it
were, the world that is familiar to the subject as well as his image of himself
within that world. Experienced interrogators recognize this effect when it ap­
pears and know that at this moment the source is far more open to suggestion,
far likelier to comply, than he was just before he experienced the shock."

37

The shock doctrine mimics this process precisely, attempting to achieve
on a mass scale what torture does one on one in the interrogation cell. The
clearest example was the shock of September 11, which, for millions of peo­
ple, exploded "the world that is familiar" and opened up a period of deep dis­
orientation and regression that the Bush administration expertly exploited.
Suddenly we found ourselves living in a kind of Year Zero, in which every­
thing we knew of the world before could now be dismissed as "pre-9/11
thinking." Never strong in our knowledge of history, North Americans had
become a blank slate —"a clean sheet of paper" on which "the newest and
38

most beautiful words can be written," as Mao said of his people. A new
army of experts instantly materialized to write new and beautiful words on
the receptive canvas of our posttrauma consciousness: "clash of civilizations,"
they inscribed. "Axis of evil," "Islamo-fascism," "homeland security." With
everyone preoccupied by the deadly new culture wars, the Bush administra­
tion was able to pull off what it could only have dreamed of doing before
9/11: wage privatized wars abroad and build a corporate security complex at
home.

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

17

That is how the shock doctrine works: the original disaster—the coup, the
terrorist attack, the market meltdown, the war, the tsunami, the hurricane —
puts the entire population into a state of collective shock. The falling
bombs, the bursts of terror, the pounding winds serve to soften up whole so­
cieties much as the blaring music and blows in the torture cells soften up
prisoners. Like the terrorized prisoner who gives up the names of comrades
and renounces his faith, shocked societies often give up things they would
otherwise fiercely protect. Jamar Perry and his fellow evacuees at the Baton
Rouge shelter were supposed to give up their housing projects and public
schools. After the tsunami, the fishing people in Sri Lanka were supposed to
give up their valuable beachfront land to hoteliers. Iraqis, if all had gone ac­
cording to plan, were supposed to be so shocked and awed that they would
give up control of their oil reserves, their state companies and their sover­
eignty to U.S. military bases and green zones.

The Big Lie

In the torrent of words written in eulogy to Milton Friedman, the role of
shocks and crises to advance his worldview received barely a mention. In­
stead, the economist's passing provided an occasion for a retelling of the offi­
cial story of how his brand of radical capitalism became government
orthodoxy in almost every corner of the globe. It is a fairy-tale version of his­
tory, scrubbed clean of all the violence and coercion so intimately entwined
with this crusade, and it represents the single most successful propaganda
coup of the past three decades. The story goes something like this.
Friedman devoted his life to fighting a peaceful battle of ideas against
those who believed that governments had a responsibility to intervene in the
market to soften its sharp edges. He believed history "got off on the wrong
track" when politicians began listening to John Maynard Keynes, intellec­
39

tual architect of the New Deal and the modern welfare state. The market
crash of 1929 had created an overwhelming consensus that laissez-faire had
failed and that governments needed to intervene in the economy to redistrib­
ute wealth and regulate corporations. During those dark days for laissez-faire,
when Communism conquered the East, the welfare state was embraced by
the West and economic nationalism took root in the postcolonial South,
Friedman and his mentor, Friedrich Hayek, patiently protected the flame of
a pure version of capitalism, untarnished by Keynesian attempts to pool col­
lective wealth to build more just societies.

18

THE S H O C K DOCTRINE

"The major error, in my opinion," Friedman wrote in a letter to Pinochet
in 1975, was "to believe that it is possible to do good with other people's
40

money." Few listened; most people kept insisting that their governments
could and should do good. Friedman was dismissively described in Time in
1969 "as a pixie or a pest," and revered as a prophet by only a select few.

41

Finally, after he'd spent decades in the intellectual wilderness, came the
eighties and the rule of Margaret Thatcher (who called Friedman "an intel­
lectual freedom fighter") and Ronald Reagan (who was seen carrying a copy
of Capitalism

and Freedom,

Friedman's manifesto, on the presidential cam­

42

paign trail). At last there were political leaders who had the courage to im­
plement unfettered free markets in the real world. According to this official
story, after Reagan and Thatcher peacefully and democratically liberated
their respective markets, the freedom and prosperity that followed were so
obviously desirable that when dictatorships started falling, from Manila to
Berlin, the masses demanded Reaganomics alongside their Big Macs.
When the Soviet Union finally collapsed, the people of the "evil empire"
were also eager to join the Friedmanite revolution, as were the Communiststurned-capitalists in China. That meant that nothing was left to stand in the
way of a truly global free market, one in which liberated corporations were
not only free in their own countries but free to travel across borders unhin­
dered, unleashing prosperity around the world. There was now a twin con­
sensus about how society should be run: political leaders should be elected,
and economies should be run according to Friedman's rules. It was, as Fran­
cis Fukuyama said, "the end of history" —"the end point of mankind's ideo­
43

logical evolution." When Friedman died, Fortune magazine wrote that "he
had the tide of history with him"; a resolution was passed in the U.S. Con­
gress praising him as "one of the world's foremost champions of liberty, not
just in economics but in all respects"; the California governor, Arnold
Schwarzenegger, declared January 29, 2007, to be a statewide Milton Fried­
man Day, and several cities and towns did the same. A headline in The Wall
Street Journal encapsulated this tidy narrative: "Freedom Man."

44

This book is a challenge to the central and most cherished claim in the offi­
cial story—that the triumph of deregulated capitalism has been born of free­
dom, that unfettered free markets go hand in hand with democracy. Instead,
I will show that this fundamentalist form of capitalism has consistently been
midwifed by the most brutal forms of coercion, inflicted on the collective
body politic as well as on countless individual bodies. The history of the

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

19

contemporary free market—better understood as the rise of corporatism —
was written in shocks.
The stakes are high. The corporatist alliance is in the midst of conquering
its final frontiers: the closed oil economies of the Arab world, and sectors of
Western economies that have long been protected from profit making—
including responding to disasters and raising armies. Since there is not even
the veneer of seeking public consent to privatize such essential functions, ei­
ther at home or abroad, escalating levels of violence and ever larger disasters
are required in order to reach the goal. Yet because the decisive role played
by shocks and crises has been so effectively purged from the official record of
the rise of the free market, the extreme tactics on display in Iraq and New
Orleans are often mistaken for the unique incompetence or cronyism of the
Bush White House. In fact, Bush's exploits merely represent the monstrously
violent and creative culmination of a fifty-year campaign for total corporate
liberation.
Any attempt to hold ideologies accountable for the crimes committed by
their followers must be approached with a great deal of caution. It is too easy
to assert that those with whom we disagree are not just wrong but tyrannical,
fascist, genocidal. But it is also true that certain ideologies are a danger to the
public and need to be identified as such. These are the closed, fundamen­
talist doctrines that cannot coexist with other belief systems; their followers
deplore diversity and demand an absolute free hand to implement their per­
fect system. The world as it is must be erased to make way for their purist in­
vention. Rooted in biblical fantasies of great floods and great fires, it is a logic
that leads ineluctably toward violence. The ideologies that long for that im­
possible clean slate, which can be reached only through some kind of cata­
clysm, are the dangerous ones.
Usually it is extreme religious and racially based idea systems that demand
the wiping out of entire peoples and cultures in order to fulfill a purified vision
of the world. But since the collapse of the Soviet Union, there has been a pow­
erful collective reckoning with the great crimes committed in the name of
Communism. The Soviet information vaults have been cracked open to re­
searchers who have counted the dead—through forced famines, work camps
and assassinations. The process has sparked heated debate around the world
about how many of these atrocities stemmed from the ideology invoked, as op­
posed to its distortion by adherents like Stalin, Ceausescu, Mao and Pol Pot.
"It was flesh-and-blood Communism that imposed wholesale repression,
culminating in a state-sponsored reign of terror," writes Stéphane Courtois,

20

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

coauthor of the contentious Black Book of Communism.

"Is the ideology it­

45

self blameless?" O f course it is not. It doesn't follow that all forms of Com­
munism are inherently genocidal, as some have gleefully claimed, but it was
certainly an interpretation of Communist theory that was doctrinaire, au­
thoritarian, and contemptuous of pluralism that led to Stalin's purges and to
Mao's reeducation camps. Authoritarian Communism is, and should be, for­
ever tainted by those real-world laboratories.
But what of the contemporary crusade to liberate world markets? The
coups, wars and slaughters to install and maintain pro-corporate regimes
have never been treated as capitalist crimes but have instead been written off
as the excesses of overzealous dictators, as hot fronts of the Cold War, and
now of the War on Terror. If the most committed opponents of the corporatist economic model are systematically eliminated, whether in Argentina
in the seventies or in Iraq today, that suppression is explained as part of the
dirty fight against Communism or terrorism—almost never as the fight for
the advancement of pure capitalism.
I am not arguing that all forms of market systems are inherently violent. It
is eminently possible to have a market-based economy that requires no such
brutality and demands no such ideological purity. A free market in con­
sumer products can coexist with free public health care, with public schools,
with a large segment of the economy—like a national oil company—held in
state hands. It's equally possible to require corporations to pay decent wages,
to respect the right of workers to form unions, and for governments to tax and
redistribute wealth so that the sharp inequalities that mark the corporatist
state are reduced. Markets need not be fundamentalist.
Keynes proposed exactly that kind of mixed, regulated economy after the
Great Depression, a revolution in public policy that created the New Deal
and transformations like it around the world. It was exactly that system of
compromises, checks and balances that Friedman's counterrevolution was
launched to methodically dismantle in country after country. Seen in that
light, the Chicago School strain of capitalism does indeed have something in
common with other dangerous ideologies: the signature desire for unattain­
able purity, for a clean slate on which to build a reengineered model society.
This desire for godlike powers of total creation is precisely why freemarket ideologues are so drawn to crises and disasters. Nonapocalyptic real­
ity is simply not hospitable to their ambitions. For thirty-five years, what has
animated Friedman's counterrevolution is an attraction to a kind of freedom
and possibility available only in times of cataclysmic change—when people,

B L A N K IS B E A U T I F U L

21

with their stubborn habits and insistent demands, are blasted out of the
way—moments when democracy seems a practical impossibility.
Believers in the shock doctrine are convinced that only a great rupture—a
flood, a war, a terrorist attack—can generate the kind of vast, clean canvases
they crave. It is in these malleable moments, when we are psychologically
unmoored and physically uprooted, that these artists of the real plunge in
their hands and begin their work of remaking the world.

PART 1

TWO DOCTOR SHOCKS
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT

We shall squeeze you empty, and then we shall fill you
with ourselves.
—George Orwell, Nineteen

Eighty-Four

The Industrial Revolution was merely the beginning of
a revolution as extreme and radical as ever inflamed
the minds of sectarians, but the problems could be
resolved given an unlimited amount of material com­
modities.
—Karl Polanyi, The Great Transformation

CHAPTER 1

THE TORTURE LAB
E W E N C A M E R O N , THE CIA A N D T H E
M A N I A C A L Q U E S T TO E R A S E A N D
R E M A K E THE H U M A N M I N D
Their m i n d s s e e m like clean s l a t e s upon which we can write.
—Dr. Cyril J . C. K e n n e d y a n d Dr. David A n c h e l on the benefits of
electroshock therapy, 1 9 4 8

1

I went to the s l a u g h t e r h o u s e to observe this s o - c a l l e d "electric
s l a u g h t e r i n g , " and I s a w that the h o g s were clamped at the t e m ­
ples with big metallic t o n g s which were hooked up to an electric
current (125 volts). A s s o o n a s the h o g s were clamped by the
t o n g s , they fell unconscious, stiffened, then after a few s e c o n d s
they were s h a k e n by convulsions in the s a m e w a y a s our experi­
mental d o g s . During this period of u n c o n s c i o u s n e s s (epileptic
coma), the butcher stabbed a n d bled the a n i m a l s without difficulty.
— U g o Cerletti, a psychiatrist, describing h o w he "invented" elec­
troshock therapy, 1 9 5 4

2

"I don't talk to journalists anymore/' says the strained voice at the other end
of the phone. And then a tiny window: "What do you want?"
I figure I have about twenty seconds to make my case, and it won't be
easy. How do I explain what I want from Gail Kastner, the journey that
brought me to her?
The truth seems so bizarre: "I am writing a book about shock. About how
countries are shocked—by wars, terror attacks, coups d'état and natural dis­
asters. And then how they are shocked again—by corporations and politi­
cians who exploit the fear and disorientation of this first shock to push

26

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

through economic shock therapy. And then how people who dare to resist
this shock politics are, if necessary, shocked for a third time—by police, sol­
diers and prison interrogators. I want to talk to you because you are by my es­
timation among the most shocked people alive, being one of the few living
survivors of the CIA's covert experiments in electroshock and other 'special
interrogation techniques.' And by the way, I have reason to believe that the
research that was done on you in the 1950s at McGill University is now be­
ing applied to prisoners in Guantânamo Bay and Abu Ghraib."
No, I definitely can't say that. So I say this instead: "I recently traveled to
Iraq, and I am trying to understand the role torture is playing there. We are
told it's about getting information, but I think it's more than that—I think it
may also have had to do with trying to build a model country, about erasing
people and then trying to remake them from scratch."
There is a long pause, and then a different tone of voice to the reply, still
strained b u t . . . is it relief? "You have just spelled out exactly what the CIA
and Ewen Cameron did to me. They tried to erase and remake me. But it
didn't work."
In less than twenty-four hours, I am knocking on the door of Gail Kastner's apartment in a grim Montreal old-age home. "It's open," comes a barely
audible voice. Gail had told me she would leave the door unlocked because
standing up is difficult for her. It's the tiny fractures down her spine that grow
more painful as arthritis sets in. Her back pain is just one reminder of the
sixty-three times that 150 to 200 volts of electricity penetrated the frontal
lobes of her brain, while her body convulsed violently on the table, causing
fractures, sprains, bloody lips, broken teeth.
Gail greets me from a plush blue recliner. It has twenty positions, I later
learn, and she adjusts them continuously, like a photographer trying to find
focus. It is in this chair that she spends her days and nights, searching for
comfort, trying to avoid sleep and what she calls "my electric dreams." That's
when she sees "him": Dr. Ewen Cameron, the long-dead psychiatrist who
administered those shocks, as well as other torments, so many years ago. "I
had two visits from the Eminent Monster last night," she announces as soon
as I walk in. "I don't want to make you feel bad, but it's because of your call
coming out of the blue like that, asking all those questions."
I become aware that my presence here is very possibly unfair. This feeling
deepens when I scan the apartment and realize that there is no place for me.
Every single surface is crowded with towers of papers and books, precariously
stacked but clearly in some kind of order, the books all marked with yellowing

THE T O R T U R E L A B

27

flags. Gail motions me to the one clear surface in the room, a wooden chair
that I had overlooked, but she goes into minor panic when I ask for a fourinch space for the recorder. The end table beside her chair is out of the ques­
tion: it is home to about twenty empty boxes of cigarettes, Matinee Regular,
stacked in a perfect pyramid. (Gail had warned me on the phone about the
chain-smoking: "Sorry, but I smoke. And I'm a poor eater. I'm fat and I
smoke. I hope that's okay.") It looks as if Gail has colored the insides of the
boxes black, but looking closer, I realize it is actually extremely dense, mi­
nuscule handwriting: names, numbers, thousands of words.
Over the course of the day we spend talking, Gail often leans over to write
something on a scrap of paper or a cigarette box—"a note to myself," she ex­
plains, "or I will never remember." The thickets of paper and cigarette boxes
are, for Gail, something more than an unconventional filing system. They
are her memory.
For her entire adult life, Gail's mind has failed her; facts evaporate instantly,
memories, if they are there (and many aren't), are like snapshots scattered on
the ground. Sometimes she will remember an incident perfectly—what she
calls "a memory shard"—but when asked for a date, she will be as much as
two decades off. "In 1968," she will say. "No, 1983." And so she makes lists
and keeps everything, proof that her life actually happened. At first she apol­
ogizes for the clutter. But later she says, "He did this to me! This apartment is
part of the torture!"
For many years, Gail was quite mystified by her lack of memory, as well
as other idiosyncrasies. She did not know, for instance, why a small electrical
shock from a garage door opener set off an uncontrollable panic attack. Or
why her hands shook when she plugged in her hair dryer. Most of all, she
could not understand why she could remember most events from her adult
life but almost nothing from before she turned twenty. When she ran into
someone who claimed to know her from childhood, she'd say, " 'I know who
you are but I can't quite place you.' I faked it."
Gail figured it was all part of her shaky mental health. In her twenties and
thirties, she had struggled with depression and addiction to pills and would
sometimes have such severe breakdowns that she would end up hospitalized
and comatose. These episodes provoked her family to disown her, leaving
her so alone and desperate that she survived by scavenging from the bins out­
side grocery stores.
There had also been hints that something even more traumatic had hap­
pened early on. Before her family cut ties, Gail and her identical twin sister

28

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

used to have arguments about a time when Gail had been much sicker and
Zella had had to take care of her. "You have no idea what I went through,"
Zella would say. "You would urinate on the living-room floor and suck your
thumb and talk baby talk and you would demand the bottle of my baby.
That's what I had to put up with!" Gail had no idea what to make of her
twin's recriminations. Urinating on the floor? Demanding her nephew's bot­
tle? She had no memory of ever doing such strange things.
In her late forties, Gail began a relationship with a man named Jacob,
whom she describes as her soul mate. Jacob was a Holocaust survivor, and
he was also preoccupied with questions of memory and loss. For Jacob, who
died more than a decade ago, Gail's unaccountably missing years were in­
tensely troubling. "There has to be a reason," he would say about the gaps in
her life. "There has to be a reason."
In 1992, Gail and Jacob happened to pass by a newsstand with a large,
sensational headline: "Brainwashing Experiments: Victims to Be Compen­
sated." Kastner started skimming the article, and several phrases immediately
leaped out: "baby talk," "memory loss," "incontinence." "I said, 'Jacob, buy
this paper.' " Sitting in a nearby coffee shop, the couple read an incredible
story about how, in the 1950s, the United States Central Intelligence Agency
had funded a Montreal doctor to perform bizarre experiments on his psychi­
atric patients, keeping them asleep and in isolation for weeks, then adminis­
tering huge doses of electroshock as well as experimental drug cocktails
including the psychedelic L S D and the hallucinogen PCP, commonly known
as angel dust. The experiments—which reduced patients to preverbal, infan­
tile states —had been performed at McGill University's Allan Memorial In­
stitute under the supervision of its director, Dr. Ewen Cameron. The CIA's
funding of Cameron had been revealed in the late seventies through a Free­
dom of Information Act request, sparking hearings in the U.S. Senate. Nine
of Cameron's former patients got together and sued the CIA as well as the
Canadian government, which had also funded Cameron's research. Over
protracted trials, the patients' lawyers argued that the experiments had vio­
lated all standards of medical ethics. They had gone to Cameron seeking re­
lief from minor psychiatric ailments—postpartum depression, anxiety, even
for help to deal with marital difficulties —and had been used, without their
knowledge or permission, as human guinea pigs to satisfy the CIA's thirst for
information about how to control the human mind. In 1988, the CIA settled,
awarding a total of $750,000 in damages to the nine plaintiffs—at the time
the largest settlement ever against the agency. Four years later, the Canadian

THE T O R T U R E L A B

29

government would agree to pay $100,000 in compensation to each patient
who was part of the experiments.

3

Not only did Cameron play a central role in developing contemporary
U.S. torture techniques, but his experiments also offer a unique insight into
the underlying logic of disaster capitalism. Like the free-market economists
who are convinced that only a large-scale disaster—a great unmaking—can
prepare the ground for their "reforms," Cameron believed that by inflicting
an array of shocks to the human brain, he could unmake and erase faulty
minds, then rebuild new personalities on that ever-elusive clean slate.
Gail had been dimly aware of a story involving the CIA and McGill over
the years, but she hadn't paid attention —she had never had anything to do
with the Allan Memorial Institute. But now, sitting with Jacob, she focused
on what the ex-patients were saying about their lives—the memory loss, the
regression. "I realized then that these people must have gone through the
same thing I went through. I said, 'Jacob, this has got to be the reason.' "

In the Shock Shop
Kastner wrote to the Allan and requested her medical file. After first being
told that they had no record of her, she finally got it, all 138 pages. The doc­
tor who had admitted her was Ewen Cameron.
The letters, notes and charts in Gail's medical file tell a heartbreaking
story, one as much about the limited choices available to an eighteen-yearold girl in the fifties as about governments and doctors abusing their power.
The file begins with Dr. Cameron's assessment of Gail on her admittance:
she is a McGill nursing student, excelling in her studies, whom Cameron
describes as "a hitherto reasonably well balanced individual." She is, how­
ever, suffering from anxiety, caused, Cameron plainly notes, by her abusive
father, an "intensely disturbing" man who made "repeated psychological as­
saults" on his daughter.
In their early notes, the nurses seem to like Gail; she bonds with them
about nursing, and they describe her as "cheerful," "sociable" and "neat."
But over the months she spent in and out of their care, Gail underwent a rad­
ical personality transformation, one that is meticulously documented in the
file: after a few weeks, she "showed childish behaviour, expressed bizarre
ideas, and apparently was hallucinated [sic] and destructive." The notes re­
port that this intelligent young woman could now manage to count only to
six; next she is "manipulative, hostile and very aggressive"; then, passive and

30

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

listless, unable to recognize her family members. Her final diagnosis is
"schizophrenic . . . with marked hysterical features"—far more serious than
the "anxiety" she displayed when she arrived.
The metamorphosis no doubt had something to do with the treatments
that are also all listed in Kastner's chart: huge doses of insulin, inducing
multiple comas; strange combinations of uppers and downers; long periods
when she was kept in a drug-induced sleep; and eight times as many electroshocks as was standard at the time.
Often the nurses remark on Kastner's attempts to escape from her doctors:
"Trying to find way out. . . claims she is being ill treated . . . refused to have
her E C T after having her injection." These complaints were invariably
treated as cause for another trip to what Cameron's junior colleagues called
"the shock shop."

4

The Quest for Blankness
After reading over her medical file several times, Gail Kastner turned herself
into a kind of archaeologist of her own life, collecting and studying every­
thing that could potentially explain what happened to her at the hospital.
She learned that Ewen Cameron, a Scottish-born American citizen, had
reached the very pinnacle of his profession: he had been president of the
American Psychiatric Association, president of the Canadian Psychiatric As­
sociation and president of the World Psychiatric Association. In 1945, he was
one of only three American psychiatrists asked to testify to the sanity of
Rudolf Hess at the war crimes trials in Nuremberg.

5

By the time Gail began her investigation, Cameron was long dead, but he
had left dozens of academic papers and published lectures behind. Several
books had also been published about the CIA's funding of mind-control
experiments, works that included plenty of detail about Cameron's relation­
ship to the agency.* Gail read them all, marking relevant passages, making
timelines and cross-referencing the dates with her own medical file. What
she came to understand was that, by the early 1950s, Cameron had rejected
the standard Freudian approach of using "talk therapy" to try to uncover the
T h e s e include Anne Collins's Governor General's Award-winning In the Sleep Room, John
M a r k s ' s The Search for the Manchurian Candidate, Alan Scheflin and Edward Option Jr.'s The
Mind Manipulators, Walter Bowart's Operation Mind Control, Gordon Thomas's Journey into
Madness and Harvey Weinstein's A Father, a Son and the CIA, written by the psychiatrist son of
one of Cameron's patients.

THE TORTURE LAB

31

"root causes" of his patients' mental illnesses. His ambition was not to mend
or repair his patients but to re-create them using a method he invented
called "psychic driving."

6

According to his published papers from the time, he believed that the only
way to teach his patients healthy new behaviors was to get inside their minds
7

and "break up old pathological patterns." The first step was "depatterning,"
which had a stunning goal: to return the mind to a state when it was, as Aris­
totle claimed, "a writing tablet on which as yet nothing actually stands writ­
8

ten," a tabula rasa. Cameron believed he could reach that state by attacking
the brain with everything known to interfere with its normal functioning—
all at once. It was "shock and awe" warfare on the mind.
By the late 1940s, electroshock was becoming increasingly popular
among psychiatrists in Europe and North America. It caused less permanent
damage than surgical lobotomy, and it seemed to help: hysterical patients
frequently calmed down, and in some cases, the jolt of electricity appeared
to make the person more lucid. But these were only observations, and even
the doctors who developed the technique could not provide a scientific ex­
planation for how it worked.
They were aware of its side effects, though. There was no question that
E C T could result in amnesia; it was by far the most common complaint as­
sociated with the treatment. Closely related to memory loss, the other side ef­
fect widely reported was regression. In dozens of clinical studies, doctors
noted that in the immediate aftermath of treatment, patients sucked their
thumbs, curled up in the fetal position, needed to be spoon-fed, and cried
for their mothers (often mistaking doctors and nurses for parents). These be­
haviors usually passed quickly, but in some cases, when large doses of shock
were used, doctors reported that their patients had regressed completely, for­
getting how to walk and talk. Marilyn Rice, an economist who, in the midseventies, spearheaded a patients' rights movement against E C T , vividly
described what it was like to have her memories and much of her education
erased by shock treatments. "Now I know how Eve must have felt, having
been created full grown out of somebody's rib without any past history. I feel
as empty as Eve."*

9

For Rice and others, that emptiness represented an irreplaceable loss.
* Even today, when ECT, much refined and including procedures to ensure the safety and
comfort of patients, has become a respectable and often effective treatment of psychosis,
temporary short-term memory loss remains a side effect. S o m e patients still report that
their long-term memories have also been impacted.

32

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Cameron, on the other hand, looked into that same void and saw something
else: the blank slate, cleared of bad habits, on which new patterns could be
written. For him, "massive loss of all recollections" brought on by intensive
E C T wasn't an unfortunate side effect; it was the essential point of the treat­
ment, the key to bringing the patient back to an earlier stage of development
"long before schizophrenic thinking and behavior made their appear­
10

ance." Like pro-war hawks who call for the bombing of countries "back to
the stone age," Cameron saw shock therapy as a means to blast his patients
back into their infancy, to regress them completely. In a 1962 paper, he de­
scribed the state to which he wanted to reduce patients like Gail Kastner:
"There is not only a loss of the space-time image but loss of all feeling that it
should be present. During this stage the patient may show a variety of other
phenomena, such as loss of a second language or all knowledge of his mari­
tal status. In more advanced forms, he may be unable to walk without sup­
port, to feed himself, and he may show double incontinence. . . . All aspects
of his memorial function are severely disturbed."

11

To "depattern" his patients, Cameron used a relatively new device called
the Page-Russell, which administered up to six consecutive jolts instead of a
single one. Frustrated that his patients still seemed to be clinging to rem­
nants of their personalities, he further disoriented them with uppers, downers
and hallucinogens: chlorpromazine, barbiturates, sodium amytal, nitrous
oxide, desoxyn, Seconal, Nembutal, Veronal, Melicone, Thorazine, largactil
and insulin. Cameron wrote in a 1956 paper that these drugs served to "disinhibit him [the patient] so that his defenses might be reduced."

12

Once "complete depatterning" had been achieved, and the earlier per­
sonality had been satisfactorily wiped out, the psychic driving could begin. It
consisted of Cameron playing his patients tape-recorded messages such as
"You are a good mother and wife and people enjoy your company." As a behaviorist, he believed that if he could get his patients to absorb the messages
on the tape, they would start behaving differently.*
With patients shocked and drugged into an almost vegetative state, they
could do nothing but listen to the messages—for sixteen to twenty hours a
day for weeks; in one case, Cameron played a message continuously for 101
days.

13

* If Cameron had been slightly less powerful in his field, his "psychic driving" tapes would
surely have been dismissed a s a cheap joke. The entire idea came to him from an advertise­
ment for the Cerebrophone, a bedside phonograph with pillow speakers that claimed to be "a
revolutionary way to learn a foreign language while you sleep."

THE T O R T U R E L A B

33

In the mid-fifties, several researchers at the CIA became interested in
Cameron's methods. It was the start of Cold War hysteria, and the agency
had just launched a covert program devoted to researching "special interro­
gation techniques." A declassified CIA memorandum explained that the pro­
gram

"examined and

investigated numerous

unusual techniques of

interrogation including psychological harassment and such matters as 'total
14

isolation' " as well as "the use of drugs and chemicals." First code-named
Project Bluebird, then Project Artichoke, it was finally renamed MKUltra in
1953. Over the next decade, MKUltra would spend $25 million on research
in a quest to find new ways to break prisoners suspected of being Commu­
nists and double agents. Eighty institutions were involved in the program,
including forty-four universities and twelve hospitals.

15

The agents involved had no shortage of creative ideas for how to extract
information from people who would rather not share it—the problem was
finding ways to test those ideas. Activities in the first few years of Project
Bluebird and Artichoke resembled those in a tragicomic spy film in which
CIA agents hypnotized each other and slipped L S D into their colleagues'
drinks to see what would happen (in at least one case, suicide) —not to men­
tion torturing suspected Russian spies.

16

The tests were more like deadly fraternity pranks than serious research,
and the results didn't provide the kind of scientific certainty the agency was
looking for. For this they needed large numbers of human test subjects. Sev­
eral such trials were attempted, but they were risky: if word got out that the
CIA was testing dangerous drugs on American soil, the entire program could
17

be shut down. Which is where the CIA's interest in Canadian researchers
came in. The relationship dates back to June 1, 1951, and a trinational meet­
ing of intelligence agencies and academics at Montreal's Ritz-Carlton Hotel.
The subject of the meeting was growing concern in the Western intelligence
community that the Communists had somehow discovered how to "brain­
wash" prisoners of war. The evidence was the fact that American GIs taken
captive in Korea were going before cameras, seemingly willingly, and de­
nouncing capitalism and imperialism. According to the declassified minutes
from the Ritz meeting, those in attendance —Omond Solandt, chairman of
Canada's Defense Research Board; Sir Henry Tizard, chairman of the
British Defense Research Policy Committee; as well as two representatives
from the CIA—were convinced that Western powers urgently needed to dis­
cover how the Communists were extracting these remarkable confessions.
With that in mind, the first step was to conduct "a clinical study of actual

34

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

cases" to see how brainwashing might work.

18

The stated goal of this re­

search was not for Western powers to start using mind control on prisoners; it
was to prepare Western soldiers for whatever coercive techniques they might
encounter if they were taken hostage.
The CIA, of course, had other interests. Yet even in closed-door meetings
like the one at the Ritz, it would have been impossible, so soon after revela­
tions of Nazi torture had provoked worldwide revulsion, for the agency to
openly admit it was interested in developing alternative interrogation meth­
ods of its own.
One of those at the Ritz meeting was Dr. Donald Hebb, director of psy­
chology at McGill University. According to the declassified minutes, Hebb,
trying to unlock the mystery of the GI confessions, speculated that the
Communists might be manipulating prisoners by placing them in intensive
isolation and blocking input to their senses. The intelligence chiefs were im­
pressed, and three months later Hebb had a research grant from Canada's
Department of National Defense to conduct a series of classified sensorydeprivation experiments. Hebb paid a group of sixty-three McGill students
$20 a day to be isolated in a room wearing dark goggles, headphones playing
white noise and cardboard tubes covering their arms and hands so as to in­
terfere with their sense of touch. For days, the students floated in a sea of
nothingness, their eyes, ears and hands unable to orient them, living inside
their increasingly vivid imaginations. To see whether this deprivation made
them more susceptible to "brainwashing," Hebb then began playing record­
ings of voices talking about the existence of ghosts or the dishonesty of
science —ideas the students had said they found objectionable before the ex­
periment began.

19

In a confidential report on Hebb's findings, the Defense Research Board
concluded that sensory deprivation clearly caused extreme confusion as well
as hallucinations among the student test subjects and that "a significant tem­
porary lowering of intellectual efficiency occurred during and immediately
after the period of perceptual deprivation."

20

Furthermore, the students'

hunger for stimulation made them surprisingly receptive to the ideas ex­
pressed on the tapes, and indeed several developed an interest in the occult
that lasted weeks after the experiment had come to an end. It was as if the
confusion from sensory deprivation partially erased their minds, and then the
sensory stimuli rewrote their patterns.
A copy of Hebb's major study was sent to the CIA, as well as forty-one
21

copies to the U.S. Navy and forty-two copies to the U.S. Army. The CIA

THE T O R T U R E L A B

35

also directly monitored the findings via one of Hebb's student researchers,
Maitland Baldwin, who, unbeknownst to Hebb, was reporting to the
22

agency. This keen interest was hardly surprising: at the very least, Hebb was
proving that intensive isolation interfered with the ability to think clearly and
made people more open to suggestion—priceless ideas for any interrogator.
Hebb eventually realized that there was enormous potential for his research
to be used not just to protect captured soldiers from getting "brainwashed"
but also as a kind of how-to manual for psychological torture. In the last in­
terview he gave before his death in 1985, Hebb said, "It was clear when we
made our report to the Defense Research Board that we were describing for­
midable interrogation techniques."

23

Hebb's report noted that four of the subjects "remarked spontaneously
that being in the apparatus was a form of torture," which meant that forcing
them to stay past their threshold —two or three days—would clearly violate
medical ethics. Aware of the limitations this placed on the experiment,
Hebb wrote that more "clearcut results" were not available because "it is
not possible to force subjects to spend 30 to 60 days in conditions of per­
ceptual isolation."

24

Not possible for Hebb, but it was perfectly possible for his McGill col­
league and academic archrival, Dr. Ewen Cameron. (In a suspension of ac­
ademic niceties, Hebb would later describe Cameron as "criminally
25

stupid.") Cameron had already convinced himself that violent destruction
of the minds of his patients was the necessary first step on their journey to
mental health and therefore not a violation of the Hippocratic oath. As for
consent, his patients were at his mercy; the standard consent form endowed
Cameron with absolute power to treat, up to and including performing full
frontal lobotomies.
Although he had been in contact with the agency for years, in 1957
Cameron got his first grant from the CIA, laundered through a front organi­
26

zation called the Society for the Investigation of Human Ecology. And, as
the CIA dollars poured in, the Allan Memorial Institute seemed less like a
hospital and more like a macabre prison.
The first changes were the dramatically increased dosages of electroshock. The two psychiatrists who invented the controversial Page-Russell
electroshock machine had recommended four treatments per patient, total­
27

ing twenty-four individual shocks. Cameron started using the machine on
his patients twice a day for thirty days, a terrifying 360 individual shocks to
28

each patient—far more than his earlier patients, like Gail, had received. To

36

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the already dizzying array of drugs he was giving his patients, he added more
experimental, mind-altering ones that were of particular interest to the CIA:
L S D and PCP.
He also added other weapons to his mind-blanking arsenal: sensory depri­
vation and extended sleep, a twin process he claimed would further "reduce
the defensiveness of the individual," making the patient more receptive to
29

his taped messages. When the CIA dollars arrived, Cameron used the grant
money to convert the old horse stables behind the hospital into isolation
boxes. He also elaborately renovated the basement so that it contained a room
30

he called the Isolation Chamber. He soundproofed the room, piped in white
noise, turned off the lights and put dark goggles and "rubber eardrums" on
each patient, as well as cardboard tubing on the hands and arms, "preventing
him from touching his body—thus interfering with his self image," as
31

Cameron put it in a 1956 paper. But, where Hebb's students fled less intense
sensory deprivation after only a couple of days, Cameron kept his patients in
for weeks, with one of them trapped in the isolation box for thirty-five days.

32

Cameron further starved his patients' senses in the so-called Sleep Room,
where they were kept in drug-induced reverie for twenty to twenty-two hours
a day, turned by nurses every two hours to prevent bed sores and wakened
33

only for meals and to go to the toilet. Patients were kept in this state for fif­
teen to thirty days, though Cameron reported that "some patients have been
34

treated up to 65 days of continuous sleep." Hospital staffers were instructed
not to allow patients to talk and not to give out any information about how
long they would have to spend in the room. To make sure no one success­
fully escaped from this nightmare, Cameron gave one group of patients
small doses of the drug Curare, which induces paralysis, making them literal
prisoners in their own bodies.

35

In a 1960 paper, Cameron said there are "two major factors" that allow us
to "maintain a time and space image"—that allow us, in other words, to
know where we are and who we are. Those two forces are "(a) our continued
sensory input, and (b) our memory." With electroshock, Cameron annihi­
lated memory; with his isolation boxes, he annihilated sensory input. He was
determined to force his patients to completely lose their sense of where they
were in time and space. Realizing that some patients were keeping track of
time of day based on their meals, Cameron ordered the kitchen to mix it all
up, changing meal times and serving soup for breakfast and porridge for
dinner. "By varying these intervals and by changing the menu from the ex­
pected time we were able to break up this structuring," Cameron reported

THE T O R T U R E L A B

37

with satisfaction. Even so, he discovered that despite his best efforts, one pa­
tient had maintained a connection with the outside world by noting "the
very faint rumble" of a plane that flew over the hospital every morning at
nine.

36

To anyone familiar with the testimonies of torture survivors, this detail is
a harrowing one. When prisoners are asked how they survived months or
years of isolation and brutality, they often speak about hearing the ring of dis­
tant church bells, or the Muslim call to prayer, or children playing in a park
nearby. When life is shrunk to the four walls of the prison cell, the rhythm of
these outside sounds becomes a kind of lifeline, proof that the prisoner is still
human, that there is a world beyond torture. "Four times I heard the birds
outside chirping with the rising sun—that's how I know it was four days," said
one survivor of Uruguay's last dictatorship, recalling a particularly brutal
stretch of torture.

37

The unidentified woman in the basement of the Allan

Memorial Institute, straining to hear the engine of an airplane through a
haze of darkness, drugs and electroshock, was not a patient in the care of a
doctor; she was, for all intents and purposes, a prisoner undergoing torture.
There are several strong indications that Cameron was well aware he was
simulating torture conditions and that, as a staunch anti-Communist, he rel­
ished the idea that his patients were part of a Cold War effort. In an interview
with a popular magazine in 1955, he openly compared his patients to POWs
facing interrogation, saying that they, "like prisoners of the Communists,
38

tended to resist [treatment] and had to be broken down." A year later, he
wrote that the purpose of depatterning was "the actual 'wearing down' of de­
fenses" and noted that "analogous to this is the breakdown of the individual
39

under continuous interrogation." By 1960, Cameron was giving lectures on
his sensory deprivation research not just to other psychiatrists but also to mil­
itary audiences. In a talk delivered in Texas at the Brooks Air Force Base, he
made no claim that he was curing schizophrenia and in fact admitted that
sensory deprivation "produces the primary symptoms of schizophrenia"—
40

hallucinations, intense anxiety, loss of touch with reality. In notes for the
lecture, he mentions following sensory deprivation with "input-overload," a
reference to his use of electroshock and endlessly repeated tape loops—and
a foreshadowing of interrogation tactics to come.

41

Cameron's work was funded by the CIA until 1961, and for many years it
wasn't clear what, if anything, the U.S. government did with his research. In
the late seventies and eighties, when proof of the CIA's funding for the ex­
periments finally came out in Senate hearings and then in the patients'

38

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

groundbreaking class-action lawsuit against the agency, journalists and legislators tended to accept the CIA's version of events—that it was conducting
research into brainwashing techniques in order to protect captured U.S. soldiers. Most of the press attention focused on the sensational detail that the
government had been funding acid trips. In fact, a large part of the scandal,
when it finally broke, was that the CIA and Ewen Cameron had recklessly
shattered lives with their experiments for no good reason—the research appeared useless: everyone knew by then that brainwashing was a Cold War
myth. The CIA, for its part, actively encouraged this narrative, much preferring to be mocked as bumbling sci-fi buffoons than for having funded a torture laboratory at a respected university—and an effective one at that. When
John Gittinger, the CIA psychologist who first reached out to Cameron, was
forced to testify before a joint Senate hearing, he called the support for
42

Cameron "a foolish mistake. . . . A terrible mistake." When the hearings
asked Sidney Gottlieb, former director of MKUltra, to explain why he had
ordered all the files destroyed from the $25 million program, he replied that
"the project MKUltra had not yielded any results of real positive value to the
43

Agency." In the exposés of MKUltra from the eighties, both in investigative
accounts in the mainstream press and in books, the experiments are consistently described as "mind control" and "brainwashing." The word "torture"
is almost never used.

The Science of Fear
In 1988, The New York Times ran a groundbreaking investigation into U.S. involvement in torture and assassinations in Honduras. Florencio Caballero, an
interrogator with Honduras's notoriously brutal Battalion 3-16, told the Times
that he and twenty-four of his colleagues were taken to Texas and trained by
the CIA. "They taught us psychological methods—to study the fears and weaknesses of a prisoner. Make him stand up, don't let him sleep, keep him naked
and isolated, put rats and cockroaches in his cell, give him bad food, serve him
dead animals, throw cold water on him, change the temperature." There was
one technique he failed to mention: electroshock. Inès Murillo, a twenty-fouryear-old prisoner who was "interrogated" by Caballero and his colleagues, told
the Times that she was electrocuted so many times that she "screamed and fell
down from the shock. The screams just escape you," she said. "I smelled
smoke and realized I was burning from the singes of the shocks. They said they
would torture me until I went mad. I didn't believe them. But then they spread

THE T O R T U R E L A B

39

44

my legs and stuck the wires on my genitals." Murillo also said that there was
someone else in the room: an American passing questions to her interrogators
whom the others called "Mr. Mike."

45

The revelations led to hearings of the Senate's Select Committee on Intel­
ligence, where the CIA's deputy director, Richard Stolz, confirmed that "Ca­
ballero did indeed attend a CIA human resources exploitation or
46

interrogation course." The Baltimore Sun filed a Freedom of Information
Act request for the course material used to train people like Caballero. For
many years the CIA refused to comply; finally, under threat of a lawsuit, and
nine years after the original story was published, the CIA produced a hand­
book called Kubark Counterintelligence

Interrogation.

The title was in code:

"Kubark" is, according to The New York Times, "a cryptonym, KU a random
diptych and BARK the agency's code word for itself at that time." More recent
reports have speculated that the "ku" referred to "a country or a specific clan­
47

destine or covert activity." The handbook is a 128-page secret manual on
the "interrogation of resistant sources" that is heavily based on the research
commissioned by MKUltra—and Ewen Cameron's and Donald Hebb's ex­
periments have left their marks all over it. Methods range from sensory depri­
vation to stress positions, from hooding to pain. (The manual acknowledges
early on that many of these tactics are illegal and instructs interrogators to
seek "prior Headquarters approval. . . under any of the following circum­
stances: 1. If bodily harm is to be inflicted. 2. If medical, chemical, or electri­
cal methods or materials are to be used to induce acquiescence.")

48

The manual is dated 1963, the final year of the MKUltra program and
two years after Cameron's CIA-funded experiments came to a close. The
handbook claims that if the techniques are used properly, they will take a re­
sistant source and "destroy his capacity for resistance." This, it turns out, was
the true purpose of MKUltra: not to research brainwashing (that was a mere
side project), but to design a scientifically based system for extracting infor­
49

mation from "resistant sources." In other words, torture.
The manual states on its first page that it is about to describe interrogation
methods based on "extensive research, including scientific inquiries con­
ducted by specialists in closely related subjects." It represents a new age of
precise, refined torture—not the gory, inexact torment that had been the
standard since the Spanish Inquisition. In a kind of preface, the manual
states: "The intelligence service which is able to bring pertinent, modern
knowledge to bear upon its problems enjoys huge advantages over a service
which conducts its clandestine business in eighteenth century fashion . . . it

40

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

is no longer possible to discuss interrogation significantly without reference
50

to the psychological research conducted in the past decade." What follows
is a how-to guide on dismantling personalities.
The manual includes a lengthy section on sensory deprivation that refers
51

to "a number of experiments at McGill University." It describes how to
build isolation chambers and notes that "the deprivation of stimuli induces
regression by depriving the subject's mind of contact with an outer world
and thus forcing it in upon itself. At the same time, the calculated provision
of stimuli during interrogation tends to make the regressed subject view the
interrogator as a father-figure."

52

The Freedom of Information Act request

also produced an updated version of the manual, first published in 1983 for
use in Latin America. "Window should be set high in the wall with the ca­
pability of blocking out light," it states.*

55

It is precisely what Hebb feared: the use of his sensory deprivation meth­
ods as "formidable interrogation techniques." But it is the work of Cameron,
and his recipe for disturbing "the time-space-image," that forms the core of
the Kubark formula. The manual describes several of the techniques that
were honed to depattern patients in the basement of the Allan Memorial
Institute: "The principle is that sessions should be so planned as to disrupt
the source's sense of chronological order. . . . Some interrogatees can be re­
gressed by persistent manipulation of time, by retarding and advancing
clocks and serving meals at odd times—ten minutes or ten hours after the
last food was given. Day and night are jumbled."

54

What most captured the imagination of Kubark's authors, more than any in­
dividual technique, was Cameron's focus on regression—the idea that by depriv­
ing people of their sense of who they are and where they are in time and space,
adults can be converted into dependent children whose minds are a blank slate
of suggestibility. Again and again, the authors return to the theme. "All of the
techniques employed to break through an interrogation roadblock, the entire
spectrum from simple isolation to hypnosis and narcosis, are essentially ways of
speeding up the process of regression. As the interrogatee slips back from matu­
rity toward a more infantile state, his learned or structured personality traits fall
away." That is when the prisoner goes into the state of "psychological shock" or
"suspended animation" referred to earlier—that torturer's sweet spot when "the
source is far more open to suggestion, far likelier to comply."

55

*The 1983 version is clearly geared to classroom use, complete with pop quizzes and friendly
reminders ("Always start each session with fresh batteries").

THE T O R T U R E L A B

41

Alfred W. McCoy, a historian at the University of Wisconsin who docu­
mented the evolution of torture techniques since the Inquisition in his book
A Question of Torture: CIA Interrogation
Terror, describes the Kubark

from the Cold War to the War on

manual's shock-inducing formula of sensory

deprivation followed by sensory overload as "the first real revolution in the
56

cruel science of pain in more than three centuries." And according to Mc­
Coy, it couldn't have happened without the McGill experiments in the
1950s. "Stripped of its bizarre excesses, Dr. Cameron's experiments, build­
ing upon Dr. Hebb's earlier breakthrough, laid the scientific foundation for
the CIA's two-stage psychological torture method."

57

Wherever the Kubark method has been taught, certain clear patterns—all
designed to induce, deepen and sustain shock—have emerged: prisoners are
captured in the most jarring and disorienting way possible, late at night or in
early-morning raids, as the manual instructs. They are immediately hooded
or blindfolded, stripped and beaten, then subjected to some form of sensory
deprivation. And from Guatemala to Honduras, Vietnam to Iran, the Philip­
pines to Chile, the use of electroshock is ubiquitous.
This was not, of course, all the influence of Cameron or MKUltra. Tor­
ture is always an improvisation, a combination of learned technique and the
human instinct for brutality that is unleashed wherever impunity reigns. By
the mid-fifties, electroshock was being routinely used against liberation
58

fighters by French soldiers in Algeria, often with the help of psychiatrists. In
this period, French military leaders conducted seminars at a U.S. military
"counterinsurgency" school in Fort Bragg, North Carolina, in which they
trained students in the Algeria techniques.

59

It is also clear, however, that

Cameron's particular model of using massive doses of shock not just to in­
flict pain but for the specific goal of erasing structured personalities made an
impression on the CIA. In 1966, the CIA sent three psychiatrists to Saigon,
armed with a Page-Russell, the same kind of electroshock machine favored
by Cameron; it was used so aggressively that it killed several prisoners. Ac­
cording to McCoy, "In effect, they were testing, under field conditions,
whether Ewen Cameron's McGill 'de-patterning' techniques could actually
alter human behavior."

60

For U.S. intelligence officials, that kind of hands-on approach was rare.
From the seventies on, the role favored by American agents was that of men­
tor or trainer—not direct interrogator. Testimony from Central American
torture survivors in the seventies and eighties is littered with references to

U2

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

mysterious English-speaking men walking in and out of cells, proposing
questions or offering tips. Dianna Ortiz, an American nun who was ab­
ducted and jailed in Guatemala in 1989, has testified that the men who
raped and burned her with cigarettes deferred to a man who spoke Spanish
61

with a heavy American accent, whom they referred to as their "boss." Jennifer
Harbury, whose husband was tortured and killed by a Guatemalan officer on
the CIA payroll, has documented many of these cases in her important book,
Truth, Torture and the American

62

Way.

Though sanctioned by successive administrations in Washington, the
U.S. role in these dirty wars had to be covert, for obvious reasons. Torture,
whether physical or psychological, clearly violates the Geneva Conventions'
blanket ban on "any form of torture or cruelty," as well as the U.S. Army's
own Uniform Code of Military Justice barring "cruelty" and "oppression" of
63

prisoners. The Kubark manual warns readers on page 2 that its techniques
carry "the grave risk of later lawsuits," and the 1983 version is even more
blunt: "Use of force, mental torture, threats, insults, or exposure to unpleas­
ant and inhumane treatment of any kind as an aid to interrogation is prohib­
64

ited by law, both international and domestic." Simply put, what they were
teaching was illegal, covert by its very nature. If anyone asked, U.S. agents
were tutoring their developing-world students in modern, professional polic­
ing methods—they couldn't be responsible for "excesses" that happened
outside their classes.
On September 11, 2001, that longtime insistence on plausible deniability
went out the window. The terrorist attack on the Twin Towers and the Penta­
gon was a different kind of shock from the ones imagined in the pages of the
Kubark manual, but its effects were remarkably similar: profound disorienta­
tion, extreme fear and anxiety, and collective regression. Like the Kubark in­
terrogator posing as a "father figure," the Bush administration promptly used
that fear to play the role of the all-protective parent, ready to defend "the
homeland" and its vulnerable people by any means necessary. The shift in
U.S. policy encapsulated by Vice President Dick Cheney's infamous state­
ment about working "the dark side" did not mark an embrace by this admin­
istration of tactics that would have repelled its more humane predecessors
(as too many Democrats have claimed, invoking what the historian Garry
65

Wills calls the particular American myth of "original sinlessness" ). Rather,
the significant shift was that what had previously been performed by proxy,
with enough distance to deny knowledge, would now be performed directly
and openly defended.

THE T O R T U R E L A B

43

Despite all the talk of outsourced torture, the Bush administration's real in­
novation has been its in-sourcing, with prisoners being tortured by U.S. citi­
zens in U.S.-run prisons or directly transported, through "extraordinary
rendition," to third countries on U.S. planes. That is what makes the Bush
regime different: after the attacks of September 11, it dared to demand the
right to torture without shame. That left the administration subject to criminal
prosecution—a problem it dealt with by changing the laws. The chain of
events is well known: then-secretary of defense Donald Rumsfeld, empowered
by George W. Bush, decreed that prisoners captured in Afghanistan were not
covered by the Geneva Conventions because they were "enemy combatants,"
not POWs, a view confirmed by the White House legal counsel at the time,
66

Alberto Gonzales (subsequently U.S. attorney general). Next, Rumsfeld ap­
proved a series of special interrogation practices for use in the War on Terror.
These included the methods laid out in the CIA manuals: "use of isolation fa­
cility for up to 30 days," "deprivation of light and auditory stimuli," "the de­
tainee may also have a hood placed over his head during transportation and
questioning," "removal of clothing" and "using detainees' individual phobias
67

(such as fear of dogs) to induce stress." According to the White House, tor­
ture was still banned—but now to qualify as torture, the pain inflicted had to
"be equivalent in intensity to the pain accompanying serious physical injury,
68

such as organ failure."* According to these new rules, the U.S. government
was free to use the methods it had developed in the 1950s under layers of se­
crecy and deniability—only now it was out in the open, without fear of prose­
cution. . . . According to these new rules, the U.S. government was free to use
the methods it had developed in the 1950s under layers of secrecy and
deniability—only now it was out in the open, without fear of prosecution. So
in February 2006, the Intelligence Sciences Board, an advisory arm of the
CIA, published a report written by a veteran Defense Department interroga­
tor. It stated openly that "a careful reading of the Kubark manual is essential
for anyone involved in interrogation."

69

* Under pressure from lawmakers in Congress and the Senate, a s well a s the Supreme
Court, the B u s h administration w a s forced to moderate its position somewhat when C o n ­
gress approved the Military Commissions Act of 2006. But although the White House used
the new bill to claim that it had renounced all use of torture, it left huge holes allowing CIA
agents and contractors to continue to use Kubark-style sensory deprivation and overload, a s
well as other "creative" techniques including simulated drowning ("water-boarding"). Before
signing the act, B u s h attached a "signing statement" asserting his right "to interpret the
meaning and application of the Geneva Conventions" a s he sees fit. The New York Times de­
scribed this as the "unilateral rewriting of more than 200 years of tradition and law."

Ul*

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

One of the first people to come face-to-face with the new order was the U.S.
citizen and former gang member José Padilla. Arrested in May 2002 at
Chicago's O'Hare airport, he was accused of intending to build a "dirty bomb."
Rather than being charged and taken through the court system, Padilla was
classified as an enemy combatant, which stripped him of all rights. Taken to a
U.S. Navy prison in Charleston, South Carolina, Padilla says he was injected
with a drug that he believes was either L S D or PCP and subjected to intense
sensory deprivation: he was kept in a tiny cell with the windows blacked out
and forbidden to have a clock or a calendar. Whenever he left the cell he was
shackled, his eyes were covered with blackout goggles and sound was blocked
with heavy headphones. Padilla was kept under these conditions for 1,307 days
and forbidden contact with anyone but his interrogators, who, when they ques­
tioned him, blasted his starved senses with lights and pounding sounds.

70

Padilla was granted a court hearing in December 2006, although the
dirty-bomb allegations for which he had been arrested were dropped. He
was accused of having terrorist contacts, but there was little he could do to
defend himself: according to expert testimony, the Cameron-style regression
techniques had completely succeeded in destroying the adult he once was,
which is precisely what they were designed to do. "The extended torture vis­
ited upon Mr. Padilla has left him damaged, both mentally and physically,"
his lawyer told the court. "The government's treatment of Mr. Padilla has
robbed him of his personhood." A psychiatrist who assessed him concluded
71

that he "lacks the capacity to assist in his own defense." The Bush-appointed
judge insisted that Padilla was fit to stand trial, however. The fact that he
even had a public trial makes Padilla's case extraordinary. Thousands of
other prisoners being held in U.S.-run prisons—who, unlike Padilla, are not
U.S. citizens—have been put through a similar torture regimen, with none
of the public accountability of a civilian trial.
Many languish in Guantânamo. Mamdouh Habib, an Australian who was
incarcerated there, has said that "Guantânamo Bay is an experiment. . . and
what they experiment in is brainwashing."

72

Indeed, in the testimonies, re­

ports and photographs that have come out of Guantânamo, it is as if the Allan
Memorial Institute of the 1950s had been transported to Cuba. When first
detained, prisoners are put into intense sensory deprivation, with hoods,
blackout goggles and heavy headphones to block out all sound. They are left
in isolation cells for months, taken out only to have their senses bombarded
with barking dogs, strobe lights and endless tape loops of babies crying, music
blaring and cats meowing.

THE T O R T U R E L A B

45

For many prisoners, the effects of these techniques have been much the
same as they were at the Allan in the fifties: total regression. One released
prisoner, a British citizen, told his lawyers that there is now an entire section
of the prison, Delta Block, reserved for "at least fifty" detainees who are in
73

permanently delusional states. A declassified letter from the FBI to the
Pentagon described one high-value prisoner who had been "subjected to in­
tense isolation for over three months" and "was evidencing behavior consis­
tent with extreme psychological trauma (talking to nonexistent people,
reporting hearing voices, crouching in a cell covered with a sheet for hours
74

on end)." James Yee, a former U.S. Army Muslim chaplain who worked at
Guantânamo, has described the prisoners on Delta Block as exhibiting the
classic symptoms of extreme regression. "I'd stop to talk to them, and they
would respond to me in a childlike voice, talking complete nonsense. Many
of them would loudly sing childish songs, repeating the song over and over.
Some would stand on top of their steel bed frames and act out childishly, re­
minding me of the King of the Mountain game I played with my brothers
when we were young." The situation worsened markedly in January 2007,
when 165 prisoners were moved into a new wing of the prison, known as
Camp Six, where the steel isolation cells allowed for no human contact.
Sabin Willett, a lawyer who represents several Guantânamo prisoners,
warned that if the situation continued, "You're going to have an insane asy­
lum."

75

Human rights groups point out that Guantânamo, horrifying as it is, is ac­
tually the best of the U.S.-run offshore interrogation operations, since it is
open to limited monitoring by the Red Cross and lawyers. Unknown num­
bers of prisoners have disappeared into the network of so-called black sites
around the world or been shipped by U.S. agents to foreign-run jails through
extraordinary rendition. Prisoners who have emerged from these nightmares
testify to having faced the full arsenal of Cameron-style shock tactics.
The Italian cleric Hassan Mustafa Osama Nasr was kidnapped off the
streets of Milan by a group of CIA agents and Italian secret police. "I didn't
understand anything about what was going on," he later wrote. "They began
to punch me in the stomach and all over my body. They wrapped my entire
head and face with wide tape, and cut holes over my nose and face so I could
breathe." They rushed him to Egypt, where he lived in a cell with no light,
where "roaches and rats walked across my body" for fourteen months. Nasr
remained in jail in Egypt until February 2007 but managed to smuggle out
an eleven-page handwritten letter detailing his abuse.

76

46

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

He wrote that he repeatedly faced torture by electroshock. According to the
Washington

Post account, he was "strapped to an iron rack nicknamed 'the

Bride' and zapped with electric stun guns" as well as "tied to a wet mattress
on the floor. While one interrogator sat on a wooden chair perched on the
prisoner's shoulders, another interrogator would flip a switch, sending jolts of
77

electricity into the mattress coils." He also had electroshock applied to his
testicles, according to Amnesty International.

78

There is reason to believe that this use of electrical torture on U.S.-captured
prisoners is not isolated, a fact overlooked in almost all the discussions about
whether the U.S. is actually practicing torture or merely "creative interroga­
tion." Jumah al-Dossari, a Guantânamo prisoner who has tried to commit
suicide more than a dozen times, gave written testimoney to his lawyer that
while he was in U.S. custody in Kandahar, "the investigator brought a small
device like a mobile phone but it was an electric shock device. He started
79

shocking my face, my back, my limbs and my genitals." And Murat Kurnaz, originally from Germany, faced similar treatment in a U.S.-run prison
in Kandahar. "It was the beginning, so there were absolutely no rules. They
had the right to do anything. They used to beat us every time. They did use
electroshocks. They dived my head in the water."

80

The Failure to Reconstruct
Near the end of our first meeting, I asked Gail Kastner to tell me more about
her "electric dreams." She told me that she often dreams of rows of patients
slipping in and out of drug-induced sleep. "I hear people screaming, moan­
ing, groaning, people saying no, no, no. I remember what it was like to wake
up in that room, I was covered in sweat, nauseated, vomiting—and I had a
very peculiar feeling in the head. Like I had a blob, not a head." Describing
this, Gail seemed suddenly far away, slumped in her blue chair, her breath
turning into a wheeze. She lowered her eyelids, and beneath them I could
see her eyes fluttering rapidly. She put her hand to her right temple and said
in a voice that sounded thick and drugged, "I'm having a flashback. You
have to distract me. Tell me about Iraq—tell me how bad it was."
I racked my brain for a suitable war story for this strange circumstance
and came up with something relatively benign about life in the Green Zone.
Gail's face slowly relaxed, and her breathing deepened. Her blue eyes once
again fixed on mine. "Thank you," she said. "I was having a flashback."
"I know."

THE TORTURE LAB

47

"How do you know?"
"Because you told me."
She leaned over and wrote something down on a scrap of paper.
After leaving Gail that evening, I kept thinking about what I hadn't said
when she'd asked me to tell her about Iraq. What I had wanted to tell her but
couldn't was that she reminded me of Iraq; that I couldn't help feeling that
what happened to her, a shocked person, and what happened to it, a shocked
country, were somehow connected, different manifestations of the same ter­
rifying logic.
Cameron's theories were based on the idea that shocking his patients into
a chaotic regressed state would create the preconditions for him to "rebirth"
healthy model citizens. It's little comfort to Gail, with her fractured spine
and shattered memories, but in his own writings Cameron envisioned his
acts of destruction as creation, a gift to his fortunate patients who were, un­
der his relentless repatterning, going to be born again.
On this front Cameron was a spectacular failure. No matter how fully he
regressed his patients, they never absorbed or accepted the endlessly re­
peated messages on his tapes. Though he was a genius at destroying people,
he could not remake them. A follow-up study conducted after Cameron left
the Allan Memorial Institute found that 75 percent of his former patients
were worse off after treatment than before they were admitted. O f his pa­
tients who held down full-time jobs before hospitalization, more than half
were no longer able to, and many, like Gail, suffered from a host of new
physical and psychological ailments. "Psychic driving" did not work, not
even a little, and the Allan Memorial Institute eventually banned the prac­
tice.

81

The problem, obvious in retrospect, was the premise on which his entire
theory rested: the idea that before healing can happen, everything that ex­
isted before needs to be wiped out. Cameron was sure that if he blasted away
at the habits, patterns and memories of his patients, he would eventually ar­
rive at that pristine blank slate. But no matter how doggedly he shocked,
drugged and disoriented, he never got there. The opposite proved true: the
more he blasted, the more shattered his patients became. Their minds
weren't "clean"; rather, they were a mess, their memories fractured, their
trust betrayed.
Disaster capitalists share this same inability to distinguish between de­
struction and creation, between hurting and healing. It's a feeling I had fre­
quently when I was in Iraq, nervously scanning the scarred landscape for the

48

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

next explosion. Fervent believers in the redemptive powers of shock, the ar­
chitects of the American-British invasion imagined that their use of force
would be so stunning, so overwhelming, that Iraqis would go into a kind of
suspended animation, much like the one described in the Kubark manual.
In that window of opportunity, Iraq's invaders would slip in another set of
shocks—these ones economic—which would create a model free-market
democracy on the blank slate that was post-invasion Iraq.
But there was no blank slate, only rubble and shattered, angry people —
who, when they resisted, were blasted with more shocks, some of them based
on those experiments performed on Gail Kastner all those years ago. "We're
really good at going out and breaking things. But the day I get to spend more
time here working on construction rather than combat, that will be a very
good day," General Peter W. Chiarelli, commander of the U.S. Army's First
Cavalry Division, observed a year and half after the official end of the war.

82

That day never came. Like Cameron, Iraq's shock doctors can destroy, but
they can't seem to rebuild.

CHAPTER 2

THE OTHER DOCTOR SHOCK
MILTON F R I E D M A N A N D T H E S E A R C H
FOR A L A I S S E Z - F A I R E L A B O R A T O R Y

Economic technocrats m a y be able to structure a tax reform here,
a new social security l a w there, or a modified exchange rate
regime s o m e w h e r e e l s e , but they really never have the luxury of a
clean state on which to s e t u p , in full flower a s it w e r e , their c o m ­
plete preferred economic policy f r a m e w o r k .
—Arnold H a r b e r g e r , University of C h i c a g o e c o n o m i c s professor,
1998

1

There are few academic environments as heavily mythologized as the Uni­
versity of Chicago's Economics Department in the 1950s, a place intensely
conscious of itself not just as a school but as a School of Thought. It was not
just training students; it was building and strengthening the Chicago School
of economics, the brainchild of a coterie of conservative academics whose
ideas represented a revolutionary bulwark against the dominant "statist"
thinking of the day. To step through the doors of the Social Science Build­
ing, under the sign reading "Science Is Measurement," and into the leg­
endary lunchroom, where students tested their intellectual mettle by daring
to challenge their titanic professors, was to seek nothing so prosaic as a de­
gree. It was to enlist in battle. As Gary Becker, the conservative economist
and Nobel Prize winner, put it, "We were warriors in combat with most of
the rest of the profession."

2

Like Ewen Cameron's psychiatric department at McGill in the same period,
the University of Chicago's Economics Department was in the thrall of an ambi­
tious and charismatic man on a mission to fundamentally revolutionize his

50

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

profession. That man was Milton Friedman. Though he had many mentors
and colleagues who believed just as fiercely as he did in ultra laissez-faire, it
was Friedman's energy that gave the school its revolutionary fervor. "People
would always ask me, 'Why are you so excited? Are you going out on a date
with a beautiful woman?' " recalls Becker. "I said, 'No, I'm going to a class in
economics!' Being a student of Milton's was magic indeed."

5

Friedman's mission, like Cameron's, rested on a dream of reaching back
to a state of "natural" health, when all was in balance, before human inter­
ferences created distorting patterns. Where Cameron dreamed of returning
the human mind to that pristine state, Friedman dreamed of depatterning
societies, of returning them to a state of pure capitalism, cleansed of all
interruptions—government regulations, trade barriers and entrenched inter­
ests. Also like Cameron, Friedman believed that when the economy is highly
distorted, the only way to reach that prelapsarian state was to deliberately in­
flict painful shocks: only "bitter medicine" could clear those distortions and
bad patterns out of the way. Cameron used electricity to inflict his shocks;
Friedman's tool of choice was policy—the shock treatment approach he
urged on bold politicians for countries in distress. Unlike Cameron, how­
ever, who was able to instantly apply his pet theories on his unwitting pa­
tients, Friedman would need two decades and several twists and turns of
history before he too got the chance to put his dreams of radical erasure and
creation into action in the real world.
Frank Knight, one of the founders of Chicago School economics, thought
professors should "inculcate" in their students the belief that each economic
4

theory is "a sacred feature of the system," not a debatable hypothesis. The
core of such sacred Chicago teachings was that the economic forces of sup­
ply, demand, inflation and unemployment were like the forces of nature,
fixed and unchanging. In the truly free market imagined in Chicago classes
and texts, these forces existed in perfect equilibrium, supply communicating
with demand the way the moon pulls the tides. If economies suffered from
high inflation, it was, according to Friedman's strict theory of monetarism, in­
variably because misguided policy makers had allowed too much money to
enter the system, rather than letting the market find its balance. Just as ecosys­
tems self-regulate, keeping themselves in balance, the market, left to its own
devices, would create just the right number of products at precisely the right
prices, produced by workers at just the right wages to buy those products—an
Eden of plentiful employment, boundless creativity and zero inflation.

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

51

According to the Harvard sociologist Daniel Bell, this love of an idealized
system is the defining quality of radical free-market economics. Capitalism is
envisaged as "a jeweled set of movements" or a "celestial clockwork . . . a
work of art, so compelling that one thinks of the celebrated pictures of
Apelles who painted a cluster of grapes so realistic that the birds would come
and pick at them."

5

The challenge for Friedman and his colleagues was how to prove that a
real-world market could live up to their rapturous imaginings. Friedman al­
ways prided himself on approaching economics as a science as hard and rigor­
ous as physics or chemistry. But hard scientists could point to the behavior of
the elements to prove their theories. Friedman could not point to any living
economy that proved that if all "distortions" were stripped away, what would
be left would be a society in perfect health and bounteous, since no country in
the world met the criteria for perfect laissez-faire. Unable to test their theories
in central banks and ministries of trade, Friedman and his colleagues had to
settle for elaborate and ingenious mathematical equations and computer mod­
els mapped out in the basement workshops of the social sciences building.
A love of numbers and systems is what had led Friedman to economics.
In his autobiography, he says his moment of epiphany came when a highschool geometry teacher wrote the Pythagorean theorem on the blackboard
and then, awed by its elegance, quoted from John Keats's "Ode on a Grecian
Urn": " 'Beauty is truth, truth beauty/— that is all / Ye know on earth, and all
6

ye need to know." Friedman passed on that same ecstatic love of a beautiful
all-encompassing system to generations of economics scholars —along with
a search for simplicity, elegance and rigor.
Like all fundamentalist faiths, Chicago School economics is, for its true
believers, a closed loop. The starting premise is that the free market is a per­
fect scientific system, one in which individuals, acting on their own selfinterested desires, create the maximum benefits for all. It follows ineluctably
that if something is wrong within a free-market economy—high inflation or
soaring unemployment—it has to be because the market is not truly free.
There must be some interference, some distortion in the system. The
Chicago solution is always the same: a stricter and more complete applica­
tion of the fundamentals.
When Friedman died in 2006, obituary writers struggled to summarize
the breadth of his legacy. One settled on this statement: "Milton's mantra of
free markets, free prices, consumer choice and economic liberty is responsible

52

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE
7

for the global prosperity we enjoy today." This is partially true. The nature
of that global prosperity—who shares in it, who doesn't, where it came
from—are all highly contested, of course. What is irrefutable is the fact that
Friedman's free-market rulebook, and his savvy strategies for imposing it,
have made some people extremely prosperous, winning for them something
approximating complete freedom—to ignore national borders, to avoid reg­
ulation and taxation and to amass new wealth.
This knack for thinking highly profitable thoughts appears to have its
roots in Friedman's early childhood, when his parents, immigrants from
Hungary, bought a garment factory in Rahway, New Jersey. The family apart­
ment was in the same building as the shop floor, which, Friedman wrote,
8

"would be termed a sweatshop today." Those were volatile times for sweat­
shop owners, with Marxists and anarchists organizing immigrant workers
into unions to demand safety regulations and weekends off—and debating
the theory of worker ownership at after-shift meetings. As the boss's son,
Friedman no doubt heard a very different perspective on these debates. In
the end, his father's factory went under, but in lectures and television ap­
pearances, Friedman spoke of it often, invoking it as a case study for the ben­
efits of deregulated capitalism—proof that even the worst, least-regulated
jobs offer the first rung on the ladder to freedom and prosperity.
A large part of the appeal of Chicago School economics was that, at a
time when radical-left ideas about workers' power were gaining ground
around the world, it provided a way to defend the interests of owners that was
just as radical and was infused with its own claims to idealism. To hear Fried­
man tell it, his ideas were not about defending the right of factory owners to
pay low wages but, rather, all about a quest for the purest possible form of
"participatory democracy" because in the free market, "each man can vote,
9

as it were, for the color of tie he wants." Where leftists promised freedom for
workers from bosses, citizens from dictatorship, countries from colonialism,
Friedman promised "individual freedom," a project that elevated atomized
citizens above any collective enterprise and liberated them to express their
absolute free will through their consumer choices. "What was particularly
exciting were the same qualities that made Marxism so appealing to many
other young people at the time," recalled the economist Don Patinkin, who
studied at Chicago in the forties—"simplicity together with apparent logical
10

completeness; idealism combined with radicalism." The Marxists had their
workers' Utopia, and the Chicagoans had their entrepreneurs' Utopia, both
claiming that if they got their way, perfection and balance would follow.

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

53

The question, as always, was how to get to that wondrous place from here.
The Marxists were clear: revolution—get rid of the current system, replace
it with socialism. For the Chicagoans, the answer was not as straightforward.
The United States was already a capitalist country, but as far as they were
concerned, just barely. In the U.S., and in all supposedly capitalist economies,
the Chicagoans saw interferences everywhere. To make products more af­
fordable, politicians fixed prices; to make workers less exploited, they set
minimum wages; to make sure everyone had access to education, they kept
it in the hands of the state. These measures often seemed to help people,
but Friedman and his colleagues were convinced—and they "proved" it
with their models—that they were actually doing untold harm to the equi­
librium of the market and the ability of its various signals to communicate
with each other. The mission of the Chicago School was thus one of
purification—stripping the market of these interruptions so that the free
market could sing.
For this reason, Chicagoans did not see Marxism as their true enemy. The
real source of the trouble was to be found in the ideas of the Keynesians in
the United States, the social democrats in Europe and the developmentalists
in what was then called the Third World. These were believers not in a
Utopia but in a mixed economy, to Chicago eyes an ugly hodgepodge of cap­
italism for the manufacture and distribution of consumer products, social­
ism in education, state ownership for essentials like water services, and all
kinds of laws designed to temper the extremes of capitalism. Like the reli­
gious fundamentalist who has a grudging respect for fundamentalists of other
faiths and for avowed atheists but disdains the casual believer, the Chicagoans
declared war on these mix-and-match economists. What they wanted was
not a revolution exactly but a capitalist Reformation: a return to uncontaminated capitalism.
Much of this purism came from Friedrich Hayek, Friedman's own per­
sonal guru, who also taught at the University of Chicago for a stretch in the
1950s. The austere Austrian warned that any government involvement in
the economy would lead society down "the road to serfdom" and had to be ex­
11

punged. According to Arnold Harberger, a longtime professor at Chicago,
"the Austrians," as this clique-within-a-clique was called, were so zealous that
any state interference was not just wrong, but "evil. . . . It's as if there is a very
pretty but highly complex picture out there, which is perfectly harmonious
within itself, you see, and if there's a speck where it isn't supposed to be,
well, that's just awful... it is a flaw that mars that beauty."

12

54

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

In 1947, when Friedman first joined with Hayek to form the Mont Pèlerin
Society, a club of free-market economists named for its location in Switzerland, the idea that business should be left alone to govern the world as it
wished was one barely suitable for polite company. Memories of the market
crash of 1929 and the Great Depression that followed were still fresh—the
life savings destroyed overnight, the suicides, the soup kitchens, the refugees.
The scale of this market-created disaster had led to a surging demand for
a distinctly hands-on form of government. The Depression did not signal the
end of capitalism, but it was, as John Maynard Keynes forecast a few years
earlier, "the end of laissez-faire"—the

end of letting the market regulate it-

13

self. The 1930s through to the early 1950s was a time of unabashed faire:
the can-do ethos of the New Deal gave way to the war effort, with public
works programs launched to create much-needed jobs, and new social programs unveiled to prevent growing numbers of people from turning hard left.
It was a time when compromise between left and right was not a dirty word
but part of what many saw as a noble mission to prevent a world, as Keynes
wrote to President Franklin D. Roosevelt in 1933, in which "orthodoxy and
revolution" are left "to fight it out."

14

John Kenneth Galbraith, heir to

Keynes's mantle in the U.S., described the prime missions of politicians and
economists alike as "the avoidance of depression and the prevention of unemployment."

15

The Second World War lent new urgency to the war against poverty.
Nazism had taken root in Germany at a time when the country was in a devastating depression, provoked by the punishing reparations imposed after
the First World War and deepened by the 1929 crash. Keynes had warned
early on that if the world took a laissez-faire approach to Germany's poverty,
the blowback would be ferocious: "Vengeance, I dare predict, will not
16

limp." Those words went unheeded at the time, but when Europe was rebuilt after the Second World War, the Western powers embraced the principle that market economies needed to guarantee enough basic dignity that
disillusioned citizens would not go looking once again for a more appealing
ideology, whether fascism or Communism. It was this pragmatic imperative
that led to the creation of almost everything that we associate today with the
bygone days of "decent" capitalism —social security in the U.S., publichealth care in Canada, welfare in Britain, workers' protections in France
and Germany.
A similar, more radical mood was on the rise in the developing world,
usually going under the name developmentalism, or Third World nationalism.

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

55

Developmentalist economists argued that their countries would finally es­
cape the cycle of poverty only if they pursued an inward-oriented industrial­
ization strategy instead of relying on the export of natural resources, whose
prices had been on a declining path, to Europe and North America. They
advocated regulating or even nationalizing oil, minerals and other key in­
dustries so that a healthy share of the proceeds fed a government-led devel­
opment process.
By the 1950s, the developmentalists, like the Keynesians and social demo­
crats in rich countries, were able to boast a series of impressive success sto­
ries. The most advanced laboratory of developmentalism was the southern
tip of Latin America, known as the Southern Cone: Chile, Argentina,
Uruguay and parts of Brazil. The epicenter was the United Nations' Eco­
nomic Commission for Latin America, based in Santiago, Chile, and headed
by the economist Raul Prebisch from 1950 to 1963. Prebisch trained teams
of economists in developmentalist theory and dispatched them to act as pol­
icy advisers for governments across the continent. Nationalist politicians like
Argentina's Juan Peron put their ideas into practice with a vengeance, pour­
ing public money into infrastructure projects such as highways and steel
plants, giving local businesses generous subsidies to build their new facto­
ries, churning out cars and washing machines, and keeping out foreign im­
ports with forbiddingly high tariffs.
During this dizzying period of expansion, the Southern Cone began to
look more like Europe and North America than the rest of Latin America or
other parts of the Third World. The workers in the new factories formed
powerful unions that negotiated middle-class salaries, and their children
were sent off to study at newly built public universities. The yawning gap be­
tween the region's polo-club elite and its peasant masses began to narrow. By
the 1950s, Argentina had the largest middle class on the continent, and nextdoor Uruguay had a literacy rate of 95 percent and offered free health care
for all citizens. Developmentalism was so staggeringly successful for a time
that the Southern Cone of Latin America became a potent symbol for poor
countries around the world: here was proof that with smart, practical poli­
cies, aggressively implemented, the class divide between the First and Third
World could actually be closed.
All this success for managed economies —in the Keynesian north and the
developmentalist south —made for dark days at the University of Chicago's
Economics Department. The Chicagoans' academic archrivals at Harvard,
Yale and Oxford were being enlisted by presidents and prime ministers to

56

THE S H O C K

DOCTRINE

help tame the beast of the market; almost no one was interested in Fried­
man's daring ideas about letting it run even more wildly than before. There
were, however, a few people left who were keenly interested in Chicago
School ideas —and they were a powerful few.
For the heads of U.S. multinational corporations, contending with a dis­
tinctly less hospitable developing world and with stronger, more demanding
unions at home, the postwar boom years were unsettling times. The econ­
omy was growing fast, enormous wealth was being created, but owners and
shareholders were forced to redistribute a great deal of that wealth through
corporate taxes and workers' salaries. Everyone was doing well, but with a re­
turn to the pre-New Deal rules, a few people could have been doing a lot
better.
The Keynesian revolution against laissez-faire was costing the corporate
sector dearly. Clearly what was needed to regain lost ground was a counter­
revolution against Keynesianism, a return to a form of capitalism even less
regulated than before the Depression. This wasn't a crusade that Wall Street
itself could lead —not in the current climate. If Friedman's close friend Wal­
ter Wriston, head of Citibank, had come forward and argued that the mini­
mum wage and corporate taxes should both be abolished, he naturally
would have been accused of being a robber baron. And that's where the
Chicago School came in. It quickly became clear that when Friedman, a
brilliant mathematician and skilled debater, made those same arguments,
they took on an entirely different quality. They might be dismissed as wrongheaded but they were imbued with an aura of scientific impartiality. The
enormous benefit of having corporate views funneled through academic,
or quasi-academic, institutions not only kept the Chicago School flush with
donations but, in short order, spawned the global network of right-wing
think tanks that would churn out the counterrevolution's foot soldiers world­
wide.
It all came back to Friedman's single-minded message: everything went wrong
with the New Deal. That's when so many countries "including my own, got off
17

on the wrong track." To get governments back on the right track, Friedman,
in his first popular book, Capitalism

and Freedom,

laid out what would be­

come the global free-market rulebook and, in the U.S., would form the eco­
nomic agenda of the neoconservative movement.
First, governments must remove all rules and regulations standing in the
way of the accumulation of profits. Second, they should sell off any assets

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

57

they own that corporations could be running at a profit. And third, they
should dramatically cut back funding of social programs. Within the threepart formula of deregulation, privatization and cutbacks, Friedman had
plenty of specifics. Taxes, when they must exist, should be low, and rich and
poor should be taxed at the same flat rate. Corporations should be free to
sell their products anywhere in the world, and governments should make
no effort to protect local industries or local ownership. All prices, including
the price of labor, should be determined by the market. There should be no
minimum wage. For privatization, Friedman offered up health care, the
post office, education, retirement pensions, even national parks. In short,
and quite unabashedly, he was calling for the breaking of the New Deal —
that uneasy truce between the state, corporations and labor that had pre­
vented popular revolt after the Great Depression. Whatever protections
workers had managed to win, whatever services the state now provided to
soften the edges of the market, the Chicago School counterrevolution
wanted them back.
And it wanted more than that—it wanted to expropriate what workers and
governments had built during those decades of frenetic public works. The
assets that Friedman urged government to sell were the end products of the
years of investment of public money and know-how that had built them and
made them valuable. As far as Friedman was concerned, all this shared
wealth should be transferred into private hands, on principle.
Though always cloaked in the language of math and science, Friedman's
vision coincided precisely with the interests of large multinationals, which
by nature hunger for vast new unregulated markets. In the first stage of capi­
talist expansion, that kind of ravenous growth was provided by colonialism —
by "discovering" new territories and grabbing land without paying for it, then
extracting riches from the earth without compensating local populations.
Friedman's war on the "welfare state" and "big government" held out the
promise of a new font of rapid riches —only this time, rather than conquer­
ing new territory, the state itself would be the new frontier, its public services
and assets auctioned off for far less than they were worth.

The War against Developmentalism
In the United States of the 1950s, access to those kinds of riches was still de­
cades away. Even with a hard-core Republican like Dwight Eisenhower in
the White House, there was no chance of a radical right turn like the one the

58

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Chicagoans were suggesting—public services and workers' protections were
far too popular, and Eisenhower was looking to the next election. Although
he had little appetite for reversing Keynesianism at home, Eisenhower
proved eager to take swift and radical action to defeat developmentalism
abroad. It was a campaign in which the University of Chicago would even­
tually play a pivotal role.
When Eisenhower took office in 1953, Iran had a developmentalist leader
in Mohammad Mossadegh, who had already nationalized the oil company,
and Indonesia was in the hands of the increasingly ambitious Achmed
Sukarno, who was talking about linking up all the nationalist governments of
the Third World into a superpower on par with the West and the Soviet Bloc.
Of particular concern to the State Department was the growing success of
nationalist economics in the Southern Cone of Latin America. At a time
when large portions of the globe were turning to Stalinism and Maoism, de­
velopmentalist proposals for "import substitution" were actually quite cen­
trist. Still, the idea that Latin America deserved its own New Deal had
powerful enemies. The continent's feudal landowners had been happy with
the old status quo, which supplied them with steep profits and a limitless
pool of poor peasants to work in the fields and mines. Now, they were out­
raged to see their profits being diverted to build up other sectors, their work­
ers demanding land redistribution, and the government keeping the price of
their crops artificially low so food could be affordable. American and Euro­
pean corporations doing business in Latin America began to express similar
complaints to their governments: their products were being blocked at the
borders, their workers were demanding higher wages and, most alarmingly,
there was growing talk that everything from foreign-owned mines to banks
could be nationalized to finance Latin America's dream of economic inde­
pendence.
Under pressure from these corporate interests, a movement took hold in
American and British foreign policy circles that attempted to pull develop­
mentalist governments into the binary logic of the Cold War. Don't be
fooled by the moderate, democratic veneer, these hawks warned: Third
World nationalism was the first step on the road to totalitarian Communism
and should be nipped in the bud. Two of the chief proponents of this theory
were John Foster Dulles, Eisenhower's secretary of state, and his brother
Allen Dulles, head of the newly created CIA. Before taking public posts,
both had worked at the legendary New York law firm Sullivan & Cromwell,

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

59

where they represented many of the companies that had the most to lose
from developmentalism, among them J. P. Morgan & Company, the Inter­
national Nickel Company, the Cuban Sugar Cane Corporation and the
18

United Fruit Company. The results of the Dulleses' ascendancy were im­
mediate: in 1953 and 1954, the CIA staged its first two coups d'état, both
against Third World governments that identified far more with Keynes than
with Stalin.
The first was in 1953, when a CIA plot successfully overthrew Mossadegh
in Iran, replacing him with the brutal shah. The next was the 1954 CIAsponsored coup in Guatemala, done at the direct behest of the United Fruit
Company. The corporation, which still had the ear of the Dulles brothers
from their Cromwell days, was indignant that President Jacobo Arbenz
Guzman had expropriated some of its unused land (with full compensation)
as part of his project to transform Guatemala, as he put it, "from a backward
country with a predominantly feudal economy into a modern capitalist
state"—apparently an unacceptable goal.

19

Soon enough Arbenz was out,

and United Fruit was back in charge.
Eradicating developmentalism in the Southern Cone, where it had taken
far deeper root, was a much greater challenge. Figuring out how to achieve
that goal was the topic of discussion between two American men as they met
in Santiago, Chile, in 1953. One was Albion Patterson, director of the U.S.
International Cooperation Administration in Chile—the agency that would
later become USAID—and the other was Theodore W. Schultz, chairman
of the Department of Economics at the University of Chicago. Patterson had
become increasingly concerned about the maddening influence of Raul
Prebisch and Latin America's other "pink" economists. "What we need to do
is change the formation of the men, to influence the education, which is
20

very bad," he had stressed to a colleague. This objective coincided with
Schultz's own belief that the U.S. government wasn't doing enough to fight
the intellectual war with Marxism. "The United States must take stock of its
economic programs abroad . . . we want [the poor countries] to work out
their economic salvation by relating themselves to us and by using our way
of achieving their economic development," he said.

21

The two men came up with a plan that would eventually turn Santiago,
a hotbed of state-centered economics, into its opposite—a laboratory for
cutting-edge free-market experiments, giving Milton Friedman what he had
longed for: a country in which to test his cherished theories. The original

60

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

plan was simple: the U.S. government would pay to send Chilean students to
study economics at what pretty much everyone recognized was the most rab­
idly anti-"pink" school in the world—the University of Chicago. Schultz and
his colleagues at the university would also be paid to travel to Santiago to
conduct research into the Chilean economy and to train students and pro­
fessors in Chicago School fundamentals.
What set the plan apart from other U.S. training programs that sponsored
Latin American students, of which there were many, was its unabashedly
ideological character. By selecting Chicago to train Chileans—a school
where the professors agitated for the near-complete dismantling of govern­
ment with single-minded focus—the U.S. State Department was firing a
shot across the bow in its war against developmentalism, effectively telling
Chileans that the U.S. government had decided what ideas their elite stu­
dents should and should not learn. This was such blatant U.S. intervention
in Latin American affairs that when Albion Patterson approached the dean
of the University of Chile, the country's premiere university, and offered him
a grant to set up the exchange program, the dean turned him down. He said
he would participate only if his faculty had input into who in the U.S. was
training his students. Patterson went on to approach the dean of a lesser in­
stitution, Chile's Catholic University, a much more conservative school with
no economics department. The dean at the Catholic University jumped at
the offer, and what became known in Washington and Chicago as "the
Chile Project" was born.
"We came here to compete, not to collaborate," said Schultz of the Univer­
sity of Chicago, explaining why the program would be closed to all Chilean
22

students but the few selected. This combative stance was explicit from the
start: the goal of the Chile Project was to produce ideological warriors who
would win the battle of ideas against Latin America's "pink" economists.
Officially launched in 1956, the project saw one hundred Chilean stu­
dents pursue advanced degrees at the University of Chicago between 1957
and 1970, their tuition and expenses paid for by U.S. taxpayers and U.S.
foundations. In 1965, the program was expanded to include students from
across Latin America, with particularly heavy participation from Argentina,
Brazil and Mexico. The expansion was funded through a grant from the
Ford Foundation and led to the creation of the Center for Latin American
Economic Studies at the University of Chicago. Under the program, there
were forty to fifty Latin Americans studying graduate-level economics at any
given time —roughly one-third of the department's total student population.

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

61

In comparable programs at Harvard or MIT, there were just four or five
Latin Americans. It was a startling achievement: in just a decade, the ultraconservative University of Chicago had become the premier destination for
Latin Americans wanting to study economics abroad, a fact that would
shape the course of the region's history for decades to come.
Indoctrinating the visitors in Chicago School orthodoxy became a press­
ing institutional priority. The head of the program, and the man in charge of
making the Latin Americans feel welcome, was Arnold Harberger, a safarisuit-wearing economist who spoke fluent Spanish, had married a Chilean
23

and described himself as "a seriously dedicated missionary." When the
Chilean students started arriving, Harberger created a special "Chile work­
shop" where University of Chicago professors presented their highly ideolog­
ical diagnosis of what was wrong with the South American country—and
offered their scientific prescriptions on how to fix it.
"Suddenly, Chile and its economy became a topic of daily conversation
in the Department of Economics," recalled André Gunder Frank, who
studied under Friedman in the 1950s and went on to become a world24

renowned development economist. All of Chile's policies were put under
the microscope and found wanting: its strong social safety net, its protec­
tions for national industry, its trade barriers, its controls on prices. Students
were taught disdain for these attempts to alleviate poverty, and many of
them devoted their PhD theses to dissecting the follies of Latin American
25

developmentalism. When Harberger would return from his frequent trips
to Santiago in the fifties and sixties, Gunder Frank recalled that he would
lambaste Santiago, Chile's health and education systems—the best on
the continent—as "absurd attempts to live beyond its underdeveloped
means.

L 0

Within the Ford Foundation, there were concerns about financing such
an overtly ideological program. Some pointed out that the only Latin Amer­
ican speakers invited to address the students in Chicago were alumni of the
same program. "Although the quality and impact of this endeavor cannot be
denied, its ideological narrowness constituted a serious deficiency," wrote
Jeffrey Puryear, a Latin American specialist with Ford, in one of the founda­
tion's internal reviews. "The interests of developing countries are not well27

served by exposure to a single point of view." This assessment did not stop
Ford from continuing to fund the program.
When the first group of Chileans returned home from Chicago, they
were "even more Friedmanite than Friedman himself," in the words of

62

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

28

Mario Zanartu, an economist at Santiago's Catholic University.* Many
took up posts as economics professors in the Catholic University Economics
Department, rapidly turning it into their own little Chicago School in the
middle of Santiago—the same curriculum, the same English-language texts,
the same unyielding claim to "pure" and "scientific" knowledge. By 1963,
twelve of the department's thirteen full-time faculty members were gradu­
ates of the University of Chicago program, and Sergio de Castro, one of the
first graduates, was appointed faculty chairman.

29

Now Chilean students

didn't need to travel all the way to the U.S.—hundreds could get a Chicago
School education without leaving home.
The students who went through the program, whether in Chicago or its
franchise operation in Santiago, became known throughout the region as "los
Chicago Boys." With more funding from USAID, Chile's Chicago Boys be­
came enthusiastic regional ambassadors for ideas Latin Americans call "neoliberalism," traveling to Argentina and Colombia to set up more University of
Chicago franchises in order to "expand this knowledge throughout Latin
America, confronting the ideological positions which prevented freedom and
perpetuated poverty and backwardness," according to one Chilean graduate.

30

Juan Gabriel Valdés, Chile's foreign minister in the 1990s, described the
process of training hundreds of Chilean economists in Chicago School or­
thodoxy as "a striking example of an organized transfer of ideology from the
United States to a country within its direct sphere of influence . . . the edu­
cation of these Chileans derived from a specific project designed in the
1950s to influence the development of Chilean economic thinking." He
pointed out that "they introduced into Chilean society ideas that were com­
pletely new, concepts entirely absent from the 'ideas market.' "

31

As a form of intellectual imperialism, it was certainly unabashed. There was,
however, a problem: it wasn't working. According to a 1957 report from the
University of Chicago to its funders at the State Department, "the central pur­
pose of the project" was to train a generation of students "who would become
32

the intellectual leaders in economic affairs in Chile." But the Chicago Boys
weren't leading their countries anywhere—in fact, they were being left behind.
In the early sixties, the main economic debate in the Southern Cone was

* Walter Heller, the famed Kennedy-government economist, once mocked the cultishness of
Friedman's followers by dividing them into categories: " S o m e are Friedmanly, some Friedmanian, some Friedmanesque, some Friedmanic and some Friedmaniacs."

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

63

not about laissez-faire capitalism versus developmentalism but about how
best to take developmentalism to the next stage. Marxists argued for exten­
sive nationalization and radical land reforms; centrists argued that the key
was greater economic cooperation among Latin American countries, with
the goal of transforming the region into a powerful trading bloc to rival Eu­
rope and North America. At the polls and on the streets, the Southern Cone
was surging to the left.
In 1962, Brazil moved decisively in this direction under the presidency of
Joào Goulart, an economic nationalist committed to land redistribution,
higher salaries and a daring plan to force foreign multinationals to reinvest a
percentage of their profits back into the Brazilian economy rather than spirit­
ing them out of the country and distributing them to shareholders in New York
and London. In Argentina, a military government was trying to defeat similar
demands by banning the party of Juan Perôn from running in elections, but
the move had only radicalized a new generation of young Peronists, many of
whom were willing to use arms to retake the country.
It was in Chile—the epicenter of the Chicago experiment—that defeat in
the battle of ideas was most evident. By Chile's historic 1970 elections, the
country had moved so far left that all three major political parties were in favor
of nationalizing the country's largest source of revenue: the copper mines then
53

controlled by U.S. mining giants. The Chile Project, in other words, was an
expensive bust. As ideological warriors waging a peaceful battle of ideas with
their left-wing foes, the Chicago Boys had failed in their mission. Not only was
the economic debate continuing to shift leftward, but the Chicago Boys were
so marginal that they did not even register on the Chilean electoral spectrum.
It might have ended there, with the Chile Project just a minor historical
footnote, but something happened to rescue the Chicago Boys from obscu­
rity: Richard Nixon was elected president of the United States. Nixon "had
an imaginative, and on the whole effective, foreign policy," Friedman en­
34

thused. And nowhere was it more imaginative than in Chile.
It was Nixon who would give the Chicago Boys and their professors some­
thing they had long dreamed of: a chance to prove that their capitalist Utopia
was more than a theory in a basement workshop—a shot at remaking a coun­
try from scratch. Democracy had been inhospitable to the Chicago Boys in
Chile; dictatorship would prove an easier fit.
Salvador Allende's Popular Unity government won Chile's 1970 elections on a
platform promising to put into government hands large sectors of the economy

64

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

that were being run by foreign and local corporations. Allende was a new breed
of Latin American revolutionary: like Che Guevara, he was a doctor, but un­
like Che, he looked the part of the tweedy academic, not the romantic guer­
rilla. He could deliver a stump speech as fiery as any by Fidel Castro, but he
was a fierce democrat who believed that socialist change in Chile needed to
come through the ballot box, not the barrel of a gun. When Nixon heard that
Allende had been elected president, he famously ordered the CIA director,
35

Richard Helms, to "make the economy scream." The election also reverber­
ated throughout the University of Chicago Economics Department. When Al­
lende won, Arnold Harberger happened to be in Chile. He wrote a letter home
to his colleagues describing the event as a "tragedy" and informing them that
"in rightist circles the idea of a military takeover is also sometimes broached."

36

Although Allende pledged to negotiate fair terms to compensate compa­
nies that were losing property and investments, U.S. multinationals feared
that Allende represented the beginning of a Latin America-wide trend, and
many were unwilling to accept the prospect of losing what was a growing
portion of their bottom line. By 1968, 20 percent of total U.S. foreign invest­
ment was tied up in Latin America, and U.S. firms had 5,436 subsidiaries in
the region. The profits that these investments were able to produce were
staggering. Mining companies had invested $1 billion over the previous fifty
years in Chile's copper mining industry—the largest in the world—but they
had sent $7.2 billion home.

37

As soon as Allende won the vote, and before he was even inaugurated,
corporate America declared war on his administration. The center of activity
was the Washington-based Ad Hoc Committee on Chile, a group that in­
cluded the major U.S. mining companies with holdings in Chile, as well as
the de facto leader of the committee, the International Telephone and Tele­
graph Company (ITT), which owned 70 percent of Chile's soon-to-benationalized

phone

company. Purina,

Bank of America and

Pfizer

Chemical also sent delegates at various stages.
The

committee's single purpose was to force Allende to back off his
38

nationalizations "by confronting him with economic collapse." They had
many ideas for how to make Allende feel the pain. According to declassified
meeting minutes, the companies planned to block U.S. loans to Chile and
"quietly have large U.S. private banks do the same. Confer with foreign
banking sources with the same thing in mind. Delay buying from Chile over
the next six months. Use U.S. copper stockpile instead of buying from Chile.
Bring about a scarcity of U.S. dollars in Chile." And the list goes on.

39

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

65

Allende appointed his close friend Orlando Letelier to be his ambassador
to Washington; that gave him the task of negotiating the terms of expropria­
tion with the same corporations plotting to sabotage the Allende government.
Letelier, a fun-loving extrovert with a quintessential seventies moustache
and a devastating singing voice, was much beloved in diplomatic circles. His
son Francisco's fondest memories are of listening to his father play the guitar
and belt out folk songs at gatherings of friends in their Washington home.

40

But even with all Letelier's charm and skill, the negotiations never stood a
chance of success.
In March 1972, in the midst of Letelier's tense negotiation with ITT, Jack
Anderson, a syndicated newspaper columnist, published an explosive series
of articles based on documents that showed that the telephone company had
secretly plotted with the CIA and the State Department to block Allende
from being inaugurated two years earlier. In the face of these allegations,
and with Allende still in power, the U.S. Senate, controlled by Democrats,
launched an investigation and uncovered a far-reaching conspiracy in
which I T T had offered $1 million in bribes to Chilean opposition forces and
"sought to engage the CIA in a plan covertly to manipulate the outcome of
the Chilean presidential election."

41

The Senate report, released in June 1973, also found that when the plan
failed and Allende took power, I T T moved to a new strategy designed to en­
sure that he would not "make it through the next six months." Most alarming
to the Senate was the relationship between I T T executives and the U.S. gov­
ernment. In testimony and documents, it became clear that I T T was directly
involved in shaping U.S. policy toward Chile at the highest level. At one
point, a senior I T T executive wrote to National Security Adviser Henry
Kissinger and suggested that "without informing President Allende, all U.S.
aid funds already committed to Chile should be placed in the 'under review'
status." The company also took the liberty of preparing an eighteen-point
strategy for the Nixon administration that contained a clear call for a military
coup: "Get to reliable sources within the Chilean military," it stated
". . . build up their planned discontent against Allende, thus, bring about ne­
cessity of his removal."

42

When grilled by the Senate committee about his brazen attempts to har­
ness the force of the U.S. government to subvert Chile's constitutional pro­
cess in order to further ITT's own economic interests, the company's vice
president, Ned Gerrity, seemed genuinely confused. "What's wrong with tak­
ing care of No. 1?" he asked. The committee offered a response in its report:

66

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

"'No. 1' should not be allowed an undue role in determining U.S. foreign
policy."

43

Yet despite years of relentless American dirty tricks, of which I T T was
only the most scrutinized example, in 1973 Allende was still in power. Eight
million dollars in covert spending had failed to weaken his base. In midterm
parliamentary elections that year, Allende's party actually gained support be­
yond the number that had first elected it in 1970. Clearly, the desire for a dif­
ferent economic model had taken deep root in Chile, and support for a
socialist alternative was growing. For Allende's opponents, who had been
plotting his overthrow since the day the 1970 election results came in, that
meant their problems would not be solved by simply getting rid of him —
someone else would just come along and replace him. A more radical plan
was needed.

Lessons in Regime Change: Brazil and Indonesia
There were two models of "regime change" that Allende's opponents had
been studying closely as possible approaches. One was in Brazil, the other in
Indonesia. When Brazil's U.S.-backed junta, led by General Humberto
Castello Branco, seized power in 1964, the military had a plan not merely to
reverse Joâo Goulart's pro-poor programs but to crack Brazil wide open to for­
eign investment. At first, the Brazilian generals tried to impose the agenda
relatively peacefully—there were no obvious shows of brutality, no mass ar­
rests, and though it was later discovered that some "subversives" had been
brutally tortured during this period, their numbers were small enough (and
Brazil so large) that word of their treatment barely escaped the jails. The
junta also made a point of keeping some remnants of democracy in place,
including limited press freedoms and freedom of assembly—a so-called gen­
tlemen's coup.
In the late sixties, many citizens decided to use those limited freedoms to
express their anger at Brazil's deepening poverty, for which they blamed the
junta's pro-business economic program, much of it designed by graduates of
the University of Chicago. By 1968 the streets were overrun with antijunta
marches, the largest led by students, and the regime was in serious jeopardy.
In a desperate bid to hold on to power, the military radically changed tactics:
democracy was shut down completely, all civil liberties were crushed, tor­
ture became systematic, and, according to Brazil's later-established truth
commission, "killings by the state became routine."

44

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

67

Indonesia's 1965 coup followed a very different trajectory. Since the Sec­
ond World War, the country had been led by President Sukarno, the Hugo
Chavez of his day (though minus Chavez's appetite for elections). Sukarno
enraged the rich countries by protecting Indonesia's economy, redistribut­
ing wealth and throwing out the International Monetary Fund and the
World Bank, which he accused of being facades for the interests of Western
multinationals. While Sukarno was a nationalist, not a Communist, he
worked closely with the Communist Party, which had 3 million active mem­
bers. The U.S. and British governments were determined to end Sukarno's
rule, and declassified documents show that the CIA had received high-level
directions to "liquidate President Sukarno, depending upon the situation
and available opportunities."

45

After several false starts, the opportunity came in October 1965, when
General Suharto, backed by the CIA, began the process of seizing power and
eradicating the left. The CIA had been quietly compiling a list of the coun­
try's leading leftists, a document that fell into Suharto's hands, while the Pen­
tagon helped out by supplying extra weapons and field radios so Indonesian
forces could communicate in the remotest parts of the archipelago. Suharto
then sent out his soldiers to hunt down the four to five thousand leftists on
his "shooting lists," as the CIA referred to them; the U.S. embassy received
46

regular reports on their progress. As the information came in, the CIA
crossed names off their lists until they were satisfied that the Indonesian left
had been annihilated. One of the people involved in the operation was
Robert J. Martens, who worked for the U.S. embassy in Jakarta. "It really was
a big help to the army," he told the journalist Kathy Kadane twenty-five years
later. "They probably killed a lot of people, and I probably have a lot of blood
on my hands, but that's not all bad. There's a time when you have to strike
hard at a decisive moment."

47

The shooting lists covered the targeted killing; the more indiscriminate
massacres for which Suharto is infamous were, for the most part, delegated
to religious students. They were quickly trained by the military and then sent
into villages on instructions from the chief of the navy to "sweep" the coun­
tryside of Communists. "With relish," wrote one reporter, "they called out
their followers, stuck their knives and pistols in their waistbands, swung their
clubs over their shoulders, and embarked on the assignment for which they
had long been hoping."

48

In just over a month, at least half a million and

possibly as many as 1 million people were killed, "massacred by the thou­
49

sands," according to Time. In East Java, "Travelers from those areas tell of

68

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

small rivers and streams that have been literally clogged with bodies; river
transportation has at places been impeded."

50

The Indonesian experience attracted close attention from the individuals
and institutions plotting the overthrow of Salvador Allende in Washington
and Santiago. O f interest was not only Suharto's brutality but also the ex­
traordinary role played by a group of Indonesian economists who had been
educated at the University of California at Berkeley, known as the Berkeley
Mafia. Suharto was effective at getting rid of the left, but it was the Berke­
ley Mafia who prepared the economic blueprint for the country's future.
The parallels with the Chicago Boys were striking. The Berkeley Mafia
had studied in the U.S. as part of a program that began in 1956, funded by
the Ford Foundation. They had also returned home to build a faithful copy
of a Western-style economics department, theirs at the University of Indone­
sia's Faculty of Economics. Ford sent American professors to Jakarta to es­
tablish the school, just as Chicago profs had gone to help set up the new
economics department in Santiago. "Ford felt it was training the guys who
would be leading the country when Sukarno got out," John Howard, then di­
rector of Ford's International Training and Research Program, bluntly ex­
plained.

51

Ford-funded students became leaders of the campus groups that partici­
pated in overthrowing Sukarno, and the Berkeley Mafia worked closely with
the military in the lead-up to the coup, developing "contingency plans"
52

should the government suddenly fall.* These young economists had enor­
mous influence over General Suharto, who knew nothing of high finance.
According to Fortune magazine, the Berkeley Mafia recorded economics les­
53

sons on audiotapes for Suharto to listen to at home. When they met in per­
son, "President Suharto did not merely listen, he took notes," one member of
the group recalled with pride.

54

Another Berkeley grad described the rela­

tionship in this way: we "presented to the Army leadership—the crucial ele­
ment in the new order—a 'cookbook' of'recipes' for dealing with Indonesia's
serious economic problems. General Suharto as the top Army commander
not only accepted the cookbook, but also wanted the authors of the recipes
55

as his economic advisers." Indeed he did. Suharto packed his cabinet with
* Not all the U.S. professors sent under the program were comfortable with this role. "I felt
that the University should not be involved in what essentially w a s becoming a rebellion
against the government," said Len Doyle, the Berkeley professor appointed to head F o r d s In­
donesian economics program. That point of view got Doyle recalled to California and re­
placed.

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

69

members of the Berkeley Mafia, handing them all the key financial posts, in­
cluding minister of trade and ambassador to Washington.

56

This economic team, having studied at a less ideological school, were not
antistate radicals like the Chicago Boys. They believed the government had
a role to play in managing Indonesia's domestic economy and making sure
that basics, like rice, were affordable. However, the Berkeley Mafia could not
have been more hospitable to foreign investors wanting to mine Indonesia's
immense mineral and oil wealth, described by Richard Nixon as "the great­
57

est prize in the Southeast Asian area."* They passed laws allowing foreign
companies to own 100 percent of these resources, handed out "tax holidays,"
and within two years, Indonesia's natural wealth —copper, nickel, hard­
wood, rubber and oil—was being divided up among the largest mining and
energy companies in the world.
For those plotting the overthrow of Allende just as Suharto's program was
kicking in, the experiences of Brazil and Indonesia made for a useful study
in contrasts. The Brazilians had made little use of the power of shock, wait­
ing years before demonstrating their appetite for brutality. It was a near-fatal
error, since it gave their opponents the chance to regroup and for some to
form left-wing guerrilla armies. Although the junta managed to clear the
streets, the rising opposition forced it to slow its economic plans.
Suharto, on the other hand, had shown that if massive repression was used
preemptively, the country would go into a kind of shock and resistance could
be wiped out before it even took place. His use of terror was so merciless, so
far beyond even the worst expectations, that a people who only weeks earlier
had been collectively striving to assert their country's independence were
now sufficiently terrified that they ceded total control to Suharto and his
henchmen. Ralph McGehee, a senior CIA operations manager during the
years of the coup, said Indonesia was a "model operation. . . . You can trace
back all major, bloody events run from Washington to the way Suharto came
to power. The success of that meant that it would be repeated, again and
again.

7 0

The other crucial lesson from Indonesia had to do with the pre-coup part­
nership between Suharto and the Berkeley Mafia. Because they were ready
to take up top "technocratic" positions in the new government and had al­
ready converted Suharto to their worldview, the coup did more than just get

* Interestingly, Arnold Harberger w a s hired a s a consultant to Suharto's finance ministry in
1975.

70

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

rid of a nationalist threat; it transformed Indonesia into one of the most wel­
coming environments for foreign multinationals in the world.
As momentum began to build toward Allende's ouster, a chilling warning
began appearing in red paint on the walls of Santiago. It said, "Jakarta is
coming."
Shortly after Allende was elected, his opponents inside Chile began to imi­
tate the Indonesia approach with eerie precision. The Catholic University,
home of the Chicago Boys, became ground zero for the creation of what the
59

CIA called "a coup climate." Many students joined the fascist Patria y Libertad and goose-stepped through the streets in open imitation of Hitler
Youth. In September 1971, a year into Allende's mandate, the top business
leaders in Chile held an emergency meeting in the seaside city of Vina del
Mar to develop a coherent regime-change strategy. According to Orlando
Saenz, president of the National Association of Manufacturers (generously
funded by the CIA and many of the same foreign multinationals doing their
own plotting in Washington), the gathering decided that "Allende's govern­
ment was incompatible with freedom in Chile and with the existence of pri­
vate enterprise, and that the only way to avoid the end was to overthrow the
government." The businessmen formed a "war structure," one part of which
would liaise with the military; another, according to Saenz, would "prepare
specific alternative programs to government programs that would systemati­
cally be passed on to the Armed Forces."

60

Saenz recruited several key Chicago Boys to design those alternative pro­
grams and set them up in a new office near the Presidential Palace in Santi­
61

ago. The group, led by the Chicago grad Sergio de Castro and by Sergio
Undurraga, his colleague at the Catholic University, began holding weekly
secret meetings during which they developed detailed proposals for how to
62

radically remake their country along neoliberal lines. According to the sub­
sequent U.S. Senate investigation, "over 75 percent" of the funding for this
"opposition research organization" was coming directly from the CIA.

63

For a time, the coup planning proceeded on two distinct tracks: the mili­
tary plotted the extermination of Allende and his supporters while the econ­
omists plotted the extermination of their ideas. As momentum built for a
violent solution, a dialogue was opened between the two camps, with
Roberto Kelly, a businessman associated with the CIA-financed newspaper
El Mercurio,

acting as the go-between. Through Kelly, the Chicago Boys

sent a five-page summary of their economic program to the navy admiral in

THE OTHER DOCTOR S H O C K

71

charge. The navy gave the nod, and from then on the Chicago Boys worked
frantically to have their program ready by the time of the coup.
Their five-hundred-page bible—a detailed economic program that would
guide the junta from its earliest days—came to be known in Chile as "The
Brick." According to a later U.S. Senate Committee, "CIA collaborators
were involved in preparing an initial overall economic plan which has
served as the basis for the Junta's most important economic decisions."

64

Eight of the ten principal authors of "The Brick" had studied economics at
the University of Chicago.

65

Although the overthrow of Allende was universally described as a military
coup, Orlando Letelier, Allende's Washington ambassador, saw it as an
equal partnership between the army and the economists. "The 'Chicago
boys,' as they are known in Chile," Letelier wrote, "convinced the generals
that they were prepared to supplement the brutality, which the military pos­
sessed, with the intellectual assets it lacked."

66

Chile's coup, when it finally came, would feature three distinct forms of
shock, a recipe that would be duplicated in neighboring countries and
would reemerge, three decades later, in Iraq. The shock of the coup itself
was immediately followed by two additional forms of shock. One was Milton
Friedman's capitalist "shock treatment," a technique in which hundreds of
Latin American economists had by now been trained at the University of
Chicago and its various franchise institutions. The other was Ewen
Cameron's shock, drug and sensory deprivation research, now codified as
torture techniques in the Kubark manual and disseminated through exten­
sive CIA training programs for Latin American police and military.
These three forms of shock converged on the bodies of Latin Americans
and the body politic of the region, creating an unstoppable hurricane of mu­
tually reinforcing destruction and reconstruction, erasure and creation. The
shock of the coup prepared the ground for economic shock therapy; the shock
of the torture chamber terrorized anyone thinking of standing in the way of the
economic shocks. Out of this live laboratory emerged the first Chicago School
state, and the first victory in its global counterrevolution.

PART 2

THE FIRST TEST
BIRTH P A N G S

The theories of Milton Friedman gave him the Nobel
Prize; they gave Chile General Pinochet.
— Eduardo Galeano, Days and Nights of Love and War,
1983
I don't think I was ever regarded as "evil."
— Milton Friedman, quoted in The Walt Street Journal,
July 22, 2006

CHAPTER 3

STATES OF SHOCK
THE BLOODY B I R T H OF T H E
COUNTERREVOLUTION

For injuries ought to be done all at one time, s o that, being tasted
l e s s , they offend l e s s .
—Niccolô Machiavelli, The Prince, 1 5 1 3

1

If this s h o c k approach were adopted, I believe that it s h o u l d be
announced publicly in great detail, to take effect at a very close
date. The more fully the public is informed, the more will its reac­
tions facilitate the adjustment.
—Milton F r i e d m a n in a letter to General A u g u s t o Pinochet, April 2 1 ,
1975

2

General Augusto Pinochet and his supporters consistently referred to the
events of September 11, 1973, not as a coup d'état but as "a war." Santiago
certainly looked like a war zone: tanks fired as they rolled down the boule­
vards, and government buildings were under air assault by fighter jets. But
there was something strange about this war. It had only one side.
From the start, Pinochet had complete control of the army, navy, marines
and police. Meanwhile, President Salvador Allende had refused to organize
his supporters into armed defense leagues, so he had no army of his own.
The only resistance came from the presidential palace, La Moneda, and the
rooftops around it, where Allende and his inner circle made a valiant effort
to defend the seat of democracy. It was hardly a fair fight: though there were
just thirty-six Allende supporters inside, the military launched twenty-four
rockets into the palace.

3

76

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Pinochet, the operation's vain and volatile commander (built like one of
the tanks he rode in on), clearly wanted the event to be as dramatic and trau­
matic as possible. Even if the coup was not a war, it was designed to feel like
one—a Chilean precursor to Shock and Awe. It could scarcely have been
more shocking. Unlike neighboring Argentina, which had been ruled by six
military governments in the previous four decades, Chile had no experience
with this kind of violence; it had enjoyed 160 years of peaceful democratic
rule, the past 41 uninterrupted.
Now the presidential palace was in flames, the president's shrouded bodywas being carried out on a stretcher, and his closest colleagues were lying
facedown in the street at rifle point.* A few minutes' drive from the presi­
dential palace, Orlando Letelier, recently returned from Washington to take
up a new post as Chile's defense minister, had gone to his office that morn­
ing in the ministry. As soon as he walked through the front door, he was am­
bushed by twelve soldiers in combat uniform, all pointing their submachine
guns at him.

4

In the years leading up to the coup, U.S. trainers, many from the CIA,
had whipped the Chilean military into an anti-Communist frenzy, persuad­
ing them that socialists were de facto Russian spies, a force alien to Chilean
society—a homegrown "enemy within." In fact, it was the military that had
become the true domestic enemy, ready to turn its weapons on the popula­
tion it was sworn to protect.
With Allende dead, his cabinet in captivity and no mass resistance in ev­
idence, the junta's grand battle was over by mid-afternoon. Letelier and the
other "VIP" prisoners were eventually taken to freezing Dawson Island in the
southern Strait of Magellan, Pinochet's approximation of a Siberian work
camp. Killing and locking up the government was not enough for Chile's
new junta government, however. The generals knew that their hold on power
depended on Chileans being truly terrified, as the people had been in In­
donesia. In the days that followed, roughly 13,500 civilians were arrested,
loaded onto trucks and imprisoned, according to a declassified CIA report.

5

Thousands ended up in the two main football stadiums in Santiago, the
Chile Stadium and the huge National Stadium. Inside the National Sta­
dium, death replaced football as the public spectacle. Soldiers prowled the
* Allende w a s found with his head blown apart. Debates continue over whether he w a s shot
by one of the bullets fired into La Moneda or he shot himself rather than give Chileans the
lasting image of their elected president surrendering to an insurrectionary army. The second
theory is the more credible.

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

77

bleachers with hooded collaborators who pointed out "subversives"; the ones
who were selected were hauled off to locker rooms and skyboxes transformed
into makeshift torture chambers. Hundreds were executed. Lifeless bodies
started showing up on the side of major highways or floating in murky urban
canals.
To make sure that the terror extended beyond the capital city, Pinochet
sent his most ruthless commander, General Sergio Arellano Stark, on a heli­
copter mission to the northern provinces to visit a string of prisons where
"subversives" were being held. At each city and town, Stark and his roving
death squad singled out the highest-profile prisoners, as many as twenty-six
at a time, who were subsequently executed. The trail of blood left behind
6

over those four days came to be known as the Caravan of Death. In short or­
der, the entire country had gotten the message: resistance is deadly.
Even though Pinochet's battle was one-sided, its effects were as real as any
civil war or foreign invasion: in all, more than 3,200 people were disap­
peared or executed, at least 80,000 were imprisoned, and 200,000 fled the
country for political reasons.

7

The Economic Front
For the Chicago Boys, September 11 was a day of giddy anticipation and
deadline adrenalin. Sergio de Castro had been working down to the wire
with his contact in the navy, getting the final sections of "The Brick" ap­
proved page by page. Now, on the day of the coup, several Chicago Boys
were camped out at the printing presses of the right-wing El Mercurio news­
paper. As shots were being fired in the streets outside, they frantically tried to
get the document printed in time for the junta's first day on the job. Arturo
Fontaine, one of the newspaper's editors, recalled that the machines "worked
non-stop to duplicate copies of this long document." And they made it—just
barely. "Before midday on Wednesday, September 12, 1973, the General Of­
ficers of the Armed Forces who performed government duties had the Plan
on their desks."

8

The proposals in the final document bore a striking resemblance to those
found in Milton Friedman's Capitalism

and Freedom: privatization, deregu­

lation and cuts to social spending—the free-market trinity. Chile's U.S.trained economists had tried to introduce these ideas peacefully, within the
confines of a democratic debate, but they had been overwhelmingly rejected.
Now the Chicago Boys and their plans were back, in a climate distinctly

78

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

more conducive to their radical vision. In this new era, no one besides a
handful of men in uniform needed to agree with them. Their staunchest po­
litical opponents were either in jail, dead or fleeing for cover; the spectacle
of fighter jets and caravans of death was keeping everyone else in line.
"To us, it was a revolution," said Cristiân Larroulet, one of Pinochet's eco­
9

nomic aides. It was a fair description. September 11, 1973, was far more
than the violent end of Allende's peaceful socialist revolution; it was the be­
ginning of what The Economist

would later describe as a "counterrevolu­

tion"—the first concrete victory in the Chicago School campaign to seize
back the gains that had been won under developmentalism and Keynesianism.

10

Unlike Allende's partial revolution, tempered and compromised by

the push and pull of democracy, this revolt, imposed through brute force,
was free to go all the way. In the coming years, the same policies laid out in
"The Brick" would be imposed in dozens of other countries under cover of a
wide range of crises. But Chile was the counterrevolution's genesis—a gene­
sis of terror.
José Pinera, an alumnus of the economics department at the Catholic
University and a self-described Chicago Boy, was doing graduate work at
Harvard at the time of the coup. On hearing the good news, he returned
home "to help found a new country, dedicated to liberty, from the ashes of
the old one." According to Pinera, who would eventually become Pinochet's
minister of labor and mining, this was "the real revolution . . . a radical,
comprehensive, and sustained move toward free markets."

11

Before the coup, Augusto Pinochet had a reputation for deference that
bordered on the obsequious, forever flattering and agreeing with his civilian
commanders. As a dictator, Pinochet found new facets of his character. He
took to power with unseemly relish, adopting the airs of a monarch and
claiming that "destiny" had given him the job. In short order, he staged a
coup within a coup to unseat the other three military leaders with whom he
had agreed to share power and named himself Supreme Chief of the Nation
as well as president. He basked in pomp and ceremony, proof of his right to
rule, never missing an opportunity to put on his Prussian dress uniform,
complete with cape. To get around Santiago, he chose a caravan of gold bul­
letproof Mercedes-Benzes.

12

Pinochet had a knack for authoritarian rule, but, like Suharto, he knew
next to nothing about economics. That was a problem because the cam­
paign of corporate sabotage spearheaded by I T T had done an effective job of
sending the economy into a tailspin, and Pinochet had a full-fledged crisis

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

79

on his hands. From the start, there was a power struggle within the junta be­
tween those who simply wanted to reinstate the pre-Allende status quo and
return quickly to democracy, and the Chicago Boys, who were pushing for a
head-to-toe free-market makeover that would take years to impose. Pinochet,
enjoying his new powers, intensely disliked the idea that his destiny was a
mere cleanup operation—there to "restore order" and then get out. "We are
not a vacuum cleaner that swept out Marxism to give back power to those
13

Mr. Politicians," he would say. It was the Chicago Boys' vision of a total
country overhaul that appealed to his newly unleashed ambition, and, like
Suharto with his Berkeley Mafia, he immediately named several Chicago
grads as senior economic advisers, including Sergio de Castro, the move­
ment's de facto leader and the main author of "The Brick." He called them
the technos—the

technicians—which appealed to the Chicago pretension

that fixing an economy was a matter of science, not of subjective human
choices.
Even if Pinochet understood little about inflation and interest rates, the
technos spoke a language he did understand. Economics for them meant
forces of nature that needed to be respected and obeyed because "to act
against nature is counter-productive and self-deceiving," as Pinera explained.

14

Pinochet agreed: people, he once wrote, must submit to structure because
15

"nature shows us basic order and hierarchy are necessary." This mutual
claim to be taking orders from higher natural laws formed the basis of the
Pinochet-Chicago alliance.
For the first year and a half, Pinochet faithfully followed the Chicago
rules: he privatized some, though not all, state-owned companies (including
several banks); he allowed cutting-edge new forms of speculative finance; he
flung open the borders to foreign imports, tearing down the barriers that had
long protected Chilean manufacturers; and he cut government spending by
16

10 percent—except the military, which received a significant increase. He
also eliminated price controls —a radical move in a country that had been
regulating the cost of necessities such as bread and cooking oil for decades.
The Chicago Boys had confidently assured Pinochet that if he suddenly
withdrew government involvement from these areas all at once, the "natural"
laws of economics would rediscover their equilibrium, and inflation—which
they viewed as a kind of economic fever indicating the presence of un­
healthy organisms in the market—would magically go down. They were mis­
taken. In 1974, inflation reached 375 percent—the highest rate in the world
17

and almost twice the top level under Allende. The cost of basics such as

80

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

bread went through the roof. At the same time, Chileans were being thrown
out of work because Pinochet's experiment with "free trade" was flooding the
country with cheap imports. Local businesses were closing, unable to com­
pete, unemployment hit record levels and hunger became rampant. The
Chicago School's first laboratory was a debacle.
Sergio de Castro and the other Chicago Boys argued (in true Chicago
fashion) that the problem didn't lie with their theory but with the fact that it
wasn't being applied with sufficient strictness. The economy had failed to
correct itself and return to harmonious balance because there were still "dis­
tortions" left over from nearly half a century of government interference. For
the experiment to work, Pinochet had to strip these distortions away—more
cuts, more privatization, more speed.
In that year and a half, many of the country's business elite had had their
fill of the Chicago Boys' adventures in extreme capitalism. The only people
benefiting were foreign companies and a small clique of financiers known as
the "piranhas," who were making a killing on speculation. The nuts-andbolts manufacturers who had strongly supported the coup were getting
wiped out. Orlando Saenz—the president of the National Association of
Manufacturers, who had brought the Chicago Boys into the coup plot in the
first place—declared the results of the experiment "one of the greatest fail­
18

ures of our economic history." The manufacturers hadn't wanted Allende's
socialism but had liked a managed economy just fine. "It is not possible to
continue with the financial chaos that dominates in Chile," Saenz said. "It is
necessary to channel into productive investments the millions and millions
of financial resources that are now being used in wild-cat speculative opera­
tions before the very eyes of those who don't even have a job."

19

Their agenda now in grave danger, the Chicago Boys and the piranhas
(and there was a great deal of overlap between the two) decided it was time
to call in the big guns. In March 1975, Milton Friedman and Arnold Har­
berger flew to Santiago at the invitation of a major bank to help save the ex­
periment.
Friedman was greeted by the junta-controlled press as something of a
rock star, the guru of the new order. Each of his pronouncements made
headlines, his academic lectures were broadcast on national television and
he had the most important audience of all: a private meeting with General
Pinochet.
Throughout his stay, Friedman hammered at a single theme: the junta
was off to a good start, but it needed to embrace the free market with greater

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

81

abandon. In speeches and interviews, he used a term that had never before
been publicly applied to a real-world economic crisis: he called for "shock
treatment." He said it was "the only medicine. Absolutely. There is no other.
20

There is no other long-term solution." When a Chilean reporter pointed
out that even Richard Nixon, then president of the U.S., imposed controls to
temper the free market, Friedman snapped, "I don't approve of them. I be­
lieve we should not apply them. I am against economic intervention by the
government, in my own country, as well as in Chile."

21

After his meeting with Pinochet, Friedman made some personal notes
about the encounter, which he reproduced decades later in his memoirs. He
observed that the general "was sympathetically attracted to the idea of a
shock treatment but was clearly distressed at the possible temporary unem­
22

ployment that might be caused." At this point, Pinochet was already notori­
ous the world over for ordering massacres in football stadiums; that the
dictator was "distressed" by the human cost of shock therapy might have
given Friedman pause. Instead, he pressed the point in a follow-up letter in
which he praised the general's "extremely wise" decisions but urged
Pinochet to cut government spending much further, "by 25 per cent within
six months. . . across-the-board," while simultaneously adopting a package
of pro-business policies moving toward "complete free trade." Friedman pre­
dicted that the hundreds of thousands of people who would be fired from the
public sector would quickly get new jobs in the private sector, soon to be
booming thanks to Pinochet's removal of "as many obstacles as possible that
now hinder the private market."

23

Friedman assured the general that if he followed this advice, he would be
able to take credit for an "economic miracle"; he "could end inflation
in months" while the unemployment problem would be equally " b r i e f measured in months—and that subsequent recovery would be rapid."
Pinochet would need to act fast and decisively; Friedman emphasized the
importance of "shock" repeatedly, using the word three times and underlin­
ing that "gradualism is not feasible."

24

Pinochet was converted. In his letter of response, Chile's supreme chief
expressed "my highest and most respectful regard for you," assuring Fried­
25

man that "the Plan is being fully applied at the present time." Immediately
after Friedman's visit, Pinochet fired his economic minister and handed the
job to Sergio de Castro, whom he later promoted to finance minister. De
Castro stacked the government with his fellow Chicago Boys, appointing
one of them to head the central bank. Orlando Saenz, who had objected to

82

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the mass layoffs and plant closures, was replaced as head of the Association
of Manufacturers by someone with a more shock-friendly attitude. "If there
are industrialists who complain because of this, let them 'go to hell.' I won't
defend them," the new director announced.

26

Freed of the naysayers, Pinochet and de Castro got to work stripping
away the welfare state to arrive at their pure capitalist Utopia. In 1975, they
cut public spending by 27 percent in one blow—and they kept cutting
27

until, by 1980, it was half of what it had been under Allende. Health and
education took the heaviest hits. Even The Economist,

a free-market cheer­

28

leader, called it "an orgy of self-mutilation." De Castro privatized almost
five hundred state-owned companies and banks, practically giving many of
them away, since the point was to get them as quickly as possible into their
29

rightful place in the economic order. He took no pity on local companies
and removed even more trade barriers; the result was the loss of 177,000 in­
30

dustrial jobs between 1973 and 1983. By the mid-eighties, manufacturing
as a percentage of the economy dropped to levels last seen during the Sec­
ond World War.

31

Shock treatment was an apt description for what Friedman had pre­
scribed. Pinochet had deliberately sent his country into a deep recession,
based on the untested theory that the sudden contraction would jolt the
economy into health. In its logic, it was strikingly similar to that of the psy­
chiatrists who started mass-prescribing E C T in the 1940s and 1950s, con­
vinced that deliberately induced grand mal seizures would magically reboot
their patients' brains.
The theory of economic shock therapy relies in part on the role of expec­
tations in feeding an inflationary process. Reining in inflation requires not
only changing monetary policy but also changing the behavior of con­
sumers, employers and workers. The role of a sudden, jarring policy shift is
that it quickly alters expectations, signaling to the public that the rules of
the game have changed dramatically—prices will not keep rising, nor will
wages. According to this theory, the faster expectations of inflation are driven
down, the shorter the painful period of recession and high unemployment
will be. However, particularly in countries where the political class has lost
its credibility with the public, only a major, decisive policy shock is said to
have the power to "teach" the public these harsh lessons.*

* S o m e Chicago School economists claim that the first experiment in shock therapy took place
in West Germany on June 20, 1948. That's when Finance Minister Ludwig Erhard eliminated

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

83

Causing a recession or a depression is a brutal idea, since it necessarily cre­
ates mass poverty, which is why no political leader had until this point been
willing to test the theory. Who wants to be responsible for what Business-Week
described as a "Dr. Strangelove world of deliberately induced depression"?

32

Pinochet did. In the first year of Friedman-prescribed shock therapy, Chile's
economy contracted by 15 percent, and unemployment—only 3 percent un­
der Allende—reached 20 percent, a rate unheard of in Chile at the time.

33

The country was certainly convulsing under its "treatments." And contrary to
Friedman's sunny predictions, the unemployment crisis lasted for years, not
34

months. The junta, which had instantly taken to Friedman's illness meta­
phors, was unapologetic, explaining that "this path was chosen because it is
35

the only one that goes directly to the sickness." Friedman concurred. When
asked by a reporter "whether the social cost of his policies would be excessive,"
36

he responded, "Silly question." To another reporter he said, "My only con­
cern is that they push it long enough and hard enough."

37

Interestingly, the most powerful criticism of shock therapy came from one
of Friedman's own former students, André Gunder Frank. During his time
at the University of Chicago in the fifties, Gunder Frank—originally from
Germany—had heard so much about Chile that when he graduated with a
PhD in economics, he decided to go see for himself the country his profes­
sors had portrayed as a mismanaged developmentalist dystopia. He liked
what he saw and ended up teaching at the University of Chile, then serving
as an economic adviser to the government of Salvador Allende, for whom he
developed a great respect. As a Chicago Boy in Chile who had defected from
the school's free-market orthodoxy, Gunder Frank had a unique perspective
on the country's economic adventure. One year after Friedman prescribed

most price controls and introduced a new currency. The moves were sudden and without warn­
ing, a tremendous shock to the German economy, leading to widespread unemployment. But
that is where the parallels end: Erhard's reforms were restricted to price and monetary policy,
they were not accompanied by cuts to social programs or by rapid introduction of free trade,
and many measures were taken to protect citizens from these shocks, including increasing
wages. Even post-shock, West Germany easily met Friedman's definition of a quasi-socialist
welfare state: it provided subsidized housing, government pensions, public health care and a
state-run education system, while the government ran, and subsidized, everything from the
phone company to aluminum plants. Crediting Erhard with inventing shock therapy makes for
a palatable narrative, since his experiment took place after West Germany was liberated from
tyranny. Erhard's shock, however, bears little resemblance to the sweeping transformations
currently understood as economic shock therapy—that method w a s pioneered by Friedman
and Pinochet, in a country that had just lost its liberty.

84

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

maximum shock, he wrote a rage-fueled "Open Letter to Arnold Harberger
and Milton Friedman" in which he used his Chicago School education "to
examine how the Chilean patient has responded to your treatment."

38

He calculated what it meant for a Chilean family to try to survive on what
Pinochet claimed was a "living wage." Roughly 74 percent of its income
went simply to buying bread, forcing the family to cut out such "luxury
items" as milk and bus fare to get to work. By comparison, under Allende,
bread, milk and bus fare took up 17 percent of a public employee's salary.

39

Many children weren't getting milk at school either, since one of the junta's
first moves had been to eliminate the school milk program. As a result of this
cut compounding the desperation at home, more and more students were
40

fainting in class, and many stopped going altogether. Gunder Frank saw a
direct connection between the brutal economic policies imposed by his for­
mer classmates and the violence Pinochet had unleashed on the country.
Friedman's prescriptions were so wrenching, the disaffected Chicago Boy
wrote, that they could not "be imposed or carried out without the twin ele­
ments that underlie them all: military force and political terror."

41

Undeterred, Pinochet's economic team went into more experimental
territory, introducing Friedman's most vanguard policies: the public school
system was replaced by vouchers and charter schools, health care became
pay-as-you-go, and kindergartens and cemeteries were privatized. Most
radical of all, they privatized Chile's social security system. José Pinera,
who brought in the program, said that he got the idea from reading Capi­
2

talism and Freedom.*

George W. Bush's administration is usually credited

with pioneering "the ownership society," but in fact it was Pinochet's gov­
ernment, thirty years earlier, that first introduced the idea of "a nation of
owners."
Chile was now in bold new territory, and free-market fans the world over,
accustomed to debating the merits of such policies in purely academic set­
tings, were paying close attention. "Economics textbooks say that's the way
the world should work, but where else do they practice it?" marveled the
U.S. business magazine Barrons.^

In an article headlined "Chile, Lab Test

for a Theorist," The New York Times noted that "it is not often that a leading
economist with strong views is given a chance to test specific prescriptions
for a very sick economy. It is even more unusual when the economist's client
44

happens to be a country other than his own." Many came for an up-close
look at the Chilean laboratory, including Friedrich Hayek himself, who trav­
eled to Pinochet's Chile several times and in 1981 selected Vina del Mar

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

85

(the city where the coup had been plotted) to hold the regional meeting of
the Mont Pèlerin Society, the brain trust of the counterrevolution.

The Myth of the Chilean Miracle
Even three decades later, Chile is still held up by free-market enthusiasts as
proof that Friedmanism works. When Pinochet died in December 2006
(one month after Friedman), The New York Times praised him for "transforming a bankrupt economy into the most prosperous in Latin America,"
while a Washington Post editorial said he had "introduced the free-market
45

policies that produced the Chilean economic miracle." The facts behind
the "Chilean miracle" remain a matter of intense debate.
Pinochet held power for seventeen years, and during that time he
changed political direction several times. The country's period of steady
growth that is held up as proof of its miraculous success did not begin until the
mid-eighties—a full decade after the Chicago Boys implemented shock therapy and well after Pinochet was forced to make a radical course correction.
That's because in 1982, despite its strict adherence to Chicago doctrine,
Chile's economy crashed: its debt exploded, it faced hyperinflation once
again and unemployment hit 30 percent—ten times higher than it was un46

der Allende. The main cause was that the piranhas, the Enron-style financial houses that the Chicago Boys had freed from all regulation, had bought
up the country's assets on borrowed money and run up an enormous debt of
$14 billion.

47

The situation was so unstable that Pinochet was forced to do exactly what
48

Allende had done: he nationalized many of these companies. In the face of
the debacle, almost all the Chicago Boys lost their influential government
posts, including Sergio de Castro. Several other Chicago graduates held
prominent posts with the piranhas and came under investigation for fraud,
stripping away the carefully cultivated facade of scientific neutrality so central to the Chicago Boy identity.
The only thing that protected Chile from complete economic collapse in
the early eighties was that Pinochet had never privatized Codelco, the state
copper mine company nationalized by Allende. That one company generated 85 percent of Chile's export revenues, which meant that when the financial bubble burst, the state still had a steady source of funds.

49

It's clear that Chile never was the laboratory of "pure" free markets that its
cheerleaders claimed. Instead, it was a country where a small elite leapt from

86

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

wealthy to super-rich in extremely short order—a highly profitable formula
bankrolled by debt and heavily subsidized (then bailed out) with public
funds. When the hype and salesmanship behind the miracle are stripped
away, Chile under Pinochet and the Chicago Boys was not a capitalist state
featuring a liberated market but a corporatist one. Corporatism, or "corpora­
tivism," originally referred to Mussolini's model of a police state run as an al­
liance of the three major power sources in society—government, businesses
and trade unions—all collaborating to guarantee order in the name of na­
tionalism. What Chile pioneered under Pinochet was an evolution of corpo­
ratism: a mutually supporting alliance between a police state and large
corporations, joining forces to wage all-out war on the third power sector—
the workers—thereby drastically increasing the alliance's share of the na­
tional wealth.
That war—what many Chileans understandably see as a war of the rich
against the poor and middle class —is the real story of Chile's economic
"miracle." By 1988, when the economy had stabilized and was growing rap­
50

idly, 45 percent of the population had fallen below the poverty line. The
richest 10 percent of Chileans, however, had seen their incomes increase by
83 percent.

51

Even in 2007, Chile remained one of the most unequal soci­

eties in the world —out of 123 countries in which the United Nations tracks
inequality, Chile ranked 116th, making it the 8th most unequal country on
the list.

52

If that track record qualifies Chile as a miracle for Chicago school econo­
mists, perhaps shock treatment was never really about jolting the economy
into health. Perhaps it was meant to do exactly what it did —hoover wealth
up to the top and shock much of the middle class out of existence.
That was the way Orlando Letelier, Allende's former defense minister,
saw it. After spending a year in Pinochet's prisons, Letelier managed to es­
cape Chile, thanks to an intensive international lobbying campaign. Watch­
ing from exile the rapid impoverishment of his country, Letelier wrote in
1976 that "during the last three years several billions of dollars were taken
from the pockets of wage earners and placed in those of capitalists and
landowners. . . concentration of wealth is no accident, but a rule; it is not
the marginal outcome of a difficult situation —as the junta would like the
world to believe—but the base for a social project; it is not an economic lia­
bility but a temporary political success."

53

What Letelier could not know at the time was that Chile under Chicago
School rule was offering a glimpse of the future of the global economy, a

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

87

pattern that would repeat again and again, from Russia to South Africa to Ar­
gentina: an urban bubble of frenetic speculation and dubious accounting
fueling superprofits and frantic consumerism, ringed by the ghostly factories
and rotting infrastructure of a development past; roughly half the population
excluded from the economy altogether; out-of-control corruption and crony­
ism; decimation of nationally owned small and medium-sized businesses; a
huge transfer of wealth from public to private hands, followed by a huge
transfer of private debts into public hands. In Chile, if you were outside the
wealth bubble, the miracle looked like the Great Depression, but inside its
airtight cocoon the profits flowed so free and fast that the easy wealth made
possible by shock therapy-style "reforms" have been the crack cocaine of fi­
nancial markets ever since. And that is why the financial world did not re­
spond to the obvious contradictions of the Chile experiment by reassessing
the basic assumptions of laissez-faire. Instead, it reacted with the junkie's
logic: Where is the next fix?

The Revolution Spreads, the People Vanish
For a time, the next fix came from other countries in Latin America's South­
ern Cone, where the Chicago School counterrevolution quickly spread.
Brazil was already under the control of a U.S.-supported junta, and several of
Friedman's Brazilian students held key positions. Friedman traveled to
Brazil in 1973, at the height of the regime's brutality, and declared the eco­
54

nomic experiment "a miracle." In Uruguay the military had staged a coup
in 1973 and the following year decided to go the Chicago route. Lacking suf­
ficient numbers of Uruguayans who had graduated from the University of
Chicago, the generals invited "Arnold Harberger and [economics professor]
Larry Sjaastad from the University of Chicago and their team, which included
former Chicago students from Argentina, Chile, and Brazil, to reform
55

Uruguay's tax system and commercial policy." The effects on Uruguay's
previously egalitarian society were immediate: real wages dropped by 28 per­
cent, and hordes of scavengers appeared on the streets of Montevideo for the
first time.

56

Next to join the experiment was Argentina in 1976, when a junta seized
power from Isabel Perôn. That meant that Argentina, Chile, Uruguay and
Brazil—the countries that had been showcases of developmentalism—were
now all run by U.S.-backed military governments and were living laborato­
ries of Chicago School economics.

88

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

According to declassified Brazilian documents just released in March
2007, weeks before the Argentine generals seized power, they contacted
Pinochet and the Brazilian junta and "outlined the main steps to be taken by
the future regime."

57

Despite this close collaboration, Argentina's military government did not
go quite as far into neoliberal experimentation as Pinochet had; it did not pri­
vatize the country's oil reserves or social security, for instance (that would
come later). However, when it came to attacking the policies and institutions
that had lifted Argentina's poor into the middle class, the junta faithfully fol­
lowed Pinochet, thanks in part to the abundance of Argentine economists
who had gone through the Chicago program.
Argentina's newly minted Chicago Boys landed key economic posts in
the junta government—as secretary of finance, president of the central bank
and research director for the Treasury Department of the Finance Ministry,
58

as well as several other lower-level economic posts. But while the Argentine
Chicago Boys were enthusiastic participants in the military government, the
top economic job went not to one of them but to José Alfredo Martinez de
Hoz. He was part of the landed gentry that belonged to the Sociedad Rural,
the cattle-ranchers' association that had long controlled the country's export
economy. These families, the closest thing to an aristocracy that Argentina
possessed, had liked the feudal economic order just fine —a time when they
didn't have to worry about their land being redistributed to peasants or the
price of meat being lowered to make sure everyone could eat.
Martinez de Hoz had been president of the Sociedad Rural, as had his fa­
ther and grandfather before him; he also sat on the boards of several multi­
national corporations, including Pan American Airways and ITT. When he
took up his post in the junta government, there was no mistaking the fact
that the coup represented a revolt of the elites, a counterrevolution against
forty years of gains by Argentina's workers.
Martinez de Hoz's first act as minister of the economy was to ban strikes
and allow employers to fire workers at will. He lifted price controls, sending
the cost of food soaring. He was also determined to make Argentina once
again a hospitable place for foreign multinationals. He lifted restrictions on
foreign ownership and in the first few years sold off hundreds of state com­
59

panies. These measures earned him powerful fans in Washington. Declas­
sified documents show William Rogers, assistant secretary of state for Latin
America, telling his boss, Henry Kissinger, shortly after the coup that
"Martinez de Hoz is a good man. We have been in close consultations

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

89

throughout." Kissinger was so impressed that he arranged to have a highprofile meeting with Martinez de Hoz when he visited Washington "as a
symbolic gesture." He also offered to make a couple of calls to help along Ar­
gentina's economic efforts: "I will call David Rockefeller/' Kissinger told the
junta's foreign minister, a reference to the president of Chase Manhattan
Bank. "And I will call his brother, the Vice President [of the United States,
Nelson Rockefeller]."

60

To attract investment, Argentina took out a thirty-one-page advertising
supplement in BusinessWeek,

produced by the PR giant Burson-Marsteller,

declaring that "few governments in history have been as encouraging to pri­
vate investment. . . . We are in a true social revolution, and we seek partners.
We are unburdening ourselves of statism, and believe firmly in the allimportant role of the private sector."*

61

Once again, the human impact was unmistakable: within a year, wages lost
40 percent of their value, factories closed, poverty spiraled. Before the junta
took power, Argentina had fewer people living in poverty than France or the
62

U.S. —just 9 percent—and an unemployment rate of only 4.2 percent. Now
the country began to display signs of the underdevelopment thought to have
been left behind. Poor neighborhoods were without water, and preventable
diseases ran rampant.
In Chile, Pinochet had a free hand to use economic policy to eviscerate
the middle class, thanks to the shocking and terrifying way in which he had
seized power. Although his fighter jets and firing squads had been enor­
mously effective at spreading terror, they had turned out to be a public rela­
tions disaster. Press reports about Pinochet's massacres sparked a worldwide
outcry, and activists in Europe and North America aggressively lobbied
their governments not to trade with Chile —a distinctly unfavorable out­
come for a regime whose reason for existence was to keep the country open
for business.
The

newly declassified documents from Brazil show that when Ar­

gentina's generals were preparing their 1976 coup, they wanted "to avoid suf­
fering an international campaign like the one that has been unleashed
63

against Chile." To achieve that goal, less sensational repression tactics were
needed—lower-profile ones capable of spreading terror but not so visible to the
prying international press. In Chile, Pinochet soon settled on disappearances.

* The junta w a s so eager to auction off the country to investors that it advertised "a 10 per­
cent discount on the price of land for ground-breaking within 60 days."

90

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Rather than openly killing or even arresting their prey, soldiers would snatch
them, take them to clandestine camps, torture and often kill them, then
deny any knowledge. Bodies were thrown into mass graves. According to
Chile's truth commission, established in May 1990, the secret police would
dispose of some victims by dropping them into the ocean from helicopters
"after first cutting their stomach open with a knife to keep the bodies from
64

floating."

In addition to their lower profile, disappearances turned out to be

an even more effective means of spreading terror than open massacres, so
destabilizing was the idea that the apparatus of the state could be used to
make people vanish into thin air.
By the mid-seventies, disappearances had become the primary enforcement
tool of the Chicago School juntas throughout the Southern Cone—and
none embraced the practice more zealously than the generals occupying
Argentina's presidential palace. By the end of their reign, an estimated thirty
thousand people had been disappeared.

65

Many of them, like their Chilean

counterparts, were thrown from planes into the muddy waters of the Rio de
la Plata.
The Argentine junta excelled at striking just the right balance between
public and private horror, carrying out enough of its terror in the open that
everyone knew what was going on, but simultaneously keeping enough se­
cret that it could always be denied. In its first days in power, the junta made
a single dramatic demonstration of its willingness to use lethal force: a man
was pushed out of a Ford Falcon (a vehicle notorious for its use by the secret
police), tied to Buenos Aires's most prominent monument, the 67.5-meterhigh white Obelisk, and machine-gunned in plain view.
After that, the junta's killings went underground, but they were always pres­
ent. Disappearances, officially denied, were very public spectacles enlisting
the silent complicity of entire neighborhoods. When someone was targeted to
be eliminated, a fleet of military vehicles showed up at that person's home or
workplace and cordoned off the block, often with a helicopter buzzing over­
head. In broad daylight and in full view of the neighbors, police or soldiers bat­
tered down the door and dragged out the victim, who often shouted his or her
name before disappearing into a waiting Ford Falcon, in the hope that news of
the event would reach the family. Some "covert" operations were even more
brazen: police were known to board crowded city buses and drag passengers off
by their hair; in the city of Santa Fe, a couple was kidnapped right at the altar
on their wedding day in front of a church filled with people.

66

The public character of terror did not stop with the initial capture. Once in

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

91

custody, prisoners in Argentina were taken to one of more than three hundred
67

torture camps across the country. Many of them were located in densely pop­
ulated residential areas; one of the most notorious was in a former athletic club
on a busy street in Buenos Aires, another in a schoolhouse in central Bahia
Blanca and yet another in a wing of a working hospital. At these torture cen­
ters, military vehicles sped in and out at odd hours, screams could be heard
through the badly insulated walls and strange, body-shaped parcels were spot­
ted being carried in and out, all silently registered by the nearby residents.
The regime in Uruguay was similarly brazen: one of its main torture cen­
ters was a navy barracks abutting Montevideo's boardwalk, an area once fa­
vored by families for ocean-side strolls and picnics. During the dictatorship,
the beautiful spot was empty, as the city's residents studiously avoided hear­
ing the screams.

68

The Argentine junta was particularly sloppy about disposing of its vic­
tims. A country walk could end in horror because mass graves were barely
concealed. Bodies would show up in public garbage bins, missing fingers
and teeth (much as they do today in Iraq), or they would wash ashore on the
banks of the Rio de la Plata, sometimes half a dozen at a time, after one of
the junta's "death flights." On occasion, they even rained down from helicop­
69

ters into farmers' fields.

All Argentines were in some way enlisted as witnesses to the erasure of
their fellow citizens, yet most people claimed not to know what was going
on. There is a phrase Argentines use to describe the paradox of wide-eyed
knowing and eyes-closed terror that was the dominant state of mind in those
years: "We did not know what nobody could deny."
Since those wanted by the various juntas often took refuge in neighboring
countries, the regional governments collaborated with each other in the noto­
rious Operation Condor. Under Condor, the intelligence agencies of the
Southern Cone shared information about "subversives"—aided by a state-ofthe-art computer system provided by Washington—and then gave each other's
agents safe passage to carry out cross-border kidnappings and torture, a system
eerily resembling the CIA's "extraordinary rendition" network today.*
The

70

juntas also swapped information about the most effective means

* The Latin American operation w a s modeled on Hitler's "Night and Fog." In 1941, Hitler de­
creed that resistance fighters in Nazi-occupied countries would be brought to Germany to
"vanish in the night and fog." Several high-profile Nazis took refuge in Chile and Argentina,
and there is some speculation that they may have trained the Southern Cone intelligence
agencies in these tactics.

92

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

each had found to extract information from their prisoners. Several Chileans
who had been tortured at Chile Stadium in the days after the coup remarked
on the unexpected detail that there were Brazilian soldiers in the room offer­
ing advice on the most scientific uses of pain.

71

There were countless opportunities for such exchanges in this period,
many of them running through the United States and involving the CIA. A
1975 U.S. Senate investigation into U.S. intervention in Chile found that
the CIA had provided training to Pinochet's military in methods for "con­
72

trolling subversion." And U.S. training of Brazilian and Uruguayan police
in interrogation techniques has been heavily documented. According to
court testimony quoted in the country's truth commission report, Brazil:
Never Again, published in 1985, military officers attended formal "torture
classes" at army police units where they watched slides depicting various ex­
cruciating methods. During these sessions, prisoners were brought in for
"practical demonstrations"—brutally tortured while as many as a hundred
army sergeants looked on and learned. The report states that "one of the first
people to introduce this practice into Brazil was Dan Mitrione, an American
police officer. As a police instructor in Belo Horizonte during the early years
of the Brazilian military regime, Mitrione took beggars off the streets and tor­
tured them in classrooms so that the local police would learn the various
ways of creating, in the prisoner, the supreme contradiction between the
73

body and the mind." Mitrione then moved on to conduct police training in
Uruguay, where, in 1970, he was kidnapped and killed by the Tupamaro
guerrillas—the group of leftist revolutionaries had planned the operation in
order to to expose Mitrione's involvement in torture training.* According to
one of his former students, he insisted, like the authors of the CIA manual,
that effective torture was not sadism but science. "The precise pain in the
precise place, in the precise amount" was his motto.

74

The results of this training are unmistakable in all the human rights re­
ports from the Southern Cone in this sinister period. Again and again they
testify to the trademark methods codified in the Kubark manual: early morn­
ing arrests, hooding, intense isolation, drugging, forced nudity, electroshock.
And everywhere, the terrible legacy of the McGill experiments in deliber­
ately induced regression.
Prisoners released from Chile's National Stadium said that bright flood­
lights were kept on twenty-four hours a day, and the order of meals seemed
* The episode w a s the basis for Costa-Gavras's superb 1972 film, State of Siege.

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

93

75

deliberately out of sequence. Soldiers forced many prisoners to wear blan­
kets over their heads so they could neither see nor hear properly, a baffling
practice since all the prisoners knew they were in the stadium. The effect of
the manipulations, prisoners reported, was that they lost their sense of night
and day, and the shock and panic triggered by the coup and their subsequent
arrests were greatly intensified. It was almost as if the stadium had been
turned into a giant laboratory, and they were the test subjects in some strange
experiment in sensory manipulation.
A more faithful copy of the CIA experiments could be seen in Chile's
Villa Grimaldi prison, which "was known for its 'Chile rooms'—wooden iso­
lation compartments so small that prisoners could not kneel" or lie down.

76

Prisoners in Uruguay's Libertad prison were sent to la isla, the island: tiny
windowless cells in which one bare bulb was illuminated at all times. Highvalue prisoners were kept in absolute isolation for more than a decade. "We
were beginning to think we were dead, that our cells weren't cells but rather
graves, that the outside world didn't exist, that the sun was a myth," one of
these prisoners, Mauricio Rosencof, recalled. He saw the sun for a total of
eight hours over eleven and a half years. So deprived were his senses during
this time that he "forgot colors—there were no colors."*

77

In one of Argentina's largest torture centers, the Navy School of Mechan­
ics in Buenos Aires, the isolation chamber was called the capucha,
Juan Miranda, who spent three months in the capucha,

the hood.

told me about that

dark place. "They keep you in a blindfold and a hood with your hands and
legs in chains, lying down on a foam mattress all day long, in the attic of the
prison. I could not see the other prisoners—I was separated from them with
plywood. When the guards would bring food, they made me face the wall,
then they would pull up the hood so I could eat. It was the only time we
were allowed to sit up; otherwise, we had to lie down all the time." Other Ar­
gentine prisoners had their senses starved in cells the size of coffins, called
tubos.
The only reprieve from isolation was the worse fate of the interrogation
room. The most ubiquitous technique, used in the torture chambers of all the
region's military regimes, was electroshock. There were dozens of variations on
how electrical currents were sent coursing through prisoners' bodies: with live
wires, with army field telephones, with needles under fingernails, clamped
* The prison administration at Libertad worked closely with behavioral psychologists to de­
sign torture techniques tailored to each individual's psychological profile—a method now
used at Guantânamo Bay.

94

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

with clothespins on gums, nipples, genitals, ears, mouths, in open wounds,
attached to bodies doused in water to intensify the charge; on bodies strapped
to tables or to Brazil's iron "dragon chair." Argentina's cattle-owning junta was
proud of its distinctive contribution—prisoners were shocked on a metal bed,
called the parrilla (the barbecue), where they were subject to the picana (cat­
tle prod).
The exact number of people who went through the Southern Cone's tor­
ture machinery is impossible to calculate, but it is probably somewhere be­
tween 100,000 and 150,000, tens of thousands of them killed.

78

A Witness in Difficult Times
To be a leftist in those years was to be hunted. Those who did not escape to
exile were in a minute-by-minute struggle to stay one step ahead of the secret
police—an existence of safe houses, phone codes and false identities. One of
the people living that life in Argentina was the country's legendary investiga­
tive journalist Rodolfo Walsh. A gregarious Renaissance man, a writer of
crime fiction and award-winning short stories, Walsh was also a super sleuth
able to crack military codes and spy on the spies. His greatest investigative
triumph took place when he was working as a journalist in Cuba, where he
managed to intercept and decode a CIA telex that blew the cover of the Bay
of Pigs invasion. That information is what allowed Castro to prepare for and
defend against the invasion.
When Argentina's previous military junta had banned Peronism and stran­
gled democracy, Walsh decided to join the armed Montonero movement as
their intelligence expert.* That put him at the very top of the generals' Most
Wanted list, with every new disappearance bringing fresh fears that informa­
tion extracted by the picana would lead the police to the safe house he had se­
cured with his partner, Lilia Ferreyra, in a small village outside Buenos Aires.
From his vast network of sources, Walsh had been trying to track the junta's
many crimes. He compiled lists of the dead and disappeared, the locations of
* The Montoneros were formed a s a response to the previous dictatorship. Peronism was
banned, and Juan Peron, from exile, called on his young supporters to arm themselves and
fight for a return to democracy. They did, and the Montoneros—though they engaged in
armed attacks and kidnappings—played a significant part in forcing democratic elections
with a Peronist candidate in 1973. But when Perôn returned to power, he was threatened by
the Montoneros' popular support and encouraged right-wing death squads to go after them,
which is why the group—the subject of much controversy—was already significantly weak­
ened by the time of the 1976 coup.

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

95

mass graves and of secret torture centers. He prided himself on his knowl­
edge of the enemy, but in 1977 even he was stunned by the furious brutality
that the Argentine junta had unleashed on its own people. In the first year of
military rule, dozens of his close friends and colleagues had disappeared in
the death camps, and his twenty-six-year-old daughter, Vicki, was also dead,
driving Walsh mad with grief.
But with Ford Falcons circling, a life of quiet mourning was not available
to him. Knowing his time was limited, Walsh made a decision about how he
would mark the upcoming one-year anniversary of junta rule: with the offi­
cial papers lavishing praise on the generals for having saved the country, he
would write his own, uncensored, version of the depravity into which his
country had descended. It would be titled "An Open Letter from a Writer to
the Military Junta," and it was composed, Walsh wrote, "without hope of be­
ing listened to, with the certainty of being persecuted, true to the commit­
ment I took up a long time ago, to bear witness in difficult times."

79

The letter would be the decisive condemnation of both the methods of
state terror and the economic system they served. Walsh planned to circulate
his "Open Letter" the way he had distributed previous communiqués from
the underground: by making ten copies, then posting them from different
mailboxes to select contacts who would distribute them further. "I want to
let those fuckers know that I'm still here, still alive and still writing," he told
Lilia as he sat down at his Olympia typewriter.

80

The letter begins with an account of the generals' terror campaign, its
use of "maximum torture, unending and metaphysical," as well as the in­
volvement of the CIA in training the Argentine police. After listing the
methods and grave sites in excruciating detail, Walsh abruptly switches
gears: "These events, which stir the conscience of the civilized world, are
not, however, the greatest suffering inflicted on the Argentinean people,
nor the worst violation for human rights which you have committed. It is
in the economic policy of this government where one discovers not only
the explanation for the crimes, but a greater atrocity which punishes
millions of human beings through planned misery. . . . You only have to
walk around greater Buenos Aires for a few hours to check the speed with
which such a policy transforms the city into a 'shantytown' of ten million
people."

81

The system Walsh was describing was Chicago School neoliberalism, the
economic model that would sweep the world. As it took deeper root in Ar­
gentina in the decades to come, it would eventually push more than half the

96

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

population below the poverty line. Walsh saw it not as an accident but the
careful execution of a plan —"planned misery."
He signed the letter on March 24, 1977, exactly one year after the coup.
The next morning, Walsh and Lilia Ferreyra traveled to Buenos Aires. They
split the bundle of letters between them and dropped them into mailboxes around
the city. A few hours later, Walsh went to a meeting he had arranged with the
family of a disappeared colleague. It was a trap: someone had talked under tor­
ture, and ten armed men were waiting outside the house in ambush, with orders
to capture Walsh. "Bring that fucking bastard back alive, he's mine," Admiral
Massera, one of the three junta leaders, had reportedly directed the soldiers.
Walsh, whose motto was "It isn't a crime to talk; getting arrested is the crime,"
immediately pulled out his gun and began firing. He injured one of the sol­
diers and drew their fire; he was dead by the time the car arrived at the Navy
School of Mechanics. Walsh's body was burned and dumped in a river.

82

The "War on Terror" Cover Story
The juntas of the Southern Cone made no secret of their revolutionary am­
bitions to remake their respective societies, but they were savvy enough to
publicly deny what Walsh was accusing them of: using massive violence in
order to achieve those economic goals, goals that, in the absence of a system
of terrorizing the public and eliminating obstacles, would have certainly
provoked popular revolt.
To the extent that killings by the state were acknowledged, they were jus­
tified by the juntas on the grounds that they were fighting a war against dan­
gerous Marxist terrorists, funded and controlled by the K G B . If the juntas
used "dirty" tactics, it was because their enemy was monstrous. Using lan­
guage that sounds eerily familiar today, Admiral Massera called it "a war for
freedom and against tyranny . . . a war against those who favor death and by
those of us who favor life. . . . We are fighting against nihilists, against agents
of destruction whose only objective is destruction itself, although they dis­
guise this with social crusades."

83

In the run-up to Chile's coup, the CIA bankrolled a massive propaganda
campaign to paint Salvador Allende as a dictator in disguise, a Machiavel­
lian schemer who had used constitutional democracy to gain power but was
on the verge of imposing a Soviet-style police state from which Chileans
would never escape. In Argentina and Uruguay, the largest left-wing guer­
rilla groups —the Montoneros and the Tupamaros—were presented as such

S T A T E S OF S H O C K

97

perilous threats to national security that the generals had no other choice but
to suspend democracy, seize the state for themselves and use whatever
means were necessary to crush them.
In every case, the threat was either wildly exaggerated or completely man­
ufactured by the juntas. Among its many other revelations, the 1975 Senate
investigation disclosed that the U.S. government's own intelligence reports
84

showed that Allende posed no threat to democracy. As for Argentina's
Montoneros and Uruguay's Tupamaros, they were armed groups with signif­
icant popular support, able to pull off daredevil attacks on military and cor­
porate targets. But Uruguay's Tupamaros were completely dismantled by the
time the military seized absolute power, and Argentina's Montoneros were
finished within the first six months of a dictatorship that stretched on for
seven years (which was why Walsh was in hiding). Declassified State De­
partment documents have proven that César Augusto Guzzetti, the Argen­
tine junta's foreign minister, told Henry Kissinger on October 7, 1976, that
"the terrorist organizations have been dismantled"—yet the junta would go
on to disappear tens of thousands of citizens after that date.

8>

For many years, the U.S. State Department also presented the "dirty wars"
in the Southern Cone as pitched battles between the military and dangerous
guerrillas, struggles that at times got out of hand but were still deserving of
economic and military aid. There is mounting evidence that in Argentina as
well as in Chile, Washington knew it was supporting a very different kind of
military operation.
In March 2006, the National Security Archive in Washington released
the newly declassified minutes from a State Department meeting that took
place just two days after the Argentine junta staged its 1976 coup. At the
meeting, William Rogers, assistant secretary of state for Latin America, tells
Kissinger that "we've got to expect a fair amount of repression, probably a
good deal of blood, in Argentina before too long. I think they're going to
have to come down very hard not only on the terrorists but on the dissidents
of trade unions and their parties."

86

Indeed they did. The vast majority of the victims of the Southern Cone's
terror apparatus were not members of armed groups but non-violent activists
working in factories, farms, shantytowns and universities. They were econo­
mists, artists, psychologists and left-wing party loyalists. They were killed not
because of their weapons (which most did not have) but because of their be­
liefs. In the Southern Cone, where contemporary capitalism was born, the
"War on Terror" was a war against all obstacles to the new order.

CHAPTER 4

C L E A N I N G THE SLATE
T E R R O R D O E S ITS W O R K

Extermination in Argentina i s not s p o n t a n e o u s , it is not by chance,
it is not irrational: it is the systematic destruction of a "substantial
part" of the Argentine national g r o u p , intended to t r a n s f o r m the
g r o u p a s s u c h , to redefine its w a y of being, its social relations, its
fate, its future.
—Daniel Feierstein, a n Argentine sociologist, 2 0 0 4

1

I had just one g o a l — t o stay alive until the next d a y . . . . But it
w a s n ' t just to survive, but to survive a s m e .
— M a r i o Villani, survivor of four y e a r s in A r g e n t i n a ' s torture c a m p s

2

In 1976, Orlando Letelier was back in Washington, D.C., no longer as an
ambassador but as an activist with a progressive think tank, the Institute for
Policy Studies. Haunted by thoughts of the colleagues and friends still facing
torture in junta camps, Letelier used his newly recovered freedom to expose
Pinochet's crimes and to defend Allende's record against the CIA propa­
ganda machine.
The activism was having an effect, and Pinochet faced universal condem­
nation for his human rights record. What frustrated Letelier, a trained econ­
omist, was that even as the world gasped in horror at reports of summary
executions and electroshock in the jails, most were silent in the face of the
economic shock therapy; or, in the case of the international banks showering
the junta with loans, downright giddy about Pinochet's embrace of "freemarket fundamentals." Letelier rejected a frequently articulated notion that

C L E A N I N G THE SLATE

99

the junta had two separate, easily compartmentalized projects—one a bold
experiment in economic transformation, the other an evil system of grisly
torture and terror. There was only one project, the former ambassador in­
sisted, in which terror was the central tool of the free-market transformation.
"The violation of human rights, the system of institutionalized brutality,
the drastic control and suppression of every form of meaningful dissent is dis­
cussed (and often condemned) as a phenomenon only indirectly linked, or
indeed entirely unrelated, to the classical unrestrained 'free market' policies
that have been enforced by the military junta," Letelier wrote in a searing es­
say for The Nation. He pointed out that "this particularly convenient con­
cept of a social system, in which 'economic freedom' and political terror
coexist without touching each other, allows these financial spokesmen to
support their concept of 'freedom' while exercising their verbal muscles in
defense of human rights."

3

Letelier went so far as to write that Milton Friedman, as "the intellectual
architect and unofficial adviser for the team of economists now running the
Chilean economy," shared responsibility for Pinochet's crimes. He dis­
missed Friedman's defense that lobbying for shock treatment was merely of­
fering "technical" advice. The "establishment of a free 'private economy'
and the control of inflation a la Friedman," Letelier argued, could not be
done peacefully. "The economic plan has had to be enforced, and in the
Chilean context that could be done only by the killing of thousands, the es­
tablishment of concentration camps all over the country, the jailing of more
than 100,000 persons in three years. . . . Regression for the majorities and
'economic freedom' for small privileged groups are in Chile two sides of
the same coin." There was, he wrote, "an inner harmony" between the "free
market" and unlimited terror.

4

Letelier's controversial article was published at the end of August 1976.
Less than a month later, on September 21, the forty-four-year-old economist
was driving to work in downtown Washington, D.C. As he passed through
the heart of the embassy district, a remote-controlled bomb planted under
the driver's seat exploded, sending the car flying and blowing off both his
legs. With his severed foot abandoned on the pavement, Letelier was rushed
to George Washington Hospital; he was dead on arrival. The former ambas­
sador had been driving with a twenty-five-year-old American colleague,
5

Ronni Moffit, and she also lost her life in the attack. It was Pinochet's most
outrageous and defiant crime since the coup itself.
An FBI investigation revealed that the bomb had been the work of

100

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Michael Townley, a senior member of Pinochet's secret police, later con­
victed in a U.S federal court for the crime. The assassins had been admitted
to the country on false passports with the knowledge of the CIA.

6

When Pinochet died in December 2006 at age ninety-one, he faced multi­
ple attempts to put him on trial for crimes committed during his rule—from
murder, kidnapping and torture to corruption and tax evasion. The family of
Orlando Letelier had been trying for decades to bring Pinochet to trial for
the bombing in Washington and to open the U.S. files on the incident. But
the dictator got the last word in death, evading all the trials and issuing a
posthumous letter in which he defended the coup and the use of "maximum
rigor" in staving off a "dictatorship of the proletariat. . . . How I wish the Sep.
11, 1973, military action had not been necessary!" Pinochet wrote. "How I
wish the Marxist-Leninist ideology had not entered our fatherland!"

7

Not all the criminals of Latin America's terror years have been so fortu­
nate. In September 2006, twenty-three years after the end of Argentina's
military dictatorship, one of the main enforcers of the terror was finally sen­
tenced to life in prison. The convicted man was Miguel Osvaldo Etchecolatz,
who had been police commissioner of the province of Buenos Aires during
the junta years.
During the historic trial, Jorge Julio Lôpez, a key witness, went missing—
disappeared. Lopez had been disappeared in the seventies, brutally tortured,
then released—now it was happening all over again. In Argentina, Lopez be­
8

came known as the first person to be "double disappeared." As of mid-2007,
he was still missing, and the police were virtually certain that he had been
kidnapped as a warning to other would-be witnesses—the same old tactics of
the terror years.
The judge on the case, fifty-five-year-old Carlos Rozanski of Argentina's
federal court, found Etchecolatz guilty of six counts of homicide, six counts
of unlawful imprisonment and seven cases of torture. When he handed
down his verdict, he took an extraordinary step. He said that the conviction
did not do justice to the true nature of the crime and that, in the interest of
"the construction of collective memory," he needed to add that these were
"all crimes against humanity committed in the context of the genocide that
took place in the Republic of Argentina between 1976 and 1983."

9

With that sentence, the judge played his part in the rewriting of Argen­
tine history: the killings of leftists in the seventies were not part of a "dirty
war" in which two sides clashed and various crimes were committed, as had

C L E A N I N G THE SLATE

101

been the official story for decades. Nor were the disappeared merely victims
of mad dictators who were drunk on sadism and their own personal power.
What had happened was something more scientific, more terrifyingly ra­
tional. As the judge put it, there had been a "plan of extermination carried
out by those who ruled the country."

10

He explained that the killings were part of a system, planned far in ad­
vance, duplicated in identical fashion across the country, and committed
with clear intent not of attacking individual persons but of destroying the
parts of society that those people represented. Genocide is an attempt to
murder a group, not a collection of individual persons; therefore, argued the
judge, it was genocide.

11

Rozanski recognized that his use of the word "genocide" was controver­
sial, and he wrote a lengthy decision backing up the choice. He acknowl­
edged that the UN Convention on Genocide defines the crime as an "intent
to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnical, religious or racial group";
the Convention does not include eliminating a group based on its political
beliefs—as had been the case in Argentina—but Rozanski said he did not
12

consider that exclusion to be legally legitimate. Pointing to a little-known
chapter in UN history, he explained that on December 11, 1946, in direct
response to the Nazi Holocaust, the UN General Assembly passed a resolu­
tion by unanimous vote barring acts of genocide "when racial, religious, po­
litical and other groups have been destroyed, entirely or in part."

13

The

reason the word "political" had been excised from the Convention two years
later was that Stalin demanded it. He knew that if destroying a "political
group" was genocidal, his bloody purges and mass imprisonment of political
opponents would fit the bill. Stalin had enough support from other leaders
who also wanted to reserve the right to wipe out their political opponents
that the word was dropped.

14

Rozanski wrote that he considered the original UN definition to be the
more legitimate, since it had not been subject to this self-interested compro­
mise.* He also made reference to a ruling by a Spanish national court that
had put one of Argentina's notorious torturers on trial in 1998. That court
had also ruled that Argentina's junta had committed "the crime of geno­
cide." It defined the group the junta was trying to wipe out as "those citizens
* The criminal codes of many countries, including Portugal, Peru and Costa Rica, bar acts of
genocide, with definitions that clearly include political groupings or "social groups." French
law is even broader, defining genocide a s a plan intended to destroy in whole or in part "a
group determined by any arbitrary criteria."

102

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

that did not fit the model determined by the repressors to be suitable for the
15

new order being established in the country." The following year, in 1999,
the Spanish judge Baltasar Garzôn, famous for issuing an arrest warrant for
Augusto Pinochet, also argued that Argentina had suffered genocide. He too
made an attempt to define which group had been targeted for extermina­
tion. The junta's goal, he wrote, was "to establish a new order, like Hitler
hoped to achieve in Germany, in which there was no room for certain types
of people." The people who did not fit the new order were ones "located in
those sectors that got in the way of the ideal configuration of the new Argen­
tinean Nation."

16

There is, of course, no comparison in scale between what happened un­
der the Nazis, or in Rwanda in 1994, and the crimes of the corporatist dicta­
torships of Latin America in the seventies. If genocide means a holocaust,
these crimes do not belong in that category. However, if genocide is under­
stood as these courts define it, as an attempt to deliberately obliterate the
groups who were barriers to a political project, then this process can be seen
not just in Argentina but, to varying degrees of intensity, throughout the re­
gion that was turned into the Chicago School laboratory. In these countries,
the people who "got in the way of the ideal" were leftists of all stripes: econ­
omists, soup kitchen workers, trade unionists, musicians, farm organizers,
politicians. Members of all these groups were subjected to a clear and delib­
erate region-wide strategy, coordinated across borders by Operation Condor,
to uproot and erase the left.
Since the fall of Communism, free markets and free people have been
packaged as a single ideology that claims to be humanity's best and only
defense against repeating a history filled with mass graves, killing fields and
torture chambers. Yet in the Southern Cone, the first place where the con­
temporary religion of unfettered free markets escaped from the basement
workshops of the University of Chicago and was applied in the real world, it
did not bring democracy; it was predicated on the overthrow of democracy in
country after country. And it did not bring peace but required the systematic
murder of tens of thousands and the torture of between 100,000 and 150,000
people.
There was, as Letelier wrote, an "inner harmony" between the drive to
cleanse sectors of society and the ideology at the heart of the project. The
Chicago Boys and their professors, who provided advice and took up top
posts in the military regimes of the Southern Cone, believed in a form of

CLEANING THE SLATE

103

capitalism that is purist by its very nature. Theirs is a system based entirely
on a belief in "balance" and "order" and the need to be free of interferences
and "distortions" in order to succeed. Because of these traits, a regime com­
mitted to the faithful application of this ideal cannot accept the presence of
competing or tempering worldviews. In order for the ideal to be achieved, it
requires a monopoly on ideology; otherwise, according to the central theory,
the economic signals become distorted and the entire system is thrown out
of balance.
The Chicago Boys could scarcely have selected a part of the world less
hospitable to this absolutist experiment than the Southern Cone of Latin
America in the 1970s. The extraordinary rise of developmentalism meant
that the area was a cacophony of precisely the policies that the Chicago
School considered distortions or "uneconomic ideas." More important, it
was teeming with popular and intellectual movements that had emerged in
direct opposition to laissez-faire capitalism. Such views were not marginal
but typical of the majority of citizens, as reflected in election after election
in country after country. A Chicago School transformation was about as
likely to be warmly received in the Southern Cone as a proletarian revolu­
tion in Beverly Hills.
Before the terror campaign descended on Argentina, Rodolfo Walsh had
written, "Nothing can stop us, neither jail nor death. Because you can't jail
or kill a whole people and because the vast majority of Argentinians. . .
know that only the people will save the people."

17

Salvador Allende, as he

watched the tanks roll in to lay siege to the presidential palace, had made
one final radio address suffused with this same defiance: "I am certain that
the seed we planted in the worthy consciousness of thousands and thousands
of Chileans cannot be definitively uprooted," he said, his last public words.
"They have the strength; they can subjugate us, but they cannot halt social
processes by either crime or force. History is ours, and the people make it."

18

The junta commanders of the region and their economic accomplices
were well acquainted with those truths. A veteran of several Argentine mili­
tary coups explained the thinking inside the military: "In 1955 we believed
that the problem was [Juan] Perôn, so we took him out, but by 1976 we al­
19

ready knew that the problem was the working class." It was the same across
the region: the problem was large and deep. That realization meant that if
the neoliberal revolution was going to succeed, the juntas needed to do what
Allende had claimed was impossible —definitively uproot the seed that was
sown during Latin America's leftward surge. In its Declaration of Principles,

104

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

issued after the coup, the Pinochet dictatorship described its mission as a
"prolonged and profound operation to change Chilean mentality," an echo of
the statement twenty years earlier by USAID's Albion Patterson, godfather
of the Chile Project: "What we need to do is change the formation of the
men."

20

But how to do that? The seed that Allende referred to wasn't a single idea
or even a group of political parties and trade unions. By the sixties and early
seventies in Latin America, the left was the dominant mass culture —it was
the poetry of Pablo Neruda, the folk music of Victor Jara and Mercedes Sosa,
the liberation theology of the Third World Priests, the emancipatory theater
of Augusto Boal, the radical pedagogy of Paulo Freire, the revolutionary jour­
nalism of Eduardo Galeano and Walsh himself. It was legendary heroes and
martyrs of past and recent history from José Gervasio Artigas to Simon Boli­
var to Che Guevara. When the juntas set out to defy Allende's prophecy and
pull up socialism by its roots, it was a declaration of war against this entire
culture.
The imperative was reflected in the dominant metaphors used by the
military regimes in Brazil, Chile, Uruguay and Argentina: those fascist
standbys of cleaning, scrubbing, uprooting and curing. In Brazil, the
junta's roundups of leftists were code-named Operaçâo Limpeza, Opera­
tion Cleanup. On the day of the coup, Pinochet referred to Allende and
his cabinet as "that filth that was going to ruin the country."

21

One month

later he pledged to "extirpate the root of evil from Chile," to bring about a
"moral cleansing" of the nation, "purified of vices" —an echo of the Third
Reich author Alfred Rosenberg's call for "a merciless cleansing with an
iron broom."

22

Cleansing Cultures
In Chile, Argentina and Uruguay, the juntas staged massive ideological
cleanup operations, burning books by Freud, Marx and Neruda, closing
hundreds of newspapers and magazines, occupying universities, banning
strikes and political meetings.
Some of the most vicious attacks were reserved for the "pink" economists
whom the Chicago Boys could not defeat before the coups. At the University
of Chile, rival to the Chicago Boys' home base, the Catholic University,
hundreds of professors were fired for "inobservance of moral duties" (includ­
ing André Gunder Frank, the dissident Chicagoan who wrote angry letters

C L E A N I N G THE SLATE

105

23

home to his former professors). During the coup, Gunder Frank reported
that "six students were shot on sight in the main entrance to the School of
24

Economics to offer an object lesson to the remainder." When the junta
seized power in Argentina, soldiers marched into the University of the South
in Bahfa Blanca and imprisoned seventeen academics on charges of "sub­
versive instruction"; once again, most were from the economics depart­
ment.

25

"It is necessary to destroy the sources which feed, form and

indoctrinate the subversive delinquent," one of the generals announced at a
26

press conference. A total of eight thousand "ideologically suspect" leftist
27

educators were purged as part of Operation Clarity. In high schools, they
banned group presentations—a sign of a latent collective spirit, dangerous to
"individual freedom."

28

In Santiago, the legendary left-wing folk singer Victor Jara was among
those taken to the Chile Stadium. His treatment was the embodiment of the
furious determination to silence a culture. First the soldiers broke both his
hands so he could not play the guitar, then they shot him forty-four times,
29

according to Chile's truth and reconciliation commission. To make sure he
could not inspire from beyond the grave, the regime ordered his master
recordings destroyed. Mercedes Sosa, a fellow musician, was forced into ex­
ile from Argentina, the revolutionary dramatist Augusto Boal was tortured
and exiled from Brazil, Eduardo Galeano was driven from Uruguay and
Walsh was murdered in the streets of Buenos Aires. A culture was being de­
liberately exterminated.
Meanwhile, another sanitized, purified culture was replacing it. At the
start of the dictatorships in Chile, Argentina and Uruguay, the only public
gatherings permitted were shows of military strength and football matches.
In Chile, wearing slacks was enough to get you arrested if you were a
woman, long hair if you were a man. "All over the Republic a thorough
cleansing is under way," declared an editorial in a junta-controlled Argen­
tine newspaper. It called for a mass scrubbing of leftist graffiti: "Soon
enough the surfaces will shine through, released from that nightmare by the
action of soap and water."

30

In Chile, Pinochet was determined to break his people's habit of taking
to the streets. The tiniest gatherings were dispersed with water cannons,
Pinochet's favorite crowd-control weapon. The junta had hundreds of
them, small enough to drive onto sidewalks and douse cliques of school­
children handing out leaflets; even funeral processions, when the mourn­
ing got too rowdy, were brutally repressed. Nicknamed guanacos,

after a

106

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

llama known for its habit of spitting, the ubiquitous cannons cleared away
people as if they were human garbage, leaving the streets glistening, clean
and empty.
Shortly after the coup, the Chilean junta issued an edict urging citizens
to "contribute to cleansing your homeland" by reporting foreign "extrem­
ists" and "fanaticized Chileans."

31

Who Was Killed—and Why
The majority of the people swept up in the raids were not "terrorists," as the
rhetoric claimed, but rather the people whom the juntas had identified as
posing the most serious barriers to their economic program. Some were ac­
tual opponents, but many were simply seen as representing values contrary
to the revolution's.
The systematic nature of this cleansing campaign is clearly corroborated
by matching the dates and times of the disappearances documented in hu­
man rights and truth commission reports. In Brazil, the junta did not begin
mass repression until the late sixties, but there was one exception: as soon as
the coup was launched, soldiers rounded up the leadership of trade unions
active in the factories and on the large ranches. According to Brasil: Nunca
Mais (Never Again), they were sent to jail, where many faced torture, "for the
simple reason that they were inspired by a political philosophy opposed by
the authorities." This truth commission report, based on the military's own
court records, notes that the General Workers Command ( C G T ) , the main
coalition of trade unions, appears in the junta's court proceedings "as an om­
nipresent demon to be exorcised." The report bluntly concludes that the rea­
son "the authorities who took over in 1964 were especially careful to 'clean
out' this sector" is that they "feared the spread of. . . resistance from the la­
bor unions to their economic programs, which were based on tightening
salaries and denationalizing the economy."

32

In both Chile and Argentina, the military governments used the initial
chaos of the coup to launch vicious attacks on the trade union movement.
These operations were clearly planned well in advance, as the systematic
raids began on the day of the coup itself. In Chile, while all eyes were on the
besieged presidential palace, other battalions were dispatched to "factories in
what were known as the 'industrial belts,' where troops carried out raids and
arrested people. During the next few days," Chile's truth and reconciliation
report notes, several more factories were raided, "leading to massive arrests of

CLEANING THE SLATE

people, some of whom were later killed or disappeared."

33

107

In 1976, 80 per­

cent of Chile's political prisoners were workers and peasants.

34

Argentina's truth commission report, Nunca Mas (Never Again), docu­
ments a parallel surgical strike against trade unions: "We notice that a large
proportion of the operations [against workers] were carried out on the day of
35

the coup itself, or immediately after." Amid the list of attacks on factories,
one testimony is particularly revealing about how "terrorism" was used as a
smoke screen to go after non-violent worker activists. Graciela Geuna, a po­
litical prisoner in the torture camp known as La Perla, described how the sol­
diers guarding her became agitated by an impending strike at a power plant.
The strike was to be "an important example in the resistance to the military
dictatorship," and the junta did not want it to happen. So, Geuna recalled,
the "soldiers in the unit decided to make it illegal or, as they said, to 'Montonerize' it" (the Montoneros being the guerrilla group the army had already
effectively broken). The strikers had nothing to do with the Montoneros, but
that didn't matter. The "soldiers at La Perla themselves printed leaflets they
signed 'Montoneros' —leaflets calling on the power workers to strike." The
leaflets then became the "proof" needed to kidnap and kill the union lead­
ership.

36

Corporate-Sponsored Torture
Attacks on union leaders were often carried out in close coordination with
the owners of the workplaces, and court cases filed in recent years provide
some of the best-documented examples of direct involvement by local sub­
sidiaries of foreign multinationals.
In the years prior to the coup in Argentina, the rise of left-wing militancy
had affected foreign companies both economically and personally; between
1972 and 1976, five executives from the auto company Fiat were assassi­
nated.

37

The fortunes of such companies changed dramatically when the

junta took power and implemented Chicago School policies; now they
could flood the local market with imports, pay lower wages, lay workers off at
will and send their profits home unhindered by regulations.
Several multinationals effusively expressed their gratitude. On the first
new year under military rule in Argentina, Ford Motor Company took out a
celebratory newspaper advertisement openly aligning itself with the regime:
"1976: Once again, Argentina finds its way. 1977: New Year of faith and
hope for all Argentines of good will. Ford Motor of Argentina and its people

108

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

commit themselves to the struggle to bring about the great destiny of the Fa­
therland."

38

Foreign corporations did more than thank the juntas for their

fine work; some were active participants in the terror campaigns. In Brazil,
several multinationals banded together and financed their own privatized
torture squads. In mid-1969, just as the junta entered its most brutal phase,
an extralegal police force was launched called Operation Bandeirantes,
known as OBAN. Staffed with military officers, OBAN was funded, accord­
ing to Brazil: Never Again, "by contributions from various multinational cor­
porations, including Ford and General Motors." Because it was outside
official military and police structures, OBAN enjoyed "flexibility and im­
punity with regard to interrogation methods," the report states, and quickly
gained a reputation for unparalleled sadism.

39

It was in Argentina, however, that the involvement of Ford's local sub­
sidiary with the terror apparatus was most overt. The company supplied cars
to the military, and the green Ford Falcon sedan was the vehicle used for
thousands of kidnappings and disappearances. The Argentine psychologist
and playwright Eduardo Pavlovsky described the car as "the symbolic expres­
sion of terror. A death-mobile."

40

While Ford supplied the junta with cars, the junta provided Ford with a
service of its own —ridding the assembly lines of troublesome trade
unionists. Before the coup, Ford had been forced to make significant con­
cessions to its workers: one hour off for lunch instead of twenty minutes, and
1 percent of the sale of each car to go to social service programs. All that
changed abruptly on the day of the coup, when the counterrevolution be­
gan. The Ford factory in suburban Buenos Aires was turned into an armed
camp; in the weeks that followed, it was swarming with military vehicles, in­
cluding tanks and helicopters buzzing overhead. Workers have testified to
the presence of a battalion of one hundred soldiers permanently stationed at
41

the factory. "It looked like we were at war in Ford. And it was all directed at
us, the workers," recalled Pedro Troiani, one of the union delegates.

42

Soldiers prowled the facility, grabbing and hooding the most active union
members, helpfully pointed out by the factory foreman. Troiani was among
those pulled off the assembly line. He recalled that "before detaining me,
they walked me around the factory, they did it right out in the open so that the
people would see: Ford used this to eliminate unionism in the factory."

43

Most startling was what happened next: rather than being rushed off to a
nearby prison, Troiani and others say soldiers took them to a detention facil­
ity that had been set up inside the factory gates. In their place of work, where

C L E A N I N G THE SLATE

109

they had been negotiating contracts just days before, workers were beaten,
44

kicked and, in two cases, electroshocked. They were then taken to outside
prisons where the torture continued for weeks and, in some cases, months.

45

According to the workers' lawyers, at least twenty-five Ford union reps were
kidnapped in this period, half of them detained on the company grounds in
a facility that human rights groups in Argentina are lobbying to have placed
on an official list of former clandestine detention facilities.

46

In 2002, federal prosecutors filed a criminal complaint against Ford Ar­
gentina on behalf of Troiani and fourteen other workers, alleging that the
company is legally responsible for the repression that took place on its prop­
erty. "Ford [Argentina] and its executives colluded in the kidnapping of its
own workers, and I think they should be held responsible for that," says
47

Troiani. Mercedes-Benz (a subsidiary of DaimlerChrysler) is facing a simi­
lar investigation stemming from allegations that the company collaborated
with the military during the 1970s to purge one of its plants of union leaders,
allegedly giving names and addresses of sixteen workers who were later dis­
appeared, fourteen of them permanently.

48

According to the Latin American historian Karen Robert, by the end of
the dictatorship, "virtually all the shop-floor delegates had been disappeared
from the country's biggest firms. . . such as Mercedes-Benz, Chrysler and
49

Fiat Concord." Both Ford and Mercedes-Benz deny that their executives
played any role in the repression. The cases are ongoing.
It wasn't only unionists who faced preemptive attack—it was anyone who
represented a vision of society built on values other than pure profit. Particu­
larly brutal throughout the region were the attacks on farmers who had been
involved in the struggle for land reform. Leaders of the Argentine Agrarian
Leagues—who had been spreading incendiary ideas about the right of peas­
ants to own land—were hunted down and tortured, often out in the fields
they worked, in full view of the community. Soldiers used truck batteries to
power their picanas,

turning the ubiquitous farm implement against the

farmers themselves. Meanwhile, the junta's economic policies were a wind­
fall for the landowners and cattle ranchers. In Argentina, Martinez de Hoz
had deregulated the price of meat, and the cost was up more than 700 per­
cent, leading to record profits.

50

In the slums, the targets of the preemptive strikes were community workers,
many church-based, who organized the poorest sectors of society to demand
health care, public housing and education—in other words, the "welfare

110

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

state" being dismantled by the Chicago Boys. "The poor won't have any
goody-goodies to look after them anymore!" Norberto Liwsky, an Argentine
doctor, was told as "they applied electric shocks to my gums, nipples, geni­
tals, abdomen and ears."

51

An Argentine priest who collaborated with the junta explained the guid­
ing philosophy: "The enemy was Marxism. Marxism in the church, let us
52

say, and in the mother country—the danger of a new nation." That "danger
of a new nation" helps explain why so many of the juntas' victims were
young. In Argentina, 81 percent of the thirty thousand people who were dis­
appeared were between the ages of sixteen and thirty.

53

"We are working

now for the next twenty years," a notorious Argentine torturer told one of his
victims.

54

Among the youngest were a group of high-school students who, in Sep­
tember 1976, banded together to ask for lower bus fare. For the junta, the
collective action showed that the teenagers had been infected with the virus
of Marxism, and it responded with genocidal fury, torturing and killing six of
55

the high-schoolers who had dared to make this subversive request. Miguel
Osvaldo Etchecolatz, the police commissioner finally sentenced in 2006,
was one of the key figures implicated in the attack.
The pattern of these disappearances was clear: while the shock therapists
were trying to remove all relics of collectivism from the economy, the shock
troops were removing the representatives of that ethos from the streets, the
universities and the factory floors.
In unguarded moments, some of those on the front lines of the economic
transformation have acknowledged that the achieving of their goals required
mass repression. Victor Emmanuel, the Burson-Marsteller public relations
executive who was in charge of selling the Argentine junta's new businessfriendly regime to the outside world, told a researcher that violence was nec­
essary to open up Argentina's "protective, statist" economy. "No one, but no
one, invests in a country involved in a civil war," he said, but he admitted
that it wasn't just guerrillas who died. "A lot of innocent people were proba­
bly killed," he told the author Marguerite Feitlowitz, but, "given the situa­
tion, immense force was required."

56

Sergio de Castro, Pinochet's Chicago Boy economics minister who over­
saw the implemention of shock treatment, said he could never have done it
without Pinochet's iron fist backing him up. "Public opinion was very much
against [us], so we needed a strong personality to maintain the policy. It
was our luck that President Pinochet understood and had the character to

CLEANING THE SLATE

111

withstand criticism." He has also observed that an "authoritarian govern­
ment" is best suited to safeguarding economic freedom because of its "im­
personal" use of power.

57

As is the case with most state terror, the targeted killings served a dual pur­
pose. First, they removed real obstacles to the project—the people most
likely to fight back. Second, the fact that everyone witnessed the "trouble­
makers" being disappeared sent an unmistakable warning to those who
might be thinking of resisting, thereby eliminating future obstacles.
And it worked. "We were confused and anguished, docile and waiting to
take orders. . . people regressed; they became more dependent and fearful,"
58

recalled the Chilean psychiatrist Marco Antonio de la Parra. They were, in
other words, in shock. So when economic shocks sent prices soaring and
wages dropping, the streets in Chile, Argentina and Uruguay remained clear
and calm. There were no food riots, no general strikes. Families coped by
quietly skipping meals, feeding their babies maté, a traditional tea that sup­
presses hunger, and waking up before dawn to walk for hours to work, saving
on bus fare. Those who died from malnutrition or typhoid were quietly
buried.
Just a decade earlier, the countries of the Southern Cone—with their ex­
ploding industrial sectors, rapidly rising middle classes and strong health and
education systems —had been the hope of the developing world. Now rich
and poor were hurtling into different economic worlds, with the wealthy
gaining honorary citizenship in the State of Florida and the rest being
pushed back into underdevelopment, a process that would deepen through­
out the neoliberal "restructurings" of the postdictatorship era. No longer in­
spirational examples, these countries were now terrifying warnings about
what happens to poor nations that think they can pull themselves out of the
Third World. It was a conversion that paralleled what prisoners were going
through inside the junta's torture centers: it wasn't enough to talk—they
were forced to renounce their most cherished beliefs, betray their lovers and
children. The ones who gave in were called quebrados,

the broken ones. So

it was in the Southern Cone: the region wasn't just beaten, it was broken,
quebrado.

Torture as "Curing"
While the policies attempted to excise collectivism from the culture, inside
the prisons torture tried to excise it from the mind and spirit. As an Argentine

112

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

junta editorial noted in 1976, "minds too must be cleansed, for that is where
the error was born."

59

Many torturers adopted the posture of a doctor or surgeon. Like the
Chicago economists with their painful but necessary shock treatments, these
interrogators imagined that their electroshocks and other torments were
therapeutic—that they were administering a kind of medicine to their pris­
oners, who were often referred to inside the camps as apestosos, the dirty or
diseased ones. They would heal them of the sickness that was socialism, of
the impulse toward collective action.* Their "treatments" were agonizing,
certainly; they might even be lethal—but it was for the patient's own good.
"If you have gangrene in an arm, you have to cut it off, right?" Pinochet de­
manded, in impatient response to criticisms of his human rights record.

60

In testimony from truth commission reports across the region, prisoners tell
of a system designed to force them to betray the principle most integral to their
sense of self. For most Latin American leftists, that most cherished principle
was what Argentina's radical historian Osvaldo Bayer called "the only tran­
61

scendental theology: solidarity." The torturers understood the importance of
solidarity well, and they set out to shock that impulse of social interconnectedness out of their prisoners. O f course all interrogation is purportedly about
gaining valuable information and therefore forcing betrayal, but many prison­
ers report that their torturers were far less interested in the information, which
they usually already possessed, than in achieving the act of betrayal itself. The
point of the exercise was getting prisoners to do irreparable damage to that part
of themselves that believed in helping others above all else, that part of them­
selves that made them activists, replacing it with shame and humiliation.
Sometimes the betrayals were completely beyond a prisoner's control. For
instance, the Argentine prisoner Mario Villani had his agenda book with him
when he was kidnapped. It contained the coordinates for a meeting he had
scheduled with a friend; the soldiers showed up in his place, and another ac­
tivist was disappeared into the terror machinery. On the table, Villani's inter­
rogators tortured him with the knowledge that "they got Jorge because he'd
kept his date with me. They knew that my knowing this would be a far worse
torment than 220 volts. The remorse is almost more than you can take."

62

* This brought electroshock therapy full circle to its earliest incarnation as an exorcism tech­
nique. The first recorded use of medical electrocution w a s by a S w i s s doctor practicing in the
1700s. Believing that mental illness w a s caused by the devil, he had a patient hold on to
a wire that he powered with a static electricity machine; one jolt of electricity was given for
each demon. The patient w a s then pronounced cured.

CLEANING THE SLATE

113

The ultimate acts of rebellion in this context were small gestures of kind­
ness between prisoners, such as tending to each other's wounds or sharing
scarce food. When such loving acts were discovered, they were met with
harsh punishment. Prisoners were goaded into being as individualistic as
possible, constantly offered Faustian bargains, like choosing between more
unbearable torture for themselves or more torture for a fellow prisoner. In
some cases, prisoners were so successfully broken that they agreed to hold
the picana on their fellow inmates or go on television and renounce their for­
mer beliefs. These prisoners represented the ultimate triumph for their tor­
turers: not only had the prisoners abandoned solidarity but in order to
survive they had succumbed to the cutthroat ethos at the heart of laissez-faire
capitalism —"looking out for No. 1," in the words of the I T T executive.*

63

Both groups of shock "doctors" working in the Southern Cone—the gen­
erals and the economists —resorted to nearly identical metaphors for their
work. Friedman likened his role in Chile to that of a physician who offered
"technical medical advice to the Chilean Government to help end a medical
64

plague"—the "plague of inflation." Arnold Harberger, head of the Latin
American program at the University of Chicago, went even further. In a lec­
ture delivered to young economists in Argentina, long after the dictatorship
had ended, he said that good economists are themselves the treatment—they
65

serve "as antibodies to combat anti-economic ideas and policies." The Ar­
gentine junta's foreign minister, César Augusto Guzzetti, said that "when
the social body of the country has been contaminated by a disease that cor­
rodes its entrails, it forms antibodies. These antibodies cannot be considered
in the same way as the microbes. As the government controls and destroys
the guerrilla, the action of the antibody will disappear, as is already happen­
ing. It is only a natural reaction to a sick body."

66

* The contemporary expression of this personality-breaking process is found in the way I s ­
lam is used as a weapon against Muslim prisoners in U.S.-run jails. In the mountain of evi­
dence that has cascaded out of Abu Ghraib and Guantânamo Bay, two forms of prisoner
abuse come up again and again: nudity and the deliberate interference with Islamic practice,
whether by forcing prisoners to shave their beards, kicking the Koran, wrapping prisoners in
Israeli flags, forcing men into homosexual poses, even touching men with simulated m e n ­
strual blood. Moazzam Begg, a former prisoner at Guantânamo, says he w a s frequently
forcibly shaved and a guard would say, "This is the part that really gets to you M u s l i m s , isn't
it?" Islam is desecrated not because it is hated by the guards (though it may well be) but be­
cause it is loved by the prisoners. Since the goal of torture is to unmake personalities,
everything that comprises a prisoner's personality must be systematically stolen —from his
clothes to his cherished beliefs. In the seventies that meant attacking social solidarity; today
it means assaulting Islam.

1H

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

This language is, of course, the same intellectual construct that allowed
the Nazis to argue that by killing "diseased" members of society they were
healing the "national body." As the Nazi doctor Fritz Klein claimed, "I want
to preserve life. And out of respect for human life, I would remove a gan­
grenous appendix from a diseased body. The Jew is the gangrenous appendix
in the body of mankind." The Khmer Rouge used the same language to jus­
tify their slaughter in Cambodia: "What is infected must be cut out."

67

"Normal" Children
Nowhere were the parallels more chilling than in the Argentine junta's treat­
ment of children inside its network of torture centers. The UN Convention
on Genocide states that among the signature genocidal practices is "impos­
ing measures intended to prevent births within the group" and "forcibly
transferring children of the group to another group."

68

An estimated five hundred babies were born inside Argentina's torture
centers, and these infants were immediately enlisted in the plan to reengineer
society and create a new breed of model citizens. After a brief nursing period,
hundreds of babies were sold or given to couples, most of them directly linked
to the dictatorship. The children were raised according to the values of capi­
talism and Christianity deemed "normal" and healthy by the junta and never
told of their heritage, according to the human rights group the Grandmothers
of the Plaza de Mayo that has painstakingly tracked down dozens of these
children.

69

The babies' parents, considered too diseased to be salvageable,

were almost always killed in the camps. The baby thefts were not individual
excesses but part of an organized state operation. In one court case, an official
1977 Department of the Interior document was submitted as evidence; it was
titled "Instructions on procedures to follow with underage children of politi­
cal or union leaders when their parents are detained or disappeared."

70

This chapter in Argentina's history has some striking parallels with the
mass theft of indigenous children from their families in the U.S., Canada
and Australia, where they were sent to residential schools, forbidden to speak
their native languages, and beaten into "whiteness." In Argentina in the sev­
enties, a similar supremacist logic was clearly at work, based not on race but
on political belief, culture and class.
One of the most graphic connections between the political killings and the
free-market revolution was not discovered until four years after the Argentine

C L E A N I N G THE SLATE

115

dictatorship had ended. In 1987, a film crew was shooting in the basement
of the Galenas Pacîfico, one of Buenos Aires' plushest downtown malls, and
to their horror they stumbled on an abandoned torture center. It turned out
that during the dictatorship, the First Army Corps hid some of its disap­
peared in the bowels of the mall; the dungeon walls still bore the desperate
markings made by its long-dead prisoners: names, dates, pleas for help.

71

Today, Galenas Pacîfico is the crown jewel of Buenos Aires' shopping dis­
trict, evidence of its arrival as a globalized consumer capital. Vaulted ceilings
and lushly painted frescoes frame the vast array of brand-name stores, from
Christian Dior to Ralph Lauren to Nike, unaffordable to the vast majority of
the country's inhabitants but a bargain for the foreigners who flock to the city
to take advantage of its depressed currency.
For Argentines who know their history, the mall stands as a chilling re­
minder that just as an older form of capitalist conquest was built on the mass
graves of the country's indigenous peoples, the Chicago School Project in
Latin America was quite literally built on the secret torture camps where
thousands of people who believed in a different country disappeared.

CHAPTER 5

"ENTIRELY UNRELATED"
HOW A N IDEOLOGY W A S C L E A N S E D
OF ITS C R I M E S

Milton [Friedman] is the e m b o d i m e n t of the truth that "ideas have
consequences."
— D o n a l d R u m s f e l d , U . S . defense secretary, M a y 2 0 0 2

1

People were in prison s o that prices could be free.
- E d u a r d o Galeano, 1 9 9 0

2

For a brief period, it did seem that the crimes of the Southern Cone might
actually stick to the neoliberal movement, discrediting it before it expanded
beyond its first laboratory. After Milton Friedman's fateful trip to Chile in
1975, the New York Times columnist Anthony Lewis asked a simple but in­
flammatory question: "If the pure Chicago economic theory can be carried
out in Chile only at the price of repression, should its authors feel some re­
sponsibility?"

3

After the murder of Orlando Letelier, grassroots activists picked up on his
call for "the intellectual architect" of Chile's economic revolution to be held
responsible for the human costs of his policies. In those years, Milton Fried­
man couldn't give a lecture without being interrupted by someone quoting
Letelier, and he was forced to enter through the kitchen at several events
where he was being honored.
Students at the University of Chicago were so disturbed to learn of their
professors' collaboration with the junta that they called for an academic in­
vestigation. Some academics backed them up, including the Austrian econ­
omist Gerhard Tintner, who fled European fascism and came to the U.S. in

ENTIRELY U N R E L A T E D "

117

the 1930s. Tintner compared Chile under Pinochet to Germany under the
Nazis and drew parallels between Friedman's support for Pinochet and the
technocrats who collaborated with the Third Reich. (Friedman, in turn, ac­
cused his critics of "Nazism.")

4

Both Friedman and Arnold Harberger gladly took credit for the economic
miracles performed by their Latin American Chicago Boys. Sounding like a
proud father, Friedman crowed in Newsweek

in 1982 that the "Chicago

Boys. . . combined outstanding intellectual and executive ability with the
courage of their convictions and a sense of dedication to implementing
them." Harberger has said, "I feel prouder about my students than of any­
thing I have written, in fact, the latino group is much more mine than the
5

contribution to the literature." When it came to considering the human
costs of the "miracles" their students performed, however, both men sud­
denly saw no relationship.
"Despite my sharp disagreement with the authoritarian political system of
Chile," Friedman wrote in his Newsweek column, "I do not regard it as evil
for an economist to render technical economic advice to the Chilean Gov­
ernment."

6

In his memoir, Friedman claimed that Pinochet spent the first two years
trying to run the economy on his own, and that it wasn't until "1975, when
inflation still raged and a world recession triggered a depression in Chile,
7

[that] General Pinochet turned to the 'Chicago Boys.' " This was blatant
revisionism —the Chicago Boys had been working with the military before
the coup even took place, and the economic transformation began on the
day the junta took power. At other points, Friedman even claimed that
Pinochet's entire reign—seventeen years of dictatorship and tens of thou­
sands tortured—was not a violent unmaking of democracy but its opposite.
"The really important thing about the Chilean business is that free markets
did work their way in bringing about a free society," Friedman said.

8

Three weeks after Letelier was assassinated, news came that cut short the
debates over how Pinochet's crimes reflected on the Chicago School move­
ment. Milton Friedman had been awarded the 1976 Nobel Prize for Eco­
nomics for his "original and weighty" work on the relationship between
9

inflation and unemployment. Friedman used his Nobel address to argue
that economics was as rigorous and objective a scientific discipline as
physics, chemistry and medicine, reliant on an impartial examination of the
facts available. He conveniently ignored the fact that the central hypothesis
for which he was receiving the prize was being graphically proven false by

118

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

the breadlines, typhoid outbreaks and shuttered factories in Chile, the one
regime ruthless enough to put his ideas into practice.

10

One year later, something else happened to define the parameters of the
debate about the Southern Cone: Amnesty International won the Nobel
Peace Prize, largely for its courageous and crusading work exposing the hu­
man rights abuses in Chile and Argentina. The economics prize is actually
independent from the peace prize, awarded by a different committee and
handed out in a different city. From afar, however, it seemed as if, with the
two Nobel prizes, the most prestigious jury in the world had issued its ver­
dict: the shock of the torture chamber was to be forcefully condemned, but
economic shock treatments were to be applauded —and the two forms of
shock were, as Letelier had written with dripping irony, "entirely unre­
lated."

11

The Blinders of "Human Rights"
This intellectual firewall went up not only because Chicago School econo­
mists refused to acknowledge any connection between their policies and the
use of terror. Contributing to the problem was the particular way that these
acts of terror were framed as narrow "human rights abuses" rather than as
tools that served clear political and economic ends. That is partly because
the Southern Cone in the seventies was not just a laboratory for a new eco­
nomic model. It was also a laboratory for a relatively new activist model: the
grassroots international human rights movement. That movement unques­
tionably played a decisive role in forcing an end to the junta's worst abuses.
But by focusing purely on the crimes and not on the reasons behind them,
the human rights movement also helped the Chicago School ideology to es­
cape from its first bloody laboratory virtually unscathed.
The dilemma back to the inception of the modern-day human rights
movement, with the 1948 adoption of the United Nations Universal Decla­
ration of Human Rights. No sooner had the document been written than it
became a partisan battering ram, used by both sides in the Cold War to ac­
cuse the other of being the next Hitler. In 1967, press reports revealed that
the International Commission of Jurists, the preeminent human rights group
focused on Soviet abuses, was not the impartial arbiter it claimed to be but
was receiving secret funding from the CIA.

12

It was in this loaded context that Amnesty International developed its
doctrine of strict impartiality: its financing would come exclusively from

ENTIRELY U N R E L A T E D "

119

members, and it would remain rigorously "independent of any government,
political faction, ideology, economic interest or religious creed." To prove
that it was not using human rights to advance a particular political agenda,
each Amnesty chapter was instructed to simultaneously "adopt" three pris­
oners of conscience, one each "from communist, Western, and Third World
13

countries." Amnesty's position, emblematic of the human rights movement
as a whole at that time, was that since human rights violations were a univer­
sal evil, wrong in and of themselves, it was not necessary to determine why
abuses were taking place but to document them as meticulously and credi­
bly as possible.
This principle is reflected in the way the terror campaign was recorded in
the Southern Cone. Under constant surveillance and harassment from se­
cret police, human rights groups sent delegations to Argentina, Uruguay and
Chile to interview hundreds of victims of torture and their families; they also
gained what access they could to prisons. Since independent media were
banned and the juntas denied their crimes, these testimonies form the pri­
mary documentation of a history that was never supposed to be written. Im­
portant as this work was, it was also limited: the reports are legalistic lists of
the most stomach-turning methods of repression, cross-referenced with the
UN charters they violated.
The narrow scope is most problematic in Amnesty International's 1976
report on Argentina, a breakthrough account of the junta's atrocities and
worthy of its Nobel Prize. Yet for all its thoroughness, the report sheds no
light on why the abuses were occurring. It asks the question "to what extent
are the violations explicable or necessary" to establish "security"—which
14

was the junta's official rationale for the "dirty war." After the evidence was
examined, the report concludes that the threat posed by left-wing guerrillas
was in no way commensurate with the level of repression used by the state.
But was there some other goal that made the violence "explicable or nec­
essary"? Amnesty made no mention of it. In fact, in its ninety-two-page re­
port, it made no mention that the junta was in the process of remaking the
country along radically capitalist lines. It offered no comment on the deep­
ening poverty or the dramatic reversal of programs to redistribute wealth,
though these were the policy centerpieces of junta rule. It carefully lists all
the junta laws and decrees that violated civil liberties but named none of the
economic decrees that lowered wages and increased prices, thereby violating
the right to food and shelter—also enshrined in the UN charter. If the junta's
revolutionary economic project had been even superficially examined, it

120

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

would have been clear why such extraordinary repression was necessary, just
as it would have explained why so many of Amnesty's prisoners of con­
science were peaceful trade unionists and social workers.
In another major omission, Amnesty presented the conflict as one re­
stricted to the local military and the left-wing extremists. No other players are
mentioned —not the U.S. government or the CIA; not local landowners; not
multinational corporations. Without an examination of the larger plan to
impose "pure" capitalism on Latin America, and the powerful interests be­
hind that project, the acts of sadism documented in the report made no
sense at all —they were just random, free-floating bad events, drifting in the
political ether, to be condemned by all people of conscience but impossible
to understand.
Every facet of the human rights movement was functioning under highly
restricted circumstances, though for different reasons. Inside the affected
countries, the first people to call attention to the terror were friends and rel­
atives of the victims, but there were severe limits on what they could say.
They didn't talk about the political or economic agendas behind the disap­
pearances because to do so was to risk being disappeared themselves. The
most famous human rights activists to emerge under these dangerous cir­
cumstances were the Mothers of the Plaza de Mayo, known in Argentina as
the Madres. At their weekly demonstrations outside the house of government
in Buenos Aires, the Madres did not dare hold up protest signs —instead they
clasped photographs of their missing children with the caption ^Donde estân? Where are they? In the place of chants, they circled silently, wearing
white headscarves embroidered with their children's names. Many of the
Madres had strong political beliefs, but they were careful to present them­
selves as nothing more threatening to the regime than grieving mothers, des­
perate to know where their innocent children had been taken.*
In Chile, the largest of the human rights groups was the Peace Commit­
tee, formed by opposition politicians, lawyers and Church leaders. These
were lifelong political activists who knew that the attempt to stop torture and
to free political prisoners was only one front in a much broader battle over
who would have control of Chile's wealth. But in order to avoid becoming
the regime's next victims, they dropped their usual old-left denunciations of
the bourgeoisie and learned the new language of "universal human rights."

* After the end of dictatorship, the Madres became some of the fiercest critics of the new
economic order in Argentina, a s they still are today.

ENTIRELY U N R E L A T E D "

121

Scrubbed clean of references to the rich and the poor, the weak and strong,
the North and the South, this way of explaining the world, so popular in
North America and Europe, simply asserted that everyone has the right to a
fair trial and to be free from cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment. It
didn't ask why, it just asserted that In the mixture of legalese and human in­
terest that characterizes the human rights lexicon, they learned that their im­
prisoned companeros

were actually prisoners of conscience whose right to

freedom of thought and speech, protected under articles 18 and 19 of the
Universal Declaration of Human Rights, had been violated.
For those living under dictatorship, the new language was essentially a
code; just as musicians hid the political messages in their lyrics in sly meta­
phors, they were disguising their leftism in legalese—a way of engaging in
politics without mentioning politics.*
When Latin America's terror campaign was picked up by the fastexpanding international human rights movement, those activists had their
own, very different, reasons for avoiding talk of politics.

Ford on Ford
The refusal to connect the apparatus of state terror to the ideological project
it served is characteristic of almost all the human rights literature from this
period. Although Amnesty's reticence can be understood as an attempt to re­
main impartial amid Cold War tensions, there was, for many other groups,
another factor at play: money. By far the most significant source of funding
for this work was the Ford Foundation, then the largest philanthropic organi­
zation in the world. In the sixties, the organization spent only a small portion
of its budget on human rights, but in the seventies and eighties, the founda­
tion spent a staggering $30 million on work devoted to human rights in Latin
America. With these funds, the foundation backed Latin American groups
like Chile's Peace Committee as well as new U.S.-based groups, including
Americas Watch.

15

Prior to the military coups, the Ford Foundation's primary role in the South­
ern Cone had been to fund the training of academics, mostly in economics
* Even with these precautions, human rights activists were not safe from the terror. Chile's
jails were filled with human rights lawyers, and in Argentina the junta sent one of its top tor­
turers to infiltrate the Madres, posing as a grieving relative. In December 1977, the group
was raided; twelve mothers were permanently disappeared, including the leader of the
Madres, Azucena de Vicenti, along with two French nuns.

122

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

and agricultural science, working closely with the U.S. State Department.

16

Frank Sutton, the deputy vice president of Ford's international division, ex­
plained the organization's philosophy: "You can't have a modernizing coun­
17

try without a modernizing elite." Although squarely within the Cold War
logic of attempting to foster an alternative to revolutionary Marxism, most of
Ford's academic grants did not betray a strong right-wing bias—Latin Ameri­
can students were sent to a wide range of U.S. universities, and funding for
graduate departments was provided to diverse Latin American universities,
including large public ones with left-leaning reputations.
But there were several significant exceptions. As discussed earlier, the Ford
Foundation was the primary hinder of the University of Chicago's Program of
Latin American Economic Research and Training, which churned out hun­
dreds of Latino Chicago Boys. Ford also financed a parallel program at the
Catholic University in Santiago, designed to attract undergraduate econom­
ics students from neighboring countries to study under Chile's Chicago Boys.
That made the Ford Foundation, intentionally or not, the leading source of
funding for the dissemination of the Chicago School ideology throughout
Latin America, more significant even than the U.S. government.

18

When the Chicago Boys came to power in a hail of gunfire alongside
Pinochet, it did not reflect particularly well on the Ford Foundation. The
Chicago Boys had been funded as part of the foundation's mission to "im­
prove economic institutions for the better realization of democratic goals."

19

Now the economic institutions that Ford had helped build in both Chicago
and Santiago were playing a central role in the overthrow of Chile's democ­
racy, and its former students were in the process of applying their U.S. edu­
cation in a context of shocking brutality. Making matters more complicated
for the foundation, this was the second time in just a few years that its pro­
tégés had chosen a violent route to power, the first case being the Berkeley
Mafia's meteoric rise to power in Indonesia after Suharto's bloody coup.
Ford had built the economics department at the University of Indonesia
from the ground up, but when Suharto came to power, "nearly all the econ­
omists that the program produced were recruited into the government," a
Ford document notes. There was practically no one left to teach the stu­
dents.

20

In 1974, nationalist riots broke out in Indonesia against "foreign

subversion" of the economy; the Ford Foundation became a target of popu­
lar rage —it was the foundation, many pointed out, that had trained Suharto's
economists to sell Indonesia's oil and mineral wealth to Western multina­
tionals.

ENTIRELY U N R E L A T E D "

123

Between the Chicago Boys in Chile and the Berkeley Mafia in Indonesia,
Ford was gaining an unfortunate reputation: graduates from two of its flag­
ship programs were now dominating the most notoriously brutal right-wing
dictatorships in the world. Although Ford could not have known that the
ideas in which its grads were trained would be enforced with such bar­
barism, uncomfortable questions were nonetheless raised about why a
foundation dedicated to peace and democracy was neck-deep in authoritari­
anism and violence.
Whether as a result of panic, social conscience or some combination of
both, the Ford Foundation dealt with its dictatorship problem the way any
good business would: proactively. In the mid-seventies, Ford transformed it­
self from a producer of "technical expertise" for the so-called Third World to
its leading funder of human rights activism. That about-face was particularly
jarring in both Chile and Indonesia. After the left in those countries had
been obliterated by regimes that Ford had helped shape, it was none other
than Ford that funded a new generation of crusading lawyers dedicated to
freeing the hundreds of thousands of political prisoners being held by those
same regimes.
Given its own highly compromised history, it is hardly surprising that
when Ford dived into human rights, it defined the field as narrowly as possi­
ble. The foundation strongly favored groups that framed their work as legal­
istic struggles for the "rule of law," "transparency" and "good governance."
As one Ford Foundation officer put it, the organization's attitude in Chile
21

was, "How can we do this and not get involved in politics?" It wasn't just
that Ford was an inherently conservative institution, accustomed to working
hand in hand, and not at cross purposes, with official U.S. foreign policy.* It
was also that any serious investigation of the goals served by the repression in
Chile would inevitably have led directly back to the Ford Foundation and
the central role it played in indoctrinating the country's current rulers in a
fundamentalist sect of economics.
There was also the question of the foundation's inescapable association
with the Ford Motor Company, a complicated relationship, especially for
activists on the ground. Today, the Ford Foundation is wholly independent
* In the 1950s, the Ford Foundation often served a s a front organization for the CIA, allowing
the agency to channel funds to anti-Marxist academics and artists who did not know where
the money was coming from, a process extensively documented in The Cultural Cold War by
Frances Stonor Saunders. Amnesty w a s not funded by the Ford Foundation; nor were the
most radical of Latin America's human rights defenders, the Mothers of the Plaza de Mayo.

124

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

of the car company and its heirs, but that was not the case in the fifties and
sixties when it was funding education projects in Asia and Latin America.
The foundation was started in 1936 with donations of stock from three Ford
Motor executives, including Henry and Edsel Ford. As the foundation's
wealth expanded, it began to operate independently, but its divestment of
Ford Motor stock was not completed until 1974, the year after the coup in
Chile and several years after the coup in Indonesia, and it had Ford family
members on its board until 1976.

22

In the Southern Cone, the contradictions were surreal: the philanthropic
legacy of the very company most intimately associated with the terror
apparatus—accused of having a secret torture facility on its property and of
helping to disappear its own workers—was the best, and often the only,
chance of putting an end to the worst of the abuses. Through its funding of
human rights campaigners, the Ford Foundation saved many lives in those
years. And it deserves at least part of the credit for persuading the U.S. Con­
gress to cut military support to Argentina and Chile, gradually forcing the
juntas of the Southern Cone to scale back the most brutal of their repressive
tactics. But when Ford rode to the rescue, its assistance came at a price, and
that price was—consciously or not—the intellectual honesty of the human
rights movement. The foundation's decision to get involved in human rights
but "not get involved in politics" created a context in which it was all but im­
possible to ask the question underlying the violence it was documenting:
Why was it happening, in whose interests?
That omission has played a disfiguring role in the way the history of the
free-market revolution has been told, largely absent any taint of the extraor­
dinarily violent circumstances of its birth. Just as the Chicago economists
had nothing to say about the torture (it had nothing to do with their areas of
expertise), the human rights groups had little to say about the radical trans­
formations taking place in the economic sphere (it was beyond their narrow
legal purview).
The idea that the repression and the economics were in fact a single uni­
fied project is reflected in only one major human rights report from this pe­
riod: Brasil: Nunca Mais. Significantly, it is the only truth commission report
published independently of both the state and foreign foundations. It is
based on the military's court records, secretly photocopied over years by
tremendously brave lawyers and Church activists while the country was still
under dictatorship. After detailing some of the most horrific crimes, the au­
thors pose that central question so studiously avoided by others: Why? They

ENTIRELY U N R E L A T E D "

125

answer matter-of-factly: "Since the economic policy was extremely unpopu­
lar among the most numerous sectors of the population, it had to be imple­
mented by force."

23

The radical economic model that took such deep root during dictatorship
would prove hardier than the generals who implemented it. Long after the
soldiers returned to their barracks, and Latin Americans were permitted to
elect their governments once again, the Chicago School logic remained
firmly entrenched.
Claudia Acuna, an Argentine journalist and educator, told me how diffi­
cult it had been in the seventies and eighties to fully grasp that violence was
not the goal of the junta but only the means. "Their human rights violations
were so outrageous, so incredible, that stopping them of course became the
priority. But while we were able to destroy the secret torture centers, what we
couldn't destroy was the economic program that the military started and
continues to this day."
In the end, as Rodolfo Walsh predicted, many more lives would be stolen
by "planned misery" than by bullets. In a way, what happened in the South­
ern Cone of Latin America in the seventies is that it was treated as a murder
scene when it was, in fact, the site of an extraordinarily violent armed rob­
bery. "It was as if that blood, the blood of the disappeared, covered up the
cost of the economic program," Acuna told me.
The debate about whether "human rights" can ever truly be separated from
politics and economics is not unique to Latin America; these are questions that
surface whenever states use torture as a weapon of policy. Despite the mystique
that surrounds it, and the understandable impulse to treat it as aberrant behav­
ior beyond politics, torture is not particularly complicated or mysterious. A
tool of the crudest kind of coercion, it crops up with great predictability when­
ever a local despot or a foreign occupier lacks the consent needed to rule:
Marcos in the Philippines, the shah in Iran, Saddam in Iraq, the French in Al­
geria, the Israelis in the occupied territories, the U.S. in Iraq and Afghanistan.
The list could stretch on and on. The widespread abuse of prisoners is a virtu­
ally foolproof indication that politicians are trying to impose a system—
whether political, religious or economic—that is rejected by large numbers of
the people they are ruling. Just as ecologists define ecosystems by the presence
of certain "indicator species" of plants and birds, torture is an indicator species
of a regime that is engaged in a deeply anti-democratic project, even if that
regime happens to have come to power through elections.

126

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

As a means of extracting information during interrogations, torture is notoriously unreliable, but as a means of terrorizing and controlling populations, nothing is quite as effective. It was for this reason that, in the fifties and
sixties, many Algerians grew impatient with French liberals who expressed
their moral outrage over news that their soldiers were electrocuting and
water-boarding liberation fighters—and yet did nothing to end the occupation that was the reason for these abuses.
In 1962, Gisèle Halimi, a French lawyer for several Algerians who had
been brutally raped and tortured in prison, wrote in exasperation, "The
words were the same stale clichés: ever since torture had been used in Algeria there had always been the same words, the same expression of indignation, the same signatures to public protests, the same promises. This
automatic routine had not abolished one set of electrodes or water-hoses;
nor had it in any remotely effective way curbed the power of those who used
them." Simone de Beauvoir, writing on the same subject, concurred: "To
protest in the name of morality against 'excesses' or 'abuses' is an error which
hints at active complicity. There are no 'abuses' or 'excesses' here, simply an
2

all-pervasive system." *
Her point was that the occupation could not be done humanely; there is
no humane way to rule people against their will. There are two choices,
Beauvoir wrote: accept occupation and all the methods required for its enforcement, "or else you reject, not merely certain specific practices, but the
greater aim which sanctions them, and for which they are essential." The
same stark choice is available in Iraq and Israel/Palestine today, and it was
the only option in the Southern Cone in the seventies. Just as there is no kind,
gentle way to occupy people against their determined will, there is no peaceful way to take away from millions of citizens what they need to live with
dignity—which is what the Chicago Boys were determined to do. Robbery,
whether of land or a way of life, requires force or at least its credible threat;
it's why thieves carry guns, and often use them. Torture is sickening, but it is
often a highly rational way to achieve a specific goal; indeed, it may be the
only way to achieve those goals. Which raises the deeper question, one that
so many were incapable of asking at the time in Latin America. Is neoliberalism an inherently violent ideology, and is there something about its
goals that demands this cycle of brutal political cleansing, followed by human rights cleanup operations?
One of the most moving testimonies on this question comes from Sergio

ENTIRELY U N R E L A T E D "

127

Tomasella, a tobacco farmer and secretary-general of Argentina's Agrarian
Leagues, who was tortured and imprisoned for five years, as were his wife
and many friends and family members.* In May 1990, Tomasella took the
overnight bus to Buenos Aires from the rural province of Corrientes in order
to add his voice to the Argentine Tribunal against Impunity, which was
hearing testimony on human rights abuses during the dictatorship.
Tomasella's testimony was different from the others. He stood before the ur­
ban audience in his farming clothes and work boots and explained that he
was the casualty of a long war, one between poor peasants who wanted
pieces of land to form cooperatives and the all-powerful ranchers who
owned half the land in his province. "The line is continuous—those who
took the land from the Indians continue to oppress us with their feudal
2

structures." ^
He insisted that the abuse he and his fellow members of the Agrarian
Leagues suffered could not be isolated from the huge economic interests
served by the breaking of their bodies and destruction of their activist net­
works. So instead of naming the soldiers who abused him, he chose to name
the corporations, both foreign and national, that profit from Argentina's con­
tinued economic dependence. "Foreign monopolies impose crops on us,
they impose chemicals that pollute our earth, impose technology and ideol­
ogy. All this through the oligarchy which owns the land and controls the pol­
itics. But we must remember—the oligarchy is also controlled, by the very
same monopolies, the very same Ford Motors, Monsanto, Philip Morris. It's
the structure we have to change. This is what I have come to denounce.
That's all."
The auditorium erupted in applause. Tomasella concluded his testimony
with these words: "I believe that truth and justice will eventually triumph. It
will take generations. If I am to die in this fight, then so be it. But one day we
will triumph. In the meantime, I know who the enemy is, and the enemy
knows who I am, too."

26

The Chicago Boys' first adventure in the seventies should have served as a
warning to humanity: theirs are dangerous ideas. By failing to hold the ideology
accountable for the crimes committed in its first laboratory, this subculture of
unrepentant ideologues was given immunity, freed to scour the world for its
* For this account I am indebted to Marguerite Feitlowitz's inspiring book, A Lexicon of Terror.

128

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

next conquest. These days, we are once again living in an era of corporatist
massacres, with countries suffering tremendous military violence alongside
organized attempts to remake them into model "free market" economies;
disappearances and torture are back with a vengeance. And once again the
goals of building free markets, and the need for such brutality, are treated as
entirely unrelated.

PART 3

S U R V I V I N G DEMOCRACY
B O M B S M A D E OF L A W S

An armed conflict between nations horrifies us. But the
economic war is no better than an armed conflict. This
is like a surgical operation. An economic war is pro­
longed torture. And its ravages are no less terrible than
those depicted in the literature on war properly so
called. We think nothing of the other because we are
used to its deadly effects

The movement against

war is sound. I pray for its success. But I cannot help
the gnawing fear that the movement will fail if it does
not touch the root of all evil—human greed.
— M . K. Gandhi, "Non-Violence—The Greatest Force,"
1926

CHAPTER

6

SAVED BY A WAR
T H A T C H E R I S M A N D ITS U S E F U L E N E M I E S

Sovereign is he w h o decides the state of emergency.
— C a r l Schmitt, Nazi lawyer

1

When Friedrich Hayek, patron saint of the Chicago School, returned from a
visit to Chile in 1981, he was so impressed by Augusto Pinochet and the
Chicago Boys that he sat down and wrote a letter to his friend Margaret
Thatcher, prime minister of Britain. He urged her to use the South Ameri­
can country as a model for transforming Britain's Keynesian economy.
Thatcher and Pinochet would later become firm friends, with Thatcher fa­
mously visiting the aging general under house arrest in England as he faced
charges of genocide, torture and terrorism.
The British prime minister was well acquainted with what she called "the
remarkable success of the Chilean economy," describing it as "a striking ex­
ample of economic reform from which we can learn many lessons." Yet
despite her admiration for Pinochet, when Hayek first suggested that she em­
ulate his shock therapy policies, Thatcher was far from convinced. In Febru­
ary 1982, the prime minister bluntly explained the problem in a private letter
to her intellectual guru: "I am sure you will agree that, in Britain with our
democratic institutions and the need for a high degree of consent, some of
the measures adopted in Chile are quite unacceptable. Our reform must be
in line with our traditions and our Constitution. At times the process may
seem painfully slow."

2

The bottom line was that Chicago-style shock therapy just wasn't possible
in a democracy like the U.K. Thatcher was three years into her first term,

132

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

sinking in the polls and not about to guarantee a loss in the next election by
doing anything as radical or unpopular as Hayek was suggesting.
For Hayek and the movement he represented, it was a disappointing as­
sessment. The Southern Cone's experiment had generated such spectacular
profits, albeit for a small number of players, that there was tremendous ap­
petite from increasingly global multinationals for new frontiers—and not
just in developing countries but in rich ones in the West too, where states
controlled even more lucrative assets that could be run as for-profit interests:
phones, airlines, television airwaves, power companies. If anyone could have
championed this agenda in the wealthy world, it would surely have been ei­
ther Thatcher in England or the American president at the time, Ronald
Reagan.
In 1981, Fortune magazine ran an article extolling the virtues of "Chile's
Brave New World of Reaganomics." Praising Santiago's "glittering, luxury
filled shops" and "shiny new Japanese cars," the article was oblivious to the
pervasive repression and the explosion of shantytowns. "What can we learn
from Chile's experiment in economic orthodoxy?" it asked, and quickly pro­
vided the correct answer: "If a small undeveloped country can live by the
theory of competitive advantage, then surely our infinitely more resourceful
economy can."

3

However, as Thatcher's letter to Hayek made clear, it wasn't quite as sim­
ple as that. Elected leaders have to worry about what voters think of their job
performance, which comes up for regular review. And in the early eighties,
even with Reagan and Thatcher in power and Hayek and Friedman serving
as influential advisers, it was not at all clear that the kind of radical economic
agenda that had been imposed with such ferocious violence in the Southern
Cone would ever be possible in Britain and the United States.
A decade earlier, Friedman and his movement had faced a great disap­
pointment in the U.S. at the hands of none other than Richard Nixon, one
that seemed to confirm this point. Even though Nixon had helped put the
Chicago Boys in power in Chile, he had taken a very different route at
home—an inconsistency Friedman would never forgive. When Nixon took
office in 1969, Friedman thought his time had finally come to lead his do­
mestic counterrevolution against the legacy of the New Deal. "Few presi­
dents have come closer to expressing a philosophy compatible with my
4

own," Friedman wrote of Nixon. The two men met regularly in the Oval
Office, and Nixon named several of Friedman's like-minded friends and col­
leagues to key economics posts. One was the University of Chicago professor

S A V E D BY A WAR

133

George Shultz, whom Friedman helped recruit to work for Nixon; another
was Donald Rumsfeld, then thirty-seven. In the sixties, Rumsfeld used to at­
tend seminars at the University of Chicago, gatherings he later described in
reverential terms. Rumsfeld called Friedman and his colleagues "a cluster of
geniuses," while he and other self-described "young pups" would "come in
5

and learn at their feet. . . . I was so privileged." With true disciples making
policy and a strong personal rapport with the president, Friedman had every
reason to believe that his ideas were about to be put into practice in the most
powerful economy in the world.
But in 1971, the U.S. economy was in a slump; unemployment was high
and inflation was pushing prices way up. Nixon knew that if he followed
Friedman's laissez-faire advice, millions of angry citizens would vote him
out of a job. He decided to put caps on the prices of necessities such as rent
and oil. Friedman was outraged: of all possible government "distortions,"
price controls were the absolute worst. He called them "a cancer that can de­
stroy an economic system's capacity to function."

6

Even more disgraceful, it was his own disciples who were the Keynesian
enforcers: Rumsfeld was in charge of the wage-and-price-control program,
and he answered to Shultz, who at the time was director of the Office of
Management and Budget. At one point, Friedman called Rumsfeld at the
White House and berated his former "young pup." According to Rumsfeld,
Friedman instructed him, "You have got to stop doing what you are doing."
The novice bureaucrat replied that it seemed to be working—inflation was
going down, the economy was growing. Friedman fired back that that was
the greatest crime of all: "People are going to think that you're doing it. . .
7

they're going to learn the wrong lesson." They did indeed, and they re­
elected Nixon with 60 percent of the popular vote the following year. In his
second term, the president proceeded to shred even more of Friedman's or­
thodoxies, passing a slew of new laws imposing higher environmental and
safety standards on industry. "We are all Keynesians now," Nixon famously
8

proclaimed—the crudest cut of all. So deep was this betrayal that Fried­
man would later describe Nixon as "the most socialist of the presidents of the
United States in the 20th century."

9

Nixon's tenure was a stark lesson for Friedman. The University of
Chicago professor had built a movement on the equation of capitalism and
freedom, yet free people just didn't seem to vote for politicians who followed
his advice. Worse, dictatorships—where freedom was markedly absent—
were the only governments who were ready to put pure free-market doctrine

134

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

into practice. So while they griped about being betrayed at home, Chicago
School luminaries junta-hopped their way through the seventies. Almost
everywhere that right-wing military dictatorships were in power, the Univer­
sity of Chicago's presence could be felt. Harberger worked as a consultant to
Bolivia's military regime in 1976 and accepted an honorary degree from Ar­
gentina's University of Tucuman in 1979, a time when universities were un­
10

der the control of the junta. And farther afield, he advised Suharto and the
Berkeley Mafia in Indonesia. Friedman wrote an economic liberalization
program for the repressive Chinese Communist Party when it decided to
convert to a market economy.

11

Stephen Haggard, a staunch neoliberal political scientist at the University
of California, conceded the "sad fact" that "some of the widest-ranging reform
efforts in the developing world were undertaken following military coups" —
in addition to the Southern Cone and Indonesia, he listed Turkey, South Ko­
rea and Ghana. Other success stories took place not after military coups but
in one-party states like Mexico, Singapore, Hong Kong and Taiwan. In direct
contradiction of Friedman's central claim, Haggard concluded that "good
things—such as democracy and market-oriented economic policy—do not
12

always go together." Indeed, in the early eighties, there was not a single case
of a multiparty democracy going full-tilt free market.
Leftists in the developing world have long argued that genuine democ­
racy, with fair rules preventing corporations from buying elections, would
necessarily result in governments committed to the redistribution of wealth.
The logic is simple enough: in these countries, there are far more poor peo­
ple than rich ones. Policies that directly redistribute land and raise wages,
not trickle-down economics, are in the clear self-interest of a poor majority.
Give all citizens the vote and a reasonably fair process, and they will elect
the politicians who appear most likely to deliver jobs and land, not more
free-market promises.
For all these reasons, Friedman had spent a fair bit of time staring down
an intellectual paradox: as the heir to Adam Smith's mantle, he believed pas­
sionately that humans are governed by self-interest and that society works
best when self-interest is allowed to govern almost all activities—except
when it comes to a little activity called voting. Since most people in the
world are either poor or live below the average income in their countries (in­
cluding in the U.S.), it is in their short-term self-interest to vote for politicians
promising to redistribute wealth from the top of the economy down to
them.

13

Friedman's longtime friend Allan Meltzer, a fellow monetarist

S A V E D BY A WAR

135

economist, put the conundrum this way: "Votes are more equally distributed
than income. . . . Voters with incomes at the median or below gain by trans­
ferring income to themselves." Meltzer described this reaction as "part of the
cost of democratic government and political freedom" but said that "the
Friedmans [Milton and his wife, Rose] swam against this strong current.
They could not stop or reverse it, but they influenced far more than most the
ways in which people and politicians think and act."

14

Across the Atlantic, Thatcher was attempting an English version of Friedmanism by championing what has become known as "the ownership soci­
ety." The effort centered on Britain's public housing, or council estates,
which Thatcher opposed on philosophical grounds, believing that the state
had no role to play in the housing market. The council estates were filled
with the type of people who wouldn't vote Tory because it wasn't in their
economic self-interest; Thatcher was convinced that if they could be
brought into the market, they would start to identify with the interests of the
wealthier people who opposed redistribution. With that in mind, she offered
strong incentives to the residents of public housing to buy their flats at re­
duced rates. Those who could became homeowners, while those who
couldn't faced rents that were almost twice as high as before. It was a divideand-conquer strategy, and it worked: the renters continued to oppose
Thatcher, the streets of Britain's large cities saw a visible increase in homelessness, but polls showed that more than half of the new owners did switch
their party affiliation to the Tories.

15

Although the estate sales offered a glimmer of hope for the possibility of
hard-right economics in a democracy, Thatcher still looked poised to lose
her job after just one term. In 1979, she had run on the slogan "Labor isn't
working," but by 1982, the number of unemployed had doubled under her
16

watch, as had the inflation rate. She had tried to take on one of the most
powerful unions in the country, the coal miners, and had failed. After three
years in office, Thatcher saw her personal approval rating drop to only 25
percent—lower than George W. Bush at his lowest point and lower than any
British prime minister in the history of opinion polls. Approval for her gov­
17

ernment as a whole had sunk to 18 percent. With a general election loom­
ing, Thatcherism was about to come to an early and inglorious close, well
before the Tories had achieved their most ambitious goals of mass privatiza­
tion and breaking the blue-collar unions. It was in those trying circum­
stances that Thatcher wrote to Hayek, politely informing him that a
Chilean-style transformation was "quite unacceptable" in the U.K.

136

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Thatcher's catastrophic first term seemed to further confirm the lessons of
the Nixon years: that the radical and highly profitable policies of the
Chicago School couldn't survive in a democratic system. It seemed clear
that the successful imposition of economic shock therapy required some
other sort of shock—whether of a coup, or of the torture chamber delivered
by a repressive regime.
That was an especially disturbing prospect on Wall Street because, in the
early eighties, authoritarian regimes were starting to collapse around the
world —Iran, Nicaragua, Ecuador, Peru, Bolivia—and many more would
follow in what the conservative political scientist Samuel Huntington would
18

term the "third wave" of democracy. These were worrying developments —
what would prevent the emergence of another Allende, winning votes and
support with populist policies?
Washington had watched as that very scenario played out in both Iran
and Nicaragua in 1979. In Iran, the U.S.-backed shah was overthrown by a
coalition of leftists and Islamists. While the stories of hostages and ayatol­
lahs made the news, the economic side of the program was also raising
alarms in Washington. The Islamic regime, which had not yet transitioned
to full-blown authoritarianism, nationalized the banking sector and then
brought in a land redistribution program. It also imposed controls on im­
19

ports and exports, a reversal of the shah's free-trade policies. Five months
later in Nicaragua, the U.S.-backed dictatorship of Anastasio Somoza
Dabayle fell to a popular revolt that installed the left-wing Sandinista gov­
ernment. It controlled imports and, like the Iranians, nationalized the bank­
ing industry.
It added up to a grim prognosis for the dream of a global free market. By
the early eighties, Friedmanites were facing the prospect that their revolu­
tion, less than a decade old, could not survive a new populist wave.

War to the Rescue
Six weeks after Thatcher wrote that letter to Hayek, something happened
that changed her mind and altered the destiny of the corporatist crusade: on
April 2, 1982, Argentina invaded the Falkland Islands, a relic of British colo­
nial rule. The Falklands War, or the Malvinas War if you are Argentine, went
down in history as a vicious but fairly minor battle. At the time, the Falklands
appeared to have no strategic importance. The cluster of islands off the Ar­
gentine coast was thousands of miles from Britain and costly to guard and

S A V E D BY A WAR

137

maintain. Argentina, too, had little use for them, though having a British
outpost in its waters was regarded as an affront to national pride. The leg­
endary Argentine writer Jorge Luis Borges scathingly described the land dis­
pute as "a fight between two bald men over a comb."

20

From a military standpoint, the eleven-week battle appears to have almost
no historic significance. Overlooked, however, was the war's impact on the
free-market project, which was enormous: it was the Falklands War that gave
Thatcher the political cover she needed to bring a program of radical capi­
talist transformation to a Western liberal democracy for the first time.
Both sides in the conflict had good reasons to want a war. In 1982, Ar­
gentina's economy was collapsing under the weight of its debt and corrup­
tion, and human rights campaigns were gaining momentum. A new junta
government, led by General Leopoldo Galtieri, calculated that the only
thing more powerful than the anger at its continued suppression of democ­
racy was anti-imperialist sentiment, which Galtieri expertly unleashed on
the British for their refusal to give up the islands. Soon enough, the junta
had Argentina's blue-and-white flag planted on that rocky outpost, and the
country cheered on cue.
When news arrived that Argentina had laid claim to the Falklands, Thatcher
recognized it as a last-ditch hope to turn around her political fortunes and im­
mediately went into Churchillian battle mode. Until this point, she had shown
only disdain for the financial burden that the Falklands placed on government
coffers. She had cut grants to the islands and announced major cutbacks to the
navy, including the armed ships that guarded the Falklands—moves read by
the Argentine generals as clear indications that Britain was ready to cede the
territory. (One of Thatcher's biographers characterized her Falklands policy as
21

"practically an invitation to Argentina to invade.") In the lead-up to the war,
critics across the political spectrum accused Thatcher of using the military for
her own political goals. The Labour MP Tony Benn said, "It looks more and
more as if what is at stake is Mrs. Thatcher's reputation, not the Falkland
Islands at all," while the conservative Financial

Times noted, "What is de­

plorable is that the issue is rapidly becoming mixed up with political differ­
ences within Britain itself which have nothing to do with the matter in hand.
Not only the pride of the Argentine Government is involved. So is the standing,
perhaps even the survival, of the Tory Government in Britain."

22

Yet even with all of this healthy cynicism in the run-up, as soon as troops
were deployed, the country was swept up in what a draft Labour Party reso­
lution described as a "jingoistic, militaristic frame of mind," embracing the

138

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE
23

Falkland Islands as a last blast of glory for Britain's faded empire. Thatcher
praised the "Falklands spirit" gripping the nation, which in practice meant
that shouts of "Ditch the bitch!" subsided while "Up Your Junta!" T-shirts
24

sold briskly. Neither London nor Buenos Aires made any serious attempt to
avoid a showdown. Thatcher brushed aside the United Nations much as
Bush and Blair did in the run-up to the war in Iraq, uninterested in sanctions
or negotiations. Glorious victory was the only outcome that either side had
any interest in.
Thatcher was fighting for her political future—and she succeeded spec­
tacularly. After the Falklands victory, which took the lives of 255 British sol­
diers and 655 Argentines, the prime minister was heralded as a war hero, her
25

moniker "Iron Lady" transformed from insult to high praise. Her poll num­
bers were similarly transformed. Thatcher's personal approval rating more
than doubled over the course of the battle, from 25 percent at the start to 59
percent at the end, paving the way for a decisive victory in the following
year's election.

26

The British military's counterinvasion of the Falklands was code-named
Operation Corporate, and though it was an odd name for a military cam­
paign, it proved prescient. Thatcher used the enormous popularity afforded
her by the victory to launch the very corporatist revolution she had told
Hayek was impossible before the war. When the coal miners went on strike
in 1984, Thatcher cast the standoff as a continuation of the war with Ar­
gentina, calling for similarly brutal resolve. She famously declared, "We
had to fight the enemy without in the Falklands and now we have to fight
the enemy within, which is much more difficult but just as dangerous to
liberty."

27

With British workers now categorized as "the enemy within,"

Thatcher unleashed the full force of the state on the strikers, including, in a
single confrontation, eight thousand truncheon-wielding riot police, many
on horseback, to storm a plant picket line, leading to roughly seven hun­
dred injuries. Over the course of the long strike, the number of injuries
reached into the thousands. As the Guardian

reporter Seumas Milne docu­

ments in his definitive account of the strike, The Enemy Within:

Thatcher's

Secret War against the Miners, the prime minister pressed the security ser­
vices to intensify surveillance of the union and, in particular, its militant
president, Arthur Scargill. What ensued was "the most ambitious countersurveillance operation ever mounted in Britain." The union was infiltrated
by multiple agents and informers, and all its phones were bugged, as were
the homes and even the fish-and-chips shop frequented by its leadership.

S A V E D BY A WAR

139

The chief executive of the union was alleged, on the floor of the House of
Commons, to have been an MI5 agent sent in to "destabilize and sabotage
the union," though he denied the charge.

28

Nigel Lawson, U.K. chancellor of the exchequer during the strike, ex­
plained that the Thatcher government considered the union to be its enemy.
"It was just like arming to face the threat of Hitler in the late 1930s," Lawson
29

said a decade later. "One had to prepare." As in the Falklands, there was lit­
tle interest in bargaining, just a focused determination to break the union,
regardless of the cost (and with three thousand extra police a day, the cost
was enormous). Colin Naylor, an acting police sergeant who was on the
30

front lines of the conflict, described it as "a civil war."

By 1985, Thatcher had won this war too: workers were going hungry and
31

couldn't hold out; in the end 966 people were fired.

It was a devastating

setback for Britain's most powerful union, and it sent a clear message to the
others: if Thatcher was willing to go to the wall to break the coal miners, on
whom the country depended for its lights and warmth, it would be suicide
for weaker unions producing less crucial products and services to take on her
new economic order. Better just to accept whatever was on offer. It was a
message very similar to the one Ronald Reagan had sent a few months after
he took office with his response to a strike by the air-traffic controllers. By not
showing up to work, they had "forfeited their jobs and will be terminated,"
Reagan said. Then he fired 11,400 of the country's most essential workers in
a single blow—a shock from which the U.S. labor movement has yet to fully
recover.

32

In Britain, Thatcher parlayed her victory in the Falklands and over the
miners into a major leap forward for her radical economic agenda. Between
1984 and 1988, the government privatized, among others, British Telecom,
British Gas, British Airways, British Airport Authority and British Steel,
while it sold its shares in British Petroleum.
Much as the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, would take an
unpopular president and hand him an opportunity to launch a massive pri­
vatization initiative (in Bush's case, the privatization of security, warfare
and reconstruction), Thatcher used her war to launch the first mass privati­
zation auction in a Western democracy. This was the real Operation Cor­
porate, one with historic implications. Thatcher's successful harnessing of
the Falklands War was the first definitive evidence that a Chicago School
economic program did not need military dictatorships and torture cham­
bers in order to advance. She had proved that with a large enough political

HO

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

crisis to rally around, a limited version of shock therapy could be imposed
in a democracy.
Still, Thatcher had needed an enemy to unite the country, a set of ex­
traordinary circumstances that justified her use of emergency measures and
repression—a crisis that made her look tough and decisive rather than cruel
and regressive. The war had served her purpose perfectly, but the Falklands
War was an anomaly in the early eighties, a throwback to earlier colonial
conflicts. If the eighties were really going to be the dawn of a new age of
peace and democracy, as many claimed, then Falklands-type clashes would
be far too infrequent to form the basis of a global political project.
It was in 1982 that Milton Friedman wrote the highly influential passage
that best summarizes the shock doctrine: "Only a crisis—actual or
perceived—produces real change. When that crisis occurs, the actions that
are taken depend on the ideas that are lying around. That, I believe, is our
basic function: to develop alternatives to existing policies, to keep them alive
and available until the politically impossible becomes politically in­
33

evitable." It was to become a kind of mantra for his movement in the new
democratic era. Allan Meltzer elaborated on the philosophy: "Ideas are al­
ternatives waiting on a crisis to serve as the catalyst of change. Friedman's
model of influence was to legitimize ideas, to make them bearable, and
worth trying when the opportunity comes."

34

The kind of crisis Friedman had in mind was not military but economic.
What he understood was that in normal circumstances, economic decisions
are made based on the push and pull of competing interests—workers want
jobs and raises, owners want low taxes and relaxed regulation, and politicians
have to strike a balance between these competing forces. However, if an
economic crisis hits and is severe enough—a currency meltdown, a market
crash, a major recession —it blows everything else out of the water, and lead­
ers are liberated to do whatever is necessary (or said to be necessary) in the
name of responding to a national emergency. Crises are, in a way,
democracy-free zones—gaps in politics as usual when the need for consent
and consensus do not seem to apply.
The idea that market crashes can act as catalysts for revolutionary change
has a long history on the far left, most notably in the Bolshevik theory that
hyperinflation, by destroying the value of money, takes the masses one step
35

closer to the destruction of capitalism itself. This theory explains why a
certain breed of sectarian leftist is forever calculating the exact conditions

S A V E D BY A WAR

HI

under which capitalism will reach "the crisis," much as evangelical Chris­
tians calibrate signs of the coming Rapture. In the mid-eighties, this Com­
munist idea began to experience a powerful revival, picked up by Chicago
School economists who argued that just as market crashes could precipitate
left-wing revolutions, so too could they be used to spark right-wing counter­
revolutions, a theory that became known as "the crisis hypothesis."

36

Friedman's interest in crisis was also a clear attempt to learn from the vic­
tories of the left after the Great Depression: when the market crashed,
Keynes and his disciples, previously voices in the wilderness, had been ready
and waiting with their ideas, their New Deal solutions. In the seventies and
early eighties, Friedman and his corporate underwriters had attempted to
mimic this process with their unique brand of intellectual disaster prepared­
ness. They painstakingly built up a new network of right-wing think tanks,
including Heritage and Cato, and produced the most significant vehicle to
disseminate Friedman's views, the ten-part PBS miniseries Free to Choose —
underwritten by some of the largest corporations in the world, including
Getty Oil, Firestone Tire & Rubber Co., PepsiCo, General Motors, Bechtel
and General Mills.

37

When the next crisis hit, Friedman was determined

that it would be his Chicago Boys who would be the ones ready with their
ideas and their solutions.
At the time he first articulated the crisis theory in the early eighties, the
U.S. was in a recession—a double whammy of high inflation and unem­
ployment. And Chicago School policies, now known as Reaganomics, cer­
tainly held sway in Washington. But even Reagan didn't dare implement the
kind of sweeping shock therapy that Friedman dreamed of, the kind he had
prescribed in Chile.
Once again, it would be a Latin American country that would be the test­
ing ground for Friedman's crisis theory—and this time, it wouldn't be a
Chicago Boy who would lead the way, but a new breed of shock doctor, one
more suited to the new democratic age.

CHAPTER 7

THE NEW DOCTOR SHOCK
ECONOMIC WARFARE REPLACES
DICTATORSHIP

Bolivia's situation could w e l l be compared with the case of a per­
s o n w h o h a s cancer. He k n o w s he faces that most d a n g e r o u s and
painful operation which monetary stabilization and a n u m b e r of
other m e a s u r e s will undoubtedly be. Yet he has no alternative.
— C o r n e l i u s Z o n d a g , U . S . economic adviser to Bolivia, 1956.

1

The u s e of cancer in political discourse e n c o u r a g e s fatalism and
justifies " s e v e r e " m e a s u r e s — a s w e l l a s strongly reinforcing the
w i d e s p r e a d notion that the d i s e a s e is necessarily fatal. The con­
cept of d i s e a s e is never innocent. But it could be argued that the
cancer m e t a p h o r s are in t h e m s e l v e s implicitly genocidal.
— S u s a n S o n t a g , Illness as Metaphor,

1977

2

In 1985, Bolivia was part of the democratic wave sweeping the developing
world. For eighteen of the previous twenty-one years, Bolivians had been liv­
ing under some form of dictatorship. Now they were getting the chance to
choose their president in national elections.
Winning control over Bolivia's economy at this particular juncture
looked less like a prize than a punishment, however: its debt was so high that
the amount Bolivia owed in interest surpassed its entire national budget. A
year earlier, in 1984, Ronald Reagan's administration pushed the country
over the edge by funding an unprecedented attack on its coca farmers, who
grow the green leaf that can be refined into cocaine. The siege, which
turned a large section of Bolivia into a military zone, didn't just choke the

THE N E W DOCTOR S H O C K

U3

coca trade, but cut off the source of roughly half of the country's export rev­
enues, triggering an economic meltdown. As The New York Times reported,
"When the army marched into the Chapare in August, closing the narcodollar pipeline part way, the shock wave immediately hit the thriving black mar­
ket in dollars. . . less than a week after the Chapare occupation, the
Government was forced to drop the peso's official value by more than half."
A few months later, inflation had increased tenfold, and thousands were
leaving the country in search of jobs in Argentina, Brazil, Spain and the
United States.

3

It was in those volatile circumstances, with inflation up to 14,000 percent,
that Bolivia entered its historic 1985 national elections. The election was a
race between two familiar figures for Bolivians—their former dictator, Hugo
Banzer, and their former elected president, Victor Paz Estenssoro. The vote
was very close, and the final decision would be left to Bolivia's Congress, but
Banzer's team was sure it had won. Before the results were announced, the
party enlisted the help of a little-known thirty-year-old economist named Jef­
frey Sachs to help develop an anti-inflation economic plan. Sachs was the ris­
ing star of Harvard's economics department, raking in academic awards and
becoming one of the university's youngest tenured professors. A few months
earlier, a delegation of Bolivian politicians had visited Harvard and seen
Sachs in action; they had been impressed by his bravado—he had told them
that he could turn around their inflationary crisis in a day. Sachs had no ex­
perience in development economics, but, by his own admission, "I thought
that I knew just about everything that needed to be known" about inflation.

4

Sachs had been heavily influenced by Keynes's writings on the connec­
tion between hyperinflation and the spread of fascism in Germany after the
First World War. The peace agreement imposed on Germany had sent it
into severe economic crisis —including a hyperinflation rate of 3.25 million
percent in 1923—which was then compounded by the Great Depression a
few years later. With an unemployment rate of 30 percent and generalized
rage at what seemed a global conspiracy, the country was fertile ground for
Nazism.
Sachs liked to quote Keynes's warning that "there is no subtler, no surer
means of overturning the existing basis of society than to debauch the cur­
rency. The process engages all the hidden forces of economic law on the side
5

of destruction." He shared Keynes's view that it was the sacred duty of econ­
omists to suppress those forces of destruction at all costs. "The thing I got
from Keynes," Sachs says, "was this deep sadness and sense of risk that things

H4

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

can go completely awry. And how incredibly stupid it was of us to leave Ger­
6

many in a state of disrepair." Sachs also told journalists that he regarded
Keynes's lifestyle as a politically engaged, globe-trotting economist as a
model for his own career.
Although Sachs shared Keynes's belief in the power of economics to fight
poverty, he was also a product of Reagan's America, which was, in 1985, in
the midst of a Friedman-inspired backlash against all that Keynes repre­
sented. Chicago School precepts about the supremacy of the free market
had rapidly become the unquestioned orthodoxy in Ivy League economics
departments, including Harvard's, and Sachs was definitely not immune. He
admired Friedman's "faith in markets, his constant insistence on proper
monetary management," calling it "far more accurate than fuzzy structural­
ist or pseudo-Keynesian arguments one hears a lot in the developing world."

7

Those "fuzzy" arguments were the same ones that in Latin America had
been suppressed by violence a decade earlier—the conviction that in order
to escape poverty, the continent needed to break the colonial ownership
structures with such interventionist policies as land reform, trade protections
and subsidies, nationalization of natural resources, and cooperatively run
workplaces. Sachs had little time for such structural changes. So although
he knew next to nothing about Bolivia and its long history of colonial ex­
ploitation, the suppression of its indigenous inhabitants and the hard-won
gains of its 1952 revolution, he was convinced that in addition to hyperinfla­
tion, Bolivia suffered from "socialist romanticism"—the same delusion of
developmentalism that an earlier generation of U.S.-trained economists had
tried to stamp out in the Southern Cone.

8

Where Sachs parted ways with Chicago School orthodoxy was that he be­
lieved free-market policies needed to be supported by debt relief and gener­
ous aid—for the young Harvard economist, the invisible hand was not
enough. This discrepancy eventually led Sachs to part ways from his more
laissez-faire colleagues and devote his efforts exclusively to aid. But that split
was years away. In Bolivia, Sachs's hybrid ideology merely made for some
strange contradictions. For instance, when he got off the plane in La Paz,
breathing the thin Andean air for the first time, he imagined himself as a
latter-day Keynes arriving to save the Bolivian people from the "chaos and
disorder" of hyperinflation.* Although the core tenet of Keynesianism is that

* Beating hyperinflation had not saved Germany from depression and then fascism, a contra­
diction S a c h s has never addressed in his persistent use of this analogy.

THE N E W DOCTOR S H O C K

H5

countries in severe economic recession should spend money to stimulate the
economy, Sachs took the opposite approach, advocating government auster­
ity and price increases in the midst of the crisis—the same recipe for con­
traction that BusinessWeek

had described in Chile as a "Dr. Strangelove

world of deliberately induced depression."

9

Sachs's advice to Banzer was straightforward: only sudden shock therapy
would cure Bolivia's hyperinflation crisis. He proposed raising the price of
oil tenfold and a range of other price deregulations and budget cuts. In a
speech to the Bolivian-American Chamber of Commerce, Sachs again pre­
dicted that hyperinflation could be ended in a day, reporting that "the crowd
10

was startled, and delighted, at the prospect." Like Friedman, Sachs was a
firm believer that, with a sudden policy jolt, "an economy can be reoriented
from a dead end, a dead end of socialism or a dead end of mass corruption
or a dead end of central planning, to a normal market economy."

11

At the time Sachs made these bold promises, the results of Bolivia's elec­
tions were still up in the air. The former dictator Hugo Banzer was acting as
if he had won, but his rival in the race, Victor Paz Estenssoro, hadn't yet
given up. During the campaign, Paz Estenssoro had provided few concrete
details about how he planned to deal with inflation. But he had served three
times before as Bolivia's elected president, most recently in 1964, before he
was overthrown in a coup. It was Paz who had been the face of Bolivia's de­
velopmentalist transformation, nationalizing the large tin mines, beginning
to distribute land to indigenous peasants, defending the right of all Bolivians
to vote. Like Argentina's Juan Perôn, Paz was a complicated, omnipresent
fixture on the political landscape, often switching allegiances abruptly in or­
der to hold on to power or make a comeback. During the 1985 campaign, an
aging Paz pledged allegiance to his "nationalist revolutionary" past and
made vague statements about fiscal responsibility. He was not a socialist, but
he was no Chicago School neoliberal — or so Bolivians believed.

12

Since the final decision about who would be named president was up to
Congress, this was a period of high-stakes backroom negotiations and horsetrading between the parties, the Congress and the Senate. One newly
elected senator ended up playing a pivotal role: Gonzalo Sanchez de
Lozada (known in Bolivia as Goni). He had lived in the United States for so
long that he spoke Spanish with a heavy American accent and had returned
to Bolivia to become one of the country's wealthiest businessmen. He owned
Comsur, the second-largest private mine in the country, soon to be the
largest. As a young man, Goni had studied at the University of Chicago, and

H6

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

though he was not an economist, he was strongly influenced by Friedman's
ideas and recognized that they held tremendously profitable implications in
the mining sector, which in Bolivia was still largely controlled by the state.
When Sachs laid out his shock plans to Banzer's team, Goni was impressed.
The details of the backroom negotiations have never been disclosed, but
the results are clear enough. On August 6, 1985, it was Paz who was sworn in
as president of Bolivia. Only four days later, Paz appointed Goni to head up
a top-secret bipartisan emergency economic team charged with radically re­
structuring the economy. The group's starting point was Sachs's shock ther­
apy, but it would go much further than anything he had suggested. In fact, it
would propose dismantling the entire state-centered economic model that
Paz himself had constructed decades earlier. At this point Sachs was back at
Harvard, but he says he "was happy to hear that the ADN [Banzer's party]
had shared a copy of our stabilization plan with the new president and his
team."

13

Paz's party had no idea that their leader had struck this backroom deal.
With the exception of the minister of finance and the minister of planning,
who were part of the secret group, Paz did not even tell his newly elected
cabinet about the existence of the emergency economic team.

14

For seventeen days straight, the emergency team met in the living room of
Goni's palatial home. "We holed ourselves up there in a cautious and almost
clandestine way," recalled the planning minister, Guillermo Bedregal, in an
interview given in 2005, revealing these details for the first time.*

15

What

they were contemplating was a radical overhaul of a national economy so
sweeping that nothing like it had ever been attempted in a democracy. Pres­
ident Paz was convinced that his only hope was to move as fast and suddenly
as possible. That way, Bolivia's notoriously militant trade unions and peasant
groups would be caught off guard and wouldn't have a chance to organize a
response, or so he hoped. As Goni recalled, Paz "kept saying, 'If you are go­
16

ing to do it, do it now. I can't operate twice.'" The reason for Paz's post­
election about-face remains something of a mystery. He died in 2001 and
never did explain whether he had agreed to adopt Banzer's shock therapy
program in exchange for being awarded the presidency, or whether he had
* For two decades, Bolivians did not know how their shock therapy program had been de­
vised. In August 2005, twenty years after the drafting of the original decree, the Bolivian
journalist S u s a n Velasco Portillo interviewed the original members of the emergency eco­
nomic team, and several of them shared information about the clandestine operation. This
account is primarily based on those memories.

THE N E W DOCTOR S H O C K

H7

undergone a heartfelt ideological conversion. Some insight was provided to
me by Edwin Corr, the U.S. ambassador to Bolivia at the time. He recalled
that he had met with all the political parties and made it clear that U.S. aid
would flow if they went the shock route.
After seventeen days, Bedregal, the planning minister, had the draft of a
textbook shock therapy program. It called for the elimination of food subsi­
dies, the canceling of almost all price controls and a 300 percent hike in the
17

price of oil. Despite the fact that life was about to get a lot more expensive
in an already desperately poor country, the plan froze government wages at
their already low levels for a year. It also called for deep cuts to government
spending, flung open Bolivia's borders to unrestricted imports and called for
a downsizing of state companies, the precursor to privatization. Bolivia had
missed the neoliberal revolution imposed on the rest of the Southern Cone
in the seventies; now it was going to make up for lost time.
When the members of the emergency team had finished drafting the new
laws, they still weren't ready to share them with Bolivia's elected representa­
tives, let alone its voters, who had never cast their ballots for such a plan.
They had one more task to complete. As a group, they drove over to the of­
fice of the International Monetary Fund's representative in Bolivia and told
him what they were planning to do. His response was at once encouraging
and harrowing: "This is what every official at the I M F has dreamed about.
But if it doesn't work, luckily I have diplomatic immunity and I can catch a
18

plane and flee."

The Bolivians proposing the plan had no such escape hatch, and several
were terrified of how the public was going to react. "They are going to kill
us," predicted Fernando Prado, the youngest member of the group. Bedre­
gal, the plan's main author, attempted to stiffen spines by comparing the
team to fighter pilots attacking an enemy. "We have to be like the pilot of Hi­
roshima. When he dropped the atomic bomb he didn't know what he was
doing, but when he saw the smoke he said: 'Oops, sorry!' And that's exactly
what we have to do, launch the measures and then: Oops, sorry!"

19

The idea that policy change should be like launching a surprise military
attack is a recurring theme for economic shock therapists. In Shock and Awe:
Achieving Rapid Dominance,

the U.S. military doctrine published in 1996

that eventually formed the basis of the 2003 invasion of Iraq, the authors
state that the invading force should "seize control of the environment and
paralyze or so overload an adversary's perceptions and understanding of
20

events so that the enemy would be incapable of resistance." Economic

U8

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

shock works according to a similar theory: the premise is that people can de­
velop responses to gradual change—a slashed health program here, a trade
deal there—but if dozens of changes come from all directions at once, a feel­
ing of futility sets in, and populations go limp.
Hoping to induce that sense of hopelessness, the Bolivian planners re­
quired all of their radical measures to be adopted at the same time, and all
within the first hundred days of the new government. Rather than presenting
each section of the plan as its own individual law (the new tax code, the new
pricing law and so on), Paz's team insisted on bundling the entire revolution
into a single executive decree, D.S. 21060. It contained 220 separate laws
and covered every aspect of economic life in the country, making it the
equivalent, in scope and ambition, to "The Brick," the hefty blueprint writ­
ten by the Chicago Boys in preparation for Pinochet's coup. According to its
authors, the entire program had to be accepted or rejected; it couldn't be
amended. It was the economic equivalent of Shock and Awe.
When the document was complete, the team made five copies: one for
Paz, one for Goni and one for the treasury minister. The destination of the
other two copies revealed how certain Paz and his team were that many Bo­
livians would regard the plan as an act of war: one was for the head of the
army and the other was for the chief of police. Paz's cabinet, however, was
still in the dark. They continued to be under the mistaken impression that
they were working for the same man who had nationalized the mines and re­
distributed land all those years ago.
Three weeks after being sworn in as president, Paz finally called his cabi­
net together to let them in on the surprise he had in store. He ordered the
doors closed to the governing chambers and "instructed the secretaries to
hold all of the ministers' telephone calls." Bedregal read the full sixty pages
to the stunned audience. He was so nervous, he confessed, that he "even got
a nosebleed only minutes later." Paz informed his cabinet members that the
decree was not up for debate; in yet another backroom deal, he had already
secured support from Banzer's right-wing opposition party. If they disagreed,
he said, they could resign.
"I don't agree," announced the minister of industry.
"Please leave," Paz replied. The minister stayed. With inflation still soar­
ing and strong hints that a shock therapy approach would be rewarded with
significant financial aid from Washington, no one dared leave. Two days
later, in a televised presidential address titled "Bolivia Is Dying," Paz
dropped Bolivia's "Brick" on a completely unsuspecting public.

THE N E W DOCTOR S H O C K

U9

Sachs was correct in predicting that price increases would end hyperinfla­
tion. Within two years, inflation was down to 10 percent, impressive by any
standard.

21

The broader legacy of Bolivia's neoliberal revolution is far more

contentious. All economists agree that rapid inflation is enormously damag­
ing, unsustainable and must be controlled—a process that imposes significant
pain during the adjustment. The debate is over how a credible program can be
achieved, as well as who, in any given society, is forced to bear the brunt of that
pain. Ricardo Grinspun, a professor of economics specializing in Latin Amer­
ica at York University, explains that an approach in the Keynesian or develop­
mentalist tradition seeks to mobilize support and share the burden through "a
negotiated process involving key stakeholders—government, employers, farm­
ers, unions and so on. In this way, the parties come to agreements over income
policies, like wages and prices, at the same time that stabilization measures are
implemented." In sharp contrast, says Grinspun, "the orthodox approach is to
shift all the social cost onto the poor through shock therapy." That, he told me,
is precisely what happened in Bolivia.
Just as Friedman had promised in Chile, freer trade was supposed to cre­
ate jobs for the newly jobless. It didn't, and the unemployment rate increased
from 20 percent at the time of the elections to between 25 and 30 percent
22

two years later. The state mining corporation alone—the same one that Paz
had nationalized in the 1950s—was downsized from twenty-eight thousand
employees to just six thousand.

23

The minimum wage never recovered its value, and two years into the pro­
gram, real wages were down 40 percent; at one point they would drop 70 per­
24

cent. In 1985, the year of shock therapy, the per capita average income in
Bolivia was $845; two years later it had fallen to $789. This is the measure
used by Sachs and the government, and despite the lack of progress it con­
veys, it does not begin to capture the degradation of daily life for many Boli­
vians. Average income is derived by adding up the country's total income
and dividing by the number of people in the country; it glosses over the fact
that shock therapy in Bolivia had the same effects that it had in the rest of the
region: a small elite grew far wealthier while large portions of what had been
the working class were discarded from the economy altogether and turned
into surplus people. In 1987, Bolivian peasants, known as campesinos, were
earning, on average, just $140 a year, less than one-fifth of the "average in­
come."

25

That is the problem with measuring only the "average": it effec­

tively erases these sharp divisions.
A leader of the peasants' union explained that "the government's statistics

150

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

don't reflect the growing number of families forced to live in tents; the thou­
sands of malnourished kids who get only a piece of bread and a cup of tea
a day; the hundreds of campesinos who have come to the capital in search of
26

work and end up begging on the streets." That was the hidden story of Bo­
livia's shock therapy: hundreds of thousands of full-time jobs with pensions
were eliminated, replaced with precarious ones with no protections at all.
Between 1983 and 1988, the number of Bolivians eligible for social security
dropped by 61 percent.

27

Sachs, who returned to Bolivia as an adviser in the midst of the transition,
opposed raising salaries to keep up with the price of food and gasoline and in­
stead favored an emergency fund to help the hardest hit—a Band-Aid on what
had become a gaping wound. Sachs returned to Bolivia at Paz Estenssoro's re­
quest and was working directly for the president. He is remembered as an un­
yielding presence. According to Goni (who would later become president of
Bolivia), Sachs helped to stiffen the resolve of policy makers when public
pressure was building against the human cost of shock therapy. "In his visits
[Sachs] said, 'Look, all this gradualist stuff, it just doesn't work. When it really
gets out of control you've got to stop it, like a medicine. You've got to take
some radical steps; otherwise your patient is going to die."

28

One immediate result of this resolve was that many of Bolivia's desper­
ately poor were pushed to become coca growers, because it paid roughly ten
times as much as other crops (somewhat of an irony since the original eco­
29

nomic crisis was set off by the U.S.-funded siege on the coca farmers.) By
1989, an estimated one in ten workers was turning to work in some aspect of
30

the coca or cocaine industries. These workers would include the family of
Evo Morales, future president of Bolivia and a former leader of the militant
coca growers' union.
The coca industry played a significant role in resuscitating Bolivia's econ­
omy and beating inflation (a fact now recognized by historians but never
mentioned by Sachs in explanations of how his reforms triumphed over in­
31

flation).

Just two years after the "atomic bomb," illegal drug exports were

generating more income for Bolivia than all its legal exports combined, and
an estimated 350,000 people were earning a living in some facet of the drug
trade. "For now," a foreign banker observed, "the Bolivian economy is
hooked on cocaine."

32

In the immediate aftermath of shock therapy, few outside Bolivia were talk­
ing about such complex repercussions. They were telling a far simpler story:

THE N E W DOCTOR S H O C K

151

about a bold, boyish professor from Harvard who had, virtually singlehandedly, "salvaged the inflation-wracked economy of Bolivia," according to
311

Boston Magazine.

The victory over inflation that Sachs had helped engi­

neer was enough to qualify Bolivia as a stunning free-market success story,
"the most remarkable of modern times," as The Economist described it.

34

"Bo­

livia's Miracle" gave Sachs immediate star status in powerful financial circles
and launched his career as the leading expert on crisis-struck economies,
sending him on to Argentina, Peru, Brazil, Ecuador and Venezuela in the
coming years.
The praise heaped on Sachs was not just about beating inflation in a
poor country. It was that he had achieved what so many had claimed was
impossible: he had helped stage a radical neoliberal transformation within
the confines of a democracy and without a war, a change far more sweeping
than those attempted by either Thatcher or Reagan. Sachs was fully aware
of the historical significance of what he had accomplished. "Bolivia was re­
ally the first, in my view, combination of democratic reform combined with
economic institutional change," he said years later. "And Bolivia much
more than Chile showed that you could combine political liberalization
and democracy with economic liberalization. That's an extremely impor­
tant lesson, to have both of those working in parallel and each one reinforc­
ing the other."
The

35

comparison with Chile was not incidental. Thanks to Sachs—

"evangelist for democratic capitalism," as The New York Times described
him—shock therapy had finally shaken off the stench of dictatorships and
death camps that had been clinging to it ever since Friedman made his fate­
36

ful trip to Santiago a decade earlier. Sachs had proven, contrary to what the
critics claimed, that the free-market crusade could not only survive but ride
the democratic wave now sweeping the world. And Sachs, with his praise for
Keynes and his unabashedly idealistic commitment to improving the lot of
the developing world, was the perfect man to steer the crusade into this
kinder, more peaceful era.
The

Bolivian left had taken to calling Paz's decree

pinochetismo

37

economico — economic Pinochetism. As far as the business community was
concerned, both inside and outside Bolivia, that was the whole point: Bolivia
had brought in Pinochet-style shock therapy, without a Pinochet—and un­
der a center-left government, no less. As one Bolivian banker put it with ad­
miration, "The things Pinochet did with a bayonet, Paz has done within a
democratic system."

38

152

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

The story of the Bolivian miracle has been told and retold, in newspaper
and magazine articles, in profiles of Sachs, in Sachs's own best-selling book,
and in documentary productions such as PBS's three-part series Command­
ing Heights: The Battle for the World Economy. There is one major problem:
it isn't true. Bolivia did show that shock therapy could be imposed in a coun­
try that had just had elections, but it did not show that it could be imposed
democratically or without repression —in fact, it proved, once again, that the
opposite was still the case.
First, there was the obvious problem that President Paz had no mandate
from Bolivian voters to remake the entire economic architecture of the
country. He had run on a nationalist platform, which he abruptly aban­
doned in a backroom deal. Some years later, the influential free-market
economist John Williamson coined a term for what Paz did: he called it
39

"voodoo politics"; most people simply call it lying. That was by no means
the only problem with the democracy narrative.
Predictably, many of the voters who elected Paz were furious at his be­
trayal, and as soon as the decree was handed down, tens of thousands took to
the streets to try to block a plan that would mean layoffs and deepening
hunger. The major opposition came from the country's main labor federa­
tion, which called a general strike that brought industry to a halt. Paz's re­
sponse made Thatcher's treatment of the miners seem tame. He immediately
declared a "state of siege," and army tanks rolled through the streets of the
capital, which was placed under a strict curfew. To travel through their own
country, Bolivian citizens now needed special passes. Riot police raided
union halls, a university and a radio station, as well as several factories. Politi­
cal assemblies and marches were forbidden, and state permission was re­
40

quired to hold meetings. Oppositional politics was effectively banned —just
as it had been during the Banzer dictatorship.
To clear the streets, police arrested fifteen hundred demonstrators, dis­
persed crowds with tear gas and fired on strikers who they said had attacked
their officers.

41

Paz also took further measures to make sure that the protests

stopped for good. With the leaders of the labor federation on a hunger strike,
Paz directed the police and military to round up the country's top two hundred
union leaders, load them on planes and fly them to remote jails in the Ama­
zon.

42

According to Reuters, the detainees included "the leadership of the

Bolivian Labor Federation and other senior trade union officials," and they
were taken "to isolated villages in the Amazon basin in northern Bolivia,
43

where their movements [were] restricted." It was a mass kidnapping, complete

THE N E W DOCTOR S H O C K

153

with a ransom demand: the prisoners would be released only if the unions
called off their protests, which they eventually agreed to do. Filemon Escobar
was a miner and labor activist on the streets in those years. In a recent tele­
phone interview from Bolivia, he recalled that "they plucked the labor leaders
from the streets and took them to the jungle to be eaten alive by the bugs.
When they were released, the new economic plan was in place." According to
Escobar, "The government didn't take people to the jungle to be tortured or
killed, but so that they could go ahead with their economic plan."
This extraordinary state of siege stayed in place for three months, and
since the plan was pushed through in one hundred days, that meant the
country was under lockdown during the decisive shock therapy period. One
year later, when the Paz government moved ahead with mass layoffs in the tin
mines, the unions once again took to the streets, and the same series of dra­
matic events unfolded: a state of siege was declared, and two Bolivian Air
Force planes carried one hundred of the country's top labor leaders to intern­
ment camps in Bolivia's tropical flatlands. This time, the kidnapped leaders
included two former labor ministers and a former senator—recalling
Pinochet's "VIP prison" in Southern Chile where Orlando Letelier had been
taken. The leaders were held in the camps for two and half weeks until, once
again, the unions agreed to call off their protests and hunger strike.

44

It was a kind of junta lite. In order for the regime to impose economic
shock therapy, certain people needed to disappear—if only temporarily.
Though certainly less brutal, these disappearances served the same purpose
as they had in the seventies. Interning Bolivia's trade unionists so that they
could not resist the reforms cleared the path for the economic erasure of
whole sectors of workers; their jobs were soon lost, and they ended up ware­
housed in the shantytowns and slums surrounding La Paz.
Sachs had gone to Bolivia quoting Keynes's warning about economic col­
lapse breeding fascism, but he had proceeded to prescribe measures so
painful that quasi-fascist measures were required for their enforcement.
The Paz government's crackdown was covered in the international press at
the time, but only as a one- or two-day news story about generic riots in Latin
America. When it came time to tell the tale of the triumph of "free-market
reforms" in Bolivia, however, the events did not make it into the narrative
(much as the symbiosis of Pinochet's violence and Chile's "economic mira­
cle" is so often omitted). Jeffrey Sachs, of course, is not the one who called in
the riot police or declared the state of siege, but he does devote a chapter of
his book The End of Poverty to Bolivia's victory over inflation, and while he

154

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

seems happy to take a share of the credit, he makes no mention of the re­
pression required to carry out the plan. The closest he comes is an oblique
reference to "tense moments in the early months of the stabilization program. ^
In other accounts, even that admission is erased. Goni went so far as to
claim that "stabilization had been achieved in a democracy without going
46

against people's human liberties, letting people express themselves." A less
idealized assessment came from a minister in the Paz government, who said
that they "behaved like authoritarian pigs."

47

That dissonance may be the most lasting legacy of Bolivia's shock therapy
experiment. Bolivia had shown that wrenching shock therapy still needed to
be accompanied by shocking attacks on inconvenient social groups and on
democratic institutions. It also showed that the corporatist crusade could ad­
vance by these baldly authoritarian means and still be applauded as demo­
cratic because elections had taken place, regardless of how completely civil
liberties were suppressed in the aftermath or how fully democratic wishes
were ignored. (It was a lesson that would prove particularly handy for Rus­
sia's Boris Yeltsin, among other leaders, in the years to come.) In this way,
Bolivia provided a blueprint for a new, more palatable kind of authoritarian­
ism, a civilian coup d'état, one carried out by politicians and economists in
business suits rather than soldiers in military uniforms—all unfolding within
the official shell of a democratic regime.

CHAPTER

8

CRISIS WORKS
THE P A C K A G I N G OF S H O C K T H E R A P Y

Well, what is the s e n s e of ruining m y head a n d e r a s i n g m y m e m ­
ory, which is m y capital, and putting m e out of b u s i n e s s ? It w a s a
brilliant cure but w e lost the patient.
— E r n e s t H e m i n g w a y on his electroshock therapy, shortly before
committing suicide, 1 9 6 1

1

For Jeffrey Sachs, the lesson of his first international adventure was that hy­
perinflation could indeed be stopped in its tracks, with the right tough and
drastic measures. He had gone to Bolivia to slay inflation and he had done it.
Case closed.
John Williamson, one of the most influential right-wing economists in
Washington and a key adviser to the I M F and the World Bank, was watching
Sachs's experiment closely, and he saw something of far greater significance
in Bolivia. He described the shock therapy program as "the big bang"
moment—a breakthrough in the campaign to bring the Chicago School
2

doctrine to the entire globe. The reason had little to do with economics and
everything to do with tactics.
It may not have been his intention, but in quite spectacular fashion Sachs
had proven that Friedman's theory about crisis was absolutely correct. Bo­
livia's hyperinflation meltdown was the excuse that was needed to push
through a program that would have been politically impossible under nor­
mal circumstances. Here was a country with a strong, militant labor move­
ment and a powerful left tradition, site of Che Guevara's last stand. Yet it had

156

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

been forced to accept draconian shock therapy in the name of stabilizing its
out-of-control currency.
By the mid-eighties, several economists had observed that a true hyperinflation crisis simulates the effects of a military war—spreading fear and con3

fusion, creating refugees and causing large loss of life. It was strikingly clear
that in Bolivia, hyperinflation had played the same role as had Pinochet's
"war" in Chile and the Falklands War for Margaret Thatcher—it had created the context for emergency measures, a state of exception during which
the rules of democracy could be suspended and economic control could be
temporarily handed over to the team of experts in Goni's living room. For
hard-core Chicago School ideologues like Williamson, that meant that hyperinflation was not a problem to be solved, as Sachs believed, but a golden
opportunity to be seized.
There was no shortage of such opportunities in the eighties. In fact, much
of the developing world, but particularly Latin America, was at that very moment spiraling into hyperinflation. The crisis was the result of two main factors, both with roots in Washington financial institutions. The first was their
insistence on passing on illegitimate debts accumulated under dictatorships
to new democracies. The second was the Friedman-inspired decision at the
U.S. Federal Reserve to allow interest rates to soar, which massively increased the size of those debts overnight.

Passing on Odious Debts
Argentina was a textbook case. In 1983, when the junta collapsed after the
Falklands War, Argentines elected Raul Alfonsïn as their new president. The
newly liberated country was rigged to detonate, thanks to the planting of a socalled debt bomb. As part of what the outgoing junta had termed a "dignified
transition" to democracy, Washington insisted that the new government agree
to pay off the debts amassed by the generals. During junta rule, Argentina's external debt had ballooned from $7.9 billion the year before the coup to $45
billion at the time of the handover—debts owed to the International Monetary
Fund, the World Bank, the U.S. Export-Import Bank and private banks based
in the U.S. It was much the same across the region. In Uruguay, the junta took
a debt of half a billion dollars when it seized power and expanded it to $5 billion, a huge load in a country of only 3 million people. In Brazil, the most dramatic case, the generals, who came to power in 1964 promising financial
order, managed to take the debt from $3 billion to $103 billion in 1985.

4

CRISIS WORKS

157

At the time of the transitions to democracy, powerful arguments were
made, both moral and legal, that these debts were "odious" and that newly
liberated people should not be forced to pay the bills of their oppressors and
tormentors. The case was especially strong in the Southern Cone because so
much of the foreign credit had gone straight to the military and police dur­
ing the dictatorship years—to pay for guns, water cannons and state-of-theart torture camps. In Chile, for instance, the loans bankrolled a tripling in
military spending, enlarging Chile's army from forty-seven thousand in 1973
to eighty-five thousand in 1980. In Argentina, the World Bank estimates that
roughly $10 billion of the money borrowed by the generals went to military
purchases.

5

Much of what wasn't spent on weapons simply vanished. A culture of cor­
ruption permeated junta rule—a glimpse of the debauched future to come
when the same free-wheeling economic policies spread to Russia, China and
the "free fraud zone" of occupied Iraq (to borrow a phrase from a disaffected
6

U.S. adviser). According to a 2005 U.S. Senate report, Pinochet maintained
a byzantine web of at least 125 secret foreign bank accounts listed under the
names of various family members and combinations of his own name. The
accounts, the most notorious of which were at the Washington, D.C.-based
Riggs Bank, hid an estimated $27 million.

7

In Argentina, the junta has been accused of being even more acquisitive.
In 1984, José Martinez de Hoz, architect of the economic program, was ar­
rested on fraud charges relating to a massive state subsidy to one of the com­
8

panies he used to head (the case was later dismissed). The World Bank,
meanwhile, later tracked what happened to $35 billion in foreign loans bor­
rowed by the junta and found that $19 billion—46 percent of the total—was
moved offshore. Swiss officials have confirmed that much of it ended up in
9

numbered accounts. The U.S. Federal Reserve observed that in 1980 alone,
Argentina's debt expanded by $9 billion; in that same year, the amount of
money deposited abroad by Argentine citizens increased by $6.7 billion.

10

Larry Sjaastad, a famed University of Chicago professor who personally
trained many of Argentina's Chicago Boys, has described these missing bil­
lions (stolen under the noses of his students) as "the greatest fraud of the
twentieth century."*

11

The junta embezzlers even enlisted their victims in these crimes. At the

* It may well have been at the time, but the century w a s not over—Russia's Chicago School
experiment was to come.

158

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

E S M A torture center in Buenos Aires, prisoners with strong language skills
or university educations were regularly pulled out of their cells to perform
clerical tasks for their captors. One survivor, Graciela Daleo, was instructed
to type a document advising officers on offshore tax havens for the money
they were embezzling.

12

The remainder of the national debt was mostly spent on interest pay­
ments, as well as shady bailouts for private firms. In 1982, just before Ar­
gentina's dictatorship collapsed, the junta did one last favor for the corporate
sector. Domingo Cavallo, president of Argentina's central bank, announced
that the state would absorb the debts of large multinational and domestic
firms that had, like Chile's piranhas, borrowed themselves to the verge of
bankruptcy. The tidy arrangement meant that these companies continued to
own their assests and profits, but the public had to pay off between $15 and
$20 billion of their debts; among the companies to receive this generous
treatment were Ford Motor Argentina, Chase Manhattan, Citibank, IBM
and Mercedes-Benz.

13

Those who favored defaulting on these illegitimately accumulated
debts argued that the lenders knew, or ought to have known, that the
money was being spent on repression and corruption. This case was bol­
stered recently when the State Department declassified the transcript of a
meeting held on October 7, 1976, between Henry Kissinger, then secre­
tary of state, and Argentina's foreign minister under the military dictator­
ship,

the

admiral

César

Augusto

Guzzetti.

After

discussing

the

international human rights outcry following the coup, Kissinger said,
"Look, our basic attitude is that we would like you to succeed. I have an
old-fashioned view that friends ought to be supported. . . . The quicker you
succeed, the better." Kissinger then moved on to the topic of loans, en­
couraging Guzzetti to apply for as much foreign assistance as possible and
fast, before Argentina's "human rights problem" tied the hands of the U.S.
administration. "There are two loans in the bank," Kissinger said, referring
to the Inter-American Development Bank. "We have no intention of voting
against them." He also instructed the minister, "Proceed with your ExportImport Bank requests. We would like your economic program to succeed
and we will do our best to help you."

14

The transcript proves that the U.S. government approved loans to the
junta knowing they were being used in the midst of a campaign of terror. In
the early eighties, it was these odious debts that Washington insisted Ar­
gentina's new democratic government had to repay.

CRISIS WORKS

159

The Debt Shock
On their own, the debts would have been an enormous burden on the new
democracies, but that burden was about to get much heavier. A new kind of
shock was in the news: the Volcker Shock. Economists used this term to de­
scribe the impact of the decision made by Federal Reserve chairman Paul
Volcker when he dramatically increased interest rates in the United States,
letting them rise as high as 21 percent, reaching a peak in 1981 and lasting
15

through the mid-eighties. In the U.S., rising interest rates led to a wave of
bankruptcies, and in 1983 the number of people who defaulted on their
mortgages tripled.

16

The deepest pain, however, was felt outside the U.S. In developing coun­
tries carrying heavy debt loads, the Volcker Shock—also known as the "debt
shock" or the "debt crisis"—was like a giant Taser gun fired from Washing­
ton, sending the developing world into convulsions. Soaring interest rates
meant higher interest payments on foreign debts, and often the higher pay­
ments could only be met by taking on more loans. The debt spiral was born.
In Argentina, the already huge debt of $45 billion passed on by the junta
grew rapidly until it reached $65 billion in 1989, a situation reproduced in
poor countries around the world.

17

It was after the Volcker Shock that

Brazil's debt exploded, doubling from $50 billion to $100 billion in six years.
Many African countries, having borrowed heavily in the seventies, found
themselves in similar straits: Nigeria's debt in the same short time period
went from $9 billion to $29 billion.

18

These were not the only economic shocks zapping the developing world
in the eighties. A "price shock" occurs every time the price of an export com­
modity like coffee or tin drops by 10 percent or more. According to the IMF,
developing countries experienced 25 such shocks between 1981 and 1983;
between 1984 and 1987, the height of the debt crisis, they experienced 140
such shocks, pushing them deeper into debt.

19

One hit Bolivia in 1986, the

year after it had swallowed Jeffrey Sachs's bitter medicine and submitted to a
capitalist makeover. The price of tin, Bolivia's major export other than coca,
dropped by 55 percent, devastating the country's economy through no fault
of its own. (This was precisely the kind of dependence on raw resource ex­
ports that developmentalist economics had been trying to transcend in the
fifties and sixties—an idea dismissed as "fuzzy" by the Northern economic
establishment.)
This is where Friedman's crisis theory became self-reinforcing. The more

160

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the global economy followed his prescriptions, with floating interest rates,
deregulated prices and export-oriented economies, the more crisis-prone the
system became, producing more and more of precisely the type of meltdowns he had identified as the only circumstances under which govern­
ments would take more of his radical advice.
In this way, crisis is built into the Chicago School model. When limitless
sums of money are free to travel the globe at great speed, and speculators are
able to bet on the value of everything from cocoa to currencies, the result is
enormous volatility. And, since free-trade policies encourage poor countries
to continue to rely on the export of raw resources such as coffee, copper, oil
or wheat, they are particularly vulnerable to getting trapped in a vicious cir­
cle of continuing crisis. A sudden drop in the price of coffee sends entire
economies into depression, which is then deepened by currency traders
who, seeing a country's financial downturn, respond by betting against its
currency, causing its value to plummet. When soaring interest rates are
added, and national debts balloon overnight, you have a recipe for potential
economic mayhem.
Chicago School believers tend to portray the mid-eighties onward as a
smooth and triumphant victory march for their ideology: at the same time
that countries were joining the democratic wave, they had the collective
epiphany that free people and unfettered free markets go hand in hand.
That epiphany was always fictional. What actually happened is that just as
citizens were finally winning their long-denied freedoms, escaping the shock
of the torture chambers under the likes of the Philippines' Ferdinand Marcos
and Uruguay's Juan Maria Bordaberry, they were hit with a perfect storm of
financial shocks —debt shocks, price shocks and currency shocks—created
by the increasingly volatile, deregulated global economy.
Argentina's experience of how the debt crisis was compounded by these
other shocks was, unfortunately, typical. Raul Alfonsfn took office in 1983,
in the midst of the Volcker Shock, which placed the new government in cri­
sis mode from day one. In 1985, inflation was so bad that Alfonsfn was
forced to unveil a brand-new currency, the austral, gambling that a fresh
start would allow him to regain control. Within four years, prices had soared
so high that massive food riots broke out, and Argentine restaurants were us­
ing the currency as wallpaper because it was cheaper than paper. In June
1989, with inflation up 203 percent that month alone, and five months be­
fore his term was set to expire, Alfonsfn gave up: he resigned and called early
elections.

20

CRISIS WORKS

161

Other options were available to politicians in Alfonsfn's position. He
could have defaulted on Argentina's huge debts. He could have joined with
neighboring governments in the same crisis and formed a debtors' cartel.
These governments could have created a common market based on devel­
opmentalist principles, a process that had begun when the region was torn
apart by sadistic military regimes. But part of the challenge at the time had to
do with the legacy of state terror faced by new democracies. In the eighties
and nineties, much of the developing world was in the grip of a kind of ter­
ror hangover, free on paper but still cautious and wary. Having finally es­
caped the darkness of dictatorship, few elected politicians were willing to
risk inviting another round of U.S.-supported coups d'état by pushing the
very policies that had provoked the coups of the seventies —especially when
the military officials who had staged them were, for the most part, not in
prison but, having negotiated immunity, in their barracks, watching.
Understandably unwilling to go to war with the Washington institutions
that owned their debts, crisis-struck new democracies had little choice but to
play by Washington's rules. And then, in the early eighties, Washington's
rules got a great deal stricter. That's because the debt shock coincided pre­
cisely, and not coincidentally, with a new era in North-South relations, one
that would make military dictatorships largely unnecessary. It was the dawn
of the era of "structural adjustment" —otherwise known as the dictatorship of
debt.
Philosophically, Milton Friedman did not believe in the I M F or the World
Bank: they were classic examples of big government interfering with the del­
icate signals of the free market. So it was ironic that there was a virtual con­
veyor belt delivering Chicago Boys to the two institutions' hulking
headquarters on Nineteenth Street in Washington, D.C., where they took up
many of the top positions.
Arnold Harberger, who headed the University of Chicago's Latin America
program, often brags about how many of his graduates landed powerful jobs
at the World Bank and the IMF. "There was one moment in time when four
regional chief economists at the World Bank had been my students in
Chicago. One of them, Marcelo Selowsky, went off to be the chief econo­
mist for the newly minted ex-Soviet empire area, which is the biggest such
job in the whole Bank. And guess what? He was replaced by yet another for­
mer student, Sebastian Edwards. So it's very nice to see these people moving
up, and I'm proud to have played a part in their development as economists."

21

162

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Another star was Claudio Loser, an Argentine who graduated from the Uni­
versity of Chicago in 1971 and went on to become director of the Western
Hemisphere Department of the IMF, the most senior post dealing with Latin
America.* Chicagoans occupied many other senior I M F posts as well, in­
cluding the second-highest position, first deputy managing director, as well
as chief economist, director of research and senior economist of the African
Department.

22

Friedman may have opposed the institutions on philosophical grounds,
but practically, there were no institutions better positioned to implement his
crisis theory. When countries were sent spiraling into crisis in the eighties,
they had nowhere else to turn but the World Bank and the IMF. When they
did, they hit a wall of orthodox Chicago Boys, trained to see their economic
catastrophes not as problems to solve but as precious opportunities to lever­
age in order to secure a new free-market frontier. Crisis opportunism was
now the guiding logic of the world's most powerful financial institutions. It
was also a fundamental betrayal of their founding principles.
Like the UN, the World Bank and the I M F were created in direct re­
sponse to the horror of the Second World War. With the goal of never again
repeating the mistakes that had allowed fascism to rise in the heart of Eu­
rope, the world powers came together in 1944 in Bretton Woods, New
Hampshire, to create a new economic architecture. The World Bank and
the IMF, financed through contributions by their initial forty-three member
countries, were given the explicit mandate to prevent future economic
shocks and crashes like the ones that had so destabilized Weimar Germany.
The World Bank would make long-term investments in development to pull
countries out of poverty, while the I M F would act as a kind of global shock
absorber, promoting economic policies that reduced financial speculation
and market volatility. When a country looked as though it was falling into
crisis, the I M F would leap in with stabilizing grants and loans, thereby pre­
venting crises before they occurred.

23

The two institutions, located across

the street from each other in Washington, would coordinate their responses.
John Maynard Keynes, who headed the U.K. delegation, was convinced
that the world had finally recognized the political perils of leaving the mar* Loser was fired after Argentina's 2001 collapse. The consensus was that the IMF under his
watch w a s so enamored of free-market policies that, a s long as countries kept cutting
spending and privatizing their economies, it continued to lavish loans on them, overlooking
glaring w e a k n e s s e s in their economies, such a s m a s s unemployment and rampant
corruption—not to mention unsustainable debt to the IMF.

CRISIS WORKS

163

ket to regulate itself. "Few believed it possible," Keynes said at the confer­
ence's end. But if the institutions stayed true to their founding principles,
"the brotherhood of man will have become more than a phrase."

24

The I M F and the World Bank did not live up to that universal vision; from
the start they allocated power not on the basis of "one country, one vote," like
the UN General Assembly, but rather on the size of each country's
economy—an arrangement that gives the United States an effective veto
over all major decisions, with Europe and Japan controlling most of the rest.
That meant that when Reagan and Thatcher came to power in the eighties,
their highly ideological administrations were essentially able to harness the
two institutions for their own ends, rapidly increasing their power and turn­
ing them into the primary vehicles for the advancement of the corporatist
crusade.
The colonization of the World Bank and the I M F by the Chicago School
was a largely unspoken process, but it became official in 1989 when John
Williamson unveiled what he called "the Washington Consensus." It was a
list of economic policies that he said both institutions now considered the
bare minimum for economic health —"the common core of wisdom em­
25

braced by all serious economists." These policies, masquerading as techni­
cal and uncontentious, included such bald ideological claims as all "state
enterprises should be privatized" and "barriers impeding the entry of foreign
26

firms should be abolished." When the list was complete, it made up noth­
ing less than Friedman's neoliberal triumvirate of privatization, deregula­
tion/free trade and drastic cuts to government spending. These were the
policies, Williamson said, "that were being urged on Latin America by the
27

powers-that-be in Washington." Joseph Stiglitz, former chief economist of
the World Bank and one of the last holdouts against the new orthodoxy,
wrote that "Keynes would be rolling over in his grave were he to see what has
happened to his child."

28

Officials with the World Bank and the I M F had always made policy recom­
mendations when they handed out loans, but in the early eighties, embold­
ened by the desperation of developing countries, those recommendations
morphed into radical free-market demands. When crisis-struck countries
came to the I M F seeking debt relief and emergency loans, the fund responded
with sweeping shock therapy programs, equivalent in scope to "The Brick"
drafted by the Chicago Boys for Pinochet and the 220-law decree cooked up in
Goni's living room in Bolivia.
The I M F issued its first full-fledged "structural adjustment" program in

164

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

1983. For the next two decades, every country that came to the fund for a
major loan was informed that it needed to revamp its economy from top to
bottom. Davison Budhoo, an I M F senior economist who designed structural
adjustment programs in Latin America and Africa throughout the eighties,
admitted later that "everything we did from 1983 onward was based on our
new sense of mission to have the south 'privatised' or die; towards this end we
ignominiously created economic bedlam in Latin America and Africa in
1983-88."

29

Despite this radical (and highly profitable) new mission, the I M F and the
bank always claimed that everything they did was in the interest of stabiliza­
tion. The fund's official mandate was still crisis prevention —not social engi­
neering or ideological transformation—so stabilization needed to be the
official rationale. The reality was that in country after country, the interna­
tional debt crisis was being methodically leveraged to advance the Chicago
School agenda, based on a ruthless application

of Friedman's

shock doc­

trine.
Economists at the World Bank and the I M F admitted this at the time, al­
though the admissions were generally made in coded economic language
and restricted to specialized forums and publications for fellow "tech­
nocrats." Dani Rodrik, a renowned Harvard economist who worked exten­
sively with the World Bank, described the entire construct of "structural
adjustment" as an ingenious marketing strategy. "The World Bank must be
given credit," Rodrik wrote in 1994, "for having invented and successfully
marketed the concept of'structural adjustment,' a concept that packaged to­
gether microeconomic and macroeconomic reforms. Structural

adjustment

was sold as the process that countries needed to undergo in order to save their
economies from the crisis. For governments that bought into the package, the
distinction between sound macroeconomic policies that maintain external
balance and stable prices, on the one hand, and policies that determine
openness [like free trade], on the other, was

30

obfuscated."

The principle was simple: countries in crisis desperately need emergency
aid to stabilize their currencies. When privatization and free-trade policies
are packaged together with a financial bailout, countries have little choice
but to accept the whole package. The really clever part was that the econo­
mists themselves knew that free trade had nothing to do with ending a crisis,
but that information was expertly "obfuscated." Rodrik meant his comment
as a compliment. Not only did this bundling work in getting poor countries
to accept the policies selected for them by Washington, but it was the only

CRISIS WORKS

165

thing that worked—and Rodrik had the numbers to back up his claim. He
had studied all the countries that adopted radical free-trade policies in the
eighties and found that "no significant case of trade reform in a developing
country in the 1980s took place outside the context of a serious economic
crisis.

5 1

It was a staggering admission. At this point in history, the bank and the
fund were publicly insisting that governments the world over had seen the
light and realized that the Washington Consensus policies were the only
recipe for stability, and therefore democracy. Yet here was an acknowledg­
ment, made inside the Washington establishment, that developing countries
were submitting to them only through a combination of false pretenses and
bald extortion: Want to save your country? Sell it off. Rodrik even conceded
that privatization and free trade—two central pieces of the structural adjust­
ment package—had no direct link with creating stability. To argue other­
wise, according to Rodrik, was "bad economics."

32

Argentina—the "model student" of the I M F in this period—once again
offers a clear window into the mechanics of the new order. After the hyper­
inflation crisis forced President Alfonsfn to resign, he was replaced by Carlos
Menem, a Peronist governor from a small province who wore leather jackets,
had muttonchop sideburns and seemed tough enough to stand up to both
the still-ominous military and the creditors. After all the violent attempts that
had been made to erase the Peronist party and the trade union movement,
Argentina now had a president who had run a pro-union campaign promis­
ing to revive Juan Perôn's nationalist economic policies. It was a moment
with many of the same emotional echoes as Paz's inauguration in Bolivia.
Too many, as it turned out. After a year in office, and under intense pres­
sure from the IMF, Menem embarked on a defiant course of "voodoo poli­
tics." Elected as the symbol of the party that had opposed the dictatorship,
Menem appointed Domingo Cavallo as his economy minister, bringing
back to power the junta-era official responsible for bailing out the debts of
33

the corporate sector—the dictatorship's parting gift. His appointment was
what economists call "a signal"—an unmistakable indication, in this case,
that the new government would pick up and continue the corporatist exper­
iment started by the junta. The Buenos Aires stock market responded with
the equivalent of a standing ovation: a 30 percent spike in trading on the day
Cavallo's name was announced.

34

Cavallo immediately called for ideological reinforcements, stacking the
government with former students of Milton Friedman and Arnold Harberger.

166

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

Virtually all the country's top economic posts were filled by Chicago Boys:
president of the central bank was Roque Fernandez, who had worked at both
the I M F and the World Bank; vice president of the central bank was Pedro
Pou, a Chicago Boy who had worked for the dictatorship; the chief central
bank adviser was the Pablo Guidotti, who came directly from his job work­
ing at the I M F under another former University of Chicago professor,
Michael Mussa.
Argentina was not unique in this regard. By 1999, the Chicago School in­
ternational alumni included more than twenty-five government ministers and
more than a dozen central bank presidents from Israel to Costa Rica, an ex­
traordinary level of influence for one university department.

35

In Argentina,

as in so many other countries, the Chicago Boys formed a kind of ideological
pincer around the elected government, one group squeezing from within, an­
other exerting its pressure from Washington. For instance, the I M F delega­
tions to Buenos Aires were often led by Claudio Loser, the Argentine Chicago
Boy, which meant that when he met with the finance ministry and the central
bank, the meetings were not adversarial negotiations but collégial discussions
among friends, former classmates at the University of Chicago and recent
coworkers on Nineteenth Street. A book published in Argentina about the ef­
fect of this global economic fraternity is aptly titled Buenos Muchachos,
erence to Martin Scorsese's mafia classic,

a ref­

36

Goodfellas.

The members of this fraternity were in enthusiastic agreement about what
needed to be done with Argentina's economy—and how to pull it off. The
Cavallo Plan, as it came to be called, was based on the clever packaging trick
that both the World Bank and the I M F had perfected: harnessing the chaos
and desperation of a hyperinflation crisis to pass privatization off as an inte­
gral part of the rescue mission. So, to stabilize the money system, Cavallo
quickly made massive cuts to public spending and launched another new
currency, the Argentine peso, pegged to the U.S. dollar. Within a year, infla­
tion was down to 17.5 percent and was virtually eliminated a few years
37

later. This dealt with the runaway currency but "obfuscated" the other half
of the program.
Argentina's dictatorship, for all its commitment to pleasing foreign in­
vestors, had left large and desirable pieces of the economy in state hands,
from the national airline to Patagonia's impressive oil reserves. As far as Cav­
allo and his Chicago Boys were concerned, the revolution was only half fin­
ished, and they were determined to use the economic crisis to complete their
work.

CRISIS WORKS

167

In the early nineties, the Argentine state sold off the riches of the country
so rapidly and so completely that the project far surpassed what had taken
place in Chile a decade earlier. By 1994, 90 percent of all state enterprises
had been sold to private companies, including Citibank, Bank Boston,
France's Suez and Vivendi, Spain's Repsol and Telefonica. Before making
the sales, Menem and Cavallo had generously performed a valuable service
for the new owners: they had fired roughly 700,000 of their workers, accord­
ing to Cavallo's own estimates; some put the number much higher. The oil
company alone lost 27,000 workers during the Menem years. An admirer of
Jeffrey Sachs, Cavallo called this process "shock therapy." Menem had an
even more brutal phrase for it: in a country still traumatized by mass torture,
he called it "major surgery without anesthetic."*

38

In the midst of the transformation, Time magazine put Menem on its
cover, his face grinning out of the middle of a sunflower, under the headline
39

"Menem's Miracle." And it was a miracle—Menem and Cavallo had
pulled off a radical and painful privatization program without sparking a na­
tional revolt. How had they done it?
Years later, Cavallo explained. "At the time of hyperinflation it's terrible
for the people, particularly for low-income people and small savers, because
they see that in a few hours or in a few days they are being told their salaries
got destroyed by the price increases, which take place at an incredible speed.
That is why the people ask the government, 'Please do something.' And if the
government comes with a good stabilization plan, that is the opportunity to
also accompany that plan with other reforms. . . the most important reforms
were related to the opening up of the economy and to the deregulation and
the privatization process. But the only way to implement all those reforms
was, at that time, to take advantage of the situation created by hyperinflation,
because the population was ready to accept drastic changes in order to elim­
inate hyperinflation and to go back to normality."

40

* In January 2006, long after Cavallo and M e n e m were out of office, Argentines received
some surprising news. It turned out that the Cavallo Plan wasn't Cavallo's at all, nor w a s it
the I M F ' s : Argentina's entire early-nineties shock therapy program w a s written in secret by
JP Morgan and Citibank, two of Argentina's largest private creditors. In the course of a law­
suit against the Argentine government, the noted historian Alejandro Olmos Gaona uncov­
ered a jaw-dropping 1,400-page document written by the two U.S. banks for Cavallo in which
"the policies carried out by the government from '92 on are drawn up . . . the privatization of
utilities, the labour law reform, the privatization of the pension system. It is all laid out with
great attention to detail. . . . Everyone believes that the economic plan pursued since 1992
was Domingo Cavallo's creation, but that's not the way it is."

168

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

In the long term, Cavallo's program in its entirety would prove disastrous
for Argentina. His method of stabilizing the currency—pegging the peso to
the U.S. dollar—made it so expensive to produce goods inside the country
that local factories could not compete with the cheap imports flooding the
country. So many jobs were lost that well over half the country would even­
tually be pushed below the poverty line. In the short term, however, the plan
worked brilliantly: Cavallo and Menem had smuggled privatization in while
the country was in shock from hyperinflation. Crisis had done its job.
What Argentina's leaders pulled off in this period was a psychological
more than an economic technique. As Cavallo, a junta veteran, well under­
stood, in moments of crisis, people are willing to hand over a great deal of
power to anyone who claims to have a magic cure—whether the crisis is a fi­
nancial meltdown or, as the Bush administration would later show, a terrorist
attack.
And that is how the crusade that Friedman began managed to survive the
dreaded transition to democracy—not by its proponents persuading elec­
torates of the wisdom of their worldview, but by moving deftly from crisis to
crisis, expertly exploiting the desperation of economic emergencies to push
through policies that would tie the hands of fragile new democracies. Once
the tactic was perfected, opportunities just seemed to multiply. The Volcker
Shock would be followed by the Mexican Tequila Crisis in 1994, the Asian
Contagion in 1997 and the Russian Collapse in 1998, which was followed
shortly afterward by one in Brazil. When these shocks and crises started to
lose their power, even more cataclysmic ones would appear: tsunamis, hurri­
canes, wars and terrorist attacks. Disaster capitalism was taking shape.

PART 4

LOST IN T R A N S I T I O N
WHILE WE WEPT WHILE WE
T R E M B L E D , WHILE WE D A N C E D
P

These worst of times give rise to the best of opportuni­
ties for those who understand the need for fundamen­
tal economic reform.
—Stephan Haggard and John Williamson, The Political
Economy of Policy Reform, 1994

9

CHAPTER

S L A M M I N G THE DOOR ON HISTORY
A C R I S I S IN P O L A N D , A M A S S A C R E IN C H I N A

I live in a Poland that i s now free, a n d I consider Milton F r i e d m a n
to be one of the main intellectual architects of m y country's
liberty.
— L e s z e k Balcerowicz, f o r m e r finance minister of P o l a n d , N o v e m ­
ber 2 0 0 6

1

There's a certain chemical that g e t s released in your s t o m a c h
w h e n you m a k e ten t i m e s your money. And it's addictive.
—William B r o w d e r , a U . S . m o n e y m a n a g e r , on investing in P o l a n d
in the early days of c a p i t a l i s m

2

We certainly m u s t not stop eating for fear of choking.
—People's

Daily, the official state n e w s p a p e r , on the need to c o n ­

tinue free-market r e f o r m s after the T i a n a n m e n S q u a r e m a s s a c r e

3

Before the Berlin Wall fell, becoming the defining symbol of the collapse of
Communism, there was another image that held out the promise of Soviet
barriers coming down. It was Lech Walesa, a laid-off electrician with a han­
dlebar moustache and disheveled hair, climbing over a steel fence festooned
with flowers and flags in Gdansk, Poland. The fence protected the Lenin
shipyards and the thousands of workers who had barricaded themselves in­
side to protest a Communist Party decision to raise the price of meat.
The workers' strike was an unprecedented show of defiance against the
Moscow-controlled government, which had ruled Poland for thirty-five

172

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

years. No one knew what would happen: Would Moscow send tanks? Would
they fire on the strikers and force them to work? As the strike wore on, the
shipyard became a pocket of popular democracy within an authoritarian
country, and the workers expanded their demands. They no longer wanted
their work lives controlled by party apparatchiks claiming to speak for the
working class. They wanted their own independent trade union, and they
wanted the right to negotiate, bargain and strike. Not waiting for permission,
4

they voted to form that union and called it Solidarnosc, Solidarity. That was
1980, the year the world fell in love with Solidarity and with its leader, Lech
Walesa.
Walesa, then thirty-six, was so in tune with the aspirations of Poland's
workers that they seemed in spiritual communion. "We eat the same bread!"
he bellowed into the microphone in the Gdansk shipyard. It was a reference
not only to Walesa's own unassailable blue-collar credentials but also to the
powerful role that Catholicism played in this trail-blazing new movement.
With religion frowned upon by party officials, the workers wore their faith as
a badge of courage, lining up to take Communion behind the barricades.
Walesa, a bracing mix of bawdy and pious, opened the Solidarity office with
a wooden crucifix in one hand and a bouquet of flowers in the other. When
it came time to sign the first landmark labor agreement between Solidarity
and the government, Walesa marked his name with "a giant souvenir pen
bearing the likeness of John Paul II." The admiration was mutual; the Polish
pope told Walesa that his prayers were with Solidarity.

5

Solidarity spread through the country's mines, shipyards and factories
with ferocious speed. Within a year, it had 10 million members—almost half
of Poland's working-age population. Having won the right to bargain, Soli­
darity started making concrete headway: a five-day work week instead of six,
and more say in the running of factories. Tired of living in a country that
worshipped an idealized working class but abused actual workers, Solidarity
members denounced the corruption and brutality of the party functionaries
who answered not to the people of Poland but to remote and isolated bu­
reaucrats in Moscow. All the desire for democracy and self-determination
suppressed by one-party rule was being poured into local Solidarity unions,
sparking a mass exodus of members from the Communist Party.
Moscow recognized the movement as the most serious threat yet to its East­
ern empire. Inside the Soviet Union, opposition was still coming largely from
human rights activists, many of whom were on the political right. But Solidar­
ity's members couldn't easily be dismissed as stooges of capitalism—they were

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

173

workers with hammers in their hands and coal dust in their pores, the people
who should, according to Marxist rhetoric, have been the party's base.* Even
more threatening, Solidarity's vision was everything the party was not: demo­
cratic where it was authoritarian; dispersed where it was centralized; partici­
patory where it was bureaucratic. And its 10 million members had the power
to bring Poland's economy to a standstill. As Walesa taunted, they might lose
their political battles, "but we will not be compelled to work. Because if peo­
ple want us to build tanks, we will build streetcars. And trucks will go back­
ward if we build them that way. We know how to beat the system. We are
pupils of that system."
Solidarity's commitment to democracy inspired even party insiders to
rebel. "Once I was so naive as to think that a few evil men were responsible
for the errors of the party," Marian Arendt, a member of the Central Com­
mittee, told a Polish newspaper. "Now I no longer have such illusions. There
is something wrong in our whole apparatus, in our entire structure."

6

In September 1981, Solidarity's members were ready to take their move­
ment to the next stage. Nine hundred Polish workers gathered once again in
Gdansk for the union's first national congress. There, Solidarity turned into
a revolutionary movement with aspirations to take over the state, with its
own alternative economic and political program for Poland. The Solidarity
plan stated, "We demand a self-governing and democratic reform at every
management level and a new socioeconomic system combining the plan,
self-government and the market." The centrepiece was a radical vision for
the huge state-run companies, which employed millions of Solidarity mem­
bers, to break away from governmental control and become democratic
workers' cooperatives. "The socialized enterprise," the program stated,
"should be the basic organizational unit in the economy. It should be con­
trolled by the workers council representing the collective and should be
operatively run by the director, appointed through competition and re­
7

called by the council." Walesa opposed this demand, fearing it was such a
challenge to party control that it would provoke a crackdown. Others ar­
gued that the movement needed a goal, a positive hope for the future, not
just an enemy. Walesa lost the debate, and the economic program became
official Solidarity policy.
Walesa's fears of a crackdown turned out to be well founded. Solidarity's

* One of the popular Solidarity slogans in 1980 w a s "Socialism—YES, Its distortions—NO"
(which no doubt works better in Polish).

174

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

mounting ambition frightened and infuriated Moscow. Under intense pres­
sure, Poland's leader, General Wojciech Jaruzelski, declared martial law in
December 1981. Tanks rolled through the snow to surround factories and
mines, Solidarity's members were rounded up in the thousands, and its lead­
ers, including Walesa, were arrested and imprisoned. As Time reported,
"Soldiers and police used force to clear out resisting workers, leaving at least
seven dead and hundreds injured when miners in Katowice fought back with
axes and crowbars."

8

Solidarity was forced underground, but during the eight years of police-state
rule, the movement's legend only grew. In 1983, Walesa was awarded the No­
bel Peace Prize, although his activities were still restricted and he could not
accept the prize in person. "The Peace Prize laureate's seat is empty," the rep­
resentative from the Nobel Committee said at the ceremony. "Let us therefore
try even harder to listen to the silent speech from his empty place."
The empty space was a fitting metaphor because, by that time, everyone
seemed to see what they wanted in Solidarity: the Nobel Committee saw a
man who "espoused no other weapon than the peaceful strike weapon."

9

The left saw redemption, a version of socialism that was not tainted by the
crimes of Stalin or Mao. The right saw evidence that Communist states
would meet even moderate expressions of dissent with brutal force. The hu­
man rights movement saw prisoners jailed for their beliefs. The Catholic
Church saw an ally against Communist atheism. And Margaret Thatcher
and Ronald Reagan saw an opening, a crack in the Soviet armor, even
though Solidarity was fighting for the very rights that both leaders were doing
their best to stamp out at home. The longer the ban lasted, the more power­
ful the Solidarity mythology became.
By 1988, the terror of the initial crackdown had eased, and Polish workers
were once again staging huge strikes. This time, with the economy in free
fall, and the new, moderate regime of Mikhail Gorbachev in power in
Moscow, the Communists gave in. They legalized Solidarity and agreed to
hold snap elections. Solidarity split in two: there was now the union and a
new wing, Citizens' Committee Solidarity, that would participate in the elec­
tions. The two bodies were inextricably linked; Solidarity leaders were the
candidates, and because the electoral platform was vague, the only specifics of
what a Solidarity future might look like were provided by the union's eco­
nomic program. Walesa himself didn't run, choosing to maintain his role as
head of the union wing, but he was the face of the campaign, which ran un­
10

der the slogan "With us, you're safer." The results were humiliating for the

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

175

Communists and glorious for Solidarity: of the 261 seats in which Solidarity
ran candidates, it won 260 of them.* Walesa, maneuvering behind the
scenes, had the post of prime minister filled by Tadeusz Mazowiecki. He had
little of Walesa's charisma, but as the editor of the Solidarity weekly newspa­
per, he was considered one of the movement's leading intellectuals.

The Shock of Power
As Latin Americans had just learned, authoritarian regimes have a habit of
embracing democracy at the precise moment when their economic projects
are about to implode. Poland was no exception. The Communists had been
mismanaging the economy for decades, making one disastrous, expensive
mistake after another, and it was at the point of collapse. "To our misfortune,
we have won!" Walesa famously (and prophetically) declared. When Solidar­
ity took office, debt was $40 billion, inflation was at 600 percent, there were
severe food shortages and a thriving black market. Many factories were mak­
ing products that, with no buyers in sight, were destined to rot in ware­
houses.

11

For Poles, the situation made for a cruel entry into democracy.

Freedom had finally come, but few had the time or the inclination to cele­
brate because their paychecks were worthless. They spent their days lining
up for flour and butter if there happened to be any in the stores that week.
All summer following its triumph at the polls, the Solidarity government
was paralyzed by indecision. The speed of the collapse of the old order and
the sudden election sweep had been shocks in themselves: in a matter of
months, Solidarity activists went from hiding from the secret police to being
responsible for paying the salaries of those same agents. And now they had
the added shock of discovering that they barely had enough money to make
the payroll. Rather than building the post-Communist economy they had
dreamed of, the movement had the far more pressing task of avoiding a com­
plete meltdown and potential mass starvation.
Solidarity's leaders knew they wanted to put an end to the state's viselike
grip on the economy, but they weren't at all clear about what could replace
it. For the movement's militant rank and file, this was the chance to test their
economic program: if the state-run factories were converted to workers'
* The elections, while a breakthrough, were still rigged: from the outset, the Communist
Party was guaranteed 65 percent of the seats in parliament's lower house, and Solidarity
was allowed to contest only the remaining ones. Nevertheless, the win was s o sweeping that
Solidarity gained effective control of the government.

176

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

cooperatives, there was a chance they could become economically viable
again—worker management could be more efficient, especially without the
added expense of party bureaucrats. Others argued for the same gradual ap­
proach to transition that Gorbachev was advocating at the time in Moscow—
slow expansion of the areas in which supply-and-demand monetary rules
apply (more legal shops and markets), combined with a strong public sector
modeled on Scandinavian social democracy.
But as had been the case in Latin America, before anything else could
happen, Poland needed debt relief and some aid to get out of its immediate
crisis. In theory, that's the central mandate of the IMF: providing stabilizing
funds to prevent economic catastrophes. If any government deserved that
kind of lifeline it was the one headed by Solidarity, which had just pulled off
the Eastern Bloc's first democratic ouster of a Communist regime in four de­
cades. Surely, after all the Cold War railing against totalitarianism behind
the Iron Curtain, Poland's new rulers could have expected a little help.
No such aid was on offer. Now in the grips of Chicago School economists,
the I M F and the U.S. Treasury saw Poland's problems through the prism of
the shock doctrine. An economic meltdown and a heavy debt load, com­
pounded by the disorientation of rapid regime change, meant that Poland
was in the perfect weakened position to accept a radical shock therapy pro­
gram. And the financial stakes were even higher than in Latin America: East­
ern Europe was untouched by Western capitalism, with no consumer market
to speak of. All of its most precious assets were still owned by the state —
prime candidates for privatization. The potential for rapid profits for those
who got in first was tremendous.
Confident in the knowledge that the worse things got, the more likely the
new government would be to accept a total conversion to unfettered capital­
ism, the I M F let the country fall deeper and deeper into debt and inflation.
The White House, under George H. W. Bush, congratulated Solidarity on
its triumph against Communism but made it clear that the U.S. administra­
tion expected Solidarity to pay the debts accumulated by the regime that had
banned and jailed its members—and it offered only $119 million in aid, a
pittance in a country facing economic collapse and in need of fundamental
restructuring.
It was in this context that Jeffrey Sachs, then thirty-four, started working as
an adviser to Solidarity. Since his Bolivian exploits, the hype surrounding
Sachs had reached feverish levels. Marveling at how he could serve as eco­
nomic shock doctor to half a dozen countries and still hold down his teaching

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

177

job, the Los Angeles Times pronounced Sachs—who still looked like a mem­
ber of the Harvard debate team— the "Indiana Jones of Economics."

12

Sachs's work in Poland had begun before Solidarity's election victory, at
the request of the Communist government. It started with a one-day trip,
during which he met with the Communist government and with Solidarity.
It was George Soros, the billionaire financier and currency trader, who had
enlisted Sachs to play a more hands-on role. Soros and Sachs traveled to
Warsaw together, and as Sachs recalls, "I told the Solidarity group and the
Polish government that I would be willing to become more involved to help
13

address the deepening economic crisis." Soros agreed to cover the costs for
Sachs and his colleague David Lipton, a staunch free-market economist
then working at the IMF, to set up an ongoing Poland mission. When Soli­
darity swept the elections, Sachs began working closely with the movement.
Though he was a free agent, not on the payroll of either the I M F or the
U.S. government, Sachs, in the eyes of many of Solidarity's top officials, pos­
sessed almost messianic powers. With his high-level contacts in Washington
and legendary reputation, he seemed to hold the key to unlocking the aid
and debt relief that was the new government's only chance. Sachs said at the
time that Solidarity should simply refuse to pay the inherited debts, and he
expressed confidence that he could mobilize $3 billion in support—a for­
14

tune compared with what Bush had offered. He had helped Bolivia land
loans with the I M F and renegotiated its debts; there seemed no reason to
doubt him.
That help, however, came at a price: for Solidarity to get access to
Sachs's connections and powers of persuasion, the government first needed
to adopt what became known in the Polish press as "the Sachs Plan" or
"shock therapy."
It was an even more radical course than the one imposed on Bolivia: in
addition to eliminating price controls overnight and slashing subsidies, the
Sachs Plan advocated selling off the state mines, shipyards and factories to
the private sector. It was a direct clash with Solidarity's economic program of
worker ownership, and though the movement's national leaders had stopped
talking about the controversial ideas in that plan, they remained articles of
faith for many Solidarity members. Sachs and Lipton wrote the plan for
Poland's shock therapy transition in one night. It was fifteen pages long and,
Sachs claimed, was "the first time, I believe, that anyone had written down a
comprehensive plan for the transformation of a socialist economy to a mar­
ket economy."

15

178

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Sachs was convinced that Poland had to take this "leap across the institu­
tional chasm" right away because, in addition to all its other problems, it was
on the verge of entering hyperinflation. Once that happened, he said, it
would be "fundamental breakdown . . . just pure, unmitigated disaster."

16

He gave several one-on-one seminars explaining the plan to key Solidarity
officials, some lasting up to four hours, and he also addressed Poland's elected
officials as a group. Many of Solidarity's leaders didn't like Sachs's ideas—the
movement had formed in a revolt against drastic price increases imposed by
the Communists—and now Sachs was telling them to do the same on a far
more sweeping scale. He argued that they could get away with it precisely
because "Solidarity had a reservoir of trust of the public, which was ab­
solutely phenomenal and critical."

17

Solidarity's leaders hadn't planned to expend that trust on policies that
would cause extreme pain to their rank and file, but the years spent in the
underground, in jail and in exile had also alienated them from their base. As
the Polish editor Przemyslaw Wielgosz explains, the top tier of the move­
ment "became effectively cut off. . . their support came not from the facto­
18

ries and industrial plants, but the church." The leaders were also desperate
for a quick fix, even if it was painful, and that was what Sachs was offering.
"Will this work? That's what I want to know. Will this work?" demanded
Adam Michnik, one of Solidarity's most celebrated intellectuals. Sachs did
not waver: "This is good. This will work."*

19

Sachs often held up Bolivia as the model that Poland should emulate, so
often that the Poles grew tired of hearing about the place. "I would love to
see Bolivia," one Solidarity leader told a reporter at the time. "I'm sure it's
very lovely, very exotic. I just don't want to see Bolivia here." Lech Walesa
developed a particularly acute antipathy to Bolivia, as he admitted to Gonzalo Sanchez de Lozada (Goni) when the two men met years later at a sum­
mit, when they were both presidents. "He came up to me," Goni recalled,
"and said, Tve always wanted to meet a Bolivian, especially a Bolivian presi­
dent, because they're always making us take this very bitter medicine, saying
you have to do it because this is what the Bolivians did. Now I know you,
you're not that bad a guy, but I sure used to hate you.' "

2 0

In Sachs's talk of Bolivia, he failed to mention that in order to push
through the shock therapy program, the government had imposed a state of

* Michnik later observed bitterly that "the worst thing about C o m m u n i s m is what comes
after."

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

179

emergency and, on two separate occasions, kidnapped and interned the
union leadership —much as the Communist Party secret police had
snatched and imprisoned Solidarity's leaders under a state of emergency not
so long before.
What was most persuasive, many now recall, was Sachs's promise that if
they followed his harsh advice, Poland would cease being exceptional and
become "normal" —as in "a normal European country." If Sachs was right,
and they really could fast-forward to becoming a country like France or Ger­
many simply by hacking off the structures of the old state, wasn't the pain
worth it? Why take an incremental route to change that could well fail —or
pioneer a new third way—when this insta-Europe version was right there,
calling out? Sachs predicted that shock therapy would cause "momentary
dislocations" as prices spiked. "But then they'll stabilize—people will know
where they stand."

21

He formed an alliance with Poland's newly appointed finance minister,
Leszek Balcerowicz, an economist at the Main School of Planning and Sta­
tistics in Warsaw. Little was known of Balcerowicz's political leanings when
he was appointed (all economists were officially socialist), but it would soon
become clear that he saw himself as an honorary Chicago Boy, having pored
over an illegal Polish edition of Friedman's Free to Choose.

It helped "to in­

spire me, and many others, to dream of a future of freedom during the dark­
est years of communist rule," Balcerowicz later explained.

22

Friedman's fundamentalist version of capitalism was a long way from
what Walesa had been promising the country that summer. He was still in­
sisting that Poland was going to find that more generous third way, which he
described in an interview with Barbara Walters as "a mixture. . . . It won't be
capitalism. It will be a system that is better than capitalism, that will reject
everything that is evil in capitalism."

23

Many did argue that the sudden fix that Sachs and Balcerowicz were sell­
ing was a myth, that, rather than jolting Poland into health and normalcy,
shock therapy would create an even bigger mess of poverty and deindustrialization than before. "This is a poor, weak country. We simply cannot take
the shock," a leading doctor and health care advocate told the New Yorker
journalist Lawrence Weschler.

24

For three months after their historic victory at the polls and their abrupt
transition from outlaws to lawmakers, the Solidarity inner circle debated,
paced, yelled and chain-smoked, unable to decide what to do. Every day, the
country fell deeper into economic crisis.

180

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

A Very Hesitant Embrace
On September 12, 1989, the Polish prime minister, Tadeusz Mazowiecki,
rose before the first elected parliament. The Solidarity caucus had at last de­
cided what it was going to do about the economy, but only a handful of peo­
ple knew the final decision—was it the Sachs Plan, the Gorbachev gradualist
route or Solidarity's platform of workers' cooperatives?
Mazowiecki was on the verge of announcing the verdict, but in the mid­
dle of his momentous speech, before he could confront the country's most
burning question, something went terribly wrong. He started to sway,
clasped the lectern and, according to one witness, "grew pale, gasped for
breath and was heard to mutter under his breath, I ' m not feeling too
well.' "

2 5

His aides whisked him out of the chamber, leaving the 415 deputies

to trade rumors. Was it a heart attack? Had he been poisoned? By the Com­
munists? By the Americans?
One floor below, a team of doctors examined Mazowiecki and adminis­
tered an electrocardiogram. It wasn't a heart attack or poison. The prime
minister was simply suffering from "acute fatigue," from too little sleep and
too much stress. After almost an hour of tense uncertainty, he reentered the
parliamentary chamber, where he was greeted with thunderous applause.
"Excuse me," said the bookish Mazowiecki. "The state of my health is the
same as the state of the Polish economy."

26

At long last, the verdict: the Polish economy would be treated for its own
acute fatigue with shock therapy, a particularly radical course of it that
would include "privatization of state industry, the creation of a stock ex­
change and capital markets, a convertible currency, and a shift from heavy
industry to consumer goods production" as well as "budget cuts"—as fast as
possible and all at o n c e .

27

If the dream of Solidarity began with Walesa's energetic vault over the steel
fence in Gdansk, then Mazowiecki's exhaustedly succumbing to shock ther­
apy represented the end of that dream. Finally, the decision came down to
money. Solidarity's members did not decide that their vision for a coopera­
tively run economy was wrongheaded, but their leaders became convinced
that all that mattered was winning relief from the Communist debts and im­
mediately stabilizing the currency. As Henryk Wujec, one of Poland's lead­
ing advocates of cooperatives, put it at the time, "If we had enough time, we
28

might even be able to pull it off. But we don't have time." Sachs, meanwhile,

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

181

could deliver the money. He helped Poland negotiate an agreement with the
IMF and secured some debt relief and $1 billion to stabilize the currency—
but all of it, particularly the I M F funds, was strictly conditional on Solidar­
ity's submitting to shock therapy.
Poland became a textbook example of Friedman's crisis theory: the disori­
entation of rapid political change combined with the collective fear gener­
ated by an economic meltdown to make the promise of a quick and magical
cure —however illusory—too seductive to turn down. Halina Bortnowska, a
human rights activist, described the velocity of change in this period as "the
difference between dog years and human years, the way we're living these
days. . . you start witnessing these semi-psychotic reactions. You can no
longer expect people to act in their own best interests when they're so disori­
ented they don't know—or no longer care—what those interests are."

29

Balcerowicz, the finance minister, has since admitted that capitalizing on
the emergency environment was a deliberate strategy—a way, like all shock
tactics, to clear away the opposition. He explained that he was able to push
through policies that were antithetical to the Solidarity vision in both content
and form because Poland was in what he dubbed a period of "extraordinary
politics." He described that condition as a short-lived window in which the
rules of "normal politics" (consultation, discussion, debate) do not a p p l y in other words, a democracy-free pocket within a democracy.

30

"Extraordinary politics," he said, "by definition is a period of very clear dis­
continuity in a country's history. It could be a period of very deep economic
crisis, of a breakdown of the previous institutional system, or of a liberation
from external domination (or end of war). In Poland, all three phenomena
31

converged in 1989." Because of those extraordinary circumstances, he was
able to shunt aside due process and force "a radical acceleration of the leg­
islative process" to pass the shock therapy package.

32

In the early nineties, Balcerowicz's theory about periods of "extraordinary
politics" attracted considerable interest among Washington economists. And
no wonder: only two months after Poland announced that it would accept
shock therapy, something happened that would change the course of history
and invest Poland's experiment with global significance. In November 1989,
the Berlin Wall was joyously dismantled, the city was turned into a festival of
possibility and the M T V flag was planted in the rubble, as if East Berlin were
the face of the moon. Suddenly it seemed that the whole world was living
the same kind of fast-forward existence as the Poles: the Soviet Union was on

182

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the verge of breaking apart, apartheid in South Africa seemed on its last legs,
authoritarian regimes continued to crumble in Latin America, Eastern Eu­
rope and Asia, and long wars were coming to an end from Namibia to
Lebanon. Everywhere, old regimes were collapsing, and the new ones rising
in their place had yet to take shape.
Within a few years it seemed as if half the world was in a period of "ex­
traordinary politics," or "in transition," as liberated countries came to be
called in the nineties—suspended in an existential in-betweenness of past
and future. According to Thomas Carothers, a leader in the U.S. govern­
ment's so-called democracy-promotion apparatus, "in the first half of the
1990s . . . the set of'transitional countries' swelled dramatically, and nearly
100 countries (approximately 20 in Latin America, 25 in Eastern Europe
and the former Soviet Union, 30 in sub-Saharan Africa, 10 in Asia, and 5 in
the Middle East) were in some kind of dramatic transition from one model
to another."

33

Many were claiming that all of this flux, and the fall of real and meta­
phorical walls, would lead to an end of ideological orthodoxy. Freed from
the polarizing effects of dueling superpowers, countries would finally be able
to choose the best of both worlds—some hybrid of political freedom and
economic security. As Gorbachev put it, "Many decades of being mesmer­
ized by dogma, by a rule-book approach, have had their effect. Today we
want to introduce a genuinely creative spirit."

34

In Chicago School circles, such talk of mix-and-match ideologies was
met with open contempt. Poland had clearly shown that this kind of chaotic
transition opened up a window for decisive men, acting swiftly, to push
through rapid change. Now was the moment to convert former Communist
countries to pure Friedmanism, not some mongrel Keynesian compromise.
The trick, as Friedman had said, was for Chicago School believers to be
ready with their solutions when everyone else was still asking questions and
regaining their bearings.
A sort of revival meeting for those who embraced this worldview was held
in that eventful winter of 1989; the location, fittingly, was the University of
Chicago. The occasion was a speech by Francis Fukuyama titled "Are We
Approaching the End of History?"* For Fukuyama, then a senior policy
maker at the U.S. State Department, the strategy for advocates of unfettered

* The lecture formed the foundation for Fukuyama's book The End of History and the Last Man,
published three years later.

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

183

capitalism was clear: don't debate with the third-way crowd; instead, pre­
emptively declare victory. Fukuyama was convinced that there should be no
abandonment of extremes, no best of both worlds, no splitting the difference.
The collapse of Communism, he told his audience, was leading "not to an
'end of ideology' or a convergence between capitalism and socialism . . . but
to an unabashed victory of economic and political liberalism." It was not ide­
ology that had ended but "history as such."

35

The talk was sponsored by John M. Olin, longtime hinder of Milton
Friedman's ideological crusade and bankroller of the boom in right-wing
36

think tanks. The synergy was fitting since Fukuyama was essentially restat­
ing Friedman's claim that free markets and free people are part of an insep­
arable project. Fukuyama took that thesis into bold new terrain, arguing that
deregulated markets in the economic sphere, combined with liberal democ­
racy in the political sphere, represented "the end point of mankind's ideo­
37

logical evolution and . . . final form of human government." Democracy
and radical capitalism were fused not only with each other but also with
modernity, progress and reform. Those who objected to the merger were not
just wrong but "still in history," as Fukuyama put it, the equivalent of being
left behind after the Rapture, since everyone else had already transcended to
a celestial "posthistorical" plane.

38

The argument was a magnificent example of the democracy avoidance
honed by the Chicago School. Much as the I M F had sneaked privatization
and "free trade" into Latin America and Africa under cover of emergency
"stabilization" programs, Fukuyama was now trying to smuggle this same
highly contested agenda into the pro-democracy wave rising up from War­
saw to Manila. It was true, as Fukuyama noted, that there was an emerging
and irrepressible consensus that all people have the right to govern them­
selves democratically, but only in the State Department's most vivid fan­
tasies was that desire for democracy accompanied by citizens' clamoring for
an economic system that would strip away job protections and cause mass
layoffs.
If there was a genuine consensus about anything, it was that for people es­
caping both left-wing and right-wing dictatorships, democracy meant finally
having a say in all major decisions rather than having somebody else's ideol­
ogy imposed unilaterally and with force. In other words, the universal princi­
ple that Fukuyama identified as "the sovereignty of the people" included the
sovereignty of the people to choose how the wealth of their countries would
be distributed, from the fate of state-owned companies to the level of funding

184

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

for schools and hospitals. Around the world, citizens were ready to exercise
their hard-won democratic powers to become the authors of their national
destinies, at last.
In 1989, history was taking an exhilarating turn, entering a period of gen­
uine openness and possibility. So it was no coincidence that Fukuyama,
from his perch at the State Department, chose precisely that moment to at­
tempt to slam the history book shut. Nor was it a coincidence that the World
Bank and the I M F chose that same volatile year to unveil the Washington
Consensus —a clear effort to halt all discussion and debate about any eco­
nomic ideas outside the free-market lockbox. These were democracycontainment strategies, designed to undercut the kind of unscripted
self-determination that was, and always had been, the greatest single threat
to the Chicago School crusade.

The Shock of Tiananmen Square
One place where Fukuyama's bold pronouncement came in for early dis­
crediting was China. Fukuyama's speech took place in February 1989; two
months later, a pro-democracy movement exploded in Beijing, with mass
protests and sit-ins in Tiananmen Square. Fukuyama had claimed that
democratic and "free market reforms" were a twin process, impossible to pry
apart. Yet in China, the government had done precisely that: it was pushing
hard to deregulate wages and prices and expand the reach of the market—
but it was fiercely determined to resist calls for elections and civil liberties.
The demonstrators, on the other hand, demanded democracy, but many op­
posed the government's moves toward unregulated capitalism, a fact largely
left out of the coverage of the movement in the Western press. In China,
democracy and Chicago School economics were not proceeding hand in
hand; they were on opposite sides of the barricades surrounding Tiananmen
Square.
In the early 1980s, the Chinese government, then led by Deng Xiaoping,
was obsessed with avoiding a repeat of what had just happened in Poland,
where workers had been allowed to form an independent movement that
challenged the party's monopoly hold on power. It was not that China's
leaders were committed to protecting the state-owned factories and farm
communes that formed the foundation of the Communist state. In fact,
Deng was enthusiastically committed to converting to a corporate-based

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

185

economy—so committed that, in 1980, his government invited Milton
Friedman to come to China and tutor hundreds of top-level civil servants,
professors and party economists in the fundamentals of free-market theory.
"All were invited guests, who had to show a ticket of invitation to attend,"
Friedman recalled of his audiences in Beijing and Shanghai. His central
message was "how much better ordinary people lived in capitalist than in
39

communist countries." The example he held up was Hong Kong, a zone of
pure capitalism that Friedman had long admired for its "dynamic, innova­
tive character that has been produced by personal liberty, free trade, low
taxes, and minimal government intervention." He claimed that Hong Kong,
despite having no democracy, was freer than the United States, since its gov­
ernment participated less in the economy.

40

Friedman's definition of freedom, in which political freedoms were inci­
dental, even unnecessary, compared with the freedom of unrestricted com­
merce, conformed nicely with the vision taking shape in the Chinese
Politburo. The party wanted to open the economy to private ownership and
consumerism while maintaining its own grip on power—a plan that ensured
that once the assets of the state were auctioned off, party officials and their
relatives would snap up the best deals and be first in line for the biggest prof­
its. According to this version of "transition," the same people who controlled
the state under Communism would control it under capitalism, while en­
joying a substantial upgrade in lifestyle. The model the Chinese government
intended to emulate was not the United States but something much closer to
Chile under Pinochet: free markets combined with authoritarian political
control, enforced by iron-fisted repression.
From the start, Deng clearly understood that repression would be crucial.
Under Mao, the Chinese state had exerted brutal control over the people,
dispensing with opponents and sending dissidents for reeducation. But
Mao's repression took place in the name of the workers and against the bour­
geoisie; now the party was going to launch its own counterrevolution and ask
workers to give up many of their benefits and security so that a minority
could collect huge profits. It was not going to be an easy task. So, in 1983, as
Deng opened up the country to foreign investment and reduced protections
for workers, he also ordered the creation of the 400,000-strong People's Armed
Police, a new, roving riot squad charged with quashing all signs of "eco­
nomic crimes" (i.e., strikes and protests). According to the China historian
Maurice Meisner, "The People's Armed Police kept American helicopters

186

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

and electric cattle prods in its arsenal." And "several units were sent to
Poland for anti-riot training"—where they studied the tactics that had been
used against Solidarity during Poland's period of martial law.

41

Many of Deng's reforms were successful and popular—farmers had more
control over their lives, and commerce returned to the cities. But in the late
eighties, Deng began introducing measures that were distinctly unpopular,
particularly among workers in the cities—price controls were lifted, sending
prices soaring; job security was eliminated, creating waves of unemploy­
ment; and deep inequalities were opening up between the winners and los­
ers in the new China. By 1988, the party was confronting a powerful
backlash and was forced to reverse some of its price deregulation. Outrage
was also mounting in the face of the party's defiant corruption and nepo­
tism. Many Chinese citizens wanted more freedom in the market, but "re­
form" increasingly looked like code for party officials turning into business
tycoons, as many illegally took posession of the assets they had previously
managed as bureaucrats.
With the free-market experiment in peril, Milton Friedman was once
again invited to pay a visit to China —much as the Chicago Boys and the pi­
ranhas had enlisted his help in 1975, when their program had sparked an in­
42

ternal revolt in Chile. A high-profile visit from the world-famous guru of
capitalism was just the boost China's "reformers" needed.
When Friedman and his wife, Rose, arrived in Shanghai in September
1988, they were dazzled by how quickly mainland China was beginning to
look and feel like Hong Kong. Despite the rage simmering at the grass roots,
everything they saw served to confirm "our faith in the power of free mar­
kets." Friedman described this moment as "the most hopeful period of the
Chinese experiment."
In the presence of official state media, Friedman met for two hours with
Zhao Ziyang, general secretary of the Communist Party, as well as with Jiang
Zemin, then party secretary of the Shanghai Committee and the future Chi­
nese president. Friedman's message to Jiang echoed the advice he had given
to Pinochet when the Chilean project was on the skids: don't bow to the
pressure and don't blink. "I emphasized the importance of privatization and
free markets, and of liberalizing at one fell stroke," Friedman recalled. In a
memo to the general secretary of the Communist Party, Friedman stressed
that more, not less, shock therapy was needed. "China's initial steps of re­
form have been dramatically successful. China can make further dramatic
progress by placing still further reliance on free private

3

markets."*

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

187

Shortly after his return to the U.S., Friedman, remembering the heat he
had taken for advising Pinochet, wrote "out of sheer devilry" a letter to the
editor of a student newspaper, denouncing his critics for their double stan­
dards. He explained that he had just spent twelve days in China, where "I
was mostly the guest of governmental entities," and had met with Commu­
nist Party officials at the highest level. Yet these meetings had provoked no
human rights outcry on American university campuses, Friedman pointed
out. "Incidentally, I gave precisely the same advice to both Chile and
China." He concluded by asking sarcastically, "Should I prepare myself for
an avalanche of protests for having been willing to give advice to so evil a
government?"

44

A few months later, that devilish letter took on sinister overtones, as the
Chinese government began to emulate many of Pinochet's most infamous
tactics.
Friedman's trip did not have the desired results. The pictures in the official
papers of the professor offering his blessing to party bureaucrats did not suc­
ceed in bringing the public onside. In subsequent months, protests grew
more determined and radical. The most visible symbols of the opposition
were the demonstrations by student strikers in Tiananmen Square. These
historic protests were almost universally portrayed in the international media
as a clash between modern, idealistic students who wanted Western-style
democratic freedoms and old-guard authoritarians who wanted to protect
the Communist state. Recently, another analysis of the meaning of Tianan­
men has emerged, one that challenges the mainstream version while putting
Friedmanism at the heart of the story. This alternative narrative is being ad­
vanced by, among others, Wang Hui, one of the organizers of the 1989
protests, and now a leading Chinese intellectual of what is known as China's
"New Left." In his 2003 book, China's New Order, Wang explains that the
protesters spanned a huge range of Chinese society—not just elite university
students but also factory workers, small entrepreneurs and teachers. What ig­
nited the protests, he recalls, was popular discontent in the face of Deng's
"revolutionary" economic changes, which were lowering wages, raising
prices and causing "a crisis of layoffs and unemployment."

45

According to

Wang, "These changes were the catalyst for the 1989 social mobilization."

46

The demonstrations were not against economic reform per se; they were
against the specific Friedmanite nature of the reforms—their speed, ruthlessness and the fact that the process was highly antidemocratic. Wang says

188

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

that the protesters' call for elections and free speech were intimately con­
nected to this economic dissent. What drove the demand for democracy was
the fact that the party was pushing through changes that were revolutionary
in scope, entirely without popular consent. There was, he writes, "a general
request for democratic means to supervise the fairness of the reform process
and the reorganization of social benefits."

47

These demands forced the Politburo to make a definite choice. The
choice was not, as was so often claimed, between democracy and Commu­
nism, or "reform" versus the "old guard." It was a more complex calculation:
Should the party bulldoze ahead with its free-market agenda, which it could
do only by rolling over the bodies of the protesters? Or should it bow to the
protesters' demands for democracy, cede its monopoly on power and risk a
major setback to the economic project?
Some of the free-market reformers within the party, most notably General
Secretary Zhao Ziyang, appeared willing to gamble on democracy, con­
vinced that economic and political reform could still be compatible. More
powerful elements in the party were not willing to take the risk. The verdict
came down: the state would protect its economic "reform" program by
crushing the demonstrators.
That was the clear message when, on May 20, 1989, the government of the
People's Republic of China declared martial law. On June 3, the tanks of
the People's Liberation Army rolled into the protests, shooting indiscrimi­
nately into the crowds. Soldiers stormed onto buses where student demon­
strators were taking cover and beat them with sticks; more troops broke
through the barricades protecting Tiananmen Square, where students had
erected a Goddess of Democracy statue, and rounded up the organizers.
Similar crackdowns took place simultaneously across the country.
There will never be reliable estimates for how many people were killed
and injured in those days. The party admits to hundreds, and eyewitness re­
ports at the time put the number of dead at between two thousand and seven
thousand and the number of injured as high as thirty thousand. The protests
were followed by a national witch hunt against all regime critics and oppo­
nents. Some forty thousand were arrested, thousands were jailed and
many—possibly hundreds—were executed. As in Latin America, the gov­
ernment reserved its harshest repression for the factory workers, who repre­
sented the most direct threat to deregulated capitalism. "Most of those
arrested, and virtually all who were executed, were workers. With the obvi­
ous aim of terrorizing the population, it became a well-publicized policy to

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

189

systematically subject arrested individuals to beatings and torture," writes
Maurice Meisner.

48

For the most part, the massacre was covered in the Western press as an­
other example of Communist brutality: just as Mao had wiped out his oppo­
nents during the Cultural Revolution, now Deng, "the Butcher of Beijing,"
crushed his critics under the watchful eye of Mao's giant portrait. A Wall
Street Journal headline claimed that "China's Harsh Actions Threaten to Set
Back [the] 10-Year Reform Drive"—as if Deng was an enemy of those re­
forms and not their most committed defender, determined to take them into
bold new territory.

49

Five days after the bloody crackdown, Deng addressed the nation and
made it perfectly clear that it wasn't Communism he was protecting with his
crackdown, but capitalism. After dismissing the protesters as "a large quan­
tity of the dregs of society," China's president reaffirmed the party's commit­
ment to economic shock therapy. "In a word, this was a test, and we passed,"
Deng said, adding, "Perhaps this bad thing will enable us to go ahead with
reform and the open-door policy at a more steady, better, even a faster
pace. . . . We haven't been wrong. There's nothing wrong with the four car­
dinal principles [of economic reform]. If there is anything amiss, it's that
these principles haven't been thoroughly implemented."*

50

Orville Schell, a China scholar and journalist, summarized Deng Xiaoping's choice: "After the massacre of 1989, he in effect said we will not stop
economic reform; we will in effect halt political reform."

51

For Deng and the rest of the Politburo, the free-market possibilities were
now limitless. Just as Pinochet's terror had cleared the streets for revolution­
ary change, so Tiananmen paved the way for a radical transformation free
from fear of rebellion. If life grew harder for peasants and workers, they
would either have to accept it quietly or face the wrath of the army and the
secret police. And so, with the public in a state of raw terror, Deng rammed
through his most sweeping reforms yet.
Before Tiananmen, he had been forced to ease off some of the more
painful measures; three months after the massacre, he brought them back,
and he implemented several of Friedman's other recommendations, includ­
ing price deregulation. For Wang Hui, there is an obvious reason why "market
* Deng had some notable defenders. After the massacre, Henry Kissinger wrote an op-ed
arguing that the party had no choice. " N o government in the world would have tolerated
having the main square of its capital occupied for eight w e e k s by tens of thousands of
demonstrators. . . . A crackdown w a s therefore inevitable."

190

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

reforms that had failed to be implemented in the late 1980s just happened to
have been completed in the post-1989 environment"; the reason, he writes,
"is that the violence of 1989 served to check the social upheaval brought
52

about by this process, and the new pricing system finally took shape." The
shock of the massacre, in other words, made shock therapy possible.
In the three years immediately following the bloodbath, China was
cracked open to foreign investment, with special export zones constructed
throughout the country. As he announced these new initiatives, Deng re­
minded the country that "if necessary, every possible means will be adopted
to eliminate any turmoil in the future as soon as it has appeared. Martial law,
or even more severe methods, may be introduced."*

53

It was this wave of reforms that turned China into the sweatshop of the
world, the preferred location for contract factories for virtually every multi­
national on the planet. No country offered more lucrative conditions than
China: low taxes and tariffs, corruptible officials and, most of all, a plentiful
low-wage workforce that, for many years, would be unwilling to risk de­
manding decent salaries or the most basic workplace protections for fear of
the most violent reprisals.
For foreign investors and the party, it has been a win-win arrangement.
According to a 2006 study, 90 percent of China's billionaires (calculated in
Chinese yuan) are the children of Communist Party officials. Roughly
twenty-nine hundred of these party scions—known as "the princelings" —
54

control $260 billion. It is a mirror of the corporatist state first pioneered in
Chile under Pinochet: a revolving door between corporate and political
elites who combine their power to eliminate workers as an organized politi­
cal force. Today, this collaborative arrangement can be seen in the way that
foreign multinational media and technology companies help the Chinese
state to spy on its citizens, and to make sure that when students do Web
searches on phrases like "Tiananmen Square Massacre," or even "democ­
racy," no documents turn up. "The creation of today's market society was not
the result of a sequence of spontaneous events," writes Wang Hui, "but
rather of state interference and violence."

55

One of the truths revealed by Tiananmen was the stark similarity between
the tactics of authoritarian Communism and Chicago School capitalism—a

* A s the New York University anthropologist David Harvey notes, it was only after Tiananmen,
when Deng went on his famous "southern tour" of China, "that the full force of the central
government was put behind the opening to foreign trade and foreign direct investment."

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON H I S T O R Y

191

shared willingness to disappear opponents, to blank the slate of all resistance
and begin anew.
Despite the fact that the massacre happened just months after he had en­
couraged Chinese officials to push forward with painful and unpopular freemarket policies, Friedman never did face "an avalanche of protests for
having been willing to give advice to so evil a government." And as usual, he
saw no connection between the advice he had given and the violence re­
quired to enforce it. While condemning China's use of repression, Fried­
man continued to hold it up as an example of "the efficacy of free-market
arrangements in promoting both prosperity and freedom."

56

In a strange coincidence, the Tiananmen Square massacre took place on
the same day as Solidarity's historic election sweep in Poland—June 4, 1989.
They were, in a way, two very different studies in the shock doctrine. Both
countries had needed to exploit shock and fear to push through a free-market
transformation. In China, where the state used the gloves-off methods of ter­
ror, torture and assassination, the result was, from a market perspective, an
unqualified success. In Poland, where only the shock of economic crisis and
rapid change were harnessed—and there was no overt violence—the effects
of the shock eventually wore off, and the results were far more ambiguous.
In Poland, shock therapy may have been imposed after elections, but it
made a mockery of the democratic process since it directly conflicted with
the wishes of the overwhelming majority of voters who had cast their ballots
for Solidarity. As late as 1992, 60 percent of Poles still opposed privatization
for heavy industry. Defending his unpopular actions, Sachs claimed he had
no choice, likening his role to that of a surgeon in an emergency room.
"When a guy comes into the emergency room and his heart's stopped, you
just rip open the sternum and you don't worry about the scars that you leave,"
he said. "The idea is to get the guy's heart beating again. And you make a
bloody mess. But you don't have any choice."

57

But once Poles recovered from the initial surgery, they had questions about
both the doctor and the treatment. Shock therapy in Poland did not cause
"momentary dislocations," as Sachs had predicted. It caused a full-blown de­
pression: a 30 percent reduction in industrial production in the two years af­
ter the first round of reforms. With government cutbacks and cheap imports
flooding in, unemployment skyrocketed, and in 1993 it reached 25 percent in
some areas—a wrenching change in a country that, under Communism, for
all its many abuses and hardships, had no open joblessness. Even when the

192

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

economy began growing again, high unemployment remained chronic. Ac­
cording to the World Bank's most recent figures, Poland has an unemploy­
ment rate of 20 percent—the highest in the European Union. For those
under twenty-four, the situation is far worse: 40 percent of young workers
were unemployed in 2006, twice the E U average. Most dramatic are the
number of people in poverty: in 1989, 15 percent of Poland's population was
living below the poverty line; in 2003, 59 percent of Poles had fallen below
58

the line. Shock therapy, which eroded job protection and made daily life far
more expensive, was not the route to Poland's becoming one of Europe's
"normal" countries (with their strong labor laws and generous social benefits)
but to the same gaping disparities that have accompanied the counterrevolu­
tion everywhere it has triumphed, from Chile to China.
The fact that it was Solidarity, the party built by Poland's blue-collar work­
ers, that oversaw the creation of this permanent underclass represented a bit­
ter betrayal, one that bred a deep cynicism and anger in the country that has
never fully lifted. Solidarity's leaders often play down the party's socialist
roots, with Walesa now claiming that as far back as 1980 he knew they would
"have to build capitalism." Karol Modzelewski, a Solidarity militant and in­
tellectual who spent eight and a half years in Communist jails, retorts an­
grily, "I wouldn't have spent a week nor a month, let alone eight and a half
years in jail for capitalism!"

59

For the first year and a half of Solidarity rule, workers believed their heroes
when they were assured that the pain was temporary, a necessary stop on the
way to bringing Poland into modem Europe. Even in the face of soaring un­
employment, they staged only a smattering of strikes and waited patiently for
the therapeutic part of their shock therapy to take effect. When the promised
recovery didn't arrive, at least not in the form of jobs, Solidarity's members
were simply confused: How could their own movement have delivered a
standard of living worse than that under Communism? "[Solidarity] de­
fended me in 1980 when I set up a union committee," one forty-one-year-old
construction worker said. "But when I went to them for help this time, they
told me that I have to suffer for the sake of reform."

60

About eighteen months into Poland's period of "extraordinary politics,"
Solidarity's base had had enough and demanded an end to the experiment.
The extreme dissatisfaction was reflected in a marked increase in the number
of strikes: in 1990, when workers were still giving Solidarity a free pass, there
were only 250 strikes; by 1992 there were more than 6,000 such protests.

61

Faced with this pressure from below, the government was forced to slow down

S L A M M I N G T H E DOOR ON HISTORY

193

its more ambitious privatization plans. By the end of 1993—a year that saw al­
most 7,500 strikes —62 percent of Poland's total industry was still public.

62

The fact that Polish workers managed to stop the wholesale privatization
of their country means that as painful as the reforms were, they could have
been far worse. The wave of strikes unquestionably saved hundreds of thou­
sands of jobs that would otherwise have been lost if these supposedly ineffi­
cient firms had been allowed to close or be radically downsized and sold off.
Interestingly, Poland's economy began growing quickly in this same period,
proving, according to the prominent Polish economist and former Solidarity
member Tadeusz Kowalik, that those who were ready to write off the state
firms as inefficient and archaic were "obviously wrong."
Besides going on strike, Polish workers found another way to express their
anger with their onetime allies in Solidarity: they used the democracy they
had fought for to punish the party decisively at the polls, including their oncebeloved leader Lech Walesa. The most dramatic trouncing came on Sep­
tember 19, 1993, when a coalition of left parties, including the former ruling
Communists (rebranded Democratic Left Alliance), won 66 percent of the
seats in parliament. Solidarity had, by this time, splintered into warring fac­
tions. The trade union faction won less than 5 percent, losing official party
status in the parliament, and a new party led by Mazowiecki, the prime min­
ister, won just 10.6 percent—a resounding rejection of shock therapy.
Yet somehow, in the years to come, as dozens of countries struggled with
how to reform their economies, the inconvenient details —the strikes, the
election defeats, the policy reversals—would be lost. Instead, Poland would
be held up as a model, proof that radical free-market makeovers can take
place democratically and peacefully.
Like so many stories about countries in transition, this one was mostly a
myth. But it was better than the truth: in Poland, democracy was used as a
weapon against "free markets" on the streets and at the polls. Meanwhile in
China, where the drive for free-wheeling capitalism rolled over democracy in
Tiananmen Square, shock and terror unleashed one of the most lucrative and
sustained investor booms in modern history. Another miracle born of a mas­
sacre.

CHAPTER

ÎO

DEMOCRACY BORN IN CHAINS
SOUTH AFRICA'S CONSTRICTED FREEDOM

Reconciliation m e a n s that those w h o have been on the underside
of history m u s t s e e that there is a qualitative difference between
r e p r e s s i o n and f r e e d o m . A n d for t h e m , freedom t r a n s l a t e s into
having a s u p p l y of clean water, having electricity on tap; being
able to live in a decent h o m e and have a g o o d job; to be able to
s e n d your children to s c h o o l and to have accessible health care. I
m e a n , w h a t ' s the point of having m a d e this transition if the quality
of life of these people is not enhanced and improved? If not, the
vote is u s e l e s s .
— A r c h b i s h o p D e s m o n d Tutu, chair of S o u t h Africa's Truth and R e c ­
onciliation C o m m i s s i o n , 2 0 0 1

1

Before transferring power, the Nationalist Party w a n t s to e m a s ­
culate it. It is trying to negotiate a kind of s w a p where it will give
up the right to run the country its w a y in exchange for the right to
stop b l a c k s f r o m running it their o w n way.
—Allister S p a r k s , S o u t h African journalist

2

In January 1990, Nelson Mandela, age seventy-one, sat down in his prison
compound to write a note to his supporters outside. It was meant to settle a
debate over whether twenty-seven years behind bars, most of it spent on
Robben Island off the coast of Cape Town, had weakened the leader's com­
mitment to the economic transformation of South Africa's apartheid state.
The note was only two sentences long, and it decisively put the matter to

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

195

rest: "The nationalisation of the mines, banks and monopoly industries is the
policy of the ANC, and the change or modification of our views in this re­
gard is inconceivable. Black economic empowerment is a goal we fully sup­
port and encourage, but in our situation state control of certain sectors of the
economy is unavoidable."

3

History, it turned out, was not over just yet, as Fukuyama had claimed. In
South Africa, the largest economy on the African continent, it seemed that
some people still believed that freedom included the right to reclaim and re­
distribute their oppressors' ill-gotten gains.
That belief had formed the basis of the policy of the African National
Congress for thirty-five years, ever since it was spelled out in its statement of
core principles, the Freedom Charter. The story of the charter's drafting is
the stuff of folklore in South Africa, and for good reason. The process began
in 1955, when the party dispatched fifty thousand volunteers into the town­
ships and countryside. The task of the volunteers was to collect "freedom de­
mands" from the people—their vision of a postapartheid world in which all
South Africans had equal rights. The demands were handwritten on scraps
of paper: "Land to be given to all landless people," "Living wages and shorter
hours of work," "Free and compulsory education, irrespective of color, race
or nationality," "The right to reside and move about freely" and many more.

4

When the demands came back, leaders of the African National Congress
synthesized them into a final document, which was officially adopted on
June 26, 1955, at the Congress of the People, held in Kliptown, a "buffer
zone" township built to protect the white residents of Johannesburg from the
teeming masses of Soweto. Roughly three thousand delegates—black, In­
dian, "colored" and a few white—sat together in an empty field to vote on
the contents of the document. According to Nelson Mandela's account of
the historic Kliptown gathering, "the charter was read aloud, section by sec­
tion, to the people in English, Sesotho and Xhosa. After each section, the
crowd shouted its approval with cries of'Afrika!'

5

and 'Mayibuye!'"

The first

defiant demand of the Freedom Charter reads, "The People Shall Govern!"
In the mid-fifties, that dream was decades away from fulfillment. On the
Congress's second day, the gathering was violently broken up by police, who
claimed the delegates were plotting treason.
For three decades, South Africa's government, dominated by white
Afrikaners and British, banned the ANC and the other political parties that
were intent on ending apartheid. Throughout this period of intense repres­
sion, the Freedom Charter continued to circulate, passed from hand to hand

196

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

in the revolutionary underground, its power to inspire hope and resistance
undiminished. In the 1980s, it was picked up by a new generation of young
militants who emerged in the townships. Fed up with patience and good be­
havior and braced to do whatever it took to topple white domination, the
young radicals stunned their parents with their fearlessness. They took to the
streets without illusion, chanting, "Neither bullets nor tear gas will stop us."
They faced massacre after massacre, buried friends, kept singing and kept
coming. When the militants were asked what they were fighting against, they
answered, "Apartheid" or "Racism"; asked what they were fighting for, many
replied "Freedom" and, often, "The Freedom Charter."
The charter enshrines the right to work, to decent housing, to freedom of
thought, and, most radically, to a share in the wealth of the richest country in
Africa, containing, among other treasures, the largest goldfield in the world.
"The national wealth of our country, the heritage of South Africans, shall be
restored to the people; the mineral wealth beneath the soil, the Banks and
monopoly industry shall be transferred to the ownership of the people as a
whole; all other industry and trade shall be controlled to assist the well-being
of the people," the charter states.

6

At the time of its drafting, the charter was viewed by some in the libera­
tion movement as positively centrist, by others as unforgivably weak. The
Pan-Africanists castigated the ANC for conceding too much to white colo­
nizers (why did South Africa belong to "everyone, black and white?" they
asked; the manifesto should have demanded, as the Jamaican black nation­
alist Marcus Garvey had, "Africa for the Africans.") The staunch Marxists
dismissed the demands as "petty bourgeois": it wasn't revolutionary to divide
the ownership of the land among all people; Lenin said that private property
itself must be abolished.
What was taken as a given by all factions of the liberation struggle was that
apartheid was not only a political system regulating who was allowed to vote
and move freely. It was also an economic system that used racism to enforce
a highly lucrative arrangement: a small white elite had been able to amass
enormous profits from South Africa's mines, farms and factories because a
large black majority was prevented from owning land and forced to provide
its labor for far less than it was worth—and was beaten and imprisoned when
it dared to rebel. In the mines, whites were paid up to ten times more than
blacks, and, as in Latin America, the large industrialists worked closely with
the military to have unruly workers disappeared.

7

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

197

What the Freedom Charter asserted was the baseline consensus in the liber­
ation movement that freedom would not come merely when blacks took con­
trol of the state but when the wealth of the land that had been illegitimately
confiscated was reclaimed and redistributed to the society as a whole. South
Africa could no longer be a country with Californian living standards for
whites and Congolese living standards for blacks, as the country was described
during the apartheid years; freedom meant that it would have to find some­
thing in the middle.
That was what Mandela was confirming with his two-sentence note from
prison: he still believed in the bottom line that there would be no freedom
without redistribution. With so many other countries now also "in transition,"
it was a statement with enormous implications. If Mandela led the ANC to
power and nationalized the banks and the mines, the precedent would make
it far more difficult for Chicago School economists to dismiss such proposals
in other countries as relics of the past and insist that only unfettered free mar­
kets and free trade had the ability to redress deep inequalities.
On February 11, 1990, two weeks after writing that note, Mandela walked
out of prison a free man, as close to a living saint as existed anywhere in the
world. South Africa's townships exploded in celebration and renewed con­
viction that nothing could stop the struggle for liberation. Unlike the move­
ment in Eastern Europe, South Africa's was not beaten down but a
movement on a roll. Mandela, for his part, was suffering from such an epic
case of culture shock that he mistook a camera microphone for "some new­
fangled weapon developed while I was in prison."

8

It was definitely a different world from the one he had left twenty-seven
years earlier. When Mandela was arrested in 1962, a wave of Third World
nationalism was sweeping the African continent; now it was torn apart by
war. While he was in prison, socialist revolutions had been ignited and ex­
tinguished: Che Guevara had been killed in Bolivia in 1967; Salvador Al­
lende had died in the coup of 1973; Mozambique's liberation hero and
president, Samora Machel, had perished in a mysterious plane crash in
1986. The late eighties and early nineties saw the fall of the Berlin Wall,
the repression in Tiananmen Square and the collapse of Communism.
Amid all this change there was little time for catching up: immediately on
his release, Mandela had a people to lead to freedom while preventing a
civil war and an economic collapse—both of which looked like distinct
possibilities.

198

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

If there was a third path between Communism and capitalism—a way of
democratizing the country and redistributing wealth at the same time —
South Africa under the ANC looked uniquely positioned to turn that persis­
tent dream into reality. It wasn't only the global outpouring of admiration
and support for Mandela but also the particular way in which the antiapartheid struggle had taken shape in the preceding years. In the eighties, it
had become a truly global mass movement, and outside South Africa, the
weapon that activists wielded most effectively was the corporate b o y c o t t both of South African-made products and of international firms that did
business with the apartheid state. The goal of the boycott strategy was to put
enough of a squeeze on the corporate sector that it would lobby the intransi­
gent South African government to end apartheid. But there was also a moral
component to the campaign: many consumers firmly believed that compa­
nies that were profiting from white supremacist laws deserved to take a fi­
nancial hit.
It was this attitude that gave the ANC a unique opportunity to reject the
free-market orthodoxy of the day. Since there was already widespread agree­
ment that corporations shared responsibility for the crimes of apartheid, the
stage was set for Mandela to explain why key sectors of South Africa's econ­
omy needed to be nationalized just as the Freedom Charter demanded. He
could have used the same argument to explain why the debt accumulated
under apartheid was an illegitimate burden to place on any new, popularly
elected government. There would have been plenty of outrage from the
IMF, the U.S. Treasury and the European Union in the face of such undis­
ciplined behavior, but Mandela was also a living saint—there would have
been enormous popular support for it as well.
We will never know which of these forces would have proved more power­
ful. In the years that passed between Mandela's writing his note from prison
and the ANC's 1994 election sweep in which he was elected president, some­
thing happened to convince the party hierarchy that it could not use its grass­
roots prestige to reclaim and redistribute the country's stolen wealth. So,
rather than meeting in the middle between California and the Congo, the
ANC adopted policies that exploded both inequality and crime to such a de­
gree that South Africa's divide is now closer to Beverly Hills and Baghdad. To­
day, the country stands as a living testament to what happens when economic
reform is severed from political transformation. Politically, its people have the
right to vote, civil liberties and majority rule. Yet economically, South Africa
has surpassed Brazil as the most unequal society in the world.

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

199

I went to South Africa in 2005 to try to understand what had happened in
the transition, in those key years between 1990 and 1994, to make Mandela
take a route that he had described so unequivocally as "inconceivable."
The ANC went into negotiations with the ruling National Party deter­
mined to avoid the kind of nightmare that neighboring Mozambique had
experienced when the independence movement forced an end to Por­
tuguese colonial rule in 1975. On their way out the door, the Portuguese
threw a vindictive temper tantrum, pouring cement down elevator shafts,
smashing tractors and stripping the country of all they could carry. To its
enormous credit, the ANC did negotiate a relatively peaceful handover.
However, it did not manage to prevent South Africa's apartheid-era rulers
from wreaking havoc on their way out the door. Unlike their counterparts
in Mozambique, the National Party didn't pour concrete —their sabotage,
equally crippling, was far subtler, and was all in the fine print of those his­
toric negotiations.
The talks that hashed out the terms of apartheid's end took place on two
parallel tracks that often intersected: one was political, the other economic.
Most of the attention, naturally, focused on the high-profile political sum­
mits between Nelson Mandela and F. W. de Klerk, leader of the National
Party.
De Klerk's strategy in these negotiations was to preserve as much power as
possible. He tried everything—breaking the country into a federation, guar­
anteeing veto power for minority parties, reserving a certain percentage of
the seats in government structures for each ethnic group —anything to pre­
vent simple majority rule, which he was sure would lead to mass land expro­
priations and the nationalizing of corporations. As Mandela later put it,
"What the National Party was trying to do was to maintain white supremacy
with our consent." De Klerk had guns and money behind him, but his op­
ponent had a movement of millions. Mandela and his chief negotiator, Cyril
Ramaphosa, won on almost every count.

9

Running alongside these often explosive summits were the much lower
profile economic negotiations, primarily managed on the ANC side by
Thabo Mbeki, then a rising star in the party, now South Africa's president.
As the political talks progressed, and it became clear to the National Party
that Parliament would soon be firmly in the hands of the ANC, the party of
South Africa's elites began pouring its energy and creativity into the economic
negotiations. South Africa's whites had failed to keep blacks from taking

200

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

over the government, but when it came to safeguarding the wealth they had
amassed under apartheid, they would not give up so easily.
In these talks, the de Klerk government had a twofold strategy. First, draw­
ing on the ascendant Washington Consensus that there was now only one way
to run an economy, it portrayed key sectors of economic decision making—
such as trade policy and the central bank—as "technical" or "administrative."
Then it used a wide range of new policy tools—international trade agree­
ments, innovations in constitutional law and structural adjustment programs —
to hand control of those power centers to supposedly impartial experts,
economists and officials from the IMF, the World Bank, the General Agree­
ment on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) and the National Party—anyone except
the liberation fighters from the ANC. It was a strategy of balkanization, not of
the country's geography (as de Klerk had originally attempted) but of its
economy.
This plan was successfully executed under the noses of ANC leaders, who
were naturally preoccupied with winning the battle to control Parliament. In
the process, the ANC failed to protect itself against a far more insidious
strategy—in essence, an elaborate insurance plan against the economic
clauses in the Freedom Charter ever becoming law in South Africa. "The
people shall govern!" would soon become a reality, but the sphere over which
they would govern was shrinking fast.
While these tense negotiations between adversaries were unfolding, the
ANC was also busily preparing within its own ranks for the day when it would
take office. Teams of ANC economists and lawyers formed working groups
charged with figuring out exactly how to turn the general promises of the
Freedom Charter—for housing amentites and health care —into practical
policies. The most ambitious of these plans was Make Democracy Work, an
economic blueprint for South Africa's postapartheid future, written while
the high-level negotiations were taking place. What the party loyalists didn't
know at the time was that while they were hatching their ambitious plans,
the negotiating team was accepting concessions at the bargaining table that
would make their implementation a practical impossibility. "It was dead be­
fore it was even launched," the economist Vishnu Padayachee told me of
Make Democracy Work. By the time the draft was complete, "there was a
new ball game."
As one of the few classically trained economists active in the ANC, Pa­
dayachee was enlisted to play a leading role in Make Democracy Work ("do­
ing the number-crunching," as he puts it). Most of the people he worked

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

201

alongside in those long policy meetings went on to top posts in the ANC
government, but Padayachee did not. He has turned down all the offers of
government jobs, preferring academic life in Durban, where he teaches,
writes and owns the much-loved Ike's Bookshop, named after Ike Mayet, the
first non-white South African bookseller. It was there, surrounded by care­
fully preserved out-of-print volumes on African history, that we met to dis­
cuss the transition.
Padayachee entered the liberation struggle in the seventies, as an adviser to
South Africa's trade union movement. "We all had the Freedom Charter
stuck on the back of our doors in those days," he recalled. I asked him when
he knew its economic promises were not going to be realized. He first sus­
pected it, he said, in late 1993, when he and a colleague from the Make
Democracy Work group got a call from the negotiating team who were in the
final stages of haggling with the National Party. The call was a request for
them to write a position paper on the pros and cons of making South Africa's
central bank an independent entity, run with total autonomy from the
elected government—oh, and the negotiators needed it by morning.
"We were caught completely off guard," recalled Padayachee, now in his
early fifties. He had done his graduate studies at Johns Hopkins University in
Baltimore. He knew that at the time, even among free-market economists in
the U.S., central bank independence was considered a fringe idea, a pet pol­
icy of a handful of Chicago School ideologues who believed that central
banks should be run as sovereign republics within states, out of reach of the
meddling hands of elected lawmakers.*

10

For Padayachee and his col­

leagues, who strongly believed that monetary policy needed to serve the new
government's "big goals of growth, employment and redistribution," the
ANC's position was a no-brainer: "There was not going to be an independent
central bank in South Africa."
Padayachee and a colleague stayed up all night writing a paper that gave
the negotiating team the arguments it needed to resist this curveball from the
National Party. If the central bank (in South Africa called the Reserve Bank)
was run separately from the rest of the government, it could restrict the
ANC's ability to keep the promises in the Freedom Charter. Besides, if the
central bank was not accountable to the ANC government, to whom, exactly,
would it be accountable? The IMF? The Johannesburg Stock Exchange?

* Milton Friedman often joked that if he had his way, central banks would be based so purely
on "economic science" that they would be run by giant computers—no humans required.

202

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Obviously, the National Party was trying to find a backdoor way to hold on to
power even after it lost the elections—a strategy that needed to be resisted at
all costs. "They were locking in as much as possible," Padayachee recalled.
"That was a clear part of the agenda."
Padayachee faxed the paper in the morning and didn't hear back for
weeks. "Then, when we asked what happened, we were told, 'Well, we gave
that one up.' " Not only would the central bank be run as an autonomous en­
tity within the South African state, with its independence enshrined in the
new constitution, but it would be headed by the same man who ran it under
apartheid, Chris Stals. It wasn't just the central bank that the ANC had given
up: in another major concession, Derek Keyes, the white finance minister
under apartheid, would also remain in his post—much as the finance minis­
ters and central bank heads from Argentina's dictatorship somehow man­
aged to get their jobs back under democracy. The New York Times praised
Keyes as "the country's ranking apostle of low-spending business-friendly
government."

11

Until that point, Padayachee said, "we were still buoyant, because, my
God, this was a revolutionary struggle; at least there'd be something to come
out of it." When he learned that the central bank and the treasury would be
run by their old apartheid bosses, it meant "everything would be lost in terms
of economic transformation." When I asked him whether he thought the ne­
gotiators realized how much they had lost, after some hesitation, he replied,
"Frankly, no." It was simple horse-trading: "In the negotiations, something
had to be given, and our side gave those things—I'll give you this, you give
me that."
From Padayachee's point of view, none of this happened because of some
grand betrayal on the part of ANC leaders but simply because they were outmaneuvered on a series of issues that seemed less than crucial at the time—
but turned out to hold South Africa's lasting liberation in the balance.
What happened in those negotiations is that the ANC found itself caught in
a new kind of web, one made of arcane rules and regulations, all designed to
confine and constrain the power of elected leaders. As the web descended on
the country, only a few people even noticed it was there, but when the new
government came to power and tried to move freely, to give its voters the tan­
gible benefits of liberation they expected and thought they had voted for, the
strands of the web tightened and the administration discovered that its

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

203

powers were tightly bound. Patrick Bond, who worked as an economic ad­
viser in Mandela's office during the first years of ANC rule, recalls that the
in-house quip was "Hey, we've got the state, where's the power?" As the new
government attempted to make tangible the dreams of the Freedom Charter,
it discovered that the power was elsewhere.
Want to redistribute land? Impossible —at the last minute, the negotia­
tors agreed to add a clause to the new constitution that protects all private
property, making land reform virtually impossible. Want to create jobs for
millions of unemployed workers? Can't—hundreds of factories were actu­
ally about to close because the ANC had signed on to the GATT, the pre­
cursor to the World Trade Organization, which made it illegal to subsidize
the auto plants and textile factories. Want to get free AIDS drugs to the
townships, where the disease is spreading with terrifying speed? That vio­
lates an intellectual property rights commitment under the W T O , which
the ANC joined with no public debate as a continuation of the GATT.
Need money to build more and larger houses for the poor and to bring free
electricity to the townships? Sorry—the budget is being eaten up servicing
the massive debt, passed on quietly by the apartheid government. Print
more money? Tell that to the apartheid-era head of the central bank. Free
water for all? Not likely. The World Bank, with its large in-country contin­
gent of economists, researchers and trainers (a self-proclaimed "Knowledge
Bank"), is making private-sector partnerships the service norm. Want to im­
pose currency controls to guard against wild speculation? That would vio­
late the $850 million I M F deal, signed, conveniently enough, right before
the elections. Raise the minimum wage to close the apartheid income gap?
Nope. The I M F deal promises "wage restraint."

12

And don't even think

about ignoring these commitments—any change will be regarded as evi­
dence of dangerous national untrustworthiness, a lack of commitment to
"reform," an absence of a "rules-based system." All of which will lead to cur­
rency crashes, aid cuts and capital flight. The bottom line was that South
Africa was free but simultaneously captured; each one of these arcane
acronyms represented a different thread in the web that pinned down the
limbs of the new government.
A longtime antiapartheid activist, Rassool Snyman, described the trap to
me in stark terms. "They never freed us. They only took the chain from
around our neck and put it on our ankles." Yasmin Sooka, a prominent
South African human rights activist, told me that the transition "was business

204

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

saying, 'We'll keep everything and you [the ANC] will rule in name. . . . You
can have political power, you can have the façade of governing, but the real
13

governance will take place somewhere else.'"* It was a process of infantilization that is common to so-called transitional countries —new govern­
ments are, in effect, given the keys to the house but not the combination to
the safe.
Part of what I wanted to understand was how, after such an epic struggle
for freedom, any of this could have been allowed to happen. Not just how the
leaders of the liberation movement gave up the economic front, but how
the ANC's base—people who had already sacrificed so much—let their
leaders give it up. Why didn't the grassroots movement demand

that the

ANC keep the promises of the Freedom Charter and rebel against the con­
cessions as they were being made?
I put the question to William Gumede, a third-generation ANC activist
who, as a leader of the student movement during the transition, was on the
streets in those tumultuous years. "Everyone was watching the political ne­
gotiations," he recalled, referring to the de Klerk-Mandela summits. "And if
people felt it wasn't going well there would be mass protests. But when the
economic negotiators would report back, people thought it was technical;
no one was interested." This perception, he said, was encouraged by Mbeki,
who portrayed the talks as "administrative" and of no popular concern
(much like the Chileans with their "technified democracy"). As a result, he
told me, with great exasperation, "We missed it! We missed the real story."
Gumede, who today is one of South Africa's most respected investigative
journalists, says he came to understand that it was in those "technical" meet­
ings that the true future of his country was being decided—though few un­
derstood it at the time. Like many people I spoke with, Gumede reminded
me that South Africa was very much on the brink of civil war throughout the
transition period—townships were being terrorized by gangs who had been

* It w a s the Chicago Boys in Chile, fittingly, who pioneered this process of democracyproofing capitalism, or building what they called "new democracy." In Chile, before handing
over power to an elected government after seventeen years of junta rule, the Chicago Boys
rigged the constitution and the courts so it w a s legally next to impossible to reverse their
revolutionary laws. They had many names for this process: building a "technified democ­
racy," a "protected democracy," or, a s Pinochet's young minister José Pinera put it, ensuring
"insulation from politics." Alvaro Bardôn, Pinochet's undersecretary of the economy, ex­
plained the classic Chicago School reasoning: "If we acknowledge economics a s a science,
this immediately implies less power for government or the political structure, since both
lose responsibility for making such decisions."

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

205

armed by the National Party, police massacres were still taking place, leaders
were still being assassinated and there was constant talk of the country de­
scending into a bloodbath. "I was focusing on the politics—mass action, go­
ing to Bisho [site of a definitive showdown between demonstrators and
police], shouting, 'Those guys must go!'" Gumede recalled. "But that was
not the real struggle—the real struggle was over economics. And I am disap­
pointed in myself for being so naive. I thought I was politically mature
enough to understand the issues. How did I miss this?"
Since then, Gumede has been making up for lost time. When we met, he
was in the middle of a national firestorm sparked by his new book, Thabo
Mbeki and the Battle for the Soul of the ANC. It is an exhaustive exposé of
precisely how the ANC negotiated away the country's economic sovereignty
in those meetings he was too busy to pay attention to at the time. "I wrote the
book out of anger," Gumede told me. "Anger at myself and at the party."
It's hard to see how the outcome could have been different. If Padayachee
is right and the ANC's own negotiators failed to grasp the enormity of what
they were bargaining away, what chance was there for the movement's street
fighters?
During those key years when the deals were being signed, South Africans
were in a constant state of crisis, ricocheting between the intense exuber­
ance of watching Mandela walk free and the rage of learning that Chris
Hani, the younger militant many hoped would succeed Mandela as leader,
had been shot dead by a racist assassin. Other than a handful of economists,
nobody wanted to talk about the independence of the central bank, a topic
that works as a powerful soporific even under normal circumstances.
Gumede points out that most people simply assumed that no matter what
compromises had to be made to get into power, they could be unmade once
the ANC was firmly in charge. "We were going to be the government—we
could fix it later," he said.
What ANC activists didn't understand at the time was that it was the na­
ture of democracy itself that was being altered in those negotiations,
changed so that—once the web of constraints had descended on their
country—there would effectively be no later.
In the first two years of ANC rule, the party still tried to use the limited re­
sources it had to make good on the promise of redistribution. There was a
flurry of public investment—more than a hundred thousand homes were
built for the poor, and millions were hooked up to water, electricity and

206

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

14

phone lines. But, in a familiar story, weighed down by debt and under in­
ternational pressure to privatize these services, the government soon began
raising prices. After a decade of ANC rule, millions of people had been cut
off from newly connected water and electricity because they couldn't pay
the bills.* At least 40 percent of the new phones lines were no longer in ser­
15

vice by 2 0 0 3 . As for the "banks, mines and monopoly industry" that Man­
dela had pledged to nationalize, they remained firmly in the hands of the
same four white-owned megaconglomerates that also control 80 percent of
16

the Johannesburg Stock Exchange. In 2005, only 4 percent of the compa­
17

nies listed on the exchange were owned or controlled by blacks. Seventy
percent of South Africa's land, in 2006, was still monopolized by whites,
18

who are just 10 percent of the population. Most distressingly, the ANC gov­
ernment has spent far more time denying the severity of the AIDS crisis than
getting lifesaving drugs to the approximately 5 million people infected with
19

HIV, though there were, by early 2007, some positive signs of progress. Per­
haps the most striking statistic is this one: since 1990, the year Mandela left
prison, the average life expectancy for South Africans has dropped by thir­
teen years.

20

Underlying all these facts and figures is a fateful choice made by the ANC
after the leadership realized it had been outmaneuvered in the economic ne­
gotiations. At that point, the party could have attempted to launch a second
liberation movement and break free of the asphyxiating web that had been
spun during the transition. Or it could simply accept its restricted power and
embrace the new economic order. The ANC's leadership chose the second
option. Rather than making the centerpiece of its policy the redistribution of
wealth that was already in the country—the core of the Freedom Charter on
which it had been elected—the ANC, once it became the government, ac­
cepted the dominant logic that its only hope was to pursue new foreign in­
vestors who would create new wealth, the benefits of which would trickle
down to the poor. But for the trickle-down model to have a hope of working,
the ANC government had to radically alter its behavior to make itself ap­
pealing to investors.
This was not an easy task, as Mandela had learned when he walked out of
prison. As soon as he was released, the South African stock market collapsed
* The question of whether more people have been cut off from new services than connected
to them is highly contested in South Africa. At least one credible study has found that the cut­
offs outnumber the connections: the government says it has connected nine million people
to water; the study calculated ten million disconnections.

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

207

21

in panic; South Africa's currency, the rand, dropped by 10 percent. A few
weeks later, De Beers, the diamond corporation, moved its headquarters
22

from South Africa to Switzerland. This kind of instant punishment from
the markets would have been unimaginable three decades earlier, when
Mandela was first imprisoned. In the sixties, it was unheard of for multina­
tionals to switch nationalities on a whim and, back then, the world money
system was still firmly linked to the gold standard. Now South Africa's cur­
rency had been stripped of controls, trade barriers were down and most trad­
ing was short-term speculation.
Not only did the volatile market not like the idea of a liberated Mandela,
but just a few misplaced words from him or his fellow ANC leaders could
lead to an earth-shaking stampede by what the New York Times columnist
23

Thomas Friedman has aptly termed "the electronic herd." The stampede
that greeted Mandela's release was just the start of what became a call-andresponse between the ANC leadership and the financial markets—a shock
dialogue that trained the party in the new rules of the game. Every time a top
party official said something that hinted that the ominous Freedom Charter
might still become policy, the market responded with a shock, sending the
rand into free fall. The rules were simple and crude, the electronic equiva­
lent of monosyllabic grunts: justice—expensive, sell; status quo—good, buy.
When, shortly after his release, Mandela once again spoke out in favor of na­
tionalization at a private lunch with leading businessmen, "the All-Gold In­
dex plunged by 5 per cent."

24

Even moves that seemed to have nothing to do with the financial world but
betrayed some latent radicalism seemed to provoke a market jolt. When Trevor
Manuel, an ANC minister, called rugby in South Africa a "white minority
game" because its team was an all-white one, the rand took another hit.

25

Of all the constraints on the new government, it was the market that
proved most confining—and this, in a way, is the genius of unfettered capi­
talism: it's self-enforcing. Once countries have opened themselves up to the
global market's temperamental moods, any departure from Chicago School
orthodoxy is instantly punished by traders in New York and London who bet
against the offending country's currency, causing a deeper crisis and the
need for more loans, with more conditions attached. Mandela acknowl­
edged the trap in 1997, telling the ANC's national conference, "The very
mobility of capital and the globalisation of the capital and other markets,
make it impossible for countries, for instance, to decide national economic
policy without regard to the likely response of these markets."

26

208

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

The person inside the ANC who seemed to understand how to make the
shocks stop was Thabo Mbeki, Mandela's right hand during his presidency
and soon to be his successor. Mbeki had spent many of his years of exile in
England, studying at the University of Sussex, then moving to London. In
the eighties, while the townships of his country were flooded with tear gas,
he was breathing in the fumes of Thatcherism. O f all the ANC leaders,
Mbeki was the one who mingled most easily with business leaders, and be­
fore Mandela's release, he organized several secret meetings with corporate
executives who were afraid of the prospect of black majority rule. In 1985,
after a night of drinking Scotch with Mbeki and a group of South African
businesspeople at a Zambian game lodge, Hugh Murray, the editor of a pres­
tigious business magazine, commented, "The ANC supremo has a remark­
able ability to instill confidence, even in the most fraught circumstances."

27

Mbeki was convinced that the key to getting the market to calm down was
for the ANC to instill that kind of clubby confidence on a much larger scale.
According to Gumede, Mbeki took on the role of free-market tutor within
the party. The beast of the market had been unleashed, Mbeki would ex­
plain; there was no taming it, just feeding it what it craved: growth and more
growth.
So, rather than calling for the nationalization of the mines, Mandela and
Mbeki began meeting regularly with Harry Oppenheimer, former chairman
of the mining giants Anglo-American and De Beers, the economic symbols
of apartheid rule. Shortly after the 1994 election, they even submitted the
ANC's economic program to Oppenheimer for approval and made several
key revisions to address his concerns, as well as those of other top industrial­
28

ists. Hoping to avoid getting another shock from the market, Mandela, in
his first postelection interview as president, carefully distanced himself
from his previous statements favoring nationalization. "In our economic
policies. . . there is not a single reference to things like nationalization, and
this is not accidental," he said. "There is not a single slogan that will connect
29

us with any Marxist ideology."* The financial press offered steady encour­
agement for this conversion: "Though the ANC still has a powerful leftist
wing," The Wall Street Journal

observed, "Mr. Mandela has in recent days

sounded more like Margaret Thatcher than the socialist revolutionary he
was once thought to be."

30

* In fact, the A N C ' s official economic platform, on which it had been elected, called for "in­
creasing the public sector in strategic areas through, for example, nationalisation." Then
there w a s the Freedom Charter, which continued to be the party's manifesto.

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

209

The memory of its radical past still clung to the ANC, and despite the
new government's best efforts to appear unthreatening, the market kept in­
flicting its painful shocks: in a single month in 1996, the rand dropped 20
percent, and the country continued to hemorrhage capital as South Africa's
jittery rich moved their money offshore.

31

Mbeki convinced Mandela that what was needed was a definitive break
with the past. The ANC needed a completely new economic plan —
something bold, something shocking, something that would communicate,
in the broad, dramatic strokes the market understood, that the ANC was
ready to embrace the Washington Consensus.
As in Bolivia, where the shock therapy program was prepared with all the
secrecy of a covert military operation, in South Africa only a handful of
Mbeki's closest colleagues even knew that a new economic program was in
the works, one very different from the promises they had all made during the
1994 elections. O f the people on the team, Gumede writes, "all were sworn
to secrecy and the entire process was shrouded in deepest confidentiality lest
32

the left wing get wind of Mbeki's plan." The economist Stephen Gelb, who
took part in drafting the new program, admitted that "this was 'reform from
above' with a vengeance, taking to an extreme the arguments in favour of in­
33

sulation and autonomy of policymakers from popular pressures." (This em­
phasis on secrecy and insulation was particularly ironic given that, under the
tyranny of apartheid, the ANC had pulled off a remarkably open and partic­
ipatory process to come up with the Freedom Charter. Now, under a new or­
der of democracy, the party was opting to hide its economic plans from its
own caucus.)
In June 1996, Mbeki unveiled the results: it was a neoliberal shock ther­
apy program for South Africa, calling for more privatization, cutbacks to
government spending, labor "flexibility," freer trade and even looser controls
on money flows. According to Gelb, its overriding aim "was to signal to po­
tential investors the government's (and specifically the ANC's) commitment
34

to the prevailing orthodoxy." To make sure the message was loud and clear
to traders in New York and London, at the public launch of the plan, Mbeki
quipped, "Just call me a Thatcherite."

35

Shock therapy is always a market performance—that is part of its underly­
ing theory. The stock market loves overhyped, highly managed moments
that send stock prices soaring, usually provided by an initial public stock of­
fering, the announcement of a huge merger or the hiring of a celebrity
CEO.

When economists urge countries to announce a sweeping shock

210

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

therapy package, the advice is partially based on an attempt to imitate this
kind of high-drama market event and trigger a stampede—but rather than
selling an individual stock, they are selling a country. The hoped-for response
is "Buy Argentine stocks!" "Buy Bolivian bonds!" A slower, more careful ap­
proach, on the other hand, may be less brutal, but it deprives the market of
these hype-bubbles, during which the real money gets made. Shock therapy
is always a significant gamble, and in South Africa it didn't work: Mbeki's
grand gesture failed to attract long-term investment; it resulted only in spec­
ulative betting that ended up devaluing the currency even further.

T h e S h o c k of t h e B a s e

"The new convert is always more zealous at these things. They want to
please even more," remarked the Durban-based writer Ashwin Desai when
we met to discuss his memories of the transition. Desai spent time in jail
during the liberation struggle, and he sees parallels between the psychology
in prisons and the ANC's behavior in government. In prison, he said, "if you
please the warden more, you get a better status. And that logic obviously
transposed itself into some of the things that South African society did. They
did want to somehow prove that they were much better prisoners. Much
more disciplined prisoners than other countries, even."
The ANC base, however, proved distinctly more unruly—which created a
need for yet more discipline. According to Yasmin Sooka, one of the jurors
on South Africa's Truth and Reconciliation Commission, the discipline
mentality reached into every aspect of the transition —including the quest for
justice. After hearing years of testimony about torture, killings and disap­
pearances, the truth commission turned to the question of what kind of ges­
tures could begin to heal the injustices. Truth and forgiveness were
important, but so was compensation for the victims and their families. It
made little sense to ask the new government to make compensation payouts,
as these were not its crimes, and anything spent on reparations for apartheid
abuses was money not spent building homes and schools for the poor in the
newly liberated nation.
Some commissioners felt that multinational corporations that had bene­
fited from apartheid should be forced to pay reparations. In the end the
Truth and Reconciliation Commission made the modest recommendation
of a onetime 1 percent corporate tax to raise money for the victims, what it
called "a solidarity tax." Sooka expected support for this mild recommendation

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

211

from the ANC; instead, the government, then headed by Mbeki, rejected
any suggestion of corporate reparations or a solidarity tax, fearing that it
would send an antibusiness message to the market. "The president decided
not to hold business accountable," Sooka told me. "It was that simple." In
the end, the government put forward a fraction of what had been requested,
taking the money out of its own budget, as the commissioners had feared.
South Africa's Truth and Reconciliation Commission is frequently held
up as a model of successful "peace building," exported to other conflict
zones from Sri Lanka to Afghanistan. But many of those who were directly
involved in the process are deeply ambivalent. When he unveiled the final
report in March 2003, the commission's chairman, Archbishop Desmond
Tutu, confronted journalists with freedom's unfinished business. "Can you
explain how a black person wakes up in a squalid ghetto today, almost 10
years after freedom? Then he goes to work in town, which is still largely
white, in palatial homes. And at the end of the day, he goes back home to
squalor? I don't know why those people don't just say, T o hell with peace. To
hell with Tutu and the truth commission.' "

3 6

Sooka, who now heads South Africa's Foundation for Human Rights,
says that she feels that although the hearings dealt with what she described
as "outward manifestations of apartheid such as torture, severe ill treatment
and disappearances," it left the economic system served by those abuses
"completely untouched" —an echo of the concerns about the blindness of
"human rights" expressed by Orlando Letelier three decades earlier. If she
had the process to do over again, Sooka said, "I would do it completely dif­
ferently. I would look at the systems of apartheid —I would look at the ques­
tion of land, I would certainly look at the role of multinationals, I would
look at the role of the mining industry very, very closely because I think
that's the real sickness of South Africa. . . . I would look at the systematic
effects of the policies of apartheid, and I would devote only one hearing to
torture because I think when you focus on torture and you don't look
at what it was serving, that's when you start to do a revision of the real
history."

Reparations in Reverse
The fact that the ANC dismissed the Commission's call for corporate repara­
tions is particularly unfair, Sooka pointed out, because the government con­
tinues to pay the apartheid debt. In the first years after the handover, it cost

212

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the new government 30 billion rand annually (about $4.5 billion) in
servicing—a sum that provides a stark contrast with the paltry total of $85
million that the government ultimately paid out to more than nineteen thou­
sand victims of apartheid killings and torture and their families. Nelson
Mandela has cited the debt burden as the single greatest obstacle to keeping
the promises of the Freedom Charter. "That is 30 billion [rand] we did not
have to build houses as we planned, before we came into government, to
make sure that our children go to the best schools, that unemployment is
properly addressed and that everybody has the dignity of having a job, a de­
cent income, of being able to provide shelter to his beloved, to feed
them. . . . We are limited by the debt that we inherited."

37

Despite Mandela's acknowledgment that paying the apartheid bills has
become a disfiguring burden, the party has opposed all suggestions that it de­
fault. The fear is that even though there is a strong legal case that the debts
are "odious," any move to default would make South Africa look danger­
ously radical in the eyes of investors, thus provoking another market shock.
Dennis Brutus, a longtime ANC member and a former prisoner on Robben
Island, ran directly into that wall of fear. In 1998, seeing the financial stress
the new government was under, he and a group of South African activists
decided that the best way they could support the ongoing struggle was to start
a "debt jubilee" movement. "I must say, I was so naive," Brutus, now in his
seventies, told me. "I expected that the government would express apprecia­
tion to us, that the grass roots are taking up the issue of debt, you know, that
it would reinforce the government taking up debt." To his astonishment, "the
government repudiated us and said, 'No, we don't accept your support.' "
What makes the ANC's decision to keep paying the debt so infuriating to
activists like Brutus is the tangible sacrifice made to meet each payment. For
instance, between 1997 and 2004, the South African government sold eight­
een state-owned firms, raising $4 billion, but almost half the money went to
servicing the debt.

38

In other words, not only did the ANC renege on Man­

dela's original pledge of "the nationalisation of the mines, banks and mo­
nopoly industry" but because of the debt, it was doing the opposite—selling
off national assets to make good on the debts of its oppressors.
Then there is the matter of where, precisely, the money is going. During
the transition negotiations, F. W. de Klerk's team demanded that all civil ser­
vants be guaranteed their jobs even after the handover; those who wanted to
leave, they argued, should receive hefty lifelong pensions. This was an ex­
traordinary demand in a country with no social safety net to speak of, yet it

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

213

was one of several "technical" issues on which the ANC ceded ground.

39

The concession meant that the new ANC government carried the cost of two
governments—its own, and a shadow white government that was out of
power. Forty percent of the government's annual debt payments go to the
country's massive pension fund. The vast majority of the beneficiaries are
former apartheid employees.*

40

In the end, South Africa has wound up with a twisted case of reparations
in reverse, with the white businesses that reaped enormous profits from
black labor during the apartheid years paying not a cent in reparations, but
the victims of apartheid continuing to send large paychecks to their former
victimizers. And how do they raise the money for this generosity? By strip­
ping the state of its assets through privatization—a modern form of the very
looting that the ANC had been so intent on avoiding when it agreed to ne­
gotiations, hoping to prevent a repeat of Mozambique. Unlike what hap­
pened in Mozambique, however, where civil servants broke machinery,
stuffed their pockets and then fled, in South Africa the dismantling of the
state and the pillaging of its coffers continue to this day.
When I arrived in South Africa, the fiftieth anniversary of the signing of
the Freedom Charter was approaching, and the ANC had decided to mark the
event with a media spectacle. The plan was for Parliament to relocate for the
day from its usual commanding home in Cape Town to the far more hum­
ble surroundings of Kliptown, where the charter was first ratified. The South
African president, Thabo Mbeki, was going to take the occasion to rename
Kliptown's main intersection the Walter Sisulu Square of Dedication, after
one of the ANC's most revered leaders. Mbeki would also inaugurate a
new Freedom Charter Monument, a brick tower in which the words of the
Charter had been engraved on stone tablets, and light an eternal "flame of
* In fact, this one apartheid-era burden is simultaneously driving the growth of the country's
overall debt and putting billions of rand of public money out of reach every year. A "technical"
accounting change in 1989 switched the state pension fund from a "pay as you g o " system, in
which benefits are paid from contributions made in any given year, to a "fully funded" system,
in which the fund has to have on hand enough capital to pay out 70 to 80 percent of its total li­
abilities at any given time—not a scenario it will ever face. A s a result, the fund ballooned from
30 billion rand in 1989 to more than 300 billion rand in 2004—certainly qualifying as a debt
shock. What this means for South Africans is that the huge pool of capital administered inde­
pendently by the pension fund has been cordoned off and placed out of reach for spending on
housing, health care or basic services. The pension agreement was actually negotiated on the
A N C side by Joe Slovo, the legendary leader of the South African Communist Party, a fact that
continues to be a source of great resentment in the country today.

2H

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

freedom." Adjacent to this building, work was progressing on another monu­
ment, this one called the Freedom Towers, a pavilion of black and white
concrete pillars designed to symbolize the charter's famous clause that says,
"South Africa belongs to all those who live in it, black and white."

41

The overall message of the event was hard to miss: fifty years ago, the party
had promised to bring freedom to South Africa and now it had delivered —it
was the ANC's own "mission accomplished" moment.
Yet there was something strange about the event. Kliptown—an impover­
ished township with dilapidated shacks, raw sewage in the streets and an un­
employment rate of 72 percent, far higher than under apartheid—seems
more like a symbol of the Freedom Charter's broken promises than an ap­
42

propriate backdrop for such a slickly produced celebration. As it turned
out, the anniversary events were staged and art-directed not by the ANC but
by an odd entity called Blue IQ. Though officially an arm of the provincial
government, Blue IQ "operates in a carefully constructed environment
which makes it look and feel more like a private sector company than a gov­
ernment department," according to its very glossy, and very blue, brochure.
Its goal is to drum up new foreign investment in South Africa —part of the
ANC program of "re-distribution through growth."
Blue IQ had identified tourism as a major growth area for investment,
and its market research showed that for tourists visiting South Africa, a
large part of the attraction is the ANC's global reputation for having tri­
umphed over oppression. Hoping to build on this powerful draw, Blue IQ
determined that there was no better symbol of the South African triumphover-adversity narrative than the Freedom Charter. With that in mind, it
launched a project to transform Kliptown into a Freedom Charter theme
park, "a world-class tourist destination and heritage site offering local and
international visitors a unique experience" —complete with museum, a
freedom-themed shopping mall and a glass-and-steel Freedom Hotel.
What is now a slum is set to be remade "into a desirous and prosperous" Jo­
hannesburg suburb, while many of its current residents will be relocated to
slums in less historic locales.

43

With its plans to rebrand Kliptown, Blue IQ is following the free-market
playbook—providing incentives for business to invest, in the hope that it will
create jobs down the road. What sets this particular project apart is that, in
Kliptown, the foundation on which the entire trickle-down apparatus rests is
a fifty-year-old piece of paper that called for a distinctly more direct road to
poverty elimination. Redistribute the land so millions can sustain themselves

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

215

from it, demanded the framers of the Freedom Charter, and take back the
mines so the bounty can be used to build houses and infrastructure and cre­
ate jobs in the process. In other words, cut out the middleman. Those ideas
may sound like Utopian populism to many ears, but after so many failed ex­
periments in Chicago School orthodoxy, the real dreamers may be those
who still believe that a scheme like the Freedom Charter theme park, which
provided handouts to corporations while further disposessing the neediest
people, will solve the pressing health and economic problems for the 22 mil­
lion South Africans still living in poverty.

44

After more than a decade since South Africa made its decisive turn to­
ward Thatcherism, the results of its experiment in trickle-down justice are
scandalous:
• Since 1994, the year the ANC took power, the number of people living
on less than $1 a day has doubled, from 2 million to 4 million in 2006.

45

• Between 1991 and 2002, the unemployment rate for black South
Africans more than doubled, from 23 percent to 48 percent.

46

• O f South Africa's 35 million black citizens, only five thousand earn
more than $60,000 a year. The number of whites in that income bracket
is twenty times higher, and many earn far more than that amount.

47

• The ANC government has built 1.8 million homes, but in the mean­
time 2 million people have lost their homes.

48

• Close to 1 million people have been evicted from farms in the first
decade of democracy.

49

• Such evictions have meant that the number of shack dwellers has
grown by 50 percent. In 2006, more than one in four South Africans
lived in shacks located in informal shantytowns, many without run­
ning water or electricity.

50

Perhaps the best measure of the betrayed promises of freedom is the way the
Freedom Charter is now regarded in different parts of South African society.
Not so long ago, the document represented the ultimate threat to white priv­
ilege in the country; today it is embraced in business lounges and gated
communities as a statement of good intentions, at once flattering and totally
unthreatening, on a par with a flowery corporate code of conduct. But in the
townships where the document adopted in a field in Kliptown was once elec­
tric with possibility, its promises are almost too painful to contemplate. Many
South Africans boycotted the government-sponsored anniversary celebrations

216

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

completely. "What is in the Freedom Charter is very good," S'bu Zikode, a
leader of Durban's burgeoning shack dwellers' movement, told me. "But all
I see is the betrayal."
In the end, the most persuasive argument for abandoning the redistribution
promises of the Freedom Charter was the least imaginative one: everyone is
doing it. Vishnu Padayachee summed up for me the message that the ANC
leadership was getting from the start from "Western governments, the I M F
and the World Bank. They would say, 'The world has changed; none of that
left stuff means anything anymore; this is the only game in town.'" As
Gumede writes, "It was an onslaught for which the ANC was wholly unpre­
pared. Key economic leaders were regularly ferried to the head offices of in­
ternational organizations such as the World Bank and IMF, and during 1992
and 1993 several ANC staffers, some of whom had no economic qualifica­
tions at all, took part in abbreviated executive training programs at foreign
business schools, investment banks, economic policy think tanks and the
World Bank, where they were Ted a steady diet of neo-liberal ideas.' It was a
dizzying experience. Never before had a government-in-waiting been so se­
duced by the international community."

51

Mandela received a particularly intense dose of this elite form of schoolyard
peer pressure when he met with European leaders at the 1992 World Eco­
nomic Forum in Davos. When he pointed out that South Africa wanted to do
nothing more radical than what Western Europe had done under the Marshall
Plan after the Second World War, the Dutch minister of finance dismissed the
parallel. "That was what we understood then. But the economies of the world
are interdependent. The process of globalization is taking root. No economy
can develop separately from the economies of other countries."

52

As leaders like Mandela traveled the globalization circuit, it was pounded
into them that even the most left-wing governments were embracing the
Washington Consensus: the Communists in Vietnam and China were doing
it, and so were the trade unionists in Poland and the social democrats in
Chile, finally free from Pinochet. Even Russians had seen the neoliberal
light—at the time the ANC was in its heaviest negotiations, Moscow was in
the midst of a corporatist feeding frenzy, selling off its state assets to
apparatchiks-turned-entrepreneurs as fast as it could. If Moscow had given
in, how could a raggedy band of freedom fighters in South Africa resist such
a forceful global tide?
That, at least, was the message being peddled by the lawyers, economists

D E M O C R A C Y B O R N IN C H A I N S

217

and social workers who made up the rapidly expanding "transition" industry—
the teams of experts who hop from war-torn country to crisis-racked city,
regaling overwhelmed new politicians with the latest best practice from
Buenos Aires, the most inspiring success story from Warsaw, the most fear­
some roar from the Asian Tigers. "Transitionologists" (as the NYU political
scientist Stephen Cohen has called them) have a built-in advantage over the
politicians they advise: they are a hypermobile class, while the leaders of lib­
eration movements are inherently inward-looking.

53

By their very nature,

people spearheading intense national transformations are narrowly focused
on their own narratives and power struggles, often unable to pay close atten­
tion to the world beyond their borders. That's unfortunate, because if the
ANC leadership had been able to cut through the transitionology spin and
find out for itself what was really going on in Moscow, Warsaw, Buenos Aires
and Seoul, it would have seen a very different picture.

C H A P T E R 11

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG DEMOCRACY
R U S S I A C H O O S E S "THE P I N O C H E T O P T I O N "

Pieces of a living city cannot be auctioned off without taking into
consideration that there are indigenous traditions, even if they
s e e m odd to f o r e i g n e r s

But these are our traditions and our

city. For a long time w e lived under the dictatorship of the C o m ­
m u n i s t s , but now w e have found out that life under the dictator­
ship of b u s i n e s s people is no better. They couldn't care l e s s about
what country they are in.
—Grigory Gorin, R u s s i a n writer, 1 9 9 3

1

S p r e a d the truth—the l a w s of economics are like the l a w s of e n g i ­
neering. One set of l a w s w o r k s everywhere.
— L a w r e n c e S u m m e r s , chief e c o n o m i s t of the W o r l d B a n k , 1 9 9 1

2

When Soviet president Mikhail Gorbachev flew to London to attend his first
G7 Summit in July 1991, he had every reason to expect a hero's welcome.
For the previous three years, he had seemed not so much to stride across the
international stage as to float, charming the media, signing disarmament
treaties and picking up peace prizes, including the Nobel in 1990.
He had even managed to do the previously unthinkable: win over the
American public. The Russian leader so thoroughly challenged Evil Empire
caricatures that the U.S. press had taken to calling him by a cuddly nick­
name, "Gorby," and in 1987, Time magazine took the risky decision of mak­
ing the Soviet president their Man of the Year. The editors explained that
unlike his predecessors ("gargoyles in fur hats"), Gorbachev was Russia's

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

219

own Ronald Reagan—"a Kremlin version of the Great Communicator." The
Nobel Prize committee declared that thanks to his work, "It is our hope that
we are now celebrating the end of the Cold War."

3

By the beginning of the nineties, with his twin policies of glasnost (openness) and perestroïka

(restructuring), Gorbachev had led the Soviet Union

through a remarkable process of democratization: the press had been freed,
Russia's parliament, local councils, president and vice president had been
elected, and the constitutional court was independent. As for the economy,
Gorbachev was moving toward a mixture of a free market and a strong safety
net, with key industries under public control—a process he predicted would
take ten to fifteen years to be completed. His end goal was to build social
democracy on the Scandinavian model, "a socialist beacon for all
mankind."

4

At first it seemed that the West also wanted Gorbachev to succeed in loosening up the Soviet economy and transforming it into something close to
Sweden's. The Nobel Committee explicitly described the prize as a way of
offering support to the transition —"a helping hand in an hour of need." And
on a visit to Prague, Gorbachev made it clear that he couldn't do it all alone:
"Like mountain climbers on one rope, the world's nations can either climb
together to the summit or fall together into the abyss," he said.

5

So what happened at the G7 meeting in 1991 was totally unexpected.
The nearly unanimous message that Gorbachev received from his fellow
heads of state was that, if he did not embrace radical economic shock therapy
immediately, they would sever the rope and let him fall. "Their suggestions
as to the tempo and methods of transition were astonishing," Gorbachev
wrote of the event.

6

Poland had just completed its first round of shock therapy under the
IMF's and Jeffrey Sachs's tutelage, and the consensus among British prime
minister John Major, U.S. president George H. W. Bush, Canadian prime
minister Brian Mulroney and Japanese prime minister Toshiki Kaifu was that
the Soviet Union had to follow Poland's lead on an even faster timetable. After the meeting, Gorbachev got the same marching orders from the IMF, the
World Bank and every other major lending institution. Later that year, when
Russia asked for debt forgiveness to weather a catastrophic economic crisis,
7

the stern answer was that the debts had to be honored. Since the time when
Sachs had marshaled aid and debt relief for Poland, the political mood had
changed —it was meaner.
What happened next—the dissolution of the Soviet Union, Gorbachev's

220

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

eclipse by Yeltsin, and the tumultuous course of economic shock therapy in
Russia —is a well-documented chapter of contemporary history. It is, how­
ever, a story too often told in the bland language of "reform," a narrative so
generic that it has hidden one of the greatest crimes committed against a
democracy in modern history. Russia, like China, was forced to choose be­
tween a Chicago School economic program and an authentic democratic
revolution. Faced with that choice, China's leaders had attacked their own
people in order to prevent democracy from disturbing their free-market
plans. Russia was different: the democratic revolution was already well
under way—in order to push through a Chicago School economic program,
that peaceful and hopeful process that Gorbachev began had to be violently
interrupted, then radically reversed.
Gorbachev knew that the only way to impose the kind of shock therapy be­
ing advocated by the G7 and the I M F was with force—as did many in the
West pushing for these policies. The Economist

magazine, in an influential

1990 piece, urged Gorbachev to adopt "strong-man rule . . . to smash the re­
8

sistance that has blocked serious economic reform." Only two weeks after
the Nobel Committee had declared an end to the Cold War, The Economist
was urging Gorbachev to model himself after one of the Cold War's most no­
torious killers. Under the heading "Mikhail Sergeevich Pinochet?" the arti­
cle concluded that even though following its advice could cause "possible
blood-letting . . . it might, just might, be the Soviet Union's turn for what could
be called the Pinochet approach to liberal economics." The Washington Post
was willing to go further. In August 1991, the paper ran a commentary under
the headline "Pinochet's Chile a Pragmatic Model for Soviet Economy." The
article supported the idea of a coup for getting rid of the slow-going Gor­
bachev, but the author, Michael Schrage, worried that the Soviet president's
opponents "had neither the savvy nor the support to seize the Pinochet op­
tion." They should model themselves, Schrage wrote, after "a despot who re­
ally knew how to run a coup: retired Chilean general Augusto Pinochet."

9

Gorbachev soon found himself facing an adversary who was more than
willing to play the role of a Russian Pinochet. Boris Yeltsin, though holding
the post of Russian president, had a much lower profile than Gorbachev, who
headed all the Soviet Union. That was to change dramatically on August 19,
1991, one month after the G7 Summit. A group from the Communist old
guard drove tanks up to the White House, as the Russian parliament building
is called. In a bid to halt the democratization process, they threatened to attack

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG D E M O C R A C Y

221

the country's first elected parliament. Amid a crowd of Russians determined
to defend their new democracy, Yeltsin stood on one of the tanks and de­
10

nounced the aggression as "a cynical, right-wing coup attempt." The tanks
retreated, and Yeltsin emerged as a courageous defender of democracy. One
demonstrator who stood in the streets that day described it as "the first time I
felt that I could really affect the situation in my country. Our souls soared. It
was such a feeling of unity. We felt invincible."

11

And so did Yeltsin. As a leader, he had always been a kind of antiGorbachev. Where Gorbachev had projected propriety and sobriety (one of
his most controversial measures was an aggressive anti-vodka-drinking cam­
paign), Yeltsin was a notorious glutton and a heavy drinker. Prior to the
coup, many Russians harbored reservations about Yeltsin, but he had helped
save democracy from a Communist coup, and that made him, at least for the
time being, a people's hero.
Yeltsin immediately parlayed his triumphant showdown into increased
political power. As long as the Soviet Union remained intact, he would al­
ways have less control than Gorbachev, but in December 1991, four months
after the aborted coup, Yeltsin pulled off a political masterstroke. He formed
an alliance with two other Soviet republics, a move that had the effect of
abruptly dissolving the Soviet Union, thereby forcing Gorbachev's resigna­
tion. The abolition of the Soviet Union, "the only country most Russians had
ever known," was a powerful shock to the Russian psyche —and as the politi­
cal scientist Stephen Cohen put it, it was the first of "three traumatic shocks"
that Russians would endure over the next three years.

12

Jeffrey Sachs was in the room at the Kremlin on the day Yeltsin an­
nounced that the Soviet Union was no more. Sachs recalled the Russian
president saying, "'Gentlemen, I just want to announce that the Soviet
Union has ended. . . .' And I said, 'Gee, you know, this is once in a century.
This is the most incredible thing you can imagine; this is a true liberation;
let's help these people.'"

13

Yeltsin had invited Sachs to come to Russia to

serve as an adviser, and Sachs was more than game: "If Poland can do it, so
can Russia," he declared.

14

But Yeltsin didn't just want advice, he wanted the kind of gold-plated
fund-raising that Sachs had pulled off for Poland. "The only hope," Yeltsin
said, "was the promises of the Group of Seven quickly to grant us large sums
of financial aid."

15

Sachs told Yeltsin he was confident that if Moscow was

willing to go with the "big bang" approach to establishing a capitalist

222

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE
16

economy, he could raise something in the area of $15 billion. They would
need to be ambitious, and they would need to move fast. What Yeltsin did
not know was that Sachs's luck was about to run out.
Russia's conversion to capitalism had much in common with the corrupt
approach that had sparked the Tiananmen Square protests in China two
years earlier. Moscow's mayor, Gavriil Popov, has claimed that there were re­
ally only two options for how to break up the centrally controlled economy:
"Property can be divided among all members of society, or the best pieces
can be given to the leaders. . . . In a word, there's the democratic approach,
17

and there's the nomenklatura, apparatchik approach." Yeltsin took the lat­
ter approach—and he was in a hurry. In late 1991, he went to the parliament
and made an unorthodox proposal: if they gave him one year of special pow­
ers, under which he could issue laws by decree rather than bring them to par­
liament for a vote, he would solve the economic crisis and give them back a
thriving, healthy system. What Yeltsin was asking for was the kind of execu­
tive power enjoyed by dictators, not democrats, but the parliament was still
grateful to the president for his role during the attempted coup, and the
country was desperate for foreign aid. The answer was yes: Yeltsin could have
one year of absolute power to remake Russia's economy.
He immediately assembled a team of economists, many of whom, in the
final years of Communism, had formed a kind of free-market book club,
reading the basic texts of the Chicago School thinkers and discussing how
the theories could be applied in Russia. Though they had never studied in
the U.S., they were such devoted fans of Milton Friedman that the Russian
press took to calling Yeltsin's team "the Chicago Boys," a knock-off of the
original title, and fitting in the context of Russia's thriving black market
economy. In the West they were dubbed "the young reformers." The group's
figurehead was Yegor Gaidar, whom Yeltsin named as one of his two deputy
prime ministers. Pyotr Aven, a Yeltsin minister in 1991-92 who was part of
this inner circle, said of his former clique, "Their identification of themselves
with God, which flowed naturally from their belief in their all-round superi­
ority, was, unfortunately, typical of our reformers."

18

Surveying the group that had suddenly ascended to power in Moscow, the
Russian newspaper Nezavisimaya

Gazeta

observed the rather astonishing

development that "for the first time Russia will get in its government a team
of liberals who consider themselves followers of Friedrich von Hayek and the
'Chicago school' of Milton Friedman." Their policies were "quite clear—'strict
financial stabilization' according to 'shock therapy' recipes." At the same

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

223

time as Yeltsin made these appointments, the newspaper noted, he had also
put the notorious strongman Yury Skokov "in charge of the defense and re­
pressive departments: the Army, the Ministry of Internal Affairs and the State
Security Committee." The decisions were clearly connected: "Probably the
'strong Skokov can 'ensure' strict stabilization in politics while the 'strong'
economists guarantee it in the economy." The article ended with a predic­
tion: "It will come as no surprise if they attempt to construct something like
a homegrown Pinochet system, in which the role of the 'Chicago boys' will
be played by Gaidar's team."

19

To provide ideological and technical backup for Yeltsin's Chicago Boys,
the U.S. government funded its own transition experts whose jobs ranged
from writing privatization decrees, to launching a New York-style stock ex­
change, to designing a Russian mutual fund market. In the fall of 1992, USAID awarded a $2.1 million contract to the Harvard Institute for International
Development, which sent teams of young lawyers and economists to shadow
the Gaidar team. In May 1995, Harvard named Sachs director of the Har­
vard Institute for International Development, which meant that he played
two roles in Russia's reform period: he began as a freelance adviser to Yeltsin,
then moved on to overseeing Harvard's large Russia outpost, funded by the
U.S. government.
Once again a group of self-described revolutionaries huddled in secret
to write a radical economic program. As Dimitry Vasiliev, one of the key re­
formers, recalled, "At the start, we didn't have a single employee, not even a
secretary. We didn't have any equipment, not even a fax machine. And in
those conditions, in just a month and a half, we had to write a comprehen­
sive privatization program, we had to write twenty normative laws. . . . It was
a really romantic period."

20

On October 28, 1991, Yeltsin announced the lifting of price controls, pre­
dicting that "the liberalization of prices will put everything in its right
21

place." The "reformers" waited only one week after Gorbachev resigned to
launch their economic shock therapy program—the second of the three
traumatic shocks. The shock therapy program also included free-trade poli­
cies and the first phase of the rapid-fire privatization of the country's approx­
imately 225,000 state-owned companies.

22

"The country was taken by surprise by the 'Chicago School' program,"
23

one of Yeltsin's original economic advisers recalled. That surprise was de­
liberate, part of Gaidar's strategy of unleashing change so suddenly and
quickly that resistance would be impossible. The problem his team was up

224

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

against was the usual one: the threat of democracy obstructing their plans.
Russians did not want their economy organized by a Communist central
committee, but most still believed firmly in wealth redistribution and in an
activist role for government. Like the Polish supporters of Solidarity, 67 per­
cent of Russians told pollsters in 1992 they believed workers' cooperatives
were the most equitable way to privatize the assets of the Communist state,
and 79 percent said they considered maintaining full employment to be a
24

core function of government. That meant that if Yeltsin's team had submit­
ted their plans to democratic debate, rather than launching a stealth attack
on an already deeply disoriented public, the Chicago School revolution
would not have stood a chance.
Vladimir Mau, an adviser to Boris Yeltsin in this period, explained that
"the most favorable condition for reform" is a "weary public, exhausted by
the previous political struggle. . . . That is why the government was confi­
dent, on the eve of price liberalization, that a drastic social clash was impos­
sible, that the government would not be overthrown by a popular revolt."
The vast majority of Russians —70 percent—were opposed to lifting price
controls, he explained, but "we could see that the people, then and now,
were concentrating on the yields of their private [garden] plots and in gen­
eral on their individual economic circumstances."

25

Joseph Stiglitz, who at the time was serving as chief economist at the
World Bank, summarized the mentality that guided the shock therapists. His
metaphors should by now be familiar: "Only a blitzkrieg approach during
the 'window of opportunity' provided by the Tog of transition' would get the
changes made before the population had a chance to organize to protect its
26

previous vested interests." In other words, the shock doctrine.
Stiglitz called Russia's reformers "market Bolsheviks" for their fondness
27

for cataclysmic revolution. However, where the original Bolsheviks fully in­
tended to build their centrally planned state in the ashes of the old, the mar­
ket Bolsheviks believed in a kind of magic: if the optimal conditions for
profit making were created, the country would rebuild itself, no planning re­
quired. (It was a faith that would reemerge, a decade later, in Iraq.)
Yeltsin made wild promises that "for approximately six months, things
will be worse," but then the recovery would begin, and soon enough Russia
would be an economic titan, one of the top four economies in the world.

28

This logic of so-called creative destruction resulted in scarce creation and
spiraling destruction. After only one year, shock therapy had taken a devas­
tating toll: millions of middle-class Russians had lost their life savings when

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG D E M O C R A C Y

225

money lost its value, and abrupt cuts to subsidies meant millions of workers
29

had not been paid in months. The average Russian consumed 40 percent
less in 1992 than in 1991, and a third of the population fell below the
30

poverty line. The middle class was forced to sell personal belongings from
card tables on the streets—desperate acts that the Chicago School econo­
mists praised as "entrepreneurial," proof that a capitalist renaissance was in­
deed under way, one family heirloom and second-hand blazer at a time.

31

As in Poland, Russians did, eventually, regain their bearings and began to
demand an end to the sadistic economic adventure ("no more experiments"
was a popular piece of graffiti in Moscow at the time). Under pressure from
voters, the country's elected parliament—the same body that had supported
Yeltsin's rise to power—decided it was time to rein in the president and his
ersatz Chicago Boys. In December 1992, they voted to unseat Yegor Gaidar,
and three months later, in March 1993, the parliamentarians voted to repeal
the special powers they had given to Yeltsin to impose his economic laws by
decree. The grace period had expired, and the results were abysmal; from
now on, laws had to go through parliament, a standard measure in any lib­
eral democracy and following the procedures set out in Russia's constitution.
The deputies were acting within their rights, but Yeltsin had grown ac­
customed to his augmented powers and had come to think of himself less as
a president and more as a monarch (he had taken to calling himself Boris I).
He retaliated against the parliament's "mutiny" by going on television and
declaring a state of emergency, which conveniently restored his imperial
powers. Three days later, Russia's independent Constitutional Court (the
creation of which was one of Gorbachev's most significant democratic
breakthroughs) ruled 9-3 that Yeltsin's power grab violated, on eight differ­
ent counts, the constitution he had sworn to uphold.
Until this point, it had still been possible to present "economic reform"
and democratic reform as part of the same project in Russia. But once
Yeltsin declared a state of emergency, the two projects were on a collision
course, with Yeltsin and his shock therapists in direct opposition to the
elected parliament and the constitution.
Nevertheless, the West threw its weight behind Yeltsin, who was still cast in
the role of a progressive "genuinely committed to freedom and democracy,
genuinely committed to reform," in the words of then U.S. president Bill
32

Clinton. The majority of the Western press also sided with Yeltsin against
the entire parliament, whose members were dismissed as "communist hard­
33

liners" trying to roll back democratic reforms. They suffered, according to

226

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the New York Times Moscow bureau chief, from "a Soviet mentalitysuspicious of reform, ignorant of democracy, disdainful of intellectuals or
'democrats/ "

3 4

In fact, these were the same politicians, for all their flaws (and with 1,041
deputies there were plenty), who had stood with Yeltsin and Gorbachev
against the coup by the hardliners in 1991, who had voted to dissolve the
Soviet Union and who had, until recently, thrown their support behind
Yeltsin. Yet The Washington

Post opted to cast Russia's parliamentarians as

"antigovernment" —as if they were interlopers and not themselves part of
the government.

35

In the spring of 1993, the collision drew closer when parliament brought
forward a budget bill that did not follow I M F demands for strict austerity.
Yeltsin responded by trying to eliminate the parliament. He hastily threw to­
gether a referendum, supported in Orwellian fashion by the press, which
asked voters if they agreed to dissolve parliament and hold snap elections.
Not enough voters turned out to give Yeltsin the mandate he needed. He
still claimed victory, however, maintaining that the exercise proved the
country was behind him, because he had slipped in an entirely non-binding
question about whether voters supported his reforms. A slim majority said
yes.

36

In Russia, the referendum was widely seen as a propaganda exercise, and
a failed one at that. The reality was that Yeltsin and Washington were still
stuck with a parliament that had the constitutional right to do what it was do­
ing: slowing down the shock therapy transformation. An intense pressure
campaign began. Lawrence Summers, then U.S. Treasury undersecretary,
warned that "the momentum for Russian reform must be reinvigorated and
37

intensified to ensure sustained multilateral support." The I M F got the mes­
sage, and an unnamed official leaked to the press that a promised $1.5 bil­
lion loan was being rescinded because the I M F was "unhappy with Russia's
38

backtracking on reforms." Pyotr Aven, the former Yeltsin minister, said,
"The maniacal obsession of the I M F with budgetary and monetary policy,
and its absolutely superficial and formal attitude to everything else . . .
played not a small role in what happened."

39

What happened was that the day after the I M F leak, Yeltsin, confident
that he had the West's support, took his first irreversible step toward what was
now being openly referred to as the "Pinochet option": he issued decree 1400,
announcing that the constitution was abolished and parliament dissolved.
Two days later, a special session of parliament voted 636-2 to impeach

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG D E M O C R A C Y

227

Yeltsin for this outrageous act (the equivalent of the U.S. president unilater­
ally dissolving Congress). Vice President Aleksandr Rutskoi announced that
Russia had already "paid a dear price for the political adventurism" of Yeltsin
and the reformers.

40

Some kind of armed conflict between Yeltsin and the parliament was now
inevitable. Despite the fact that Russia's Constitutional Court once again
ruled Yeltsin's behavior unconstitutional, Clinton continued to back him,
and Congress voted to give Yeltsin $2.5 billion in aid. Emboldened, Yeltsin
sent in troops to surround the parliament and got the city to cut off power,
heat and phone lines to the White House parliament building. Boris Kagarlitsky, director of the Institute of Globalization Studies in Moscow, told me
that supporters of Russian democracy "were coming in by the thousands try­
ing to break the blockade. There were two weeks of peaceful demonstrations
confronting the troops and police forces, which led to partial unblocking of
the parliament building, with people able to bring food and water inside.
Peaceful resistance was growing more popular and gaining broader support
every day."
With each side becoming more entrenched, the only compromise that
could have resolved the standoff would have been for both sides to agree to
early elections, putting everybody's job up for public review. Many were urg­
ing this outcome, but just as Yeltsin was weighing his options, and reportedly
leaning toward elections, news came from Poland that voters had rained
down their decisive punishment on Solidarity, the party that had betrayed
them with shock therapy.
After they witnessed Solidarity get pounded at the polls, it was obvious to
Yeltsin and his Western advisers that early elections were far too risky. In
Russia, too much wealth hung in the balance: huge oil fields, about 30 per­
cent of the world's natural gas reserves, 20 percent of its nickel, not to men­
tion weapons factories and the state media apparatus with which the
Communist Party had controlled the vast population.
Yeltsin abandoned negotiations and moved into war posture. Having just
doubled military salaries, he had most of the army on his side, and he "sur­
rounded the parliament with thousands of Interior Ministry troops, barbed
wire and water cannons and refused to let anyone pass," according to The
Washington

1

Post.* Vice President Rutskoi, Yeltsin's main rival in parlia­

ment, had by this point armed his guards and welcomed proto-fascist nation­
alists into his camp. He urged his supporters to "not give a moment of
peace" to Yeltsin's "dictatorship."

42

Kagarlitsky, who participated in the

228

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

protests and wrote a book about the episode, told me that on October 3,
crowds of supporters of the parliament "marched to the Ostankino T V center
to demand that news be announced. Some people in the crowd were armed,
but most were not. There were children in the crowd. It was met by Yeltsin's
troops and machine-gunned." About one hundred demonstrators, and one
member of the military, were killed. Yeltsin's next move was to dissolve all
city and regional councils in the country. Russia's young democracy was be­
ing destroyed piece by piece.
There is no doubt that some parliamentarians showed antipathy for a
peaceful settlement by egging on the crowds, but as even the former U.S.
State Department official Leslie Gelb wrote, the parliament was "not dom­
43

inated by a bunch of right-wing crazies." It was Yeltsin's illegal dissolu­
tion of parliament and his defiance of the country's highest court that
precipitated the crisis —moves that were bound to be met by desperate
measures in a country that had little desire to give up the democracy it had
just won.*
A clear signal from Washington or the E U could have forced Yeltsin to
engage in serious negotiations with the parliamentarians, but he received
only encouragement. Finally, on the morning of October 4, 1993, Yeltsin
fulfilled his long-prescribed destiny and became Russia's very own Pinochet,
unleashing a series of violent events with unmistakable echoes of the coup in
Chile exactly twenty years earlier. In what was the third traumatic shock in­
flicted by Yeltsin on the Russian people, he ordered a reluctant army to
storm the Russian White House, setting it on fire and leaving charred the
very building he had built his reputation defending just two years earlier.
Communism may have collapsed without the firing of a single shot, but
Chicago-style capitalism, it turned out, required a great deal of gunfire to de­
fend itself: Yeltsin called in five thousand soldiers, dozens of tanks and ar­
mored personnel carriers, helicopters and elite shock troops armed with
automatic machine guns—all to defend Russia's new capitalist economy
from the grave threat of democracy.
This is how The Boston Globe reported on Yeltsin's parliamentary siege:

* In one of the most remarkable bits of sensational reporting, The Washington Post noted,
"About 200 demonstrators then surged to Russia's Defense Ministry, where the nation's n u ­
clear controls are located and its top generals were meeting"—raising the absurd prospect
that the crowd of Russians attempting to defend their democracy might start a nuclear war.
"The ministry locked its doors and kept the crowd out without incident," reported The Post.

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

229

"For 10 hours yesterday, about 30 Russian army tanks and armored person­
nel carriers encircled the parliament building in downtown Moscow, known
as the White House, and pelted it with explosive rounds, while infantry
troops sprayed machine-gun fire. At 4:15 p.m., about 300 guards, congres­
sional deputies and staff workers marched single-file out of the building with
their hands up."

44

By the end of the day, the all-out military assault had taken the lives of ap­
proximately five hundred people and wounded almost a thousand, the most
violence Moscow had seen since 1917.

45

Peter Reddaway and Dmitri Glin-

ski, who wrote the definitive account of the Yeltsin years (The Tragedy of
Russia's Reforms: Market Bolshevism

against Democracy),

point out that

"during the mopping-up operation in and around the White House, 1,700
persons had been arrested, and 11 weapons seized. Some of the arrested
were interned in a sports stadium, recalling the procedures used by Pinochet
46

after the 1973 coup in Chile." Many were taken to police stations, where
they were severely beaten. Kagarlitsky recalls that while he was being struck
on the head, an officer shouted, "You wanted democracy, you sons of
bitches? We'll show you democracy!"

47

But Russia wasn't a repeat of Chile —it was Chile in reverse order:
Pinochet staged a coup, dissolved the institutions of democracy and then im­
posed shock therapy; Yeltsin imposed shock therapy in a democracy, then
could defend it only by dissolving democracy and staging a coup. Both sce­
narios earned enthusiastic support from the West.
"Yeltsin Receives Widespread Backing for Assault," read a headline in
The Washington Post the day after the coup, "Victory Seen for Democracy." The
Boston Globe went with "Russia Escapes a Return to the Dungeon of Its Past."
The U.S. secretary of state, Warren Christopher, traveled to Moscow to stand
with Yeltsin and Gaidar and declared, "The United States does not easily sup­
port the suspension of parliaments. But these are extraordinary times."

48

The events looked different in Russia. Yeltsin, the man who had risen to
power by defending the parliament, had now literally set it on fire, leaving it so
badly charred that it was nicknamed the black house. A middle-age Muscovite
told a foreign camera crew in horror, "People supported [Yeltsin] because he
promised us democracy, but he shot up that democracy. Not only did he violate
49

it, but he shot it up." Vitaly Neiman, who had stood guard at the entrance of
the White House during the 1991 coup, put the betrayal this way: "What we
got was entirely the opposite of what we dreamed of. We went to the barricades
for them, laid our lives on the line, but they didn't keep their promises."

50

230

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Jeffrey Sachs, lauded for proving that radical free-market reforms could
be compatible with democracy, continued to publicly support Yeltsin after
his assault on the parliament, dismissing his opponents as "a group of former
communists intoxicated by power."

51

In his book The End of Poverty, in

which he gives his definitive account of his involvement in Russia, Sachs
completely glosses over this dramatic episode, not mentioning it once, just
as he left out the state of siege and attacks on labor leaders that accompanied
his shock program in Bolivia.

52

Following the coup, Russia was under unchecked dictatorial rule: its elected
bodies were dissolved, the Constitutional Court was suspended, as was the
constitution; tanks patrolled the streets, a curfew was in effect, and the press
faced pervasive censorship, though civil liberties were soon restored.
So what did the Chicago Boys and their Western advisers do at this critical
moment? The same thing they did when Santiago smoldered, and the same
thing they would do when Baghdad burned: liberated from the meddling of
democracy, they went on a law-making binge. Three days after the coup,
Sachs observed that up to this point "there was no shock therapy" because
the plan was "only incoherently and fitfully put into practice. Now there is a
chance to do something," he said.

53

And do something they did. "These days, Yeltsin's liberal economic team
is on a roll," reported Newsweek. "The day after the Russian president dis­
solved Parliament, the word came down to the market reformers: start writ­
ing decrees." The magazine quoted a "jubilant Western economist working
closely with the government" who made it absolutely clear that in Russia,
democracy was always a hindrance to the market plan: "With Parliament out
of the way, this is a great time for reform. . . . The economists around here
were pretty depressed. Now we're working day and night." Indeed, there seems
to be nothing quite as cheering as a coup, as Charles Blitzer, the World
Bank's chief economist for Russia, told The Wall Street Journal. "I've never
had so much fun in my life."

54

The fun was just beginning. With the country reeling from the attack,
Yeltsin's own Chicago Boys rammed through the most contentious measures
in their program: huge budget cuts, the removal of price controls on basic
food items, including bread, and even more and faster privatizations—the
standard policies that cause so much instant misery that they seem to require
a police state to stave off rebellion.

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

231

After Yeltsin's coup, Stanley Fischer, first deputy managing director of the
IMF (and a 1970s Chicago Boy), advocated "moving as fast as possible on all
55

fronts." So did Lawrence Summers, who was helping to shape Russia pol­
icy in the Clinton administration. The "three '-ations,' " as he called them —
"privatization, stabilization and liberalization —must all be completed as
soon as possible."

56

Change was so rapid that it was impossible for Russians to keep up. Work­
ers often did not even know that their factories and mines had been sold—let
alone how they had been sold or to whom (a profound confusion I would
witness a decade later in the state-owned factories of Iraq). In theory, all this
wheeling and dealing was supposed to create the economic boom that
would lift Russia out of desperation; in practice, the Communist state was
simply replaced with a corporatist one: the beneficiaries of the boom were
confined to a small club of Russians, many of them former Communist
Party apparatchiks, and a handful of Western mutual fund managers who
made dizzying returns investing in newly privatized Russian companies. A
clique of nouveaux billionaires, many of whom were to become part of the
group universally known as "the oligarchs" for their imperial levels of wealth
and power, teamed up with Yeltsin's Chicago Boys and stripped the country
of nearly everything of value, moving the enormous profits offshore at a rate
of $2 billion a month. Before shock therapy, Russia had no millionaires; by
2003, the number of Russian billionaires had risen to seventeen, according
to the Forbes list.

57

That is partly because, in a rare departure from Chicago School ortho­
doxy, Yeltsin and his team did not allow foreign multinationals to buy up
Russia's assets directly; they kept the prizes for Russians, then opened up the
newly privatized companies, owned by so-called oligarchs, to foreign share­
holders. The returns were still astronomical. "Looking for an investment that
could gain 2,000 per cent in three years?" The Wall Street Journal
"Only one stock market offers that hope . . . Russia."

58

asked.

Many investment

banks, including Credit Suisse First Boston, as well as a few deep-pocketed
financiers, quickly set up dedicated Russian mutual funds.
For the country's oligarchs and foreign investors, only one cloud loomed on
the horizon: Yeltsin's plummeting popularity. The effects of the economic
program were so brutal for the average Russian, and the process was so selfevidently corrupt, that his approval ratings fell to the single digits. If Yeltsin

232

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

was pushed from office, whoever replaced him would likely put a halt to
Russia's adventure in extreme capitalism. Even more worrying for the oli­
garchs and the "reformers," there would be a strong case for renationalizing
many of the assets that had been handed out under such unconstitutional
political circumstances.
In December 1994, Yeltsin did what so many desperate leaders have done
throughout history to hold on to power: he started a war. His national secu­
rity chief, Oleg Lobov, had confided to a legislator, "We need a small, victo­
rious war to raise the president's ratings," and the defense minister predicted
that his army could defeat the forces in the breakaway republic of Chechnya
in a matter of hours—a cakewalk.

59

For a while at least, the plan seemed to work. In its first phase, the
Chechen independence movement was partially suppressed, and Russian
troops took over the already abandoned presidential palace in Grozny, al­
lowing Yeltsin to declare glorious victory. It would prove to be a short-term
triumph, both in Chechnya and in Moscow. When Yeltsin faced reelection
in 1996, he was still so unpopular and his defeat looked so certain that his
advisers toyed with canceling the vote altogether; a letter signed by a group
of Russian bankers published in all the Russian national newspapers strongly
60

hinted at this possibility. Yeltsin's privatization minister, Anatoly Chubais
(whom Sachs once described as "a freedom fighter"), became one of the
most outspoken proponents of the Pinochet option.

61

"In order to have a

democracy in society there must be a dictatorship in power," he pronounced.

62

It was a direct echo of both the excuses made for Pinochet by Chile's
Chicago Boys and Deng Xiaoping's philosophy of Friedmanism without the
freedom.
In the end, the election went ahead and Yeltsin won, thanks to an esti­
mated $100 million in financing from oligarchs (thirty-three times the legal
amount) as well as eight hundred times more coverage on oligarch63

controlled T V stations than his rivals. With the threat of a sudden change
in government removed, the knockoff Chicago Boys were able to move to
the most contentious, and most lucrative, part of their program: selling off
what Lenin had once called "the commanding heights."
Forty percent of an oil company comparable in size to France's Total was
sold for $88 million (Total's sales in 2006 were $193 billion). Norilsk
Nickel, which produced a fifth of the world's nickel, was sold for $170
million —even though its profits alone soon reached $1.5 billion annually.
The massive oil company Yukos, which controls more oil than Kuwait, was

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG D E M O C R A C Y

233

sold for $309 million; it now earns more than $3 billion in revenue a year.
Fifty-one percent of the oil giant Sidanko went for $130 million; just two
years later that stake would be valued on the international market at $2.8
billion. A huge weapons factory sold for $3 million, the price of a vacation
home in Aspen.

64

The scandal wasn't just that Russia's public riches were auctioned off
for a fraction of their worth —it was also that, in true corporatist style, they
were purchased with public money. As the Moscow Times journalists Matt
Bivens and Jonas Bernstein put it, "a few hand-picked men took over Rus­
sia's state-developed oil fields for free, as part of a giant shell game in which
one arm of government paid another arm." In a bold act of cooperation be­
tween the politicians selling the public companies and the businessmen
buying them, several of Yeltsin's ministers transferred large sums of public
money, which should have gone into the national bank or treasury, into
private banks that had been hastily incorporated by oligarchs.* The state
then contracted with the same banks to run the privatization auctions for
the oil fields and mines. The banks ran the auctions, but they also bid in
them —and sure enough, the oligarch-owned banks decided to make them­
selves the proud new owners of the previously public assets. The money
that they put up to buy the shares in these public companies was likely the
same public money that Yeltsin's ministers had deposited with them ear­
65

lier. In other words, the Russian people fronted the money for the looting
of their own country.
As one of Russia's "young reformers" put it, when Russia's Communists
decided to break up the Soviet Union, they made an "exchange [of] power
66

for property." Just like his mentor Pinochet's, Yeltsin's own family grew ex­
ceedingly rich, his children and several of their spouses appointed to top
posts at large privatized firms.
With oligarchs firmly in control of the key assets of the Russian state, they
opened up their new companies to blue-chip multinationals, who snapped
up large portions. In 1997, Royal Dutch/Shell and BP entered into partner­
67

ships with two key Russian oil giants, Gazprom and Sidanko. These were
highly profitable investments, but the principal share of the wealth in Russia
was in the hands of Russian players, not their foreign partners. It is an over­
sight that the I M F and the U.S. Treasury would successfully rectify in future

* The two major oligarch-connected banks were Mikhail Khodorkovsky's Bank Menatep and
Vladimir Potanin's Uneximbank.

234

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

privatization auctions in Bolivia and Argentina. And in Iraq after the inva­
sion, the U.S. would go even further, attempting to cut the local elite out of
lucrative privatization deals entirely.
Wayne Merry, the chief political analyst at the U.S. embassy in Moscow
during the key years of 1990 to 1994, has admitted that the choice between
democracy and market interests in Russia was a stark one. "The U.S. govern­
ment chose the economic over the political. We chose the freeing of prices,
privatization of industry, and the creation of a really unfettered, unregulated
capitalism, and essentially hoped that rule of law, civil society, and represen­
tative democracy would develop somehow automatically as a result of
that. . . . Unfortunately, the choice was to ignore popular will and to press on
with the policy."

68

So much wealth was being made in Russia in this period that some of the
"reformers" couldn't resist getting in on the action. Indeed, more than any­
where else up to this point, the situation in Russia exposed the myth of the
technocrat, the egghead free-market economist supposedly imposing text­
book models out of pure conviction. As in Chile and China, where rampant
corruption and economic shock therapy went hand in hand, several of
Yeltsin's Chicago School ministers and deputy ministers ended up losing
their posts in high-profile corruption scandals.

69

Then there were the whiz kids from Harvard's Russia Project, tasked with
organizing the country's privatizations and the mutual fund market. The two
academics who headed the project—Harvard economics professor Andrei
Shleifer and his deputy Jonathan Hay—were discovered to have been di­
rectly profiting from the market they were busily creating. While Shleifer
was the lead adviser to the Gaidar team on privatization policy, his wife was
investing heavily in privatized Russian assets. Hay, a thirty-year-old graduate
of Harvard Law School, also made personal investments in privatized Rus­
sian oil stocks, allegedly in direct violation of Harvard's USAID contract.
And while Hay was helping the Russian government to set up a new mutual
fund market, his girlfriend, later wife, was awarded the first license to open a
mutual fund company in Russia, which, when it started, was managed out of
the U.S. government-funded Harvard office. (Technically, as head of the
Harvard Institute for International Development, which housed the Russia
Project, Sachs was Shleifer's and Hay's boss for part of this time. However,
Sachs was no longer working on the ground in Russia and has never been
implicated in any of the questionable actions.)

70

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

235

When these tangles came to light, the U.S. Department of Justice sued
Harvard, alleging that the business dealings of Shleifer and Hay violated
contracts they had signed agreeing not to profit personally from their highlevel work. After a seven-year investigation and legal battle, the U.S. District
Court in Boston found that Harvard had breached its contract, that the two
academics "conspired to defraud the United States," that "Shleifer engaged
in apparent self-dealing," that "Hay attempted to launder $400,000 through
his father and girlfriend."

71

Harvard paid a settlement of $26.5 million, the

largest in the institution's history. Shleifer agreed to pay $2 million, and Hay
agreed to pay between $1 and $2 million, depending on his earnings,
though neither admitted any liability.*

72

Perhaps this kind of "self-dealing" was inevitable, given the nature of the
Russian experiment. Anders Aslund, one of the most influential Western
economists working in Russia at the time, claimed that shock therapy would
work because "the miraculous incentives or temptations of capitalism con­
73

quer more or less anything." So if greed was to be the engine for rebuilding
Russia, then surely the Harvard men and their wives and girlfriends, as well
as Yeltsin's staff and family, by taking part in the frenzy themselves, were sim­
ply leading by example.
This points to a nagging and important question about free-market ideo­
logues: Are they "true believers," driven by ideology and faith that free mar­
kets will cure underdevelopment, as is often asserted, or do the ideas and
theories frequently serve as an elaborate rationale to allow people to act on
unfettered greed while still invoking an altruistic motive? All ideologies are
corruptible, of course (as Russia's apparatchiks made abundantly clear when,
during the Communist era, they collected their abundant privileges), and
there are certainly honest neoliberals. But Chicago School economics does
seem particularly conducive to corruption. Once you accept that profit and
greed as practiced on a mass scale create the greatest possible benefits for any
society, pretty much any act of personal enrichment can be justified as a con­
tribution to the great creative cauldron of capitalism, generating wealth and
spurring economic growth—even if it's only for yourself and your colleagues.
George Soros's philanthropic work in Eastern Europe—including his fund­
ing of Sachs's travels through the region—has not been immune to controversy.
* Unfortunately, the money didn't go to the Russian people, the true victims of the corrupt
privatization process, but back to the U.S. government—the same way that the "whistleblower" lawsuits against U.S. contractors in Iraq divvy up the settlement between the U.S.
government and the American whistle-blower.

236

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

There is no doubt that Soros was committed to the cause of democratization
in the Eastern Bloc, but he also had clear economic interests in the kind of
economic reform accompanying that democratization. As the world's most
powerful currency trader, he stood to benefit greatly when countries imple­
mented convertible currencies and lifted capital controls, and when state com­
panies were put on the auction block, he was one of the potential buyers.
It would have been perfectly legal for Soros to profit directly from the
markets he—as a philanthropist—was helping to open up, but it would not
have looked particularly good. For a time, he dealt with the appearance of
conflict of interest by barring his companies from investing in countries
where his foundations were active. But by the time Russia went up for sale,
Soros could no longer resist. In 1994, he explained that his policy "has been
modified due to the fact that markets are really developing in the region and
I have no rhyme or reason or right to deny my funds, or my shareholders, the
possibility of investing there, or to deny those countries the chance to get
hold of some of these funds." Soros had already purchased shares in Russia's
privatized phone system in 1994, for example (a very bad investment, as it
74

turned out), and acquired a piece of a large food company in Poland. In
the early days of the fall of Communism, Soros, through Sachs's work, had
been one of the prime movers behind the push for the shock approach to
economic transformation. By the late nineties, however, he had an apparent
change of heart, becoming one of the leading critics of shock therapy and di­
recting his foundations to fund NGOs that focus on putting anticorruption
measures in place before privatizations occur.
That epiphany came much too late to save Russia from casino capitalism.
Shock therapy had cracked it open to flows of hot money—short-term specu­
lative investment and currency trading, which are highly profitable. Such in­
tense speculation meant that in 1998, when the Asian financial crisis (the
subject of chapter 13) started spreading, Russia was left wholly unprotected.
Its already precarious economy crashed definitively. The public blamed
Yeltsin, and his approval rating dropped to an utterly untenable 6 percent.

75

With the futures of many of the oligarchs in jeopardy once again, it was going
to take yet another major shock to save the economic project and stave off the
threat of genuine democracy coming to Russia.
In September 1999, the country was hit with a series of exceedingly cruel
terrorist attacks: seemingly out of the blue, four apartment buildings were
blown up in the middle of the night, killing close to three hundred people.

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

237

In a narrative all too familiar to Americans after September 11, 2001, every
other issue was blasted off the political map by the only force on earth capa­
ble of doing the job. "It was this sort of very simple fear," explains the Rus­
sian journalist Yevgenia Albats. "All of a sudden, it appeared that all these
discussions about democracy, oligarchs —nothing compared to this fear to
die inside your own apartment."

76

The man put in charge of hunting down the "animals" was Russia's prime
minister, the steely and vaguely sinister Vladimir Putin.*

77

Immediately after

the apartment bombings, in late September 1999, Putin launched air strikes
on Chechnya, attacking civilian areas. In the new light of terror, the fact that
Putin was a seventeen-year veteran of the KGB —the most feared symbol of
the Communist era—suddenly seemed reassuring to many Russians. With
Yeltsin's alcoholism making him increasingly dysfunctional, Putin the pro­
tector was perfectly positioned to succeed him as president. On December
31, 1999, with the war in Chechnya foreclosing serious debate, several oli­
garchs engineered a quiet handover from Yeltsin to Putin, no elections nec­
essary. Before he left power, Yeltsin took one last page out of the Pinochet
playbook and demanded legal immunity for himself. Putin's first act as pres­
ident was signing a law protecting Yeltsin from any criminal prosecution,
whether for corruption or for the military's killing of pro-democracy demon­
strators that took place on his watch.
Yeltsin is regarded by history more as a corrupt buffoon than a menacing
strongman. Yet his economic policies, and the wars he waged in order to pro­
tect them, contributed significantly to the Chicago School crusade death
toll, which has been mounting steadily since Chile in the seventies. In addi­
tion to the casualties of Yeltsin's October coup, the wars in Chechnya have
78

killed an estimated 100,000 civilians. The larger massacres he precipitated
have taken place in slow motion, but their numbers are much higher—the
"collateral damage" of economic shock therapy.
In the absence of major famine, plague or battle, never have so many lost
so much in so short a time. By 1998, more than 80 percent of Russian farms
had gone bankrupt, and roughly seventy thousand state factories had closed,
creating an epidemic of unemployment. In 1989, before shock therapy, 2
* Not surprisingly, given the defiant criminality of Russia's ruling class, conspiracy theories
swirl around these events. Many Russians believe that Chechens had nothing to do with the
apartment bombings and that they were a covert operation designed to turn Putin into
Yeltsin's heir apparent.

238

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

million people in the Russian Federation were living in poverty, on less than
$4 a day. By the time the shock therapists had administered their "bitter med­
icine" in the mid-nineties, 74 million Russians were living below the poverty
line, according to the World Bank. That means that Russia's "economic re­
forms" can claim credit for the impoverishment of 72 million people in only
eight years. By 1996, 25 percent of Russians—almost 37 million p e o p l e lived in poverty described as "desperate."

79

Although millions of Russians have been pulled out of poverty in recent
years, thanks largely to soaring oil and gas prices, Russia's underclass of ex­
treme poor has remained permanent—with all the sicknesses associated with
that discarded status. As miserable as life under Communism was, with
crowded, cold apartments, Russians at least were housed; in 2006 the gov­
ernment admitted that there were 715,000 homeless kids in Russia, and
U N I C E F has put the number as high as 3.5 million children.

80

During the Cold War, widespread alcoholism was always seen in the
West as evidence that life under Communism was so dismal that Russians
needed large quantities of vodka to get through the day. Under capitalism,
however, Russians drink more than twice as much alcohol as they used to —
and they are reaching for harder painkillers as well. Russia's drug czar, Aleksandr Mikhailov, says that the number of users went up 900 percent from
1994 to 2004, to more than 4 million people, many of them heroin addicts.
The drug epidemic has contributed to another silent killer: in 1995, fifty
thousand Russians were HIV positive, and in only two years that number
doubled; ten years later, according to UNAIDS, nearly a million Russians
were HIV positive.

81

These are the slow deaths, but there are fast ones as well. As soon as shock
therapy was introduced in 1992, Russia's already high suicide rate began to
rise; 1994, the peak of Yeltsin's "reforms," saw the suicide rate climb to al­
most double what it had been eight years earlier. Russians also killed each
other with much greater frequency: by 1994, violent crime had increased
more than fourfold.

82

"What have our motherland and her people gotten out of the last 15 crim­
inal years?" Vladimir Gusev, a Moscow academic, asked at a 2006 democ­
racy demonstration. "The years of criminal capitalism have killed off 10
percent of our population." Russia's population is indeed in dramatic
decline—the country is losing roughly 700,000 people a year. Between
1992, the first full year of shock therapy, and 2006, Russia's population shrank
83

by 6.6 million. Three decades ago, André Gunder Frank, the dissident

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

239

Chicago economist, wrote a letter to Milton Friedman accusing him of
"economic genocide." Many Russians describe the slow disappearance of
their fellow citizens in similar terms today.
This planned misery is made all the more grotesque because the wealth
accumulated by the elite is flaunted in Moscow as nowhere else outside of a
handful of oil emirates. In Russia today, wealth is so stratified that the rich
and the poor seem to be living not only in different countries but in different
centuries. One time zone is downtown Moscow, transformed in fast-forward
into a futuristic twenty-first-century sin city, where oligarchs race around in
black Mercedes convoys, guarded by top-of-the-line mercenary soldiers, and
where Western money managers are seduced by the open investment rules
by day and by on-the-house prostitutes by night. In the other time zone, a
seventeen-year-old provincial girl, asked about her hopes for the future,
replied, "It's difficult to talk about the twenty-first century when you're sit­
ting here reading by candlelight. The twenty-first century does not matter.
It's the nineteenth century here."

84

This pillage of a country with as much wealth as Russia required extreme
acts of terror—from the torching of the parliament to the invasion of Chech­
nya. "Policy that breeds poverty and crime," writes Georgi Arbatov, one of
Yeltsin's original (and ignored) economic advisers, ". . . can survive only if
85

democracy is suppressed." Just as it had been in the Southern Cone, in Bo­
livia under the state of siege, in China during Tiananmen. Just as it would
be in Iraq.

When in Doubt, Blame Corruption
Rereading Western news reports on Russia's shock therapy period, it is strik­
ing how closely discussions at that time paralleled debates about Iraq that
would unfold more than a decade later. For both the Clinton and Bush Sr.
administrations, not to mention the European Union, the G 7 and the IMF,
the clear goal in Russia was to erase the preexisting state and create the con­
ditions for a capitalist feeding frenzy, which in turn would kick-start a boom­
ing free-market democracy—managed by overconfident Americans barely
out of school. In other words, it was Iraq without the explosives.
When the zeal for shock therapy in Russia was at its peak, its cheerleaders
were absolutely convinced that only total destruction of every single institu­
tion would create the conditions for a national rebirth—the dream of the
blank slate that would recur in Baghdad. It is "desirable," wrote the Harvard

240

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

historian Richard Pipes, "for Russia to keep on disintegrating until nothing
remains of its institutional structures."

86

And the Columbia University

economist Richard Ericson wrote in 1995, "Any reform must be disruptive
on a historically unprecedented scale. An entire world must be discarded,
including all of its economic and most of its social and political institu­
tions, and concluding with the physical structure of production, capital,
and technology."

87

Another Iraq parallel: no matter how baldly Yeltsin defied anything re­
sembling democracy, his rule was still characterized in the West as part of "a
transition to democracy," a narrative that would change only when Putin
began cracking down on the illegal activities of several of the oligarchs. Sim­
ilarly, the Bush administration has always portrayed Iraq as on the road to
freedom, even in the face of overwhelming evidence of rampant torture, outof-control death squads and pervasive press censorship. Russia's economic
program was always described as "reform," just as Iraq is perennially under
"reconstruction," even after the U.S. contractors have mostly all fled, leaving
the infrastructure in a shambles, as the destruction roars on. In Russia in the
mid-nineties, anyone who dared question the wisdom of "the reformers" was
dismissed as nostalgic for Stalin, just as critics of Iraq's occupation were, for
years, met with accusations that they thought life was better under Saddam
Hussein.
When it was no longer possible to hide the failures of Russia's shock ther­
apy program, the spin turned to Russia's "culture of corruption," as well as
speculation that Russians "aren't ready" for genuine democracy because of
their long history of authoritarianism. Washington's think-tank economists
hastily disavowed the Frankenstein economy they helped create in Russia,
deriding it as "mafia capitalism"—supposedly a phenomenon peculiar to the
Russian character. "Nothing good will ever come of Russia," The Atlantic
Monthly reported in 2001, quoting a Russian office worker. In the Los Ange­
les Times, the journalist and novelist Richard Lourie pronounced that "the
Russians are such a calamitous nation that even when they undertake some­
thing sane and banal, like voting and making money, they make a total hash
88

of it." The economist Anders Aslund had claimed that the "temptations of
capitalism" alone would transform Russia, that the sheer power of greed
would provide the momentum to rebuild the country. Asked a few years later
what went wrong, he replied, "Corruption, corruption and corruption," as if
corruption was something other than the unrestrained expression of the
"temptations of capitalism" that he had so enthusiastically praised.

89

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG D E M O C R A C Y

241

The entire charade would be replayed a decade later to explain away the
billions of missing reconstruction dollars in Iraq, with the disfiguring legacy
of Saddam and the pathologies of "radical Islam" standing in for the legacy
of Communism and czarism. In Iraq, U.S. rage at the apparent inability of
Iraqis to accept their gift of gunpoint "freedom" would also turn abusive —
except that in Iraq the rage would not be found only in nasty editorials about
"ungrateful" Iraqis but would also be pounded out on the bodies of Iraqi
civilians by U.S. and British soldiers.
The real problem with the blame-Russia narrative is that it pre-empts any
serious examination of what the whole episode has to teach about the true
face of the crusade for unfettered free markets, the most powerful political
trend of the past three decades. The corruption of many of the oligarchs is
still spoken of as an alien force that infected otherwise worthy free-market
plans. But corruption wasn't an intruder to Russia's free-market reforms:
quick and dirty deals were actively encouraged by Western powers at every
stage as the fastest way to kick-start the economy. National salvation through
the harnessing of greed was the closest thing Russia's Chicago Boys and their
advisers had to a plan for what they were going to do after they finished de­
stroying Russia's institutions.
Nor were these catastrophic results unique to Russia; the entire thirtyyear history of the Chicago School experiment has been one of mass cor­
ruption and corporatist collusion between security states and large
corporations, from Chile's piranhas, to Argentina's crony privatizations, to
Russia's oligarchs, to Enron's energy shell game, to Iraq's "free fraud zone."
The point of shock therapy is to open up a window for enormous profits to
be made very quickly—not despite the lawlessness but precisely because of
it. "Russia Has Become a Klondike for International Fund Speculators," ran
a headline in a Russian newspaper in 1997, while Forbes described Russia
90

and Central Europe as "the new frontier." The colonial-era terms were en­
tirely appropriate.
The movement that Milton Friedman launched in the 1950s is best under­
stood as an attempt by multinational capital to recapture the highly prof­
itable, lawless frontier that Adam Smith, the intellectual forefather of today's
neoliberals, so admired—but with a twist. Rather than journeying through
Smith's "savage and barbarous nations" where there was no Western law (no
longer a practical option), this movement set out to systematically dismantle
existing laws and regulations to re-create that earlier lawlessness. And where

242

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

Smith's colonists earned their record profits by seizing what he described as
"waste lands" for "but a trifle/' today's multinationals see government pro­
grams, public assets and everything that is not for sale as terrain to be con­
quered and seized—the post office, national parks, schools, social security,
disaster relief and anything else that is publicly administered.

91

Under Chicago School economics, the state acts as the colonial frontier,
which corporate conquistadors pillage with the same ruthless determination
and energy as their predecessors showed when they hauled home the gold and
silver of the Andes. Where Smith saw fertile green fields turned into profitable
farmlands on the pampas and the prairies, Wall Street saw "green field oppor­
tunities" in Chile's phone system, Argentina's airline, Russia's oil fields, Bo­
livia's water system, the United States' public airwaves, Poland's factories—all
92

built with public wealth, then sold for a trifle. Then there are the treasures
created by enlisting the state to put a patent and a price tag on life-forms and
natural resources never dreamed of as commodities—seeds, genes, carbon in
the earth's atmosphere. By relentlessly searching for new profit frontiers in the
public domain, Chicago School economists are like the mapmakers of the
colonial era, identifying new waterways through the Amazon, marking off the
location of a hidden cache of gold inside an Inca temple.
Corruption has been as much a fixture on these contemporary frontiers
as it was during the colonial gold rushes. Since the most significant privati­
zation deals are always signed amid the tumult of an economic or political
crisis, clear laws and effective regulators are never in place—the atmos­
phere is chaotic, the prices are flexible and so are the politicians. What we
have been living for three decades is frontier capitalism, with the frontier
constantly shifting location from crisis to crisis, moving on as soon as the
law catches up.
And so, far from acting as a cautionary tale, the rise of Russia's billionaire
oligarchs proved precisely how profitable the strip mining of an industrialized
state could be—and Wall Street wanted more. Immediately following the So­
viet collapse, the U.S. Treasury and the I M F became much tougher in their
demands for instant privatizations from other crisis-racked countries. The
most dramatic case to date came in 1994, the year after Yeltsin's coup, when
Mexico's economy suffered a major meltdown known as the Tequila Crisis:
the terms of the U.S. bailout demanded rapid-fire privatizations, and Forbes
announced that the process had minted twenty-three new billionaires. "The
lesson here is fairly obvious: to predict whence the next bursts of billionaires

B O N F I R E OF A Y O U N G D E M O C R A C Y

243

will issue, look for countries where markets are opening." It also cracked
Mexico open to unprecedented foreign ownership: in 1990, only one of Mex­
ico's banks was foreign owned, but "by 2000 twenty-four out of thirty were in
93

foreign hands." Clearly the only lesson learned from Russia is that the faster
and more lawless the transfer of wealth, the more profitable it will be.
One person who understood that was Gonzalo Sanchez de Lozada
(Goni), the businessman in whose living room the Bolivian shock therapy
plan had been drafted in 1985. As president of the country in the midnineties, he sold off Bolivia's national oil company, as well as the national air­
line, railway, electricity and phone companies. Unlike what transpired in
Russia, where the biggest prizes were awarded to locals, the winners of Bo­
livia's fire sale included Enron, Royal Dutch/Shell, Amoco Corp. and
Citicorp—and the sales were direct; there was no need to partner with local
94

firms.

The Wall Street Journal described the Wild West scene in La Paz in

1995: "The Radisson Plaza Hotel is crammed with executives from major
U.S. companies like AMR Corp.'s American Airlines, M C I Communications
Corp., Exxon Corp. and Salomon Brothers Inc. They have been invited by
the Bolivians to rewrite laws governing the sectors to be privatized and to bid
on the companies on the block" —a tidy arrangement. "The important thing
is to make these changes irreversible and to get them done before the anti­
bodies kick in," said President Sanchez de Lozada, explaining his shock ther­
apy approach. To make absolutely sure those "antibodies" didn't kick in,
Bolivia's government did something it had done before under similar circum­
stances: it imposed yet another prolonged "state of siege" that banned politi­
cal gatherings and authorized the arrest of all opponents of the process.

95

These were also the years of Argentina's notoriously corrupt privatization
circus, hailed as "A Bravo New World" in an investment report by Goldman
Sachs. Carlos Menem, the Peronist president who came to power promising
to be the voice of the working man, was in charge during those years, down­
sizing and then selling the oil fields, the phone system, the airline, the trains,
the airport, the highways, the water system, the banks, the Buenos Aires zoo
and, eventually, the post office and the national pension plan. As the coun­
try's wealth moved offshore, the lifestyles of Argentina's politicians grew in­
creasingly lavish. Menem, once known for his leather jackets and
working-class sideburns, began wearing Italian suits and reportedly making
trips to the plastic surgeon ("a bee sting" is how he explained his swollen fea­
tures). Maria Julia Alsogaray, Menem's minister in charge of privatization,

2U

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

posed for the cover of a popular magazine wearing nothing but an artfully
draped fur coat, while Menem began driving a bright red Ferrari Testarossa—
a "gift" from a grateful businessman.
The

96

countries that emulated Russia's privatizations also experienced

milder versions of Yeltsin's coups-in-reverse—governments that came to
power peacefully and, through elections, found themselves resorting to in­
creasing levels of brutality to hold on to power and defend their reforms. In
Argentina, the rule of unfettered neoliberalism ended on December 19,
2001, when President Fernando de la Rua and his finance minister, Domingo
Cavallo, tried to impose further IMF-prescribed austerity measures. The pop­
ulation revolted, and de la Rua sent in federal police on orders to disperse the
crowds by whatever means were required. De la Rua was forced to flee in a
helicopter, but not before twenty-one protesters were killed by police and
97

1,350 people were injured. Goni's last months and days in office were even
bloodier. His privatizations sparked a series of "wars" in Bolivia: first the water
war, against Bechtel's water contract that sent prices soaring 300 percent; then
a "tax war" against an IMF-prescribed plan to make up a budget shortfall by
taxing the working poor; then the "gas wars" against his plans to export gas to
the U.S. In the end, Goni was also forced to flee the presidential palace to live
in exile in the U.S., but, as in de la Rua's case, not before many lives were lost.
After Goni ordered the military to put down street demonstrations, soldiers
killed close to seventy people —many of them bystanders—and injured four
hundred others. As of early 2007, Goni was wanted by Bolivia's Supreme
Court on charges relating to the massacre.

98

The regimes that imposed mass privatization on Argentina and Bolivia
were both held up in Washington as examples of how shock therapy could
be imposed peacefully and democratically, without coups or repression. Al­
though it's true that they did not begin in a hail of gunfire, it is surely signifi­
cant that both ended in one.
In much of the Southern Hemisphere, neoliberalism is frequently spoken of
as "the second colonial pillage": in the first pillage, the riches were seized
from the land, and in the second they were stripped from the state. After
every one of these profit frenzies come the promises: next time, there will be
firm laws in place before a country's assets are sold off, and the entire process
will be watched over by eagle-eyed regulators and investigators with unim­
peachable ethics. Next time there will be "institution building" before priva­
tizations (to use the post-Russia parlance). But calling for law and order after

B O N F I R E OF A YOUNG D E M O C R A C Y

245

the profits have all been moved offshore is really just a way of legalizing the
theft ex post facto, much as the European colonizers locked in their land
grabs with treaties. Lawlessness on the frontier, as Adam Smith understood,
is not the problem but the point, as much a part of the game as the contrite
hand-wringing and the pledges to do better next time.

C H A P T E R 12

THE CAPITALIST ID
R U S S I A A N D THE N E W E R A
OF THE BOOR M A R K E T

You have m a d e yourself the trustee for those in every country who
s e e k to m e n d the evils of o u r condition by reasoned experiment
within the f r a m e w o r k of the existing social s y s t e m . If you fail, r a ­
tional c h a n g e will be gravely prejudiced throughout the w o r l d ,
leaving orthodoxy and revolution to fight it out.
— J o h n M a y n a r d K e y n e s in a letter to
President F r a n k l i n D. Roosevelt, 1 9 3 3

1

On the day I went to visit Jeffrey Sachs in October 2006, New York City was
under a damp blanket of gray drizzle punctuated, every five paces or so, by a
vibrant burst of red. It was the week of the grand launch of Bono's (Product)
Red brand, and the city was getting the full blitz. Red iPods and Armani
sunglasses loomed from billboards overhead, every bus shelter featured
Steven Spielberg or Penelope Cruz in a different red garment, every Gap
outlet in the city had given itself over to the launch, and the Apple store on
Fifth Avenue was emitting a rosy glow. "Can a tank top change the world?"
asked one ad. Yes it can, we were assured, because a portion of the profits
was going to the Global Fund to Fight AIDS, T B and malaria. "Shop till it
stops!" Bono had pronounced, in the midst of a televised shopping spree
with Oprah a couple of days earlier.

2

I had a hunch that most of the journalists wanting to talk to Sachs that
week would be looking for the superstar economist's view on this fashionable
new way to raise aid money. After all, Bono refers to Sachs as "my professor,"
and a photo of the two men greeted me as I entered Sachs's office at Columbia

T H E C A P I T A L I S T ID

247

University (he left Harvard in 2002). In the midst of all this glamorous char­
ity, I felt like a bit of a spoiler, because I wanted to talk about the professor's
least favorite topic of all, one that has prompted him to threaten to hang up
on reporters mid-interview. I wanted to talk about Russia and what went
wrong there.
It was in Russia, after the first year of shock therapy, that Sachs began his
own transition, from global shock doctor to one of the world's most outspo­
ken campaigners for increasing aid to impoverished countries. It is a transi­
tion that, in the years since, has put him in conflict with many former
colleagues and collaborators in orthodox economic circles. As far as Sachs is
concerned, he isn't the one who changed—he was always committed to
helping countries develop market-based economies bolstered by generous
aid and debt forgiveness. For years he had found it possible to achieve these
goals by working in partnership with the I M F and the U.S. Treasury. But by
the time he was on the ground in Russia, the tenor of discussion had
changed and he came up against a level of official indifference that shocked
him and pushed him into a more confrontational stance with Washington's
economic establishment.
Seen with hindsight, there is no doubt that Russia marked the beginning of
a new chapter in the evolution of the Chicago School crusade. In earlier
shock therapy laboratories of the seventies and eighties, there had been some
desire at the U.S. Treasury and the I M F to make the experiments at least su­
perficially successful—precisely because they were experiments, meant to
serve as models for other countries to follow. The Latin American dictator­
ships of the seventies were rewarded for their attacks on trade unions and their
open borders with steady loans, which were granted despite such departures
from Chicago School orthodoxy as Chile's continued state control over the
world's largest copper mines and the Argentine junta's slow action on privati­
zations. Bolivia, as the first democracy to adopt shock therapy in the eighties,
was granted aid and had a portion of its debt erased—well before Goni
moved ahead with privatization in the nineties. In Poland, the first Eastern
Bloc country to impose shock therapy, Sachs had no trouble securing sub­
stantial loans, and, once again, major privatizations were slowed and stag­
gered when the original plan encountered strong opposition.
Russia was different. "Too much shock, not enough therapy" was the
widespread verdict. Western powers were totally unyielding in their demand
for the most painful "reforms," at the same time as they were assiduously
stingy in the amount of aid they would offer in return. Even Pinochet had

248

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

cushioned the pain of shock therapy with food programs for the poorest chil­
dren; Washington lenders saw no reason to help Yeltsin do the same, push­
ing the country instead into its Hobbesian nightmare.
Having a substantive discussion about Russia with Sachs isn't easy. I was
hoping to take the conversation beyond his initial defensiveness ("I was right
and they were completely wrong," he told me. Then, "Ask Larry Summers,
don't ask me; ask Bob Rubin, ask Clinton, ask Cheney how happy they were
with the way Russia went"). I also wanted to get beyond the genuine despon­
dency ("I was trying to do something at the time, which proved to be com­
pletely useless"). What I was aiming to understand better was why he was so
unsuccessful in Russia, why Jeffrey Sachs's famous luck ran out at that par­
ticular juncture.
Sachs now says that he knew something was different as soon as he arrived
in Moscow. "I had a sense of foreboding from the first m o m e n t . . . I was fu­
rious from the first moment." Russia was facing "a first-class macroeconomic
crisis, one of the most intense and unstable I had ever seen in my life," he
said. And as far as he was concerned, the way out was clear: the shock ther­
apy measures he had prescribed for Poland "to get basic market forces work­
ing quickly—plus a heck of a lot of aid. I was thinking of $30 billion a year,
roughly divided, $15 billion for Russia and $15 billion for the republics, in
order to be able to pull off a peaceful and democratic transition."
Sachs, it must be said, has a notoriously selective memory when it comes
to the draconian policies he pushed in both Poland and Russia. In our inter­
view, he repeatedly glossed over his own calls for swift privatization and large
cutbacks (in short, shock therapy, a phrase he now disavows, claiming he was
referring only to narrow pricing policies, not wholesale country makeovers).
The way he remembers his role, shock therapy played a minor part, and he
was almost exclusively focused on fund-raising; his plan for Poland, he says,
was a "stabilization fund, debt cancellation, short-term financial help, inte­
gration with the Western European economy. . . . When I was asked by
Yeltsin's team to help them, I proposed basically the same thing."*
There is no debate about the key fact in Sachs's account: securing a major
aid infusion was a central pillar of his plan for Russia —that was Yeltsin's
* A s John Cassidy noted in a 2005 New Yorker profile, "The fact is that in both Poland and
Russia S a c h s favored large-scale social engineering over gradual change and institutionbuilding. The disastrous privatization policy is one example. Although most of the privatiza­
tion took place after S a c h s left Russia, at the end of 1994, the original policy framework was
put in place in 1992 and 1993, when he w a s still there."

THE C A P I T A L I S T ID

249

incentive for submitting to the entire program. Sachs based this vision, he
says, on the Marshall Plan, the $12.6 billion ($130 billion in today's dollars)
that the U.S. allotted for Europe to reconstruct its infrastructure and industry
after the Second World War—a scheme widely regarded as Washington's
3

most successful diplomatic initiative. Sachs says the Marshall Plan showed
that "when a country is in disarray, you can't just expect it to get back up on
its feet in a coherent way by itself. So, for me the interesting thing about the
Marshall Plan . . . is how a modest amount of monetary infusion created a
base for [Europe's] economic recovery to take hold." At the start, he had been
convinced that there was a similar political will in Washington to transform
Russia into a successful capitalist economy, just as there had been a genuine
commitment to West Germany and Japan after the Second World War.
Sachs was confident that he could shake a new Marshall Plan out of the
U.S. Treasury and the IMF, and not without reason. "Probably the most im­
portant economist in the world" is how The New York Times described him
4

in this period. When he was an adviser to Poland's government, he recalled
that he "raised $1 billion in one day in the White House." But, Sachs told
me, "when I suggested the same thing for Russia, there was absolutely no in­
terest at all. None. And the I M F just stared me down like I was crazy."
Although Yeltsin and his Chicago Boys had plenty of admirers in Wash­
ington, no one was willing to come up with the kind of aid they were talking
about. That meant Sachs had urged wrenching policies on Russia, and he
couldn't keep up his end of the bargain. It was in this period that he came
close to self-criticism: "My greatest personal mistake," Sachs said in the midst
of the Russia debacle, "was to say to President Boris Yeltsin, 'Don't worry;
help is on the way.' I believed deeply that the assistance was too important,
and too crucial to the West, for it to be messed up as significantly and funda­
5

mentally as it has been." But the problem wasn't only that the I M F and the
Treasury hadn't listened to Sachs, it was that Sachs had pushed hard for
shock therapy before he had any guarantee that they would—a gamble for
which millions paid dearly.
When I revisited the question with Sachs, he reiterated that his real failing
was in misreading Washington's political mood. He recalled a discussion
with Lawrence Eagleburger, U.S. secretary of state under George H. W.
Bush. Sachs made his case: if Russia was allowed to descend further into eco­
nomic chaos, it could unleash forces no one could control —mass famine,
resurgent nationalism, even fascism, surely unwise in a country where virtu­
ally the only product held in surplus was nuclear arms. "Your analysis may

250

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

be just right, but it's not going to happen," Eagleburger replied. Then he
asked Sachs, "Do you know what year this is?"
It was 1992, the year of the U.S. election in which Bill Clinton was about
to defeat Bush Sr. The core of Clinton's campaign was that Bush had neg­
lected economic hardship at home to pursue glory abroad ("It's the econ­
omy, stupid"). Sachs believes that Russia was a casualty of that domestic
battle. And, he says, he now sees that there was something else at work: many
of Washington's power brokers were still fighting the Cold War. They saw
Russia's economic collapse as a geopolitical victory, the decisive one that en­
sured U.S. supremacy. "I had none of that mind-set," Sachs told me, sound­
ing, as he often does, like a Boy Scout who has stumbled into an episode of
The Sopranos.

"For me it was just, 'Great, this is the final end of this abom­

inable regime. Now, let's really help [the Russians]. Let's throw everything
into it. . . .' I'm sure that in retrospect, in the minds of the policy planners,
that was viewed as crazy."
Despite his failure, Sachs does not feel that the policy toward Russia in this
period was driven by free-market ideology. It was mostly, he said, characterized
by "sheer laziness." He would have welcomed a heated debate about whether
to offer aid to Russia or leave it all to the market. Instead, there was a collective
shrug. He said he was amazed by the absence of serious research and debate
informing momentous decisions. "To me, it was just the lack of effort that was
the dominant thing. Let's at least spend two days and debate this—well, we
never even did that! I never saw the hard work of'Roll up your sleeves, let's get
down and solve these problems, let's figure out what's really going on.' "
When Sachs talks passionately about "hard work," he is harking back to
the days of the New Deal, the Great Society and the Marshall Plan, when
young men from Ivy League schools sat around commanding tables in their
shirt sleeves, surrounded by empty coffee cups and piles of policy papers,
having heated debates about the interest rate and the price of wheat. That is
how policy makers behaved in the heyday of Keynesianism, and that is the
kind of "seriousness" that Russia's catastrophe clearly deserved.
But attributing the abandonment of Russia to a bout of collective laziness
in Washington offers little by way of explanation. Perhaps a better way to un­
derstand the episode is through the lens favored by free-market economists:
competition in the market. When the Cold War was in full swing and the So­
viet Union was intact, the people of the world could choose (at least theoreti­
cally) which ideology they wanted to consume; there were the two poles, and
there was much in between. That meant capitalism had to win customers; it

THE C A P I T A L I S T ID

251

needed to offer incentives; it needed a good product. Keynesianism was al­
ways an expression of that need for capitalism to compete. President Roose­
velt brought in the New Deal not only to address the desperation of the Great
Depression but to undercut a powerful movement of U.S. citizens who, hav­
ing been dealt a savage blow by the unregulated free market, were demanding
a different economic model. Some wanted a radically different one: in the
1932 presidential elections, one million Americans voted for Socialist or
Communist candidates. Growing numbers of Americans were also paying
close attention to Huey Long, the populist senator from Louisiana who be­
lieved that all Americans should receive a guaranteed annual income of
$2,500. Explaining why he had added more social welfare benefits to the
New Deal in 1935, F D R said he wanted to "steal Long's thunder."

6

It was in this context that American industrialists grudgingly accepted
FDR's New Deal. The edges of the market needed to be softened with pub­
lic sector jobs and by making sure no one went hungry—the very future of
capitalism was at stake. During the Cold War, no country in the free world
was immune to this pressure. In fact, the achievements of mid-century capi­
talism, or what Sachs calls "normal" capitalism—workers' protections, pen­
sions, public health care and state support for the poorest citizens in North
America—all grew out of the same pragmatic need to make major conces­
sions in the face of a powerful left.
The Marshall Plan was the ultimate weapon deployed on this economic
front. After the war, the German economy was in crisis, threatening to bring
down the rest of Western Europe. Meanwhile, so many Germans were
drawn to socialism that the U.S. government opted to split Germany into two
parts rather than risk losing it all, either to collapse or to the left. In West Ger­
many, the U.S. government used the Marshall Plan to build a capitalist sys­
tem that was not meant to create fast and easy new markets for Ford and
Sears but, rather, to be so successful on its own terms that Europe's market
economy would thrive and socialism would be drained of its appeal.
By 1949, that meant tolerating from the West German government all
kinds of policies that were positively uncapitalist: direct job creation by the
state, huge investment in the public sector, subsidies for German firms and
strong labour unions. In a move that would have been unthinkable in Russia
in the 1990s or Iraq under U.S. occupation, the U.S. government infuriated
its own corporate sector by imposing a moratorium on foreign investment
so that war-battered German companies would not be forced to compete
before they had recovered. "The feeling was that letting foreign companies

252

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

come in at that point would have been like piracy," I was told by Carolyn
7

Eisenberg, author of an acclaimed history of the Marshall Plan. "The main
difference between now and then is that the U.S. government did not see
Germany as a cash cow. They didn't want to antagonize people. The belief
was that if you come in and start pillaging the place, you interfere with the
recovery of Europe as a whole."
This approach, Eisenberg points out, was not born of altruism. "The Soviet
Union was like a loaded gun. The economy was in crisis, there was a substan­
tial German left, and they [the West] had to win the allegiance of the German
people fast. They really saw themselves battling for the soul of Germany."
Eisenberg's account of the battle of ideologies that created the Marshall
Plan points to a persistent blind spot in Sachs's work, including his recent
laudable efforts to dramatically increase aid spending for Africa. Rarely are
mass popular movements even mentioned. For Sachs, the making of history
is a purely elite affair, a matter of getting the right technocrats settled on the
right policies. Just as shock therapy programs are drafted in secret bunkers in
La Paz and Moscow, so, apparently, should a $30 billion aid program for the
Soviet republics have materialized based solely on the commonsense argu­
ments he was making in Washington. As Eisenberg notes, however, the orig­
inal Marshall Plan came about not out of benevolence, or even reasoned
argument, but fear of popular revolt.
Sachs admires Keynes, but he seems uninterested in what made Keynesianism finally possible in his own country: the messy, militant demands of
trade unionists and socialists whose growing strength turned a more radical so­
lution into a credible threat, which in turn made the New Deal look like an ac­
ceptable compromise. This unwillingness to recognize the role of mass
movements in pressuring reluctant governments to embrace the very ideas he
advocates has had serious ramifications. For one, it meant that Sachs could not
see the most glaring political reality confronting him in Russia: there was
never going to be a Marshall Plan for Russia because there was only ever a
Marshall Plan because

of Russia. When Yeltsin abolished the Soviet Union,

the "loaded gun" that had forced the development of the original plan was dis­
armed. Without it, capitalism was suddenly free to lapse into its most savage
form, not just in Russia but around the world. With the Soviet collapse, the
free market now had a global monopoly, which meant all the "distortions" that
had been interfering with its perfect equilibrium were no longer required.
This was the real tragedy of the promise made to the Poles and Russians —
that if they followed shock therapy they would suddenly wake up in a "normal

THE C A P I T A L I S T ID

253

European country." Those normal European countries (with their strong so­
cial safety nets, workers' protections, powerful trade unions and socialized
health care) emerged as a compromise between Communism and capital­
ism. Now that there was no need for compromise, all those moderating so­
cial policies were under siege in Western Europe, just as they were under
siege in Canada, Australia and the U.S. Such policies were not about to be
introduced in Russia, certainly not subsidized with Western funds.
This liberation from all constraints is, in essence, Chicago School econom­
ics (otherwise known as neoliberalism or, in the U.S., neoconservatism): not
some new invention but capitalism stripped of its Keynesian appendages, cap­
italism in its monopoly phase, a system that has let itself go—that no longer
has to work to keep us as customers, that can be as antisocial, antidemocratic
and boorish as it wants. As long as Communism was a threat, the gentlemen's
agreement that was Keynesianism would live on; once that system lost ground,
all traces of compromise could finally be eradicated, thereby fulfilling the
purist goal Friedman had set out for his movement a half century earlier.
That was the real point of Fukuyama's dramatic "end of history" an­
nouncement at the University of Chicago lecture in 1989: he wasn't actually
claiming that there were no other ideas in the world, but merely that, with
Communism collapsing, there were no other ideas sufficiently powerful to
constitute a head-to-head competitor.
So while Sachs saw the collapse of the Soviet Union as a liberation from au­
thoritarian rule and was ready to roll up his sleeves and start helping, his
Chicago School colleagues saw it as a freedom of a different sort—as the final
liberation from Keynesianism and the do-gooder ideas of men like Jeffrey
Sachs. Seen in that light, the do-nothing attitude that so infuriated Sachs when
it came to Russia was not "sheer laziness" but laissez-faire in action: let it go,
do nothing. By not lifting a finger to help, all the men charged with Russian
policy—from Dick Cheney, as Bush Sr.'s defense secretary, to Lawrence Sum­
mers, Treasury undersecretary, to Stanley Fischer at the IMF—were indeed
doing something: they were practicing pure Chicago School ideology, letting
the market do its worst. Russia, even more than Chile, was what this ideology
looked like in practice, a foreshadowing of the get-rich-or-die-trying dystopia
that many of these same players would create a decade later in Iraq.
The new rules of the game were on display in Washington, D.C., on January
13, 1993. The occasion was a small but important conference, by invitation
only, on the tenth floor of the Carnegie Conference Center on Dupont

254

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Circle, a seven-minute drive from the White House and a stone's throw from
the headquarters of the I M F and the World Bank. John Williamson, the
powerful economist known for shaping the missions of both the bank and the
fund, had convened the event as a historic gathering of the neoliberal tribe.
In attendance was an impressive array of the star "technopols" who were at
the forefront of the campaign to spread the Chicago doctrine throughout the
world. There were present and former finance ministers from Spain, Brazil
and Poland, central bank heads from Turkey and Peru, the chief of staff for
the president of Mexico and a former president of Panama. There was
Sachs's old friend and hero, Leszek Balcerowicz, architect of Poland's shock
therapy, as well as his Harvard colleague Dani Rodrik, the economist who
had proven that every country that had accepted neoliberal restructuring
had been in deep crisis. Anne Krueger, future first deputy managing director
of the IMF, was there, and although José Pinera, Pinochet's most evangelical
minister, couldn't make it because he was trailing in Chile's presidential
election, he sent a detailed paper in his place. Sachs, who was still advising
Yeltsin at the time, was to deliver the keynote address.
All day long, the conference participants had been indulging in that fa­
vorite economists' pastime of strategizing how to get reluctant politicians to
embrace policies that are unpopular with voters. How soon after elections
should shock therapy be launched? Are center-left parties more effective
than right-wing ones because the attack is unexpected? Is it better to warn
the public or take people by surprise with "voodoo politics"? Though the
conference was called "The Political Economy of Policy Reform"—so will­
fully bland a title that it seemed designed to deflect media interest—one par­
ticipant remarked slyly that what it was really about was "Machiavellian
economics."

8

Sachs listened to all this talk for several hours, and after dinner he went to
the podium to give his address, titled, in true Sachsian fashion, "Life in the
9

Economic Emergency Room." He was visibly agitated. The crowd was
ready to hear a speech from one of their idols, the man who had carried the
torch of shock therapy into the democratic era. Sachs was in no mood for
self-congratulation. Instead, he was determined to use the speech, he later
explained to me, to try to get this powerful crowd to grasp the gravity of what
was unfolding in Russia.
He reminded his audience of the infusions of aid that had gone to Europe
and Japan after the Second World War, "vital for Japan's later magnificent

THE C A P I T A L I S T ID

255

success." He told a story about getting a letter from an analyst at the Heritage
Foundation—ground zero of Friedmanism—who "believed strongly in Rus­
sia's reforms but not in foreign aid for Russia. This is a common view of freemarket ideologues—of which I am one," Sachs said. "It is plausible but it is
mistaken. The market cannot do it all by itself; international help is crucial."
The laissez-faire obsession was taking Russia into catastrophe, where, he
said, "no matter how valiant, brilliant, and lucky are Russia's reformers, they
won't make it without large-scale external assistance . . . we are close to miss­
ing a historic opportunity."
Sachs got a round of applause, of course, but the response was tepid. Why
was he praising such lavish social spending? This crowd was on a global cru­
sade to dismantle the New Deal, not to forge a new one. In the conference
sessions that followed, not a single participant supported Sachs's challenge,
and several spoke out against it.
What he was trying to do with the speech, Sachs told me, was "explain
what a real crisis was like . . . to convey a sense of urgency." People who
make policy from Washington, he said, often "don't understand what eco­
nomic chaos is. They don't understand the disarray that comes." He wanted
to confront them with the reality that "there's also a dynamic that things get
farther and farther out of control, until you have other disasters, until Hitler
comes back in power, until you have civil war, or mass famine or whatever it
is. . . . You need to do emergency things to help, because an unstable situa­
tion definitely has a path of increasing instability, not just a path to normal
equilibrium."
I couldn't help thinking that Sachs wasn't giving his audience enough
credit. The people in that room were well versed in Milton Friedman's crisis
theory, and many had applied it in their own countries. Most understood
perfectly how wrenching and volatile an economic meltdown could be, but
they were taking a different lession from Russia: that a painful and disorient­
ing political situation was forcing Yeltsin to rapidly auction off the riches of
the state, a distinctly favorable outcome.
It was left to John Williamson, the host of the conference, to steer the dis­
cussion back to those pragmatic priorities. Sachs was the one with the star
power at the event, but it was Williamson who was the crowd's real guru.
Balding and untelegenic but thrillingly politically incorrect, Williamson
was the one who coined the phrase "the Washington Consensus"—perhaps
the most quoted and contentious three words in modern economics. He is

256

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

famous for his tightly structured closed-door conferences and seminars, each
designed to test one of his bold hypotheses. At the conference in January, he
had a pressing agenda: he wanted to test what he called the "crisis hypothe­
sis" once and for all.

10

In his lecture, Williamson offered no warnings of the imperative to save
any country from crisis; in fact, he spoke rhapsodically of cataclysmic events.
He reminded his audience of the indisputable evidence that only when
countries are truly suffering do they agree to swallow their bitter market med­
icine; only when they are in shock do they lie down for shock therapy.
"These worst of times give rise to the best of opportunities for those who un­
derstand the need for fundamental economic reform," he declared.

11

With his unparalleled knack for verbalizing the subconscious of the fi­
nancial world, Williamson casually pointed out that this raised some intrigu­
ing questions:
One will have to ask whether it could conceivably make sense to think
of deliberately provoking a crisis so as to remove the political logjam to
reform. For example, it has sometimes been suggested in Brazil that it
would be worthwhile stoking up a hyperinflation so as to scare every­
one into accepting those changes. . . . Presumably no one with histor­
ical foresight would have advocated in the mid-1930s that Germany or
Japan go to war in order to get the benefits of the supergrowth that fol­
lowed their defeat. But could a lesser crisis have served the same func­
tion? Is it possible to conceive of a pseudo-crisis that could serve the
same positive function without the cost of a real crisis?

12

Williamson's remarks represented a major leap forward for the shock doc­
trine. In a room filled with enough finance ministers and central bank chiefs
to hold a major trade summit, the idea of actively creating a serious crisis so
that shock therapy could be pushed through was now being openly discussed.
At least one conference participant felt obliged to distance himself in his
own speech from these risqué ideas. "Williamson's suggestion that it might
be a good move to provoke an artificial crisis in order to trigger reform
should best be read as an idea designed to provoke and tease," said John
13

Toye, a British economist from the University of Sussex. There was no evi­
dence that Williamson was teasing. In fact, there was plenty of evidence that
his ideas were already being acted on at the highest levels of financial deci­
sion making in Washington and beyond.

T H E C A P I T A L I S T ID

257

The month after Williamson's conference in Washington, we caught a
glimpse of the new enthusiasm for "pseudo crisis" in my country, although
few understood it as part of a global strategy at the time. In February 1993,
Canada was in the midst of financial catastrophe, or so one would have con­
cluded by reading the newspapers and watching TV. "Debt Crisis Looms,"
screamed a banner front-page headline in the national newspaper, the Globe
and Mail. A major national television special reported that "economists are
predicting that sometime in the next year, maybe two years, the deputy min­
ister of finance is going to walk into cabinet and announce that Canada's
credit has run out. . . . Our lives will change dramatically."

14

The phrase "debt wall" suddenly entered the vocabulary. What it meant
was that, although life seemed comfortable and peaceful now, Canada was
spending so far beyond its means that, very soon, powerful Wall Street firms
like Moody's and Standard and Poor's would downgrade our national credit
rating from its perfect Triple A status to something much lower. When that
happened, hypermobile investors, liberated by the new rules of globalization
and free trade, would simply pull their money from Canada and take it
somewhere safer. The only solution, we were told, was to radically cut spend­
ing on such programs as unemployment insurance and health care. Sure
enough, the governing Liberal Party did just that, despite having just been
elected on a platform of job creation (Canada's version of "voodoo politics").
Two years after the deficit hysteria peaked, the investigative journalist
Linda McQuaig definitively exposed that a sense of crisis had been carefully
stoked and manipulated by a handful of think tanks funded by the largest
banks and corporations in Canada, particularly the C. D. Howe Institute and
the Fraser Institute (which Milton Friedman had always actively and strongly
supported).

15

Canada did have a deficit problem, but it wasn't caused by

spending on unemployment insurance and other social programs. According
to Statistics Canada, it was caused by high interest rates, which exploded the
worth of the debt much as the Volcker Shock had ballooned the developing
world's debt in the eighties. McQuaig went to Moody's Wall Street head of­
fice and spoke with Vincent Truglia, the senior analyst in charge of issuing
Canada's credit rating. He told her something remarkable: that he had come
under constant pressure from Canadian corporate executives and bankers to
issue damning reports about the country's finances, something he refused to
do because he considered Canada an excellent, stable investment. "It's the
only country that I handle where, usually, nationals from that country want

258

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the country downgraded even more —on a regular basis. They think it's
rated too highly." He said he was used to getting calls from country repre­
sentatives telling him he had issued too low a rating. "But Canadians usu­
ally, if anything, disparage their country far more than foreigners do."
That's because, for the Canadian financial community, the "deficit crisis"
was a critical weapon in a pitched political battle. At the time Truglia was get­
ting those strange calls, a major campaign was afoot to push the government
to lower taxes by cutting spending on social programs such as health and ed­
ucation. Since these programs are supported by an overwhelming majority of
Canadians, the only way the cuts could be justified was if the alternative was
national economic collapse—a full-blown crisis. The fact that Moody's kept
giving Canada the highest possible bond rating—the equivalent of an A++—
was making it extremely difficult to maintain the apocalyptic mood.
Investors, meanwhile, were getting confused by the mixed messages:
Moody's was upbeat about Canada, but the Canadian press contantly pre­
sented the national finances as catastrophic. Truglia got so fed up with the
politicized statistics coming out of Canada, which he felt were calling his
own research into question, that he took the extraordinary step of issuing a
"special commentary" clarifying that Canada's spending was "not out of con­
trol," and he even aimed some veiled shots at the dodgy math practiced by
right-wing think tanks. "Several recently published reports have grossly exagger­
ated Canada's fiscal debt position. Some of them have double counted num­
bers, while others have made inappropriate international comparisons. . . .
These inaccurate measurements may have played a role in exaggerated eval­
uations of the severity of Canada's debt problems." With Moody's special re­
port, word was out that there was no looming "debt wall"—and Canada's
business community was not pleased. Truglia says that when he put out the
commentary, "one Canadian . . . from a very large financial institution in
Canada called me up on the telephone screaming at me, literally screaming
at me. That was unique."*

16

By the time Canadians learned that the "deficit crisis" had been grossly
manipulated by the corporate-funded think tanks, it hardly mattered—the
budget cuts had already been made and locked in. As a direct result, social
programs for the country's unemployed were radically eroded and have never
recovered, despite many subsequent surplus budgets. The crisis strategy was
* It must be said that Truglia is a rarity on Wall Street—bond and credit ratings are often
influenced by political pressure, and are used to increase the pressure to enact "market
reforms."

T H E C A P I T A L I S T ID

259

used again and again in this period. In September 1995, a video was leaked to
the Canadian press of John Snobelen, Ontario's minister of education, telling
a closed-door meeting of civil servants that before cuts to education and other
unpopular reforms could be announced, a climate of panic needed to be cre­
ated by leaking information that painted a more dire picture than he "would
be inclined to talk about." He called it "creating a useful crisis."

17

"Statistical Malpractice" in Washington
By 1995, political discourse in most Western democracies was saturated with
talk of debt walls and imminent economic collapse, demanding ever-deeper
cuts and more ambitious privatizations, with the Friedmanite think tanks al­
ways out front crying crisis. At Washington's most powerful financial institu­
tions, however, there was a willingness not only to create an appearance of
crisis through the media but also to take concrete measures to generate crises
that were all too real. Two years after Williamson made his observations about
"stoking up" crisis, Michael Bruno, chief economist of development eco­
nomics at the World Bank, publicly echoed the same line, once again without
attracting media scrutiny. In a lecture to the International Economic Associ­
ation in Tunis in 1995, later published as a paper by the World Bank, Bruno
informed five hundred assembled economists from sixty-eight countries that
there was a growing consensus about "the idea that a large enough crisis may
shock otherwise

reluctant

policymakers into

instituting

productivity-

18

enhancing reforms."* Bruno pointed to Latin America as "a prime example
of seemingly beneficial deep crises" and to Argentina in particular, where, he
said, President Carlos Menem and his finance minister, Domingo Cavallo,
were doing a fine job of "taking advantage of the emergency atmosphere" to
push through deep privatization. Just in case the audience missed the point,
Bruno said, "I have emphasized one major theme: the political economy of
deep crises tends to yield radical reforms with positive outcomes."
In light of this fact, he argued that international agencies needed to do
more than just take advantage of existing economic crises to push through
the Washington Consensus—they needed to preemptively cut off aid to
make those crises worse. "An adverse shock (such as a drop in government

* Though Bruno did not attend the University of Chicago, he studied under and w a s mentored
by the prominent Chicagoan Don Patinkin, quoted earlier comparing Chicago economics to
Marxism for its "logical completeness."

260

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

revenue or in external transfers) may actually increase welfare because it
shortens the delay [before reforms are adopted]. The notion that 'things have
to get worse before they can get better' emerges naturally. . . . In fact, a highinflation crisis may leave a country better off than if it had muddled along
through less severe crises."
Bruno conceded that deepening or creating a serious economic melt­
down was frightening—government salaries would go unpaid, public infra­
structure would rot—but, Chicago disciple that he was, he urged his
audience to embrace this destruction as the first stage of creation. "Indeed,
as the crisis deepens the government

may gradually

wither away," Bruno

said. "This development has a positive outcome; namely, at the time of re­
form the power of entrenched groups may have been weakened—and a
leader who opts for the long-run solution over short-term expediency may
win support for reform."

19

The Chicago School crisis addicts were certainly on a speedy intellectual
trajectory. Only a few years earlier, they had speculated that a hyperinflation
crisis could create the shocking conditions required for shock policies. Now
a chief economist at the World Bank, an institution funded, by this time,
with tax dollars from 178 countries and whose mandate was to rebuild and
strengthen struggling economies, was advocating the creation of failed states
because of the opportunities they provided to start over in the rubble.

20

For years, there had been rumors that the international financial institutions
had been dabbling in the art of "pseudo-crisis," as Williamson put it, in order
to bend countries to their will, but it was difficult to prove. The most exten­
sive testimony came from Davison Budhoo, an I M F staffer turned whistleblower, who accused the organization of cooking the books in order to doom
the economy of a poor but strong-willed country.
Budhoo was a Grenadian-born, London School of Economics-trained
economist who stood out in Washington thanks to an unconventional ap­
proach to personal style: he let his hair stand straight on end, à la Albert Ein­
stein, and preferred the windbreaker to the pinstripe suit. He had worked at
the I M F for twelve years, where his job was designing structural adjustment
programs for Africa, Latin America and his native Caribbean. After the orga­
nization took its sharp right turn during the Reagan/Thatcher era, the inde­
pendent-minded Budhoo felt increasingly ill at ease in his place of work. The
fund was packed with zealous Chicago Boys under the leadership of its man­
aging director, the staunch neoliberal Michel Camdessus. When Budhoo

THE C A P I T A L I S T ID

261

quit in 1988, he decided to devote himself to exposing the secrets of his former
workplace. It began when he wrote a remarkable open letter to Camdessus,
adopting the j'accuse tone of André Gunder Frank's letters to Friedman a de­
cade earlier.
Showing an enthusiasm for language rare for senior fund economists, the
letter began: "Today I resigned from the staff of the International Monetary
Fund after over twelve years, and after 1000 days of official Fund work in the
field, hawking your medicine and your bag of tricks to governments and to
peoples in Latin America and the Caribbean and Africa. To me resignation
is a priceless liberation, for with it I have taken the first big step to that place
where I may hope to wash my hands of what in my mind's eye is the blood of
millions of poor and starving peoples. . . . The blood is so much, you know,
it runs in rivers. It dries up, too; it cakes all over me; sometimes I feel that
there is not enough soap in the whole world to cleanse me from the things
that I did do in your name."

21

He then went on to build his case. Budhoo accused the fund of using sta­
tistics as "lethal" weapons. He exhaustively documented how, as a fund em­
ployee in the mid-eighties, he was involved in elaborate "statistical
malpractices" to exaggerate the numbers in I M F reports on oil-rich Trinidad
and Tobago in order to make the country look far less stable than it actually
was. Budhoo contended that the I M F had more than doubled a crucial sta­
tistic measuring the labor costs in the country, making it appear highly
unproductive —even though, as he said, the fund had the correct informa­
tion on hand. In another instance, he claimed that the fund "invented, liter­
ally out of the blue," huge unpaid government debts.

22

Those "gross irregularities," which Budhoo claims were deliberate and
not mere "sloppy calculations," were taken as fact by the financial markets,
which promptly classified Trinidad as a bad risk and cut off its financing.
The country's economic problems—triggered by a drop in the price of oil, its
primary export—quickly became calamitous, and it was forced to beg the
IMF for a bailout. The fund then demanded that it accept what Budhoo
described as the IMF's "deadliest medicine": layoffs, wage cuts and the
"whole gamut" of structural adjustment policies. He described the process as
the "deliberate blocking of an economic lifeline to the country through sub­
terfuge" in order to see "Trinidad and Tobago destroyed economically first,
and converted thereafter."
In his letter, Budhoo, who died in 2001, made it clear that his dispute was
over more than the treatment of one country by a handful of officials. He

262

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

characterized the IMF's entire program of structural adjustment as a form of
mass torture in which " 'screaming-in-pain' governments and peoples [are]
forced to bend on their knees before us, broken and terrified and disintegrat­
ing, and begging for a sliver of reasonableness and decency on our part. But
we laugh cruelly in their face, and the torture goes on unabated."
After the letter was published, the government of Trinidad commissioned
two independent studies to investigate the allegations and found that they
were correct: the I M F had inflated and fabricated numbers, with tremen­
dously damaging results for the country.

23

Even with this substantiation, however, Budhoo's explosive allegations
disappeared virtually without a trace; Trinidad and Tobago is a collection of
tiny islands off the coast of Venezuela, and unless its people storm the head­
quarters of the I M F on Nineteenth Street, its complaints are unlikely to cap­
ture world attention. The letter was, however, turned into a play in 1996
called Mr. Budhoo's
Enough),

Letter of Resignation

from the Î.M.F.

(SO Years Is

put on in a small theater in New York's East Village. The produc­

tion received a surprisingly positive review in The New York Times, which
24

praised its "uncommon creativity" and "inventive props." The short theater
review was the only time Budhoo's name was ever mentioned in The New
York Times.

CHAPTER

13

LET IT BURN
THE LOOTING OF A S I A A N D " T H E FALL
OF A S E C O N D B E R L I N W A L L "

M o n e y flows to where opportunity is, a n d , right now, A s i a a p p e a r s
to be cheap.
—Gerard S m i t h , a financial institutions b a n k e r at U B S Securities in
N e w York, on the A s i a n e c o n o m i c crisis of 1 9 9 7 - 9 8

1

Good times m a k e bad policy.
—Mohammad
Suharto

Sadli,

economic

adviser

to

Indonesia's

General

2

They seemed like simple questions. What can your salary buy? Is it enough
for room and board? Is there any left over to send money back to your par­
ents? How about transportation costs to and from the factory? But no matter
how I phrased them, the answers I kept getting were "It depends." Or "I don't
know."
"A few months ago," a seventeen-year-old worker who sewed Gap cloth­
ing near Manila explained, "I used to have enough money to send a little bit
home to my family every month, but now I don't even make enough to buy
food for myself."
"Are they lowering your wages?" I asked.
"No, I don't think so," she said, a little confused. "It just doesn't buy as
much. The prices keep rising."
It was the summer of 1997, and I was in Asia researching the working con­
ditions inside the region's booming export factories. I found workers facing a
problem bigger than forced overtime or abusive supervisors: their countries

264

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

were rapidly falling into what would soon become a full-fledged depression.
In Indonesia, where the crisis was even deeper, the atmosphere felt danger­
ously volatile. The Indonesian currency dropped between morning and
nightfall over and over and again. One day factory workers could buy fish
and rice, and the next day they were subsisting on rice alone. In casual con­
versations at restaurants and in taxis, everyone seemed to have the same the­
ory about who was to blame: "the Chinese," I was told. It was ethnic Chinese
people, as Indonesia's merchant class, who seemed to be profiting most di­
rectly from the rising prices, and so they were bearing the brunt of the anger.
This is what Keynes had meant when he warned of the dangers of economic
chaos—you never know what combination of rage, racism and revolution
will be unleashed.
Southeast Asian countries were particularly vulnerable to conspiracy the­
ories and ethnic scapegoating because, on the face of it, the financial crisis
had no rational cause. On television and in newspapers, analysis kept refer­
ring to the region as if it had contracted some mysterious but highly conta­
gious disease —"the Asian Flu," as the market crash was immediately
labeled, later upgraded to "the Asian Contagion" when it spread to Latin
America and Russia.
Just weeks before it all went wrong, these countries were being held up as
paragons of economic fitness and vitality—the so-called Asian Tigers, glob­
alization's most robust success stories. One minute, stockbrokers were telling
their clients that there was no surer route to wealth than sinking your savings
in Asian "emerging market" mutual funds; the next they were cashing out in
droves, while traders "attacked" the currencies—the baht, the ringgit, the
rupiah—creating what The Economist

called "a destruction of savings on a
3

scale more usually associated with a full-scale war." And yet, within Asia's
Tiger economies, nothing observable had changed—for the most part, they
were still run by the same crony elite; they had not been hit by a natural dis­
aster or war; they were not running large deficits —some had none at all.
Many large conglomerates were carrying heavy debts, but they were still pro­
ducing everything from sneakers to cars, and their sales were as strong as
ever. So how was it possible that, in 1996, investors had seen fit to pour $100
billion into South Korea and then, the very next year, the country had a neg­
4

ative investment of $20 billion—a discrepancy of $120 billion? What could
explain this kind of monetary whiplash?
It turned out that the countries were victims of pure panic, made lethal by
the speed and volatility of globalized markets. What began as a rumor—that

LET IT B U R N

265

Thailand did not have enough dollars to back up its currency—triggered a
stampede by the electronic herd. Banks called in their loans, and the real es­
tate market, which had been growing so quickly that it had become a bub­
ble, promptly popped. Construction ground to a halt on half-built malls,
skyscrapers and resorts; motionless construction cranes loomed over
Bangkok's crowded skyline. In a slower era of capitalism, the crisis might
have stopped there, but because mutual fund brokers had marketed the
Asian Tigers as part of a single investment package, when one Tiger went
down, they all did: after Thailand, panic spread and money fled from In­
donesia, Malaysia, the Philippines and even South Korea, the eleventhlargest economy in the world and a star in the globalization firmament.
Asian governments were forced to drain their reserve banks in an effort to
prop up their currencies, turning the original fear into a reality: now these
countries really were going broke. The market responded with more panic.
In one year, $600 billion had disappeared from the stock markets of Asia —
wealth that had taken decades to build.

5

The crisis provoked desperate measures. In Indonesia, impoverished citi­
zens stormed urban stores and took what they could carry. In one particu­
larly horrific incident, a Jakarta shopping mall caught fire while it was being
looted, and hundreds of people were burned alive.

6

In South Korea, television stations ran a massive campaign calling on cit­
izens to donate their gold jewelry so that it could be melted down and used
to pay off the country's debts. In just a few weeks, 3 million people had
handed over necklaces, earrings, sports medals and trophies. At least one
woman donated her wedding ring, and a cardinal donated his golden cross.
The television stations ran kitschy give-away-your-gold game shows, but even
with two hundred tons of gold collected, enough to drive down the world
price, Korea's currency continued to plummet.

7

As had happened during the Great Depression, the crisis led to a wave of
suicides as families saw their life savings disappear and tens of thousands of
small businesses shut their doors. In South Korea, the suicide rate went up
by 50 percent in 1998. The spike was steepest among people over sixty, with
older parents attempting to lessen the economic burden on their struggling
children. The Korean press also reported an alarming increase in family sui­
cide pacts in which fathers led their debt-ridden households in group hang­
ings. Authorities pointed out that since "only the [family] leader's death is
classified as suicide while the rest are listed as murders, the actual number of
suicides is far higher than the statistics released."

8

266

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Asia's crisis was caused by a classic fear cycle, and the only move that
might have arrested it was the same one that had rescued Mexico's currency
during the so-called Tequila Crisis of 1994: a quick, decisive loan—proof to
9

the market that the U.S. Treasury would simply not let Mexico fail. No such
timely move was forthcoming for Asia. In fact, as soon as the crisis hit, a sur­
prising array of heavy hitters from the financial establishment stepped for­
ward with a unified message: Don't help Asia.
Milton Friedman himself, now in his mid-eighties, made a rare appearance
on CNN to tell the news anchor Lou Dobbs that he opposed any kind of
bailout and that the market should be left to correct itself. "Well, Professor, I
can't tell you what it means to have your support in this semantic discussion,"
said an embarassingly starstruck Dobbs. The let-them-sink position was echoed
by Friedman's old friend Walter Wriston, former head of Citibank, and George
Shultz, now working alongside Friedman at the right-wing Hoover Institution
and a board member at the brokerage house Charles Schwab.

10

The view was openly shared by one of Wall Street's premier investment
banks, Morgan Stanley. Jay Pelosky, the firm's hotshot emerging-market
strategist, told a conference in Los Angeles hosted by the Milken Institute (of
junk bonds fame) that it was imperative that the I M F and the U.S. Treasury
do nothing to lessen the pain of a crisis of 1930s proportions. "What we need
now in Asia is more bad news. Bad news is needed to keep stimulating the
adjustment process," Pelosky said.

11

The Clinton administration took its cue from Wall Street. When the Asia
Pacific Economic Cooperation Summit was held in November 1997 in Van­
couver, four months into the crash, Bill Clinton enraged his Asian counter­
parts by dismissing what they viewed as an economic apocalypse as "a few
12

little glitches in the road." The message was clear: the U.S. Treasury was in
no rush to stop the pain. As for the IMF, the world body created to prevent
crashes like this one, it took the do-nothing approach that had become its
trademark since Russia. It did, eventually, respond—but not with the sort of
fast, emergency stabilization loan that a purely financial crisis demanded.
Instead, it came up with a long list of demands, pumped up by the Chicago
School certainty that Asia's catastrophe was an opportunity in disguise.
Back in the early nineties, whenever advocates of free trade wanted a persua­
sive success story to invoke in debates, they invariably pointed to the Asian
Tigers. These were the miracle economies that were growing by leaps and
bounds, supposedly because they had flung open their borders to unrestricted

LET IT B U R N

267

globalization. It was a useful story—the Tigers were certainly developing
with whirlwind speed—but to suggest that their expansion was based on free
trade was fiction. Malaysia, South Korea and Thailand still had highly pro­
tectionist policies that barred foreigners from owning land and from buying
out national firms. They had also maintained a significant role for the state,
keeping sectors like energy and transportation in public hands. The Tigers
had also blocked many foreign imports from Japan, Europe and North
America, as they built up their own domestic markets. They were economic
success stories unquestionably, but ones that proved that mixed, managed
economies grew faster and more equitably than those following the Wild
West Washington Consensus.
The situation did not please Western and Japanese investment banks and
multinational firms; watching Asia's consumer market explode, they under­
standably longed for unfettered access to the region to sell their products.
They also wanted the right to buy up the best of the Tigers' corporations—
particularly Korea's impressive conglomerates like Daewoo, Hyundai, Sam­
sung and L G . In the mid-nineties, under pressure from the I M F and the
newly created World Trade Organization, Asian governments agreed to split
the difference: they would maintain the laws that protected national firms
from foreign ownership and resist pressure to privatize their key state compa­
nies, but they would lift barriers to their financial sectors, allowing a surge of
paper investing and currency trading.
In 1997, when the flood of hot money suddenly reversed current in Asia,
it was a direct result of this kind of speculative investment, which was legal­
ized only because of Western pressure. Wall Street, of course, didn't see it
that way. Top investment analysts instantly recognized the crisis as the
chance to level the remaining barriers protecting Asia's markets once and for
all. Pelosky, the Morgan Stanley strategist, was particularly forthright about
the logic: if the crisis was left to worsen, all foreign currency would be
drained from the region and Asian-owned companies would have either to
close down or to sell themselves to Western firms—both beneficial outcomes
for Morgan Stanley. "I'd like to see closure of companies and asset sales. . . .
Asset sales are very difficult; typically owners don't want to sell unless they're
forced to. Therefore, we need more bad news to continue to put the pressure
on these corporates to sell their companies."

13

Some saw the breaking of Asia in even grander terms. José Pinera,
Pinochet's star minister who was now working at the Cato Institute in Wash­
ington, D.C., greeted the crisis with undisguised glee, pronouncing that "the

268

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

day of reckoning has arrived." In Pinera's eyes, the crisis was the latest chap­
ter in the war that he and his fellow Chicago Boys had started in Chile in the
seventies. The fall of the Tigers, he said, represented nothing less than "the
fall of a second Berlin Wall," the collapse of "the notion that there is a 'Third
Way' between free-market democratic capitalism and socialist statism."

14

Pinera's was not a fringe perspective. It was openly shared by Alan
Greenspan, chairman of the U.S. Federal Reserve and probably the single
most powerful economic policy maker in the world. Greenspan described
the crisis as "a very dramatic event towards a consensus of the type of market
system which we have in this country." He also observed that "the current
crisis is likely to accelerate the dismantling in many Asian countries of the
remnants of a system with large elements of government-directed invest­
15

ment." In other words, the destruction of Asia's managed economy was ac­
tually a process of creating a new American-style economy—birth pangs for
a new Asia, to borrow a phrase that would be used in an even more violent
context a few years later.
Michel Camdessus, who as head of the I M F was arguably the world's sec­
ond most powerful monetary policy maker, expressed a similar view. In a
rare interview, he spoke of the crisis as an opportunity for Asia to shed its old
skin and be born anew. "Economic models are not eternal," he said. "There
are times when they are useful and other times. . . where they become out­
16

dated and must be abandoned." The crisis sparked by a rumor that turned
fiction into fact apparently provided such a time.
Eager not to let this opportunity slip by, the IMF—after months of doing
nothing while the emergency worsened —finally entered into negotiations
with the ailing governments of Asia. The only country to resist the fund in
this period was Malaysia, thanks to its relatively small debt. Malaysia's con­
troversial prime minister, Mahathir Mohamad, said that he did not think he
should have to "destroy the economy in order that it should become better,"
17

which was enough to brand him as a raving radical at the time. The rest of
Asia's crisis-struck economies were too desperate for foreign currency to re­
fuse the possibility of tens of billions in I M F loans: Thailand, the Philip­
pines, Indonesia and South Korea all came to the table. "You can't force a
country to ask you for help. It has to ask. But when it's out of money, it hasn't
got many places to turn," said Stanley Fischer, who was in charge of the talks
for the I M F .

18

Fischer had been one of the most vocal advocates of shock therapy in
Russia, and despite the harrowing human costs there, his attitude was just as

LET IT B U R N

269

unyielding in Asia. Several governments suggested that since the crisis was
caused by the ease with which money could gush in and out of their coun­
tries with nothing to slow down the flow, perhaps it made sense to put some
barriers back up—the dreaded "capital controls." China had kept its controls
up (ignoring Friedman's advice in this regard), and it was the only country in
the region that was not being ravaged by the crisis. And Malaysia had put
controls back up, and they seemed to be working.
Fischer and the rest of the I M F team dismissed the idea out of hand.

19

The I M F displayed no interest in what had actually caused the crisis. In­
stead, like a prison interrogator looking for a weakness, the fund was exclu­
sively focused on how the crisis could be used as leverage. The meltdown
had forced a group of strong-willed countries to beg for mercy; to fail to take
advantage of that window of opportunity was, for the Chicago School econ­
omists running the IMF, tantamount to professional negligence.
With their treasuries empty, the Tigers were, as far as the I M F was con­
cerned, broken; now they were primed to be remade. The first stage of this
process was to strip the countries of all the "trade and investment protection­
ism and activist state intervention that were the key ingredients of the 'Asian
20

miracle,' " as the political scientist Walden Bello put it. The I M F also de­
manded that the governments make deep budget cuts, leading to mass lay­
offs of public sector workers in countries where people were already taking
their own lives in record numbers. Fischer admitted after the fact that the
IMF had concluded that in Korea and Indonesia, the crisis was unrelated to
government overspending. Nonetheless, he used the extraordinary leverage
granted by the crisis to extract these painful austerity measures. As one New
York Times reporter wrote, the IMF's actions were "like a heart surgeon who,
in the middle of an operation, decides to do some work on the lungs and kid­
neys, too."*

21

After the I M F had stripped the Tigers of their old habits and ways, they
were now ready to be reborn, Chicago-style: privatized basic services, inde­
pendent central banks, "flexible" workforces, low social spending and, of
* The IMF is often portrayed a s a puppet of the U.S. Treasury, but rarely have the strings been
as clearly visible a s during these negotiations. To make sure the interests of U.S. firms were
reflected in the final agreements, David Lipton, U.S. Treasury undersecretary for interna­
tional affairs (and Sachs's former partner for Poland's shock therapy program), flew to South
Korea and checked into the Seoul Hilton—the hotel where the negotiations between the I M F
and the Korean government were taking place. Lipton's presence w a s , according to The
Washington Post's Paul Blustein, "a visible manifestation of the influence the United States
wields over IMF policy."

270

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

course, total free trade. According to the new agreements, Thailand would al­
low foreigners to own large stakes in its banks, Indonesia would cut food sub­
sidies, and Korea would lift its law protecting workers against mass layoffs.

22

The I M F even set strict layoff targets in Korea: in order to get the loan, the
country's banking sector needed to shed 50 percent of its workforce (later low­
23

ered to 30 percent). This kind of demand was crucial for many Western
multinationals who wanted assurances that they could radically downsize the
Asian firms they were about to buy. Pinera's "Berlin Wall" was falling down.
Such measures would have been unthinkable a year before the crisis hit,
when South Korea's trade unions had been at their peak of militancy. They
had greeted a proposed new labor law that would have reduced job security
with the largest and most radical series of strikes in South Korea's history.
But, thanks to the crisis, the rules of the game had changed. The economic
meltdown was so dire that it gave governments the license (as similar crises
had from Bolivia to Russia) to declare temporary authoritarian rule; it didn't
last long—just long enough to impose the I M F decrees.
Thailand's shock therapy package, for instance, was pushed through the
National Assembly not in a normal process of debate but as a result of four
emergency decrees. "We have lost our autonomy, our ability to determine our
macroeconomic policy. This is unfortunate," conceded Thailand's deputy
premier, Supachai Panitchpakdi (later rewarded for this kind of cooperative
attitude by being named head of the W T O ) .

24

In South Korea, the I M F sub­

version of democracy was even more overt. There, the end of the I M F negoti­
ations coincided with scheduled presidential elections in which two of the
candidates were running on anti-IMF platforms. In an extraordinary act of in­
terference with a sovereign nation's political process, the I M F refused to re­
lease the money until it had commitments from all four main candidates that
they would stick to the new rules if they won. With the country effectively
held at ransom, the I M F was triumphant: each candidate pledged his support
25

in writing. Never before had the central Chicago School mission to protect
economic matters from the reach of democracy been more explicit: you can
vote, South Koreans were told, but your vote can have no bearing on the
managing and organization of the economy. (The day the deal was signed
was instantly dubbed Korea's "National Humiliation Day.")

26

In one of the worst-hit countries, such acts of democracy containment
were not required. Indonesia, first in the region to fling open its doors to dereg­
ulated foreign investment, was still under the control of General Suharto,

LET IT B U R N

271

after more than thirty years. Suharto, however, had become less compliant
with the West in his old age (as dictators often do). After decades of selling off
Indonesia's oil and mineral wealth to foreign corporations, he had grown
bored with enriching others and had spent the previous decade or so taking
care of himself, his children and his golfing buddies. For instance, the gen­
eral had given heavy subsidies to a car company—owned by his son
Tommy—much to the consternation of Ford and Toyota, who saw no reason
why they should have to compete with what analysts called "Tommy's toys."

27

For a few months, Suharto tried to resist the IMF, issuing a budget that
did not contain the massive cuts it was demanding. The fund fought back by
increasing the pain levels. Officially, I M F representatives are not allowed to
talk to the press during a negotiation since the slightest indication of how
talks are going can dramatically influence the market. That didn't stop an
unnamed "senior I M F official" from telling The Washington

Post that "the

markets are asking themselves the question of just how much the senior In­
donesian leadership is committed to this program, and particularly to the
major reform measures." The article went on to predict that the I M F would
punish Indonesia by withholding billions in promised loans. As soon as it ap­
peared, Indonesia's currency fell through the floor, losing 25 percent of its
value in a single day.

28

With that massive blow, Suharto gave in. "Can someone find me an econ­
omist who knows what's going on?" Indonesia's foreign minister reportedly
pleaded.

29

Suharto found such an economist; in fact, he found several.

Guaranteeing that the final I M F negotiations would go smoothly, he
brought back the Berkeley Mafia who, after playing such a central role in the
early days of his regime, had lost their influence with the aging general. After
years in the political wilderness, they were once again in charge, with Widjojo Nitisastro, now seventy years old and known in Indonesia as "the dean of
the Berkeley Mafia," heading up the negotiations. "When times are good,
Widjojo and the economists are put in an obscure corner and President
Suharto speaks to the cronies," explained Mohammad Sadli, a former Suharto
minister. "The technocrat group is at its best in times of crisis. Suharto lis­
tens to them more for the time being and he orders the other ministers to
30

shut up." Talks with the I M F now took a distinctly more collégial tone,
more "like intellectual discussions. No pressure from one side on the other,"
explained a member of Widjojo's team. Naturally, the I M F got almost every­
thing it wanted —140 "adjustments" in all.

31

272

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

The Reveal
As far as the I M F was concerned, the crisis was going extremely well. In less
than a year, it had negotiated the economic equivalent of extreme makeovers
for Thailand, Indonesia, South Korea and the Philippines.

32

It was finally

ready for the defining moment in every makeover drama: the Reveal, the mo­
ment when the nipped-and-tucked, coached-and-buffed subject is unveiled
to the awestruck public —in this case, the global stock and currency markets.
If all had gone smoothly, when the I M F pulled back the curtain on its
newest creations, the hot money that had fled Asia the previous year would
have come rushing back in to buy up the Tigers' now irresistible stocks,
bonds and currencies. Something else happened; the market panicked. The
reasoning went like this: if the fund thought that the Tigers were such hope­
less cases that they needed to be remade from scratch, then Asia was obvi­
ously in much worse shape than anyone had previously feared.
So rather than rushing back, traders responded to the IMF's big Reveal by
promptly yanking out even more money and further attacking Asia's curren­
cies. Korea was losing $1 billion a day and its debt was downgraded to junk
bond status. The IMF's "help" had turned crisis into catastrophe. Or, as Jeffrey
Sachs, now in open warfare with the international financial institutions, put it,
"Instead of dousing the fire, the I M F in effect screamed fire in the theatre."

33

The human costs of the IMF's opportunism were nearly as devastating in
Asia as in Russia. The International Labor Organization estimates that a
staggering 24 million people lost their jobs in this period and that Indone­
sia's unemployment rate increased from 4 to 12 percent. Thailand was losing
2,000 jobs a day at the height of the "reforms" —60,000 a month. In South
Korea, 300,000 workers were fired every month—largely the result of the
IMF's totally unnecessary demands to slash government budgets and hike
interest rates. By 1999, South Korea's and Indonesia's unemployment rates
had nearly tripled in only two years. As in Latin America in the seventies,
what disappeared in these parts of Asia was what was so remarkable about the
region's "miracle" in the first place: its large and growing middle class. In
1996, 63.7 percent of South Koreans identified as middle class; by 1999 that
number was down to 38.4 percent. According to the World Bank, 20 million
Asians were thrown into poverty in this period of what Rodolfo Walsh would
have called "planned misery."

34

Behind every statistic was a story of wrenching sacrifice and degraded de­
cisions. As is always the case, women and children suffered the worst of the

LET IT B U R N

273

crisis. Many rural families in the Philippines and South Korea sold their
daughters to human traffickers who took them to work in the sex trade in
Australia, Europe and North America. In Thailand, public health officials
reported a 20 percent increase in child prostitution in just one year—the
year after the I M F reforms. The Philippines tracked the same trend. "It was
the rich who benefited from the boom, but we the poor pay the price of the
crisis," said Khun Bunjan, a community leader in northeast Thailand who
was forced to send her children to work as scavengers after her husband lost
his factory job. "Even our limited access to schools and health [care] is now
beginning to disappear."

35

It was in this context that the U.S. secretary of state, Madeleine Albright,
visited Thailand in March 1999 and saw fit to scold the Thai public for turn­
ing to prostitution and the "dead end of drugs." It is "essential that girls not be
exploited and abused and exposed to AIDS. It's very important to fight back,"
Albright said, filled with moral resolve. She apparently saw no connection be­
tween the fact that so many Thai girls were being forced into the sex trade
and the austerity policies for which she expressed her "strong support" on the
same trip. It was the Asian financial crisis's equivalent of Milton Friedman ex­
pressing his displeasure with Pinochet's or Deng Xiaoping's human rights vi­
olations while praising their bold embrace of economic shock therapy.

36

F e e d i n g Off t h e R u i n s

The story of Asia's crisis usually ends there—the I M F tried to help; it didn't
work. Even the IMF's own internal audit came to that conclusion. The
fund's Independent Evaluation Office concluded that the structural adjust­
ment demands were "ill-advised" and "broader than seemed necessary" as
well as "not critical to resolving the crisis." It also warned that "crisis should
not be used as an opportunity to seek a long agenda of reforms just because
leverage is high, irrespective of how justifiable they may be on merits."* A
particularly forceful section of the internal report accused the fund of being
so blinded by free-market ideology that even considering capital controls was
institutionally unimaginable. "If it was heresy to suggest that financial mar­
kets were not distributing world capital in a rational and stable way, then it
was a mortal sin to contemplate" capital controls.

37

* For some reason, that highly critical report did not come out until 2003, five years after the
crisis. By then, it w a s a little late to be issuing warnings against crisis opportunism; the I M F
was already structurally adjusting Afghanistan and drawing up plans for Iraq.

274

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

What few were willing to admit at the time is that, while the I M F cer­
tainly failed the people of Asia, it did not fail Wall Street—far from it. The
hot money may have been spooked by the IMF's drastic measures, but the
large investment houses and multinational firms were emboldened. "Of
course these markets are highly volatile," said Jerome Booth, head of re­
search at London's Ashmore Investment Management. "That's what makes
38

them fun." These fun-seeking firms understood that as a result of the IMF's
"adjustments," pretty much everything in Asia was now up for sale—and the
more the market panicked, the more desperate Asian companies would be to
sell, pushing their prices through the floor. Morgan Stanley's Jay Pelosky had
said that what Asia needed was "more bad news to continue to put pressure
on these corporates to sell their companies"—and that's exactly what hap­
pened, thanks to the IMF.
Whether the I M F planned the deepening of Asia's crisis or was merely
recklessly indifferent remains a subject of debate. Perhaps the most charita­
ble interpretation is that the fund knew it could not lose: if its adjustments
inflated another bubble in emerging-market stocks, that would be a boon; if
they sparked more capital flight, it would be a bonanza for vulture capital­
ists. Either way, the I M F was comfortable enough with the possibility of to­
tal meltdown to be willing to roll the dice. It's now clear who won the
gamble.
Two months after the I M F came to its final agreement with South Korea,
The Wall Street Journal ran an article headlined "Wall Street Scavenging in
Asia-Pacific." It reported that Pelosky's firm, as well as several other promi­
nent houses, had "dispatched armies of bankers to the Asia-Pacific region to
scout for brokerage firms, asset management firms and even banks that they
can snap up at bargain prices. The hunt for Asian acquisitions is urgent be­
cause many U.S. securities firms, led by Merrill Lynch & Co. and Morgan
39

Stanley, have made overseas expansion their priority." In short order, sev­
eral major sales went through: Merrill Lynch bought Japan's Yamaichi Se­
curities as well as Thailand's largest securities firm, while AIG bought
Bangkok Investment for a fraction of its worth. JP Morgan bought a stake in
Kia Motors, while Travelers Group and Salomon Smith Barney bought one
of Korea's largest textile companies as well as several other companies. Inter­
estingly, the chair of Salomon Smith Barney's International Advisory Board,
which was providing advice to the company on mergers and acquisitions in
this period, was Donald Rumsfeld (appointed in May 1999). Dick Cheney
was also on the board. Another winner was the Carlyle Group, the secretive

LET IT B U R N

275

Washington-based firm known for being the preferred soft landing for expresidents and ministers, from former secretary of state James Baker, to for­
mer U.K. prime minister John Major, to Bush Sr., who served as a consultant.
Carlyle used its top-level connections to snap up Daewoo's telecom division,
Ssangyong Information and Communication (one of Korea's largest high­
tech firms), and it became a major shareholder in one of Korea's largest
banks.

40

Jeffrey Garten, former U.S. undersecretary of commerce, had predicted
that when the I M F was finished, "there is going to be a significantly different
Asia, and it will be an Asia in which American firms have achieved much
41

deeper penetration, much greater access." He wasn't kidding. Within two
years, the face of much of Asia was utterly transformed, with hundreds of lo­
cal brands replaced by multinational giants. It was dubbed "the world's
biggest going-out-of-business sale," by The New York Times, and a "business412

buying bazaar" by BusinessWeek.

In fact, it was a preview of the kind of dis­

aster capitalism that would become the market norm after September 11: a
terrible tragedy was exploited to allow foreign firms to storm Asia. They were
there not to build their own businesses and compete but to snap up the en­
tire apparatus, workforce, customer base and brand value built over decades
by Korean companies, often to break them apart, downsize them or shut
them completely in order to eliminate competition for their imports.
The Korean titan Samsung, for instance, was broken up and sold for
parts: Volvo got its heavy industry division, SC Johnson & Son its pharma­
ceutical arm, General Electric its lighting division. A few years later, Dae­
woo's once-mighty car division, which the company had valued at $6 billion,
was sold off to G M for just $400 million—a steal worthy of Russia's shock
therapy. But this time, unlike what happened in Russia, local firms were get­
ting wiped out by the multinationals.

43

Other big players who got a piece of the Asian distress sale included Sea­
gram's, Hewlett-Packard, Nestlé, Interbrew and Novartis, Carrefour, Tesco and
Ericsson. Coca-Cola bought a Korean bottling company for half a billion dol­
lars; Procter and Gamble bought a Korean packaging company; Nissan
bought one of Indonesia's largest car companies. General Electric acquired a
controlling stake in Korea's refrigerator manufacturer LG; and Britain's Powergen nabbed L G Energy, a large Korean electricity-and-gas company. Accord­
ing to BusinessWeek, the Saudi prince Alwaleed bin Talal was "jetting across
Asia in his cream-colored Boeing 727, collecting bargains"—including a stake
in Daewoo.

44

276

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Fittingly, Morgan Stanley, which had been the loudest in calling for a
deepening of the crisis, inserted itself into many of these deals, collecting
huge commissions. It acted as Daewoo's adviser on the sale of its automotive
division and on brokering the privatization of several South Korean banks.

45

It wasn't only private Asian firms that were being sold to foreigners. Like
earlier crises in Latin America and Eastern Europe, this one also forced gov­
ernments to sell public services to raise badly needed capital. The U.S. govern­
ment eagerly anticipated this effect early on. In arguing why Congress
should authorize billions to the I M F for the Asia makeover, the U.S. trade
representative Charlene Barshefsky offered assurances that the agreements
would "create new business opportunities for US firms": Asia would be
forced to "accelerate privatization of certain key sectors—including energy,
transportation, utilities and communications."

46

Sure enough, the crisis set off a wave of privatizations, and foreign multi­
nationals cleaned up. Bechtel got the contract to privatize the water and
sewage systems in eastern Manila, as well as one to build an oil refinery in
Sulawesi, Indonesia. Motorola got full control over Korea's Appeal Telecom.
The New York-based energy giant Sithe got a large stake in Thailand's pub­
lic gas company, the Cogeneration. Indonesia's water systems were split be­
tween Britain's Thames Water and France's Lyonnaise des Eaux. Canada's
Westcoast Energy snapped up a huge Indonesian power plant project.
British Telecom purchased a large stake in both Malaysia's and Korea's
postal services. Bell Canada got a piece of Korea's telecom Hansol.

47

All told, there were 186 major mergers and acquisitions of firms in In­
donesia, Thailand, South Korea, Malaysia and the Philippines by foreign
multinationals in a span of only twenty months. Watching this sale unfold,
Robert Wade, an L S E economist, and Frank Veneroso, an economic consul­
tant, predicted that the I M F program "may even precipitate the biggest
peacetime transfer of assets from domestic to foreign owners in the past fifty
years anywhere in the world."

48

The IMF, while admitting some errors in its early responses to the crisis,
claims that it quickly corrected them and that the "stabilization" programs
were successful. It's true that Asia's markets eventually calmed down, but at a
tremendous and ongoing cost. Milton Friedman, at the height of the crisis,
had cautioned against panic, insisting that "it will be over. . . . As they get
this financial mess settled, you can see a return to growth in Asia, but
whether it will be one year, two years, three years, nobody can tell you."

49

LET IT B U R N

277

The truth is that Asia's crisis is still not over, a decade later. When 24 mil­
lion people lose their jobs in a span of two years, a new desperation takes
root that no culture can easily absorb. It expresses itself in different forms
across the region, from a significant rise in religious extremism in Indonesia
and Thailand to the explosive growth in the child sex trade.
Employment rates have still not reached pre-1997 levels in Indonesia,
Malaysia and South Korea. And it's not just that workers who lost their jobs
during the crisis never got them back. The layoffs have continued, with new
foreign owners demanding ever-higher profits for their investments. The sui­
cides have also continued: in South Korea, suicide is now the fourth most
common cause of death, more than double the pre-crisis rate, with thirtyeight people taking their own lives every day.

50

That is the untold story of the policies that the I M F calls "stabilization
programs," as if countries were ships being tossed around on the market's
high seas. They do, eventually, stabilize, but that new equilibrium is
achieved by throwing millions of people overboard: public sector workers,
small-business owners, subsistence farmers, trade unionists. The ugly secret
of "stabilization" is that the vast majority never climb back aboard. They
end up in slums, now home to 1 billion people; they end up in brothels or
in cargo ship containers. They are the disinherited, those described by the
German poet Rainer Maria Rilke as "ones to whom neither the past nor the
future belongs."

51

These people weren't the only victims of the IMF's demand for perfect or­
thodoxy in Asia. In Indonesia, the anti-Chinese sentiment I witnessed in the
summer of 1997 continued to build, stoked by a political class happy to de­
flect attention away from itself. It got much worse after Suharto raised the
price of basic survival items. Riots broke out across the country, and many of
them targeted the Chinese minority; approximately twelve hundred people
were killed, and dozens of Chinese women were gang-raped.

52

They too

should be counted among the victims of Chicago School ideology.
Anger in Indonesia did, finally, direct itself at Suharto and the presiden­
tial palace. For three decades, Indonesians had been kept more or less in
line by the memory of the bloodbath that brought Suharto to power, a mem­
ory that was refreshed by periodic massacres in the provinces and in East
Timor. Anti-Suharto rage had burned under the surface all this time, but it
took the I M F to pour the gasoline—which it did, ironically, by demanding

278

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

that he raise the price of gasoline. After that, Indonesians rose up and pushed
Suharto from power.
Like a prison interrogator, the I M F used the extreme pain of the crisis to
break the Asian Tigers' will, to reduce the countries to total compliance. But
the CIA's interrogation manuals warn that this process can go too far—apply
too much direct pain and, instead of regression and compliance, the inter­
rogators face confidence and defiance. In Indonesia that line was crossed, a
reminder that it is possible to take shock therapy too far, provoking a kind of
blowback that was about to become very familiar, from Bolivia to Iraq.
Free-market crusaders are, however, slow learners when it comes to the
unintended consequences of their policies. The only lesson learned from the
enormously lucrative Asian sell-off appears to have been yet more confirma­
tion for the shock doctrine, more evidence (as if any more was needed) that
there is nothing like a true disaster, a genuine churning of society, to open
up a new frontier. A few years after the peak of the crisis, several prominent
commentators were even willing to go so far as to say that what happened in
Asia, despite all the devastation, was a blessing in disguise. The

Economist

noted that "it took a national crisis for South Korea to turn from an inwardlooking nation to one that embraced foreign capital, change and competi­
tion." And Thomas Friedman, in his best-selling book The Lexus and the
Olive Tree, declared that what happened in Asia wasn't a crisis at all. "I be­
lieve globalization did us all a favor by melting down the economies of Thai­
land, Korea, Malaysia, Indonesia, Mexico, Russia, and Brazil in the 1990s,
because it laid bare a lot of rotten practices and institutions," he wrote,
adding that "exposing the crony capitalism in Korea was no crisis in my
53

book." In his New York Times columns supporting the invasion of Iraq, a
similar logic would be on display, except that the melting down would be
done with cruise missiles, not currency trades.
The Asian crisis certainly showed how well disaster exploitation worked.
At the same time, the destructiveness of the market crash and the cynicism
of the West's response sparked powerful countermovements.
The forces of multinational capital got their way in Asia, but they pro­
voked new levels of public rage, with the rage eventually directed squarely at
the institutions advancing the ideology of unfettered capitalism. As an un­
usually balanced Financial

Times editorial put it, Asia was a "warning signal

that public unease with capitalism and the forces of globalization is reaching
a worrying level. The Asian crisis showed the world how even the most
successful countries could be brought to their knees by a sudden outflow of

LET IT B U R N

279

capital. People were outraged at how the whims of secretive hedge funds
could apparently cause mass poverty on the other side of the world."

54

Unlike in the former Soviet Union, where the planned misery of shock
therapy could be passed off as part of the "painful transition" from Commu­
nism to market democracy, Asia's crisis was plainly a creation of the global
markets. Yet when the high priests of globalization sent missions to the disas­
ter zone, all they wanted to do was deepen the pain.
The result was that these missions lost the comfortable anonymity they
had enjoyed previously. The IMF's Stanley Fischer recalled the "circus at­
mosphere" around the Seoul Hilton when he visited South Korea at the start
of the negotiations. "I got imprisoned in my hotel room —couldn't move out
because [if] I opened the door, there were 10,000 photographers." According
to another account, in order to reach the banquet room where the negotia­
tions were taking place, I M F representatives were forced "to take a circuitous
route to a back entrance that involved going up and down flights of stairs and
55

through the Hilton's vast kitchen." At the time, I M F officials were unac­
customed to such attention. The experience of being prisoners in five-star
hotels and conference centers would become familiar for emissaries of the
Washington Consensus in the years to come, as mass protests started to greet
their gatherings around the world.
After 1998, it became increasingly difficult to impose the shock therapystyle makeovers by peaceful means—through the usual I M F bullying or
arm-twisting at trade summits. The defiant new mood coming from the
South made its global debut when the World Trade Organization talks col­
lapsed in Seattle in 1999. Though the college-age protesters received the
bulk of the media coverage, the real rebellion took place inside the confer­
ence center, when developing countries formed a voting bloc and rejected
demands for deeper trade concessions as long as Europe and the U.S. con­
tinued to subsidize and protect their domestic industries.
At the time, it was still possible to dismiss the Seattle breakdown as a mi­
nor pause in the steady advance of corporatism. Within a few years, however,
the depth of the shift would be undeniable: the U.S. government's ambitious
dream of creating a unified free-trade zone encompassing all of Asia-Pacific
was abandoned, as were a global investors' treaty and plans for a Free Trade
Area of the Americas, stretching from Alaska to Chile.
Perhaps the greatest impact of the so-called antiglobalization movement
was that it forced the Chicago School ideology into the dead center of the in­
ternational debate. For a brief moment at the turn of the millennium, there

280

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

was no pressing crisis to deflect attention—the debt shocks had faded, the
"transitions" were complete, and a new global war had not yet arrived. What
was left was the real world track record of the free-market crusade: the dismal
reality of inequality, corruption and environmental degradation left behind
when government after government embraced Friedman's advice, given to
Pinochet all those years ago, that it was a mistake to try "to do good with
other people's money."
In retrospect, it is striking that capitalism's monopoly period, when it no
longer had to deal with competing ideas or counterpowers, was extremely
brief—only eight years, from the collapse of the Soviet Union in 1991 to the
collapse of the W T O talks in 1999. But rising opposition would not slow the
determination to advance this extraordinarily profitable agenda; its advo­
cates would simply ride the waves of fear and disorientation created by big­
ger shocks than ever before.

PART 5

SHOCKING TIMES
THE R I S E OF T H E D I S A S T E R
CAPITALISM COMPLEX
Creative destruction is our middle name, both within
our own society and abroad. We tear down the old order
every day, from business to science, literature, art,
architecture, and cinema to politics and the law
They must attack us in order to survive, just as we must
destroy them to advance our historic mission.
—Michael Ledeen, The War against the Terror Masters,
2002
George's answer to any problem at the ranch is to cut it
down with a chain saw—which I think is why he and
Cheney and Rumsfeld get along so well.
—Laura Bush, White House Correspondents' Association
Dinner, April 30, 2005

CHAPTER

14

SHOCK THERAPY IN THE U.S.A.
THE H O M E L A N D S E C U R I T Y B U B B L E

He's a ruthless little bastard. You can be s u r e of that.
—Richard Nixon, U . S . president, referring to D o n a l d
1971

Rumsfeld,

1

Today I fear that we are in fact w a k i n g up to a surveillance society
that is already all around u s .
—Richard T h o m a s ,
2006

U.K. information c o m m i s s i o n e r ,

November

2

H o m e l a n d security m a y have just reached the s t a g e that Internet
investing hit in 1997. Back then, a l l you needed to do w a s put a n
"e" in front of your company n a m e a n d your IPO w o u l d rocket.
N o w you can do the s a m e with " f o r t r e s s . "
—Daniel G r o s s , Slate, J u n e 2 0 0 5

3

It was a muggy Monday in Washington, and Donald Rumsfeld was about to do
something he hated: talk to his staff. Since taking office as defense secretary, he
had solidified his reputation among the Joint Chiefs of Staff as high-handed,
secretive and—a word that kept coming up—arrogant. Their animosity was
understandable. Since setting foot in the Pentagon, Rumsfeld had brushed
aside the prescribed role of leader and motivator and acted instead like a blood­
less hatchet man—a C E O secretary on a downsizing mission.
When Rumsfeld accepted the post, many wondered why he would even
want it. He was sixty-eight years old, had five grandchildren and a personal

284

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

fortune estimated at as much as $250 million—and he had already held the
4

same post in the Gerald Ford administration. Rumsfeld, however, had no
desire to be a traditional defense secretary, defined by the wars waged on his
watch; he had greater ambitions than that.
The incoming defense secretary had spent the past twenty-odd years
heading up multinational corporations and sitting on their boards, often
leading companies through dramatic mergers and acquisitions, as well as
painful restructurings. In the nineties, he had come to see himself as a man
of the New Economy, directing a company specializing in digital TV, sitting
on the board of another promising "e-business solutions," and serving as
board chairman of the very sci-fi biotech firm that held the exclusive patent
on a treatment for avian flu as well as on several important AIDS medica­
5

tions. When Rumsfeld joined the cabinet of George W. Bush in 2001, it was
with a personal mission to reinvent warfare for the twenty-first century—
turning it into something more psychological than physical, more spectacle
than struggle, and far more profitable than it had ever been before.
Much has been written about Rumsfeld's controversial "transformation"
project, which prompted eight retired generals to call for his resignation and
eventually forced him to step down after the 2006 midterm elections. When
Bush announced the resignation he described the "sweeping transforma­
tion" project—and not the war in Iraq or the broader "War on Terror"—as
Rumsfeld's most profound contribution: "Don's work in these areas did not
often make the headlines. But the reforms that set in motion—that he has set
6

in motion—are historic." They are indeed, but it has not always been clear
what those reforms consist of.
Senior military officials derided "transformation" as "empty buzz words,"
and Rumsfeld often seemed determined (almost comically) to prove the crit­
ics right: "The Army is going through what is a major modernization,"
Rumsfeld said in April 2006. "It's moving from a division-oriented force to a
modular brigade combat team force . . . from service-centric war-fighting to
deconfliction war-fighting to interoperability and now toward interdepen­
7

dence. That's a hard thing to do." But the project was never quite as com­
plicated as Rumsfeld made it sound. Beneath the jargon, it was simply an
attempt to bring the revolution in outsourcing and branding that he had
been part of in the corporate world into the heart of the U.S. military.
During the 1990s, many companies that had traditionally manufactured
their own products and maintained large, stable workforces embraced what

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

285

became known as the Nike model: don't own any factories, produce your
products through an intricate web of contractors and subcontractors, and pour
your resources into design and marketing. Other companies opted for the al­
ternative, Microsoft model: maintain a tight control center of shareholder/em­
ployees who perform the company's "core competency" and outsource
everything else to temps, from running the mailroom to writing code. Some
called the companies that underwent these radical restructurings "hollow cor­
porations" because they were mostly form, with little tangible content left over.
Rumsfeld was convinced that the U.S. Department of Defense needed an
equivalent makeover; as Fortune said when he arrived at the Pentagon,
"Mr. C E O " was "about to oversee the same sort of restructuring that he or­
8

chestrated so well in the corporate world." There were, of course, some
necessary differences. Where corporations unburdened themselves of
geography-bound factories and full-time workers, Rumsfeld saw the army
shedding large numbers of full-time troops in favor of a small core of staffers
propped up by cheaper temporary soldiers from the Reserve and National
Guard. Meanwhile, contractors from companies such as Blackwater and
Halliburton would perform duties ranging from high-risk chauffeuring to
prisoner interrogation to catering to health care. And where corporations
poured their savings on labor into design and marketing, Rumsfeld would
spend his savings from fewer troops and tanks on the latest satellite and nanotechnology from the private sector. "In the twenty-first century," Rumsfeld
said of the modern military, "we're going to have to stop thinking about
things, numbers of things, and mass, and think also and maybe even first
about speed and agility and precision." He sounded very much like the hy­
peractive management consultant Tom Peters, who declared in the late
nineties that companies had to decide if they were "pure 'players' in brainware" or "lumpy-object purveyors."

9

Not surprisingly, the generals who were used to holding sway in the Pen­
tagon were pretty sure that "things" and "mass" still mattered when it came
to fighting wars. They soon became deeply hostile to Rumsfeld's vision of a
hollow military. After a little more than seven months in office, the secretary
had already stepped on so many powerful toes that it was rumored his days
were numbered.
It was at this moment that Rumsfeld called a rare "town hall meeting"
for Pentagon staff. The speculation began immediately: Was he going to
announce his resignation? Was he going to try his hand at a pep talk? Was he

286

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

belatedly trying to sell the old guard on transformation? As hundreds of Pen­
tagon senior staff filed into the auditorium that Monday morning, "the mood
was definitely one of curiosity," one staffer told me. "The feeling was, How
are you going to convince us? Because there was already a huge amount of
animosity toward him."
When Rumsfeld made his entrance, "we politely stood up and sat down."
It rapidly became clear that this was not a resignation, and it most certainly
was not a pep talk. It may have been the most extraordinary speech ever
given by a U.S. secretary of defense. It began like this:
The topic today is an adversary that poses a threat, a serious threat, to
the security of the United States of America. This adversary is one of
the world's last bastions of central planning. It governs by dictating
five-year plans. From a single capital, it attempts to impose its de­
mands across time zones, continents, oceans and beyond. With bru­
tal consistency, it stifles free thought and crushes new ideas. It
disrupts the defense of the United States and places the lives of men
and women in uniform at risk.
Perhaps this adversary sounds like the former Soviet Union, but
that enemy is gone: our foes are more subtle and implacable today.. . .
The adversary's closer to home. It's the Pentagon bureaucracy.

10

As Rumsfeld's rhetorical gimmick revealed itself, the faces in the audience
went stony. Most of the people listening had devoted their careers to fighting
the Soviet Union and didn't appreciate being compared to Commies at this
stage in the game. Rumsfeld wasn't finished. "We know the adversary. We
know the threat. And with the same firmness of purpose that any effort
against a determined adversary demands, we must get at it and stay at it. . .
today we declare war on bureaucracy."
He'd done it: the defense secretary had not only described the Pentagon
as a grave threat to America but declared war against the institution where he
worked. The audience was stunned. "He was saying we were the enemy, that
the enemy was us. And here we were thinking we were doing the nation's
business," the staffer told me.
It wasn't that Rumsfeld wanted to save taxpayer dollars—he had just asked
Congress for an 11 percent budget increase. But following the corporatist
principles of the counterrevolution, in which Big Government joins forces
with Big Business to redistribute funds upward, he wanted less spent on staff

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

287

and far more public money transferred directly into the coffers of private
companies. And with that, Rumsfeld launched his "war." Every department
needed to slash its staff by 15 percent, including "every base headquarters
building in the world. It's not just the law, it's a good idea, and we're going to
get it done."

11

He had already directed his senior staff to "scour the Department [of De­
fense] for functions that could be performed better and more cheaply through
commercial outsourcing." He wanted to know, "Why is D o D one of the last or­
ganizations around that still cuts its own checks? When an entire industry ex­
ists to run warehouses efficiently, why do we own and operate so many of our
own? At bases around the world, why do we pick up our own garbage and mop
our own floors, rather than contracting services out, as many businesses do?
And surely we can outsource more computer systems support."
He even went after the sacred cow of the military establishment: health
care for soldiers. Why were there so many doctors? Rumsfeld wanted to
know. "Some of those needs, especially where they may involve general
practice or specialties unrelated to combat, might be more efficiently de­
livered by the private sector." And how about the houses for soldiers and
their families —surely these could be done through "public-private part­
nerships."
The

Defense Department should focus on its core competency:

"warfighting . . . But in all other cases, we should seek suppliers who can
provide these non-core activities efficiently and effectively."
After the speech, plenty of Pentagon staffers griped that the only thing
standing in the way of Rumsfeld's bold vision of outsourcing the army was
the small matter of the U.S. Constitution, which clearly defined national se­
curity as the duty of government, not private companies. "I thought the
speech was going to cost Rumsfeld his job," my source told me.
It didn't, and the coverage of his declaration of war on the Pentagon was
sparse. That's because the date of his contentious address was September
10, 2001.
It is a strange historical footnote that CNN Evening News on September
10 carried a short story under the headline "Defense Secretary Declares War
on the Pentagon's Bureaucracy" and that, the next morning, the network
would report on an attack on that institution of a distinctly less metaphorical
kind, one that killed 125 Pentagon employees and seriously wounded an­
other 110 of the people whom Rumsfeld had portrayed as enemies of the
state less than twenty-four hours earlier.

12

288

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Cheney and Rumsfeld: Proto-Disaster Capitalists
The idea at the heart of Rumsfeld's forgotten speech is nothing less than the
central tenet of the Bush regime: that the job of government is not to govern
but to subcontract the task to the more efficient and generally superior pri­
vate sector. As Rumsfeld made clear, this task was about nothing as prosaic
as trimming the budget, but was, for its advocates, a world-changing crusade
on a par with defeating Communism.
By the time the Bush team took office, the privatization mania of the
eighties and nineties (fully embraced by the Clinton administration, as well
as state and local governments) had successfully sold off or outsourced the
large, publicly owned companies in several sectors, from water and electric­
ity to highway management and garbage collection. After these limbs of the
state had been lopped off, what was left was "the core"—those functions so
intrinsic to the concept of governing that the idea of handing them to private
corporations challenged what it meant to be a nation-state: the military, po­
lice, fire departments, prisons, border control, covert intelligence, disease
control, the public school system and the administering of government bu­
reaucracies. The earlier stages of the privatization wave had been so prof­
itable, however, that many of the companies that had devoured the
appendages of the state were greedily eyeing these essential functions as the
next source of instant riches.
By the late nineties, a powerful move was afoot to break the taboos pro­
tecting "the core" from privatization. It was, in many ways, merely a logical
extension of the status quo. Just as Russia's oil fields, Latin America's telecorns, and Asia's industry had supplied the stock market with superprofits in
the nineties, now it would be the U.S. government itself that would play that
central economic role—all the more crucial because the backlash against
privatization and free trade was spreading rapidly through the developing
world, closing off other avenues for growth.
It was a move that brought the shock doctrine to a new, self-referential
phase: until that point, disasters and crises had been harnessed to push
through radical privatization plans after the fact, but the institutions that had
the power both to create and respond to cataclysmic events—the military, the
CIA, the Red Cross, the UN, emergency "first responders"—had been some
of the last bastions of public control. Now, with the core set to be devoured,
the crisis-exploiting methods that had been honed over the previous three
decades would be used to leverage the privatization of the infrastructure of

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

289

disaster creation and disaster response. Friedman's crisis theory was going
postmodern.
At the vanguard of the push to create what can only be described as a
privatized police state were the most powerful figures in the future Bush
administration: Dick Cheney, Donald Rumsfeld and George W. Bush
himself.
For Rumsfeld, the idea of applying "market logic" to the U.S. military was
a project that dated back four decades. It began in the early sixties, when he
used to attend seminars at the University of Chicago's Economics Depart­
ment. He had developed a particularly close connection with Milton Fried­
man, who, after Rumsfeld was elected to Congress at the age of thirty, took
the precocious Republican under his wing, helping him to develop a bold
free-market policy platform and tutoring him in economic theory. The two
men remained close over the years, with Rumsfeld attending an annual
birthday celebration for Friedman, organized every year by the Heritage
Foundation's president, Ed Feulner. "There is something about Milton that
when I am around him, and talking to him, I feel smarter," Rumsfeld said of
his mentor when Friedman turned ninety.

13

The admiration was mutual. Friedman was so impressed with Rumsfeld's
commitment to deregulated markets that he aggressively lobbied Reagan to
name Rumsfeld as his running mate in the 1980 election instead of George
H. W. Bush—and he never did quite forgive Reagan for disregarding his ad­
vice. "I believe that Reagan made a mistake when he chose Bush as his vicepresidential candidate," Friedman wrote in his memoirs; "indeed, I regard it
as the worst decision not only of his campaign but of his presidency. My fa­
vorite candidate was Donald Rumsfeld. Had he been chosen, I believe he
would have succeeded Reagan as president, and the sorry Bush-Clinton
period would never have occurred."

14

Rumsfeld survived being passed over as Reagan's running mate by throw­
ing himself into his burgeoning business career. As C E O of the international
drug and chemical company Searle Pharmaceuticals, he used his political
connections to secure the controversial and extraordinarily lucrative Food
and Drug Administration (FDA) approval for aspartame (marketed as NutraSweet); and when Rumsfeld brokered the deal to sell Searle to Monsanto,
he personally earned an estimated $12 million.

15

The high-stakes sale established Rumsfeld as a corporate power player,
landing him seats on the boards of such blue-chip firms as Sears and Kellogg's. His status as a former defense secretary, meanwhile, made him a score

290

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

for any company that was part of what Eisenhower had called the "militaryindustrial complex." Rumsfeld sat on the board of the aircraft manufacturer
Gulfstream and was also paid $190,000 a year as a board member of ASEA
Brown Boveri (ABB), the Swiss engineering giant that gained unwanted at­
tention when it was revealed to have sold nuclear technology to North Ko­
rea, including the capacity to produce plutonium. The nuclear reactor sale
went through in 2000, and at the time Rumsfeld was the only North Ameri­
can on the ABB board. He claims to have no memory of the reactor sale
coming before the board, though the company insists that "board members
were informed about the project."

16

It was in 1997, when Rumsfeld was named chairman of the board of the
biotech firm Gilead Sciences, that he would firmly establish himself as a
proto disaster capitalist. The company had registered the patent for Tamiflu,
a treatment for many kinds of influenza and the preferred drug for avian
flu.* If there was ever an outbreak of the highly contagious virus (or the
threat of one), governments would be forced to buy billions of dollars' worth
of the treatment from Gilead Sciences.
The patenting of drugs and vaccines to treat public health emergencies
remains a controversial subject. The U.S. has been epidemic-free for several
decades, but when the polio outbreak was at its peak in the mid-fifties, the
ethics of disease profiteering were hotly debated. With close to sixty thou­
sand known cases of polio, and parents terrified that their children were go­
ing to contract the crippling, often fatal, disease, the search for a cure was
frantic. When Jonas Salk, a scientist at the University of Pittsburgh, found it
and developed the first polio vaccine in 1952, he did not patent the lifesaving
treatment. "There is no patent," Salk told the broadcaster Edward R. Murrow: "Could you patent the sun?"

17

It's safe to say that if you could patent the sun, Donald Rumsfeld would
have long since put in an application with the U.S. Patent and Trademark Of­
fice. His former company Gilead Sciences, which also owns the patents on
four AIDS treatments, spends a great deal of energy trying to block the distri­
bution of cheaper generic versions of its lifesaving drugs in the developing

* Tamiflu has become highly controversial. In a growing number of reported cases, young
people who took the drug became confused, paranoid, delusional and suicidal. Between N o ­
vember 2005 and November 2006, twenty-five deaths around the world were linked to Tami­
flu, and in the United States the drug is now issued with a health warning alerting patients to
an "increased risk of self-injury and confusion" and urging them to "be closely monitored for
signs of unusual behavior."

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

291

world. It has been targeted for these activities by public health activists in the
U.S., who point out that some of Gilead's key medicines were developed on
18

grants funded by taxpayers. Gilead, for its part, sees epidemics as a growth
market, and it has an aggressive marketing campaign to encourage businesses
and individuals to stockpile Tamiflu, just in case. Before he reentered govern­
ment, Rumsfeld was so convinced that he was on to a hot new industry that
he helped found several private investment funds specializing in biotechnol­
19

ogy and pharmaceuticals. These companies are banking on an apocalyptic
future of rampant disease, one in which governments are forced to buy, at top
dollar, whatever lifesaving products the private sector has under patent.
Dick Cheney, a protégé of Rumsfeld's in the Ford administration, has also
built a fortune based on the profitable prospect of a grim future, though
where Rumsfeld saw a boom market in plagues, Cheney was banking on a
future of war. As secretary of defense under Bush Sr., Cheney scaled down
the number of active troops and dramatically increased reliance on private
contractors. He contracted Brown & Root, the engineering division of the
Houston-based multinational Halliburton, to identify tasks being performed
by U.S. troops that could be taken over by the private sector for a profit. Not
surprisingly, Halliburton identified all kinds of jobs that the private sector
could perform, and those findings led to a bold new Pentagon contract: the
Logistics Civil Augmentation Program, or LOGCAP. The Pentagon was no­
torious for its multi-billion-dollar contracts with weapons manufacturers, but
this was something new: not supplying the military with gear but serving as
manager for its operations.

20

A select group of companies was invited to apply to provide unlimited
"logistical support" for U.S. military missions, an extremely vague work de­
scription. Furthermore, no dollar value was attached to the contract: the
winning company was simply assured that whatever it did for the military, it
would have its costs covered by the Pentagon, plus a guaranteed profit—
what is known as a "cost plus" contract. These were the final days of the
Bush Sr. administration, and the company that won the contract in 1992
was none other than Halliburton. As the Los Angeles Times s T. Christian
Miller noted, Halliburton "beat out thirty-six other bidders to win a five-year
contract—not surprising perhaps, given that it was the company that drew
up the plans."
In 1995, with Clinton in the White House, Halliburton recruited Cheney
as its new boss. While the Halliburton division Brown & Root had a long his­
tory as a U.S. military contractor, under Cheney's leadership Halliburton's

292

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

role was to expand so dramatically that it would transform the nature of
modern war. Thanks to the loosely worded contract that Halliburton and
Cheney had crafted when he was at the Pentagon, the company was able to
stretch and expand the meaning of the term "logistical support" until Hal­
liburton was responsible for creating the entire infrastructure of a U.S. mili­
tary operation overseas. All that was required of the army was to provide the
soldiers and the weapons —they were, in a way, content providers, while Hal­
liburton ran the show.
The result, first on display in the Balkans, was a kind of McMilitary expe­
rience in which deploying abroad resembled a heavily armed and perilous
package vacation. "The first person to greet our soldiers as they arrive in the
Balkans and the last one to wave goodbye is one of our employees," a Hal­
liburton spokesperson explained, making the company's staff sound more like
21

cruise directors than army logistics coordinators. That was the Halliburton
difference: Cheney saw no reason why war shouldn't be a thriving part of
America's highly profitable service economy—invasion with a smile.
In the Balkans, where Clinton deployed nineteen thousand soldiers, U.S.
bases sprang up as mini Halliburton cities: neat, gated suburbs, built and run
entirely by the company. And Halliburton was committed to providing the
troops with all the comforts of home, including fast-food outlets, supermar­
kets, movie theaters and high-tech gyms.

22

Some senior officers wondered

what the strip-mailing of the military would do to troop discipline—but they
too were enjoying the perks. "Everything with Halliburton was gold-plated,"
one told me. "So we weren't complaining." As far as Halliburton was con­
cerned, keeping the customer satisfied was good business —it guaranteed
more contracts, and because profits were calculated as a percentage of costs,
the higher the costs, the higher the profits. "Don't worry, it's cost plus," was a
saying made famous in Baghdad's Green Zone, but the deluxe war spending
was pioneered during the Clinton era. In just five years at Halliburton, Che­
ney almost doubled the amount of money the company extracted from the
U.S. Treasury, from $1.2 billion to $2.3 billion, while the amount it received
23

in federal loans and loan guarantees increased fifteenfold. And he was well
rewarded for his efforts. Before taking office as vice president, Cheney "val­
ued his net worth at between $18 million and $81.9 million, including be­
tween $6 million and $30 million worth of stock in Halliburton Co. . . .
Overall, Cheney was given some 1,260,000 Halliburton options, with
100,000 already used, 760,000 eligible to be redeemed and 166,667 to be­
come valid this December [2000]."

24

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

293

The push to expand the service economy into the heart of government
was, for Cheney, a family affair. In the late nineties, while he was turning
military bases into Halliburton suburbs, his wife, Lynne, was earning stock
options in addition to her salary as a board member at Lockheed Martin, the
world's largest defense contractor. Lynne's time on the board, from 1995 to
2001, coincided with a key period of transition for companies like Lock­
25

heed. The Cold War was over, defense spending was dropping, and with
nearly their entire budgets coming from government weapons contracts,
these firms needed a new business model. At Lockheed and its fellow arms
manufacturers, a strategy emerged to aggressively pursue a new line of work:
running the government for a fee.
In the mid-nineties, Lockheed began taking over information technology
divisions of the U.S. government, running its computer systems and a great
deal of its data management. Largely under the public radar, the company
went so far in this direction that, in 2004, The New York Times reported,
"Lockheed Martin doesn't run the United States. But it does help run a
breathtakingly big part of it. . . . It sorts your mail and totals your taxes. It
cuts Social Security checks and counts the United States census. It runs
space flights and monitors air traffic. To make all that happen, Lockheed
writes more computer code than Microsoft.*

26

It made for a powerful husband-and-wife team. While Dick was steering
Halliburton to take over the infrastructure of warfare abroad, Lynne was
helping Lockheed to take over the day-to-day running of government at
home. At times husband and wife found themselves in direct competition.
In 1996, when the state of Texas announced that corporations could bid to
run its welfare program—a contract worth up to $2 billion over five years —
both Lockheed and the IT giant Electronic Data Systems, which boasted
Dick Cheney as a board member, bid on the contract. In the end, the Clin­
ton administration intervened and halted the auction. Though it was gener­
ally an enthusiastic supporter of outsourcing, deciding who was eligible to
receive welfare was determined to be an essential role of government, not
suitable for privatization. Both Lockheed and E D S cried foul, as did the

* All the large weapons makers got into the business of running government in this period.
Computer Sciences, which provides information technologies to the military, including biometric IDs, won a $644 million contract from the county of S a n Diego to run all its informa­
tion technology—one of the largest contracts of its kind ever awarded. The county became
dissatisfied with Computer Sciences' performance and did not renew the contract, only to
give it to yet another weapons giant, Northrop G r u m m a n , maker of the B-2 stealth bomber.

294

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

governor of Texas, George W. Bush, who thought privatizing the welfare sys­
tem was a terrific idea.

27

George W. Bush didn't distinguish himself as governor in too many
ways, but there was one area in which he excelled: parceling out to private
interests the various functions of the government he was elected to run —
especially security-related functions, a preview of the privatized War on
Terror he would soon unleash. Under his watch, the number of private
prisons in Texas grew from twenty-six to forty-two, prompting The Ameri­
can

Prospect

magazine to call Bush's Texas "the world capital of the

private-prison industry." In 1997, the F B I launched an investigation into a
jail in Brazoria County, forty miles outside Houston, after a local television
station aired a videotape of guards kicking unresisting inmates in the
groin, shooting them with stun guns and attacking them with dogs. At least
one of the violent guards in the video was wearing the uniform of Capital
Correctional Resources, a private company contracted to supply guards for
the prison.

28

Bush's enthusiasm for privatization was in no way dampened by the Bra­
zoria incident. A few weeks later, he had what appears to have been an
epiphany when he met José Pinera, the Chilean minister who had privatized
social security during the Pinochet dictatorship. This is Pinera's description
of the meeting: "By his concentrated focus, his body language [and] his rel­
evant questions, I knew immediately that Mr. Bush had fully understood the
essence of my idea: that Social Security reform could be used both to pro­
vide a decent retirement and to create a world of worker-capitalists, an own­
ership society. . . . He was so enthusiastic that at the end he whispered in my
ear with a smile, 'Go and tell all this to my little brother in Florida. He will
also love it.' "

2 9

The future president's commitment to auctioning off the state, combined
with Cheney's leadership in outsourcing the military and Rumsfeld's patent­
ing of drugs that might prevent epidemics, provided a preview of the kind of
state the three men would construct together—it was a vision of a perfectly
hollow government. Though this radical program did not form the center­
piece of Bush's campaign for the presidency in 2000, there were hints of
what was in store: "There are hundreds of thousands of full-time federal em­
ployees that are performing tasks that could be done by companies in the
private sector," Bush said in one campaign speech. "I will put as many of
these tasks as possible up for competitive bidding. If the private sector can do
a better job, the private sector should get the contract."

30

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

295

September 11 and the Civil Service Comeback
As Bush and his cabinet took their posts in January 2001, the need for new
sources of growth for U.S. corporations took on even greater urgency. With
the tech bubble now officially popped and the Dow Jones tumbling 824
points in their first two and half months in office, they found themselves star­
ing in the face of a serious economic downturn. Keynes had argued that gov­
ernments should spend their way out of recessions, providing economic
stimulus with public works. Bush's solution was for the government to de­
construct itself—hacking off great chunks of the public wealth and feeding
them to corporate America, in the form of tax cuts on the one hand and lu­
crative contracts on the other. Bush's budget director, the think-tank ideo­
logue Mitch Daniels, pronounced, "The general idea—that the business of
government is not to provide services, but to make sure that they are
31

provided—seems self-evident to me." That assessment included disaster re­
sponse. Joseph Allbaugh, the Republican Party operative whom Bush put in
charge of the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA)—the body
responsible for responding to disasters, including terrorist attacks —described
his new place of work as "an oversized entitlement program."

32

Then came 9/11, and all of a sudden having a government whose central
mission was self-immolation did not seem like a very good idea. With a
frightened population wanting protection from a strong, solid government,
the attacks could well have put an end to Bush's project of hollowing out
government just as it was beginning.
For a while, that even seemed to be the case. "September 11 has changed
everything," said Ed Feulner, Milton Friedman's old friend and president of
the Heritage Foundation, ten days after the attack, making him one of the first
to utter the fateful phrase. Many naturally assumed that part of that change
would be a réévaluation of the radical antistate agenda that Feulner and his
ideological allies had been pushing for three decades, at home and around the
world. After all, the nature of the September 11 security failures exposed the
results of more than twenty years of chipping away at the public sector and
outsourcing government functions to profit-driven corporations. Much as the
flooding of New Orleans exposed the rotting condition of public infrastruc­
ture, the attacks pulled back the curtain on a state that had been allowed to
grow dangerously weak: radio communications for the New York City police
and firefighters broke down in the middle of the rescue operation, air traffic
controllers didn't notice the off-course planes in time, and the attackers had

296

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

passed through airport security checkpoints staffed by contract workers, some
of whom earned less than their counterparts at the food court.

33

The first major victory of the Friedmanite counterrevolution in the
United States had been Ronald Reagan's attack on the air traffic controllers'
union and his deregulation of the airlines. Twenty years later, the entire air
transit system had been privatized, deregulated and downsized, with the vast
majority of airport security work performed by underpaid, poorly trained,
nonunion contractors. After the attacks, the inspector general of the Depart­
ment of Transportation testified that the airlines, which were responsible for
security on their flights, had skimped significantly to keep costs down. The
"counterpressures in turn manifested themselves as significant weaknesses in
security," he told the Bush-convened 9/11 Commission. A longtime Federal
Aviation Authority security official testifed before the commission that the
airlines' approach to security was "decry, deny and delay."

34

On September 10, as long as flights were cheap and plentiful, none of
that seemed to matter. But on September 12, putting $6-an-hour contract
workers in charge of airport security seemed reckless. Then, in October, en­
velopes with white powder were sent to lawmakers and journalists, spreading
panic about the possibility of a major anthrax outbreak. Once again, nineties
privatization looked very different in this new light: Why did a private lab
have the exclusive right to produce the anthrax vaccine? Had the federal
government signed away its responsibility to protect the public from a major
public health emergency? It didn't help that Bioport, the privatized lab in
question, had failed a series of inspections and that the FDA wasn't even au­
35

thorizing it to distribute its vaccines at the time. Furthermore, if it was true,
as media reports kept claiming, that anthrax, smallpox and other deadly
agents could be spread through the mail, the food supply or the water sys­
tems, was it really such a good idea to be pushing ahead with Bush's plans to
privatize the postal service? And what about all those laid-off food and water
inspectors—could somebody bring them back?
The backlash against the pro-corporate consensus only deepened in the
face of new scandals like that of Enron. Three months after the 9/11 attacks,
Enron declared bankruptcy, leading thousands of employees to lose their re­
tirement savings while executives acting on insider knowledge cashed out.
The crisis contributed to a general plummeting of faith in private industry to
perform essential services, especially when it came out that it was Enron's ma­
nipulation of energy prices that had led to the massive blackouts in California
a few months earlier. Milton Friedman, aged ninety, was so concerned that

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

297

the tides were shifting back toward Keynesianism that he complained that
"businessmen are being presented in the public as second-class citizens."

36

While CEOs were falling from their pedestals, unionized public sector
workers—the villains of Friedman's counterrevolution—were rapidly as­
cending in the public's estimation. Within two months of the attacks, trust
in government was higher than it had been since 1968—and that, remarked
Bush to a crowd of federal employees, is "because of how you've performed
37

your jobs." The uncontested heroes of September 11 were the blue-collar
first responders—the New York firefighters, police and rescue workers, 403 of
whom lost their lives as they tried to evacuate the towers and aid the victims.
Suddenly, America was in love with its men and women in all kinds of uni­
forms, and its politicians—slapping on NYPD and F D N Y baseball caps with
unseemly speed—were struggling to keep up with the new mood.
When Bush stood with the firefighters and rescue workers at Ground Zero
on September 14—what his advisers call "the bullhorn moment" —he was
embracing some of the very unionized civil servants that the modern conser­
vative movement had devoted itself to destroying. O f course he had to do it
(even Dick Cheney put on a hard hat in those days), but he didn't have to do
it so convincingly. Through some combination of genuine feeling on Bush's
part, and the public's projected desire for a leader worthy of the moment,
these were the most moving speeches of Bush's political career.
For weeks after the attacks, the president went on a grand tour of the pub­
lic sector—public schools, firehouses and memorials, the Centers for Dis­
ease Control and Prevention —embracing and thanking civil servants for
their contributions and humble patriotism. "We have gained new heroes,"
Bush said in a speech, praising not only emergency services personnel but
38

teachers, postal employees and health care workers. At these events, he
treated work done in the public interest with a level of respect and dignity
that had not been seen in the United States in four decades. Cost-cutting
was suddenly off the agenda, and in every speech the president gave, he an­
nounced some ambitious new public program.
"The twin demands of a sagging economy and an urgent new war on ter­
rorism have transformed the philosophical heart of President Bush's agenda,"
confidently declared John Harris and Dana Milbank in The Washington Post
eleven days after the attacks. "A man who came to power offering himself as
an ideological descendant of Ronald Reagan has emerged nine months later
as something closer to an heir of Franklin D. Roosevelt." They further ob­
served that "Bush is working on a large economic stimulus package to stave

298

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

off recession. He said a weak economy needs its pump primed by govern­
ment with a big infusion of money—a basic precept of Keynesian econom­
ics that was at the heart of FDR's New Deal."

39

A Corporate New Deal
Public pronouncements and photo ops aside, Bush and his inner circle had
no intention of converting to Keynesianism. Far from shaking their deter­
mination to weaken the public sphere, the security failures of 9/11 reaf­
firmed their deepest ideological (and self-interested) beliefs—that only
private firms possessed the intelligence and innovation to meet the new se­
curity challenge. Although it was true that the White House was on the
verge of spending huge amounts of taxpayer money to stimulate the econ­
omy, it most certainly was not going to be on the model of FDR. Rather,
Bush's New Deal would be exclusively with corporate America, a straightup transfer of hundreds of billions of public dollars a year into private
hands. It would take the form of contracts, many offered secretively, with
no competition and scarcely any oversight, to a sprawling network of indus­
tries: technology, media, communications, incarceration, engineering, edu­
cation, health care.*
What happened in the period of mass disorientation after the attacks was,
in retrospect, a domestic form of economic shock therapy. The Bush team,
Friedmanite to the core, quickly moved to exploit the shock that gripped the
nation to push through its radical vision of a hollow government in which
everything from war fighting to disaster response was a for-profit venture.
It was a bold evolution of shock therapy. Rather than the nineties ap­
proach of selling off existing public companies, the Bush team created a whole
new framework for its actions—the War on Terror—built to be private from
the start. This feat required two stages. First, the White House used the om­
nipresent sense of peril in the aftermath of 9/11 to dramatically increase the
policing, surveillance, detention and war-waging powers of the executive
branch—a power grab that the military historian Andrew Bacevich has termed
40

"a rolling coup." Then those newly enhanced and richly funded functions
* The lack of competition in awarding contracts has been one of the distinguishing features
of the B u s h years. A New York Times analysis in February 2007 found that "fewer than half of
all 'contract actions'—new contracts and payments against existing contracts—are now sub­
ject to full and open competition. Just 48 percent were competitive in 2005, down from 79
percent in 2 0 0 1 . "

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

299

of security, invasion, occupation and reconstruction were immediately out­
sourced, handed over to the private sector to perform at a profit.
Although the stated goal was fighting terrorism, the effect was the creation
of the disaster capitalism complex—a full-fledged new economy in home­
land security, privatized war and disaster reconstruction tasked with nothing
less than building and running a privatized security state, both at home and
abroad. The economic stimulus of this sweeping initiative proved enough to
pick up the slack where globalization and the dot-com booms had left off.
Just as the Internet had launched the dot-com bubble, 9/11 launched the di­
saster capitalism bubble. "When the IT industry shut down, post-bubble,
guess who had all the money? The government," said Roger Novak of Novak
Biddle Venture Partners, a venture capitalism firm that invests in homeland
security companies. Now, he says, "every fund is seeing how big the trough is
and asking, How do I get a piece of that action?"

41

It was the pinnacle of the counterrevolution launched by Friedman. For
decades, the market had been feeding off the appendages of the state; now it
would devour the core.
Bizarrely, the most effective ideological tool in this process was the claim
that economic ideology was no longer a primary motivator of U.S. foreign or
domestic policy. The mantra "September 11 changed everything" neatly dis­
guised the fact that for free-market ideologues and the corporations whose
interests they serve, the only thing that changed was the ease with which they
could pursue their ambitious agenda. Now, rather than subjecting new poli­
cies to fractious public debate in Congress or bitter conflict with public sec­
tor unions, the Bush White House could use the patriotic alignment behind
the president and the free pass handed out by the press to stop talking and
start doing. As The New York Times observed in February 2007, "Without a
public debate or formal policy decision, contractors have become a virtual
fourth branch of government."

42

Rather than meet the security challenge posed by September 11 with a com­
prehensive plan to plug the holes in the public infrastructure, the Bush team
devised a new role for government, one in which the job of the state was not
to provide security but to purchase it at market prices. And so, in November
2001, just two months after the attacks, the Department of Defense brought
together what it described as "a small group of venture capitalist consultants"
with experience in the dot-com sector. The mission was to identify "emerg­
ing technology solutions that directly assist in the U.S. efforts in the Global

300

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

War on Terrorism." By early 2006, this informal exchange had become an
official arm of the Pentagon: the Defense Venture Catalyst Initiative (DeVenCI), a "fully operational office" that continually feeds security informa­
tion to politically connected venture capitalists, who, in turn, scour the
private sector for start-ups that can produce new surveillance and related
products. "We're a search engine," explains Bob Pohanka, director of De43

VenCI. According to the Bush vision, the role of government is merely to
raise the money necessary to launch the new war market, then buy the best
products that emerge out of that creative cauldron, encouraging industry to
even greater innovation. In other words, the politicians create the demand,
and the private sector supplies all manner of solutions—a booming econ­
omy in homeland security and twenty-first-century warfare entirely under­
written by taxpayer dollars.
The Department of Homeland Security, as a brand-new arm of the state
created by the Bush regime, is the clearest expression of this wholly out­
sourced mode of government. As Jane Alexander, deputy director of the re­
search wing of the Department of Homeland Security, explained, "We don't
make things. If it doesn't come from industry, we are not going to be able to
get it."

44

Another is Counterintelligence Field Activity (CIFA), a new intelligence
agency created under Rumsfeld that is independent of the CIA. This parallel
spy agency outsources 70 percent of its budget to private contractors; like the
Department of Homeland Security, it was built as a hollow shell. As Ken
Minihan, former director of the National Security Agency, explained,
"Homeland security is too important to be left to the government." Minihan,
like hundreds of other Bush administration staffers, has already left his gov­
ernment post to work in the bourgeoning homeland security industry,
which, as a top spy, he helped create.

45

Every aspect of the way the Bush administration has defined the parame­
ters of the War on Terror has served to maximize its profitability and sustainability as a market—from the definition of the enemy to the rules of
engagement to the ever-expanding scale of the battle. The document that
launched the Department of Homeland Security declares, "Today's terrorists
can strike at any place, at any time, and with virtually any weapon"—which
conveniently means that the security services required must protect against
every imaginable risk in every conceivable place at every possible time. And
it's not necessary to prove that a threat is real for it to merit a full-scale
response —not with Cheney's famous "1 percent doctrine," which justified

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

301

the invasion of Iraq on the grounds that if there is a 1 percent chance that
something is a threat, it requires that the U.S. respond as if the threat is a 100
percent certainty. This logic has been a particular boon for the makers of
various high-tech detection devices: for instance, because we can conceive
of a smallpox attack, the Department of Homeland Security has handed out
half a billion dollars to private companies to develop and install detection
equipment to guard against this unproven threat.

46

Through all its various name changes—the War on Terror, the war on
radical Islam, the war against Islamofascism, the Third World War, the long
war, the generational war—the basic shape of the conflict has remained un­
changed. It is limited by neither time nor space nor target. From a military
perspective, these sprawling and amorphous traits make the War on Terror
an unwinnable proposition. But from an economic perspective, they make it
an unbeatable one: not a flash-in-the-pan war that could potentially be won
but a new and permanent fixture in the global economic architecture.
That was the business prospectus that the Bush administration put before
corporate America after September 11. The revenue stream was a seemingly
bottomless supply of tax dollars to be funneled from the Pentagon ($270 bil­
lion a year to private contractors, a $137 billion increase since Bush took
office); U.S. intelligence agencies ($42 billion a year to contractors for out­
sourced intelligence, more than double 1995 levels); and the newest arrival,
the Department of Homeland Security. Between September 11, 2001, and
2006, the Department of Homeland Security handed out $130 billion to pri­
vate contractors —money that was not in the economy before and that is
more than the G D P of Chile or the Czech Republic. In 2003, the Bush ad­
ministration spent $327 billion on contracts to private companies —nearly
40 cents of every discretionary dollar.

47

In a remarkably short time, the suburbs ringing Washington, D.C., be­
came dotted with gray buildings housing security "start-ups" and "incuba­
tor" companies, hastily thrown together operations where, as in late-nineties
Silicon Valley, the money came in faster than the furniture could be assem­
bled. The Bush administration, meanwhile, played the part of the freespending venture capitalist of that same heady era. Whereas in the nineties
the goal was to develop the killer application, the "next new new thing," and
sell it to Microsoft or Oracle, now it was to come up with a new "search and
nail" terrorist-catching technology and sell it to the Department of Home­
land Security or the Pentagon. That is why, in addition to the start-ups and
investment funds, the disaster industry also gave birth to an army of new

302

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

lobby firms promising to hook up new companies with the right people on
Capitol Hill —in 2001, there were two such security-oriented lobby firms,
but by mid-2006 there were 543. "I've been in private equity since the early
'90s," Michael Steed, managing director of the homeland security firm Pal­
adin told Wired, "and I've never seen a sustained deal flow like this."

48

A M a r k e t for T e r r o r i s m

Like the dot-com bubble, the disaster bubble is inflating in an ad hoc and
chaotic fashion. One of the first booms for the homeland security industry
was surveillance cameras, 4.2 million of which have been installed in
Britain, one for every fourteen people, and 30 million in the U.S., shooting
about 4 billion hours of footage a year. That created a problem: Who's going
to watch 4 billion hours of footage? So a new market emerged for "analytic
software" that scans the tapes and creates matches with images already on
file (networking various security systems has been the source of some of the
most lucrative contracts, such as $9 billion from the air force to a consor­
tium of companies including Booz Allen Hamilton, one of the oldest strat­
egy consulting firms, and some of the largest defense contractors).

49

This development created another problem, because facial recognition
software can really make positive IDs only if people present themselves front
and center to the cameras, which they rarely do while rushing to and from
work. So another market was created for digital image enhancement. Salient
Stills, a company that sells software to isolate and enhance video images,
started by pitching its technology to media companies, but it turned out that
there was more potential revenue from the FBI and other law-enforcement
50

agencies. And with all the snooping going on—phone logs, wiretapping, fi­
nancial records, mail, surveillance cameras, Web surfing—the government
is drowning in data, which has opened up yet another massive market in in­
formation management and data mining, as well as software that claims to
be able to "connect the dots" in this ocean of words and numbers and pin­
point suspicious activity.
In the nineties, tech companies endlessly trumpeted the wonders of the
borderless world and the power of information technology to topple author­
itarian regimes and bring down walls. Today, inside the disaster capitalism
complex, the tools of the information revolution have been flipped to serve
the opposite purpose. In the process, cell phones and Web surfing have
been turned into powerful tools of mass state surveillance by increasingly

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

303

authoritarian regimes, with the full cooperation of privatized phone compa­
nies and search engines, whether it's Yahoo collaborating with the Chinese
government to pinpoint the location of dissidents or A T & T helping the U.S.
National Security Agency to wiretap its customers without a warrant (a prac­
tice the Bush administration claims it has discontinued). The dismantling of
borders, the great symbol and promise of globalization, has been replaced
with the exploding industry of border surveillance, from optical scanning
and biométrie IDs to the planned high-tech fence on the border between
Mexico and the U.S., worth up to $2.5 billion for Boeing and a consortium
of other companies.

51

As high-tech firms have jumped from one bubble to another, the result
has been a bizarre merger of security and shopping cultures. Many tech­
nologies in use today as part of the War on Terror—biométrie identification,
video surveillance, Web tracking, data mining, sold by companies like Verint
Systems and Seisint, Accenture and ChoicePoint—had been developed by
the private sector before September 11 as a way to build detailed customer
profiles, opening up new vistas for micromarketing. They also promised to
reduce the number of retail workers at supermarkets and shopping malls, be­
cause biométrie IDs, combined with cash cards, would eliminate the need
for tellers. When widespread discomfort about big-brother technologies
stalled many of these initiatives, it caused dismay to both marketers and re­
tailers. September 11 loosened this logjam in the market: suddenly the fear
of terror was greater than the fear of living in a surveillance society. So now,
the same information collected from cash cards or "loyalty" cards can be
sold not only to a travel agency or the Gap as marketing data but also to the
FBI as security data, flagging a "suspicious" interest in pay-as-you-go cell
phones and Middle Eastern travel.

52

As an exuberant article in the business magazine Red Herring explained,
one such program "tracks terrorists by figuring out if a name spelled a hun­
dred different ways matches a name in a homeland security database. Take
the name Mohammad. The software contains hundreds of possible spellings
53

for the name, and it can search terabytes of data in a second." Impressive,
unless they nail the wrong Mohammad, which they have a bad habit of do­
ing, from Iraq to Afghanistan to the suburbs of Toronto.
This potential for error is where the incompetence and greed that have
been the hallmark of the Bush years, from Iraq to New Orleans, becomes har­
rowing. One false ID coming out of any of these electronic fishing expedi­
tions is enough for an apolitical family man, who sort of looks like someone

304

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

whose name sort of sounds like his (at least to someone with no knowledge of
Arabic or Muslim culture), to be flagged as a potential terrorist. And the pro­
cess of putting names and organizations on watch lists is also now handled by
private companies, as are the programs to cross-check the names of travelers
with the names in the data bank. As of June 2007, there were half a million
names on a list of suspected terrorists kept by the National Counterterrorism
Center. Another program, the Automated Targeting System (ATS), made
public in November 2006, has already assigned a "risk assessment" rating to
tens of millions of travelers passing through the U.S. The rating, never dis­
closed to passengers, is based on suspicious patterns revealed through com­
mercial data mining—for instance, information provided by airlines about
"the passenger's history of one-way ticket purchase, seat preferences, frequent
flyer records, number of bags, how they pay for tickets and even what meals
54

they order." Incidents of supposedly suspicious behaviour are tallied up to
generate each passenger's risk rating.
Anyone can be blocked from flying, denied an entry visa to the U.S. or
even arrested and named as an "enemy combatant" based on evidence from
these dubious technologies—a blurry image identified through facial recog­
nition software, a misspelled name, a misunderstood snippet of a conversa­
tion. If "enemy combatants" are not U.S. citizens, they will probably never
even know what it was that convicted them, because the Bush administration
has stripped them of habeas corpus, the right to see the evidence in court, as
well as the right to a fair trial and a vigorous defense.
If the suspect is taken, as a result, to Guantânamo, he may well end up in
the new two-hundred-person maximum-security prison constructed by Hal­
liburton. If he is a victim of the CIA's "extraordinary rendition" program, kid­
napped off the streets of Milan or while changing planes at a U.S. airport, then
whisked to a so-called black site somewhere in the CIA's archipelago of secret
prisons, the hooded prisoner will likely fly in a Boeing 737, designed as a
deluxe executive jet, retrofitted for this purpose. According to The New Yorker,
Boeing has been acting as the "CIA's travel agent"—blocking out flight plans
for as many as 1,245 rendition voyages, arranging ground crews and even
booking hotels. A Spanish police report explains that the work was done by
Jeppesen International Trip Planning, a Boeing subsidiary in San Jose. In May
2007, the American Civil Liberties Union launched a lawsuit against the Boe­
ing subsidiary; the company has refused to confirm or deny the allegations.

55

Once the prisoners arrive at the destination, they face interrogators, some
of whom will not be employed by the CIA or the military but by private

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

305

contractors. According to Bill Golden, who runs the job Web site www
.IntelligenceCareers.com, "Over half of the qualified counter-intelligence
56

experts in the field work for contractors." If these freelance interrogators are
to keep landing lucrative contracts, they must extract from prisoners the kind
of "actionable intelligence" their employers in Washington are looking for.
It's a dynamic ripe for abuse: just as prisoners under torture will usually say
anything to make the pain stop, contractors have a powerful economic in­
centive to use whatever techniques are necessary to produce the sought-after
information, regardless of its reliability. (Part of the reason the Bush admin­
istration has relied so heavily on private intelligence contractors working in
new structures like Rumsfeld's secretive Office of Special Plans is that they
have proven far more willing than their counterparts in governments to mas­
sage and manipulate information to meet the political goals of the adminis­
tration—after all, their next contract depends on it.)
Then there is the low-tech version of this application of market "solu­
tions" to the War on Terror—the willingness to pay top dollar to pretty much
anyone for information about alleged terrorists. During the invasion of
Afghanistan, U.S. intelligence agents let it be known that they would pay
anywhere from $3,000 to $25,000 for al Qaeda or Taliban fighters handed
over to them. "Get wealth and power beyond your dreams," stated a typical
flyer handed out by the U.S. in Afghanistan, introduced as evidence in a
2002 U.S. federal court filing on behalf of several Guantânamo prisoners.
"You can receive millions of dollars helping the anti-Taleban forces. . . . This
is enough money to take care of your family, your village, your tribe for the
rest of your life."

57

Soon enough, the cells of Bagram and Guantânamo were overflowing
with goatherds, cabdrivers, cooks and shopkeepers—all lethally dangerous
according to the men who turned them over and collected the rewards.
"Do you have any theories about why the government and the Pakistani
intel folks would sell you out and turn you over to the Americans?" a mem­
ber of a military tribunal asked an Egyptian prisoner held in the Guantâ­
namo prison.
In the declassified transcript, the prisoner appears incredulous. "Come
on, man," he replied, "you know what happened. In Pakistan you can buy
people for $10. So what about $5,000?"
"So they sold you?" the tribunal member asked, as if the thought had
never before occurred to him.
"Yes."

306

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

According to the Pentagon's own figures, 86 percent of the prisoners at
Guantânamo were handed over by Afghan and Pakistani fighters or agents
after the bounties were announced. As of December 2006, the Pentagon had
released 360 prisoners from Guantânamo. The Associated Press was able to
track down 245 of them; 205 had been freed or cleared of all charges when
58

they returned to their home countries. It is a track record that is a grave in­
dictment of the quality of intelligence produced by the administration's
market-based approach to terrorist identification.
In just a few years, the homeland security industry, which barely existed be­
fore 9/11, has exploded to a size that is now significantly larger than either
59

Hollywood or the music business. Yet what is most striking is how little the
security boom is analyzed and discussed as an economy,

as an unprece­

dented convergence of unchecked police powers and unchecked capitalism,
a merger of the shopping mall and the secret prison. When information
about who is or is not a security threat is a product to be sold as readily as in­
formation about who buys Harry Potter books on Amazon or who has taken
a Caribbean cruise and might enjoy one in Alaska, it changes the values of a
culture. Not only does it create an incentive to spy, torture and generate false
information but it creates a powerful impetus to perpetuate the fear and
sense of peril that created the industry in the first place.
When new economies emerged in the past, from the Fordist revolution to
the I T boom, they sparked a flood of analysis and debate about how such
seismic shifts in the production of wealth were also altering the way we as a
culture worked, the way we traveled, even the way our brains process infor­
mation. The new disaster economy has been subject to none of this kind of
far-reaching discussion. There have been and are debates, of course—about
the constitutionality of the Patriot Act, about indefinite detention, about tor­
ture and extraordinary rendition —but discussion of what it means to have
these functions performed as commercial transactions has been almost com­
pletely avoided. What passes for debate is restricted to individual cases of war
profiteering and corruption scandals, as well as the usual hand-wringing
about the failure of government to adequately oversee private contractors—
rarely about the much broader and deeper phenomenon of what it means to
be engaged in a fully privatized war built to have no end.
Part of the problem is that the disaster economy sneaked up on us. In the
eighties and nineties, new economies announced themselves with great
pride and fanfare. The tech bubble in particular set a precedent for a new

S H O C K T H E R A P Y IN T H E U . S . A .

307

ownership class inspiring deafening levels of hype —endless media lifestyle
profiles of dashing young C E O s beside their private jets, their remotecontrolled yachts, their idyllic Seattle mountain homes.
That kind of wealth is being generated by the disaster complex today,
though we rarely hear about it. According to a 2006 study, "Since the 'War
on Terror' began, the C E O s of the top 34 defense contractors have enjoyed
average pay levels that are double the amounts they received during the four
years leading up to 9/11." While these C E O s saw their compensation go up
an average of 108 percent between 2001 and 2005, chief executives at other
large American companies averaged only 6 percent over the same period.

60

The disaster industry may be approaching dot-com levels of profit, but it
generally has CIA levels of discretion. Disaster capitalists dodge the press,
play down their wealth and know better than to brag. "We are not celebrat­
ing that there is this huge industry blossoming around protecting ourselves
from terrorism," said John Elstner of the Chesapeake Innovation Center, a
homeland security incubator. "But there is big business going on, and C I C
is in the middle of it."

61

Peter Swire, who served as the U.S. government's privacy counselor dur­
ing the Clinton administration, describes the convergence of forces behind
the War on Terror bubble like this: "You have government on a holy mission
to ramp up information gathering and you have an information technology
62

industry desperate for new markets." In other words, you have corporatism:
big business and big government combining their formidable powers to reg­
ulate and control the citizenry.

CHAPTER

15

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE
R E M O V I N G T H E REVOLVING DOOR,
PUTTING IN A N A R C H W A Y

I think that's weird a n d it's nuts. To s u g g e s t that everything we do
is b e c a u s e we're h u n g r y for money, I think that's crazy. I think you
need to g o back to s c h o o l .
—George H. W. B u s h in r e s p o n s e to an accusation that his s o n in­
vaded Iraq to open up new m a r k e t s for U . S . c o m p a n i e s

1

There's s o m e t h i n g civil s e r v a n t s have that the private sector
doesn't. A n d that is the duty of loyalty to the greater g o o d — t h e
duty of loyalty to the collective best interest of all rather than the
interest of a few. C o m p a n i e s have duties of loyalty to their s h a r e ­
h o l d e r s , not to the country.
—David M. Walker, comptroller g e n e r a l of the United States, F e b r u ­
ary 2 0 0 7

2

He doesn't s e e the difference between public and private inter­
ests.
— S a m Gardiner, retired U . S . Air Force colonel, on Dick Cheney,
February 2 0 0 4

3

In the heat of the midterm elections in 2006, three weeks before announcing
Donald Rumsfeld's resignation, George W. Bush signed the Defense Autho­
rization Act in a private Oval Office ceremony. Tucked into its fourteen
hundred pages is a rider that went almost completely unnoticed at the time.
It gave the president the power to declare martial law and "employ the armed

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

309

forces, including the National Guard," overriding the wishes of state gover­
nors, in the event of a "public emergency" in order to "restore public order"
and "suppress" the disorder. That emergency could be a hurricane, a mass
protest or a "public health emergency," in which case the army could be
4

used to impose quarantines and to safeguard vaccine supplies. Before this
act, the president had these martial law powers only in the face of an insur­
rection.
With his colleagues on the campaign trail, Democratic Senator Patrick
Leahy was a lone voice of alarm, entering into the public record that "using
the military for law enforcement goes against one of the founding tenets of
our democracy" and pointing out that "the implications of changing the act
are enormous, but this change was just slipped in the defense bill as a rider
with little study. Other congressional committees with jurisdiction over these
matters had no chance to comment, let alone hold hearings on, these pro­
posals."

5

In addition to the executive branch, which gained the extraordinary new
powers, there was at least one other clear winner: the pharmaceutical indus­
try. In the case of any kind of disease outbreak, the military can now be
called in to safeguard their labs and drug supplies and impose quarantines —
a long-standing policy goal of the Bush administration. That was good news
for Rumsfeld's former company Gilead Sciences, which owns the patent on
Tamiflu, used to treat avian flu. The new law, as well as continued avian flu
scares, may even have contributed to Tamiflu's stellar performance after
Rumsfeld left office; in just five months, its stock price went up 24 percent.

6

What role did industry interests play in shaping the specifics of the law?
Perhaps none, but the question is worth asking. Similarly, and on a much
wider scale, what role did the benefits to contractors such as Halliburton and
Bechtel and oil companies such as ExxonMobil play in the Bush team's en­
thusiasm for invading and occupying Iraq? These questions of motivation
are impossible to answer with any precision, because the people involved are
notorious for conflating corporate interests with the national interest, to the ex­
tent that they themselves are seemingly incapable of drawing distinctions.
In his 2006 book Overthrow, the former New York Times correspondent
Stephen Kinzer tries to get to the bottom of what has motivated the U.S.
politicians who have ordered and orchestrated foreign coups d'état over the
past century. Studying U.S. involvement in regime change operations from
Hawaii in 1893 to Iraq in 2003, he observes that there is often a clear threestage process that takes place. First, a U.S.-based multinational corporation

310

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

faces some kind of threat to its bottom line by the actions of a foreign gov­
ernment demanding that the company "pay taxes or that it observe labor laws
or environmental laws. Sometimes that company is nationalized or is some­
how required to sell some of its land or its assets," Kinzer says. Second, U.S.
politicians hear of this corporate setback and reinterpret it as an attack on the
United States: "They transform the motivation from an economic one into a
political or geo-strategic one. They make the assumption that any regime that
would bother an American company or harass an American company must
be anti-American, repressive, dictatorial, and probably the tool of some for­
eign power or interest that wants to undermine the United States." The third
stage happens when the politicians have to sell the need for intervention to
the public, at which point it becomes a broadly drawn struggle of good versus
evil, "a chance to free a poor oppressed nation from the brutality of a regime
that we assume is a dictatorship, because what other kind of a regime would
7

be bothering an American company?" Much of U.S. foreign policy, in other
words, is an exercise in mass projection, in which a tiny self-interested elite
conflates its needs and desires with those of the entire world.
Kinzer points out that this tendency has been especially pronounced in
politicians who move directly from the corporate world into public office.
For instance, Eisenhower's secretary of state, John Foster Dulles, worked as a
high-powered international corporate lawyer for most of his life, representing
some of the richest firms in the world in their conflicts with foreign govern­
ments. Dulles's various biographers have concluded, like Kinzer, that the
secretary of state was simply incapable of distinguishing between the inter­
ests of corporations and the interests of his country. "Dulles had two lifelong
obsessions: fighting Communism and protecting the rights of multinational
corporations," writes Kinzer. "In his mind they were . . . 'interrelated and
8

mutually reinforcing.' " That meant he didn't need to choose between his
obsessions: if the Guatemalan government took an action that hurt the inter­
ests of the United Fruit Company, for instance, that was a de facto attack on
America and worthy of a military response.
As it pursues its twin obsessions of fighting terrorism and protecting the
interests of multinational corporations, the Bush administration, packed
with C E O s fresh from the boardroom, is subject to the same confusions and
conflations. But there is a significant difference. The companies with which
Dulles identified were multinationals with large international investments in
foreign countries —in mining, agriculture, banking and oil. These companies
generally shared a straightforward objective: they wanted stable, profitable

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

311

environments in which to do business—loose investment laws, pliant work­
ers and no nasty expropriation surprises. Coups and military interventions
were a means to that end, not the goal itself.
As proto-disaster capitalists, the architects of the War on Terror are part of
a different breed of corporate-politicians from their predecessors, one for
whom wars and other disasters are indeed ends in themselves. When Dick
Cheney and Donald Rumsfeld conflate what is good for Lockheed, Hal­
liburton, Carlyle and Gilead with what is good for the United States and
indeed the world, it is a form of projection with uniquely dangerous conse­
quences. That's because what is unquestionably good for the bottom line of
these companies is cataclysm—wars, epidemics, natural disasters and re­
source shortages—which is why all their fortunes have improved dramati­
cally since Bush took office. What makes their acts of projection even more
perilous is the fact that, to an unprecedented degree, key Bush officials have
maintained their interests in the disaster capitalism complex even as they
have ushered in a new era of privatized war and disaster response, allowing
them to simultaneously profit from the disasters they help unleash.
For instance, when Rumsfeld resigned his post after the Republican de­
feat in the 2006 midterm elections, the press reported that he was returning
to the private sector. The truth was that he never actually left. When he ac­
cepted Bush's nomination as defense secretary, Rumsfeld, like all public of­
ficials, was required to divest himself of any holdings that stood to lose or
gain from decisions he might make while in office. Simple enough—that
meant selling everything related to national security or defense. But Rums­
feld had a great deal of trouble. He was so weighed down with holdings in
various disaster-related industries that he claimed it was impossible to disen­
tangle himself in time to meet the deadlines, and he tied the ethics rules in
knots trying to hold on to everything he could.
He sold off his directly owned stocks in Lockheed, Boeing and other de­
fense companies and put up to $50 million worth of stocks in a blind trust.
But he still was part or complete owner of private investment firms that were
devoted to defense and biotechnology stocks. Rumsfeld was unwilling to
take losses to sell those companies quickly and instead asked for two threemonth extensions to the time limit—extremely rare at that level of govern­
ment. That meant he was still looking for what he considered suitable buyers
for his companies and assets a full six months into his term as defense secre­
tary, possibly even longer.

9

When it came to Gilead Sciences, the company Rumsfeld used to chair

312

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

and that held the patent on Tamiflu, the secretary of defense put his foot
down. Asked to choose between his business interests and his public calling,
he simply refused. Epidemics are national security issues and therefore
squarely within the portfolio of the defense secretary. Yet despite this glaring
conflict of interest, Rumsfeld failed to sell off his Gilead stocks for his entire
term in office, holding on to somewhere between $8 million and $39 million
worth of Gilead holdings.

10

As the Senate Ethics Committee tried to bring him into compliance with
standard conflict rules, Rumsfeld was openly belligerent. At one point, he
wrote a letter to the Office of Government Ethics complaining that he had to
spend $60,000 on accountants' fees to help him with "excessively complex
and confusing" disclosure forms. For a man bent on holding on to $95 mil­
lion in shares while in office, $60,000 in finessing fees hardly seemed out of
proportion.

11

Rumsfeld's adamant refusal to stop making money from disaster while in
the top security post in the country affected his job performance in several
concrete ways. For much of his first year in office, while he looked to off-load
his holdings, Rumsfeld had to recuse himself from an alarming range of crucial
policy decisions: according to the Associated Press, "he has avoided Penta­
gon meetings in which AIDS is discussed." And when the federal govern­
ment had to decide whether to intervene in several high-profile mergers and
sales involving top defense contractors, including General Electric, Honey­
well, Northrop Grumman and Silicon Valley Graphics, Rumsfeld recused
himself from those top-level talks as well. It turned out, according to his offi­
cial spokesperson, that he had financial ties to several of the companies listed
above. "I have tended to stay away from them thus far," Rumsfeld told a re­
porter who asked about one of the sales.

12

For the six years that he held office, Rumsfeld had to leave the room when­
ever talk turned to the possibility of avian flu treatment and the purchase of
drugs for it. According to the letter outlining the arrangement that allowed
him to hold on to his stocks, he had to stay out of decisions that "may directly
13

and predictably affect Gilead." His colleagues, however, took good care of
his interests. In July 2005, the Pentagon purchased $58 million worth of Tamiflu, and the Department of Health and Human Services announced that it
would order up to $1 billion worth of the drug a few months later.

14

Rumsfeld's defiance definitely paid off. If he had sold his Gilead stocks at
inauguration, in January 2001, he would have received a mere $7.45 each.
By keeping them through all the avian flu scares, all the bioterror hysteria

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

313

and through his own administration's decisions to invest heavily in the com­
pany, Rumsfeld ended up with stocks worth $67.60 each when he left
office—an 807 percent increase. (By April 2007 the price had reached $84
15

each.) That meant that when Rumsfeld left his post as defense secretary, he
did so a significantly wealthier man than when he arrived—a rare occur­
rence for a multimillionaire in public office.
If Rumsfeld never really left Gilead behind, Cheney was equally reluctant
to fully sever his ties to Halliburton—an arrangement that, unlike Rums­
feld's with Gilead, has been the subject of a great deal of media attention.
Before stepping down as C E O to be George Bush's running mate, Cheney
negotiated a retirement package that left him loaded with Halliburton stocks
and options. After some uncomfortable press questions, he agreed to sell
some of his Halliburton shares, making an impressive $18.5 million profit in
the process. But he didn't cash out entirely. According to The Wall Street
Journal, Cheney hung on to 189,000 Halliburton shares and 500,000 un­
vested options even as he entered the vice presidency.

16

The fact that Cheney still maintains such a quantity of Halliburton shares
means that throughout his term as vice president, he has collected millions
every year in dividends from his stocks and has also been paid an annual de­
ferred income by Halliburton of $211,000 —roughly equivalent to his gov­
ernment salary. When he leaves office in 2009 and is able to cash in his
Halliburton holdings, Cheney will have the opportunity to profit extrava­
gantly from the stunning improvement in Halliburton's fortunes. The com­
pany's stock price rose from $10 before the war in Iraq to $41 three years
later—a 300 percent jump, thanks to a combination of soaring energy prices
and Iraq contracts, both of which flow directly from Cheney's steering the
17

country into war with Iraq. Iraq seems to fit Kinzer's formula perfectly. Sad­
dam did not pose a threat to U.S. security, but he did pose a threat to U.S. en­
ergy companies, since he had recently signed contracts with a Russian oil
giant and was in negotiations with France's Total, leaving U.S. and British
oil firms with nothing; the third-largest proven oil reserves in the world were
18

slipping out of the Anglo-American grasp. Saddam's removal from power
has opened vistas of opportunities for the oil giants, including ExxonMobil,
Chevron, Shell and BP, all of whom have been laying the groundwork for
new deals in Iraq, as well as for Halliburton, which, with its move to Dubai,
19

is perfectly positioned to sell its energy services to all these companies. Al­
ready the war itself has been the single most profitable event in Halliburton's
history.

3H

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Both Rumsfeld and Cheney could have taken simple measures to divest
themselves completely of their disaster-related holdings, thereby eliminating
any doubt about what role profit has played in their enthusiasm for disasterproducing situations. But then they would have missed the boom years in
their own industries. Asked to choose between private profit and public life,
again and again they chose profit, forcing the government ethics committees
to adapt to their defiant stance.
During the Second World War, President Franklin D. Roosevelt spoke
out strongly against war profiteers, saying, "I don't want to see a single war
millionaire created in the United States as a result of this world disaster."
One wonders what he would have made of Cheney, whose millions in war
profits accumulated while he was a sitting vice president. Or Rumsfeld, who,
in 2004, couldn't resist cashing in a few Gilead stocks, making an easy $5
million, according to his annual disclosure report, while he was defense
secretary—a small taste of the profits that awaited him when he left office.

20

In the Bush administration, the war profiteers aren't just clamoring to get ac­
cess to government, they are the government; there is no distinction between
the two.
The Bush years have, of course, been characterized by some of the seedi­
est and most blatant corruption scandals in recent memory: Jack Abramoff
and his golfing vacations offered to members of Congress; Randy "Duke"
Cunningham, now serving eight years for accepting bribes and donating his
yacht the Duke-Stir as part of a "bribe menu" listed on official congressional
letterhead to a defense contractor; and the parties at the Watergate hotel with
courtesy prostitutes—all sounding very much like Moscow and Buenos Aires
in the mid-nineties.

21

Then there is the whirling revolving door between government and in­
dustry. It has always been there, but for the most part political figures used to
wait until their administration was out of office before cashing in on govern­
ment connections. Under Bush, the nonstop homeland security market bo­
nanza has proved too tempting for many administration officials to resist. So,
rather than wait until the end of their terms, hundreds, from a wide range of
government agencies, have already charged for the door. According to Eric
Lipton, who has tracked this phenomenon in the Department of Homeland
Security for The New York Times, "veteran Washington lobbyists and watch­
dog groups say the exodus of such a sizable share of an agency's senior man­
agement before the end of an administration has few modern parallels."
Lipton identified ninety-four examples of civil servants who had been working

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

315

on domestic security and who are now working in some aspect of the home­
land security industry.

22

There are far too many such cases to detail here, but a few stand out,
since they involve the key architects of the War on Terror. John Ashcroft, for­
mer attorney general and prime mover behind the Patriot Act, now heads up
the Ashcroft Group, specializing in helping homeland security firms pro­
cure federal contracts. Tom Ridge, the first head of the Department of
Homeland Security, is now at Ridge Global and an adviser to the communi­
cation technology company Lucent, which is active in the security sector.
Rudy Giuliani, the former New York mayor and hero of the September 11 re­
sponse, started Giuliani Partners four months later to sell his services as a cri­
sis consultant. Richard Clarke, counterterrorism czar under Clinton and
Bush and an outspoken critic of the administration, is now chairman of
Good Harbor Consulting, specializing in homeland security and counterter­
rorism. James Woolsey, head of the CIA until 1995, is now at Paladin Capi­
tal Group, a private equity firm that invests in homeland security companies,
and a vice president at Booz Allen, one of the leaders in the homeland secu­
rity industry. Joe Allbaugh, head of F E M A on September 11, cashed out just
eighteen months later to start New Bridge Strategies, promising to be the
"bridge" between business and the lucrative world of government contracts
and investment opportunities in Iraq. He was replaced by Michael Brown,
who bolted after only two years to start Michael D. Brown L L C , specializing
in disaster preparedness.

23

"Can I quit now?" Brown wrote in an infamous e-mail to a fellow F E M A
24

staffer in the middle of the Hurricane Katrina disaster. That is pretty much
the philosophy: stay in government just long enough to get an impressive ti­
tle in a department handing out big contracts and to collect inside informa­
tion on what will sell, then quit and sell access to your former colleagues.
Public service is reduced to little more than a reconnaissance mission for fu­
ture work in the disaster capitalism complex.
In some ways, however, the stories about corruption and revolving doors
leave a false impression. They imply that there is still a clear line between
the state and the complex, when in fact that line disappeared long ago. The
innovation of the Bush years lies not in how quickly politicians move from
one world to the other but in how many feel entitled to occupy both worlds
simultaneously. People like Richard Perle and James Baker make policy, of­
fer top-level advice and speak in the press as disinterested experts and states­
men when they are at the same time utterly embedded in the business of

316

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

privatized war and reconstruction. They embody the ultimate fulfillment of
the corporatist mission: a total merger of political and corporate elites in the
name of security, with the state playing the role of chair of the business
guild—as well as the largest source of business opportunities, thanks to the
contract economy.
Wherever it has emerged over the past thirty-five years, from Santiago to
Moscow to Beijing to Bush's Washington, the alliance between a small cor­
porate elite and a right-wing government has been written off as some sort
of aberration —mafia capitalism, oligarchy capitalism and now, under Bush,
"crony capitalism." But it's not an aberration; it is where the entire Chicago
School crusade—with its triple obsessions—privatization, deregulation and
union-busting—has been leading.
Rumsfeld's and Cheney's dogged refusals to choose between their
disaster-connected holdings and their public duties were the first sign that a
genuine corporatist state had arrived. There are many others.

The Power of the Formers
One of the distinguishing features of the Bush administration has been its re­
liance on outside advisers and freelance envoys to perform key functions:
James Baker, Paul Bremer, Henry Kissinger, George Shultz, Richard Perle,
as well as the members of the Defense Policy Board and the Committee for
the Liberation of Iraq, to name just a few. While Congress played a rubberstamp role during the pivotal decision-making years, and Supreme Court
rulings are treated as little more than gentle suggestions, these mostly volun­
teer advisers have wielded enormous influence.
Their power stems from the fact that these advisers used to perform key
roles in government—they are former secretaries of state, former ambassa­
dors and former undersecretaries of defense. All have been out of govern­
ment for years and, in the meantime, have set up lucrative careers in the
disaster capitalism complex. Because they are classified as contractors, not
staff, most are not subject to the same conflict-of-interest rules as elected or
appointed politicians — i f they are subject to any restrictions at all. The effect
has been to eliminate the so-called revolving door between government and
industry and put in "an archway" (as the disaster management specialist Ir­
win Redlener put it to me). It has allowed the disaster industries to set up
shop inside the government, using the reputations of such illustrious expoliticians as cover.

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

317

When in March 2006 James Baker was named cochair of the Iraq Study
Group, the advisory panel charged with recommending a new way forward
in Iraq, there was palpable bipartisan relief: here was a politician of the old
school, one who had steered the country in more stable times, a grown-up.
Certainly Baker is a veteran of a less reckless era of U.S. foreign policy than
the current one. But that was fifteen years ago. Who is James Baker now?
Like Cheney, when he left office at the end of Bush Sr.'s term, James
Baker III made a fortune from his government contacts. Particularly lucra­
tive were the friends he made in Saudi Arabia and Kuwait during the first
25

Gulf War. His Houston-based law firm, Baker Botts, represents the Saudi
royal family as well as Halliburton and Gazprom, Russia's largest oil com­
pany, and is one of the leading oil and gas law firms in the world. He also be­
came an equity partner in the Carlyle Group, earning an estimated $180
million stake in the highly secretive company.

26

Carlyle has benefited enormously from the war, thanks to sales of robot­
ics systems, defense communications systems, and a major Iraq contract to
train police awarded to its holding, USIS. The $56 billion company has a
defense-oriented equity firm that specializes in collecting defense contrac­
tors and taking them public, a very profitable enterprise in recent years. "It's
the best 18 months we ever had," said Carlyle's chief investment officer,
Bill Conway, referring to the first eighteen months of the war in Iraq. "We
made money and we made it fast." The war in Iraq, already clearly a disas­
ter, translated into a record-breaking $6.6 billion payout to Carlyle's select
investors.

27

When Bush Jr. pulled Baker back into public life by naming him his spe­
cial envoy on Iraq's debt, Baker did not have to cash out of the Carlyle
Group or Baker Botts, despite their direct interests in the war. At first, several
commentators pointed out these serious potential conflicts. The New York
Times published an editorial calling on Baker to resign his posts at the Car­
lyle Group and Baker Botts to preserve the integrity of the debt envoy posi­
tion. "Mr. Baker is far too tangled in a matrix of lucrative private business
relationships that leave him looking like a potentially interested party in any
debt-restructuring formula," stated the editorial. It concluded that it wasn't
enough for Baker to "forgo earnings from clients with obvious connections
to Iraqi debts. . . . To perform honorably in his new public job, Mr. Baker
must give up these two private ones."

28

In keeping with the example set at the top of the administration, Baker
simply refused, and Bush backed his decision, leaving Baker in charge of the

318

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

effort of persuading governments around the world to forgive Iraq's crushing
foreign debt. After he had been in the role for nearly a year, I obtained a
copy of a confidential document that proved that he was in a far more serious
and direct conflict of interest than previously understood. The document
was a sixty-five-page business plan submitted by a consortium of companies,
including the Carlyle Group, to the government of Kuwait, one of Iraq's
main creditors. The consortium offered to use its high-level political con­
nections to collect from Iraq $27 billion in unpaid debts to Kuwait stem­
ming from Saddam's invasion of Kuwait—in other words, to do exactly the
opposite of what Baker was supposed to be doing as envoy, which was to
convince governments that Saddam-era debts should be canceled.

29

The document, titled "Proposal to Assist the Government of Kuwait in
Protecting and Realizing Claims against Iraq," was submitted almost two
months after Baker's appointment. It named James Baker personally eleven
times, making it clear that Kuwait would benefit from working with a com­
pany that employed the man in charge of erasing Iraq's debts. But there was
a price. In exchange for these services, the documents said, the government
of Kuwait would have to invest $1 billion with the Carlyle Group. It was
straight-up influence peddling: pay Baker's company to get protection from
Baker. I showed the document to Kathleen Clark, a law professor at Wash­
ington University and a leading expert on government ethics and regula­
tions, and she said Baker was in a "classic conflict of interest. Baker is on two
sides of this transaction: he is supposed to be representing the interests of the
United States, but he is also a senior counselor at Carlyle, and Carlyle wants
to get paid to help Kuwait recover its debts from Iraq." After examining the
documents, Clark determined that "Carlyle and the other companies are ex­
ploiting Baker's current position to try to land a deal with Kuwait that would
undermine the interests of the U.S. government."
The day after my story about Baker was published in The Nation, Carlyle
backed out of the consortium, forfeiting its hope of landing the $1 billion;
several months later, Baker cashed out of the Carlyle Group and resigned as
general counsel. But the real damage had been done: Baker had performed
miserably as envoy, failing to secure the kind of debt forgiveness that Bush
had pledged and Iraq required. In 2005 and 2006, Iraq made $2.59 billion
in reparation payments for Saddam's war, most to Kuwait—resources that
were desperately needed to meet Iraq's humanitarian crisis and to rebuild
the country, especially after U.S. firms pulled out with the aid money squan­
dered and the job left undone. Baker's mandate was to erase 90 to 95 percent

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

319

of Iraq's debt. Instead, the debt was merely rescheduled and is still equiva­
lent to 99 percent of the country's G D P .

30

Other key aspects of Iraq policy were also handed to freelance envoys
whose companies earned record profits from the war. Former secretary of
state George Shultz headed up the Committee for the Liberation of Iraq, a
pressure group formed in 2002 at the request of the Bush White House to
help it build the case for war in the public mind. Shultz certainly obliged.
Since his role was at arm's length from the administration, he was able to
whip up hysteria about the imminent danger posed by Saddam, entirely free
from any burden of proof or fact. "If there is a rattlesnake in the yard, you
don't wait for it to strike before you take action in self-defense," he wrote in
The Washington Post in September 2002 under the headline "Act Now: The
danger is immediate. Saddam Hussein must be removed." Shultz did not dis­
close to his readers that he was, at the time, a member of the board of direc­
tors of Bechtel, where he had served many years earlier as C E O . The
company would collect $2.3 billion to reconstruct the country that Shultz
31

was so eager to see destroyed. So, in retrospect, it seems worth asking, when
Shultz called on the world to Act Now, was he speaking as a concerned elder
statesman or as a representative of Bechtel—or perhaps Lockheed Martin?
According to Danielle Brian, executive director of the Project on Govern­
ment Oversight, a nonprofit watchdog group, "It's impossible to tell where the
government ends and Lockheed begins." It's even harder to tell where Lock­
heed ends and the Committee for the Liberation of Iraq begins. The group
Shultz headed and used as a pro-war platform was convened by Bruce Jack­
son, who, just three months earlier, held the job of vice president for strat­
egy and planning at Lockheed Martin. Jackson says that he was asked to
form the group by "people in the White House," but he stacked it with old
colleagues from Lockheed. Besides Jackson, Lockheed's representatives in­
cluded Charles Kupperman, Lockheed Martin's vice president for space
and strategic missiles, and Douglas Graham, Lockheed's director of defense
systems. Even though the committee was formed at the explicit request of
the White House to be the propaganda arm of the war, no one had to step
down from Lockheed or sell his shares. Which was certainly good for com­
mittee members, since Lockheed's share price jumped 145 percent thanks
to the war they helped engineer—from $41 in March 2003 to $102 in Feb­
ruary 2 0 0 7 .

32

And then there is Henry Kissinger, the man who kicked off the counter­
revolution with his support for Pinochet's coup. In his 2006 book State of

320

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Denial, Bob Woodward revealed that Dick Cheney holds monthly meetings
with Kissinger, while Bush meets with Kissinger about half as frequently,
"making him the most regular and frequent outside adviser to Bush on for­
eign affairs." Cheney told Woodward, "I probably talk to Henry Kissinger
more than I talk to anybody else."

33

But who was Kissinger representing in all those top-level meetings? Like
Baker and Shultz, he used to be a secretary of state, but hasn't held that post
for three decades. Since 1982, when he started his privately held and secre­
tive company, Kissinger Associates, his job has been to represent a roster of
clients that is said to have included everyone from Coca-Cola to Union Car­
bide to Hunt Oil to the engineering giant Fluor (one of the biggest recon­
struction contract winners in Iraq)—and even his old partner in the Chilean
covert action, I T T .

34

So when he met with Cheney, was he acting as elder

statesman, or as high-priced lobbyist for his oil and engineering clients?
Kissinger gave a strong indication of where his loyalties lay in November
2002, when Bush named him to chair the 9/11 Commission, perhaps the
most crucial role any patriot could be called out of retirement to perform.
Yet when the families of the victims asked Kissinger to produce a list of his
corporate clients, pointing to potential conflicts of interest with the investi­
gation, he refused to cooperate with this basic gesture of public accountabil­
ity and transparency. Rather than disclose the names of his clients, he
stepped down as chair of the commission.

35

Richard Perle, a friend and business associate of Kissinger's, would make
that precise choice a year later. Perle, a defense official under Reagan, was
asked by Rumsfeld to chair the Defense Policy Board. Before Perle took over,
the board was a quiet advisory panel, a way to pass on the knowledge of for­
mer administrations to the one in office. Perle turned it into a platform for
himself, using the impressive title to argue forcefully in the press for a pre­
emptive attack on Iraq. He also used it in other ways. According to a Sey­
mour Hersh investigation in The New Yorker, he touted the title to solicit
investment for his new company. Perle, it turned out, was one of the first
post-9/11 disaster capitalists —just two months after the attacks, he launched
his venture capital firm Trireme Partners, which would invest in firms devel­
oping products and services relevant to homeland security and defense. In
letters soliciting business, Trireme boasted of its political connections:
"Three of Trireme's Management Group members currently advise the U.S.
Secretary of Defense by serving on the U.S. Defense Policy Board." Those
three were Perle, his friend Gerald Hillman and Henry Kissinger.

36

A C O R P O R A T I S T STATE

321

One of Perle's early investors was Boeing—the Pentagon's second-largest
contractor—which kicked in $20 million to get Trireme going. Perle be­
came an outspoken Boeing fan, writing an op-ed supporting Boeing's con­
troversial $17 billion tanker contract with the Pentagon.*

37

Although Perle told his investors all about his pull at the Pentagon, several
of his colleagues on the Defense Policy Board say he failed to tell them about
Trireme. On hearing about the company, one described it as "at the edge of
or off the ethical charts." In the end, all the knots of conflict caught up with
Perle and he, like Kissinger, had to choose: make defense policy or profit
from the War on Terror. In March 2003, just as the war in Iraq was starting
and the contractor bonanza was about to begin, Perle stepped down as chair­
man of the Defense Policy Board.

38

There is nothing that enrages Richard Perle more than the suggestion
that his advocacy of unlimited war to end all evil is in any way influenced by
the enormous profitability of that proposition for him personally. On CNN,
Wolf Blitzer confronted Perle with Hersh's observation that "he has set up a
company that may gain from a war." It would seem self-evidently true, yet
Perle blew up, calling Hersh, a Pulitzer Prize winner, "the closest thing
American journalism has to a terrorist, frankly." He told Blitzer, "I don't be­
lieve that a company would gain from a war. . . . The suggestion that my
views are somehow related for the potential for investments in homeland de­
fense is complete nonsense."

39

It was a strange claim. If a venture capital firm that was set up to invest in se­
curity and defense companies managed not to gain from a war, it would surely
be failing its investors. The episode raised larger questions about the role
played by figures such as Perle, who exist in a gray zone between disaster capi­
talist, public intellectual and policy maker. If a Lockheed or Boeing executive
went on Fox News to make the case for regime change in Iran (as Perle has
done), their obvious self-interest would negate any intellectual arguments they

* The tanker deal became the biggest scandal in recent Pentagon history, ultimately landing
a senior Department of Defense official and a Boeing executive in jail. The official had been
negotiating for a job at Boeing while the deal was going down. In a subsequent investigation,
Rumsfeld w a s questioned about why he didn't catch the rotten deal under his watch. He
replied that he could not recall the details of his role in a contract that would consume be­
tween $17 billion and $30 billion of taxpayer money. "I don't remember approving it. But I
certainly don't remember not approving it, if you will." Rumsfeld was slammed for poor m a n ­
agement, but his forgetfulness may also have been a casualty of how frequently the secre­
tary of defense recused himself from purchasing discussions in order to avoid the
appearance of conflicts with his many defense-related holdings.

322

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

offered. Yet Perle continues to be introduced as an "analyst" or as a Pentagon
adviser, perhaps as "a neocon," but certainly there is never any suggestion that
he might just be an arms dealer with an impressive vocabulary.
Whenever members of this Washington clique are confronted with their
economic interests in the wars they support, they invariably respond the way
Perle did: the entire suggestion is preposterous, simple-minded, vaguely ter­
rorist. The neocons—a group that includes Cheney, Rumsfeld, Shultz, Jack­
son and, I would argue, Kissinger—take great pains to project themselves as
egghead intellectuals or hawkish realists, driven by ideology and big ideas,
not anything so worldly as profit. Bruce Jackson, for instance, says Lockheed
did not approve of his extracurricular foreign policy work. Perle says that his
association with the Pentagon has hurt him in business since "it means there
are . . . things you can't say and do." Perle's partner Gerald Hillman insists
that Perle "is not a financial creature. He doesn't have any desire for finan­
cial gain." Douglas Feith, when he was undersecretary of defense for policy,
claimed that "the vice president's former connection [with Halliburton]
made people in the government reluctant to award the contract, not eager to
do it, even though awarding it to KBR [Kellogg, Brown and Root, the former
Halliburton subsidiary] was the right thing to do."

40

Even their most committed critics tend to portray the neocons as true be­
lievers, motivated exclusively by a commitment to the supremacy of Ameri­
can and Israeli power that is so all-consuming they are prepared to sacrifice
economic interests in favor of "security." This distinction is both artificial and
amnesiac. The right to limitless profit-seeking has always been at the center of
neocon ideology. Before 9/11, demands for radical privatization and attacks
on social spending fuelled the neocon movement—Friedmanite to its core—
at think tanks such as the American Enterprise Institute, Heritage and Cato.
With the War on Terror, the neocons didn't abandon their corporatist
economic goals; they found a new, even more effective way to achieve them.
Of course these Washington hawks are committed to an imperial role for the
United States in the world and for Israel in the Middle East. It is impossible,
however, to separate that military project—endless war abroad, and a secu­
rity state at home—from the interests of the disaster capitalism complex,
which has built a multibillion-dollar industry based on these very assump­
tions. Nowhere has the merger of these political and profit-making goals
been clearer than on the battlefields of Iraq.

PART 6

IRAQ, F U L L CIRCLE
OVERSHOCK

One of the risks in shock-based operations has to do
with the likelihood of "unintended consequences," or in
precipitating reactions that have not been anticipated.
For example, extensive attacks against a nation's infra­
structure, electrical grid, or economic system can cre­
ate such extreme hardship that the resulting backlash
bolsters rather than weakens our opponent's national
will to fight.
—Lieutenant Colonel John N. T. Shanahan, "ShockBased Operations," Air & Space Power, October 15, 2001
Direct physical brutality creates only resentment, hos­
tility, and further defiance

Interrogatees who have

withstood pain are more difficult to handle by other
methods. The effect has been not to repress the subject
but to restore his confidence and maturity.
—Kubark Counterintelligence Interrogation,
CIA manual, 1963

CHAPTER

l6

ERASING IRAQ
IN S E A R C H OF A " M O D E L "
FOR THE M I D D L E EAST

The introverted schizophrenic or melancholic m a y be likened to a
w a l l e d city which h a s closed its g a t e s a n d r e f u s e s to trade with
the rest of the w o r l d . . . . A breach is blown in the w a l l , a n d rela­
tions with the world are r e - e s t a b l i s h e d . Unfortunately w e cannot
control the amount of d a m a g e done in the b o m b a r d m e n t .
— A n d r e w M. WylLie, a British psychiatrist, on electroshock therapy,
1940

1

In a p o s t - S e p t . 11 w o r l d , I thought the prudent u s e of violence
could be therapeutic.
—Richard C o h e n , a Washington
the invasion of I r a q

Post c o l u m n i s t , on his s u p p o r t for

2

It was March 2004. I had been in Baghdad for less than three hours, and it
wasn't going well. First, our car hadn't shown up at the airport checkpoint,
and my photographer, Andrew Stem, and I had to hitch a ride on what was
already being called "the most dangerous road in the world." When we
made it to the hotel in the busy Karada district, we were greeted by Michael
Birmingham, an Irish peace activist who had moved to Baghdad before the
invasion. I had asked if he could introduce me to a few Iraqis concerned
about the plans to privatize their economy. "No one here cares about privati­
zation," Michael told us. "What they care about is surviving."
A tense debate followed about the ethics of bringing a political agenda to
a war zone. Michael wasn't saying that Iraqis supported the privatization

326

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

plans—only that most people had more urgent concerns. They were worried
about bombs going off in their mosques or finding a cousin who has disap­
peared into the U.S.-run Abu Ghraib prison. They were thinking about how
to get drinking and bathing water for tomorrow, not whether a foreign com­
pany wanted to privatize their water system and sell it back to them in a year.
The job of an outsider, he argued, is to try to document the reality of war and
occupation, not to decide what Iraqi priorities ought to be.
I defended myself as best as I could, pointing out that selling this country
off to Bechtel and ExxonMobil wasn't an idea I had dreamed up—it was al­
ready in its early stages, spearheaded by the White House's top envoy to Iraq,
L. Paul Bremer III. For months I had been reporting on the auctioning off of
Iraq's state assets from trade shows in hotel ballrooms, surreal events where
body-armor salesmen terrified businessmen with stories of severed limbs while
U.S. trade officials assured everyone that it really wasn't as bad as it seemed
on TV. "The best time to invest is when there is still blood on the ground," I
was told earnestly by a delegate at the "Rebuilding Iraq 2" conference in
Washington, D.C.
The fact that it was hard to find people in Baghdad who were interested
in talking about economics was not surprising. The architects of this inva­
sion were firm believers in the shock doctrine —they knew that while Iraqis
were consumed with daily emergencies, the country could be auctioned off
discreetly and the results announced as a done deal. As for journalists and
activists, we seemed to be exhausting our attention on the spectacular phys­
ical attacks, forgetting that the parties with the most to gain never show up
on the battlefield. And in Iraq there was plenty to gain: not just the world's
third-largest proven oil reserves but territory that was one of the last remain­
ing holdouts from the drive to build a global market based on Friedman's
vision of unfettered capitalism. After the crusade had conquered Latin
America, Africa, Eastern Europe and Asia, the Arab world called out as its
final frontier.
While Michael and I debated back and forth, Andrew went to have a cig­
arette on the balcony. As he opened the glass door, all the air seem to be
sucked out of the room. Outside the window was a ball of lavalike fire, deep
red flecked with black. We grabbed our shoes and ran in our socks down five
flights of stairs. The lobby was covered in shattered glass. Around the corner,
the Mount Lebanon Hotel lay in rubble, along with a neighboring house,
destroyed by a thousand-pound bomb, making it, at that point, the largest at­
tack of its kind since the end of the war.

E R A S I N G IRAQ

327

Andrew ran with his camera to the wreckage; I tried not to, but ended up
following. After only three hours in Baghdad, I was already breaking my one
rule: no bomb chasing. Back at the hotel, all the indie reporters and N G O
types were drinking arak and trying to get their adrenalin under control.
Everybody kept grinning at me and saying, "Welcome to Baghdad!" I
glanced at Michael, and we both silently acknowledged that, yes, he had
won the argument. The last word came from the war itself: "Bombs, not
journalists, set the agenda here." And they certainly do. They don't just suck
oxygen into their vortex, they demand everything: our attention, our com­
passion, our outrage.
That night I thought about Claudia Acuna, the extraordinary journalist I
had met in Buenos Aires two years earlier who had given me a copy of
Rodolfo Walsh's "Open Letter from a Writer to the Military Junta." She had
warned me that extreme violence has a way of preventing us from seeing the
interests it serves. In a way, it had happened already to the antiwar move­
ment. Our explanations for why the war was waged rarely went beyond oneword answers: oil, Israel, Halliburton. Most of us chose to oppose the war as
an act of folly by a president who mistook himself for a king, and his British
sidekick who wanted to be on the winning side of history. There was little in­
terest in the idea that war was a rational policy choice, that the architects of
the invasion had unleashed ferocious violence because they could not crack
open the closed economies of the Middle East by peaceful means, that the
level of terror was proportional to what was at stake.
The invasion of Iraq was sold to the public on the basis of fear of weapons of
mass destruction because, as Paul Wolfowitz explained, W M D s were "the
one issue that everyone could agree on" —it was, in other words, the lowest3

common-denominator excuse. The more rarefied reason, favored by the
most intellectual proponents of the war, was the "model" theory. According
to the pundits who advanced this theory, many of them identified as neo­
cons, terrorism was coming from multiple locations in the Arab and Muslim
world: the September 11 hijackers were from Saudi Arabia, Egypt, the
United Arab Emirates and Lebanon; Iran was funding Hezbollah; Syria was
housing Hamas's leadership; Iraq was sending money to the families of
Palestinian suicide bombers. For these war advocates, who conflated attacks
on Israel with attacks on the U.S., as if there were no differences between the
two, that was enough to qualify the entire region as a potential terrorist
breeding ground.

328

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

So what was it about this part of the world, they asked, that produced ter­
rorism? Ideologically blinded from seeing either U.S. or Israeli policies as
contributing factors, let alone provocations, they identified the true cause as
something else—the region's deficit in free-market democracy.*

4

Since the entire Arab world could not be conquered all at once, a single
country needed to serve as the catalyst. The U.S. would invade that country
and turn it into, as Thomas Friedman, chief media proselytizer of the theory,
put it, "a different model in the heart of the Arab-Muslim world," one that in
turn would set off a series of democratic/neoliberal waves throughout the re­
gion. Joshua Muravchik, an American Enterprise Institute pundit, forecast
a "tsunami across the Islamic world" in "Tehran and Baghdad," while the
archconservative Michael Ledeen, an adviser to the Bush administration,
described the goal as "a war to remake the world."

15

Within the internal logic of this theory, fighting terrorism, spreading fron­
tier capitalism and holding elections were bundled into a single unified
project. The Middle East would be "cleaned out" of terrorists and a giant
free-trade zone would be created; then it would all be locked in with afterthe-fact elections—a sort of three-for-one special. George W. Bush later sim­
plified this agenda to a single phrase: "spreading freedom in a troubled
region," and many mistook the sentiment as a starry-eyed commitment to
6

democracy. But it was always that other kind of freedom, the one offered to
Chile in the seventies and to Russia in nineties—the freedom for Western
* The free-market wave had bypassed this region for several reasons. The richest c o u n t r i e s Kuwait, Saudi Arabia, the emirates—were so flush with oil cash that they managed to keep
out of debt and thus out of the grip of the IMF (84 percent of Saudi Arabia's economy, for in­
stance, is state controlled). Iraq had a heavy debt, accumulated during the war with Iran, but
just a s the era of globalization w a s beginning, the first Gulf War ended and Iraq w a s locked
away under strict sanctions: not only would there be no "free trade," there would be virtually
no legal trade at all.
t The idea that a failure to join the Washington C o n s e n s u s could be enough to provoke a for­
eign invasion may seem far-fetched, but there w a s a precedent. When NATO bombed Bel­
grade in 1999, the official reason w a s Slobodan Milosevic's egregious human rights
violations that had horrified the world. But in a little-reported revelation years after the
Kosovo war, Strobe Talbott, deputy secretary of state under President Clinton and the lead
U.S. negotiator during the war, provided a distinctly less idealistic explanation. " A s nations
throughout the region sought to reform their economies, mitigate ethnic tensions, and
broaden civil society, Belgrade seemed to delight in continually moving in the opposite direc­
tion. It is s m a l l wonder NATO and Yugoslavia ended up on a collision course. It was Yugo­
slavia's resistance to the broader trends of political and economic reform—not the plight of
the Kosovar Albanians—that best explains NATO's war." The revelation came out in a 2005
book, Collision Course: NATO, Russia, and Kosovo by Talbott's former communications direc­
tor, John Norris.

E R A S I N G IRAQ

329

multinationals to feed off freshly privatized states—that was at the center of
the model theory. The president made that perfectly clear only eight days af­
ter declaring an end to major combat in Iraq when he announced plans for
the "establishment of a U.S.-Middle East free trade area within a decade."

7

Dick Cheney's daughter Liz, a veteran of the Soviet shock therapy adven­
ture, was put in charge of the project.
When the idea of invading an Arab country and turning it into a model
state first gained currency after September 11, the names of several possible
countries were floated—Iraq, Syria, Egypt and, Michael Ledeen's prefer­
ence, Iran. Iraq had a great deal to recommend it, however. In addition to its
vast oil reserves, it also made a good central location for military bases now
that Saudi Arabia looked less dependable, and Saddam's use of chemical
weapons on his own people made him easy to hate. Another factor, often
overlooked, was that Iraq had the advantage of familiarity.
The 1991 Gulf War had been the U.S.'s last major ground offensive in­
volving hundreds of thousands of troops, and in the twelve years since, the
Pentagon had been using the battle as a template in workshops, training and
elaborate war games. One example of this postgame theory was a paper that
had captured the imagination of Donald Rumsfeld called Shock and Awe:
Achieving Rapid Dominance.

Written by a group of maverick strategists at

the National Defense University in 1996, the paper positions itself as an allpurpose military doctrine, but it is really about refighting the Gulf War. Its
lead author, the retired navy commander Harlan Ullman, explained that the
project began when General Chuck Horner, the commander of the air war
in the 1991 invasion, was asked about his greatest frustration in fighting Sad­
dam Hussein. He replied that he did not know where to "stick the needle" to
make the Iraqi army collapse. "Shock and Awe," writes Ullman (who coined
the phrase) "was intended to address this question: If Desert Storm could be
refought, how could we win in half the time or less and with far fewer
forces? . . . The key to its success is finding the entry points for Horner's
needles—the spots that, when targeted, get an enemy to collapse immedi­
8

ately." The authors were convinced that if the U.S. military ever got the
chance to fight Saddam again, it would now be in a far better position to find
those "entry points," thanks to new satellite technologies and breakthroughs
in precision weaponry that would allow it to insert the "needles" with unpre­
cedented accuracy.
Iraq had another advantage. While the U.S. military was busy fantasizing
about refighting Desert Storm with a technological upgrade equivalent to

330

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

"the difference between Atari and PlayStation," as one commentator put it,
Iraq's military capacity had been hurtling backward, eroded by sanctions
and virtually disassembled by the United Nations-administered weapons in­
9

spection program. That meant that, compared with Iran or Syria, Iraq
seemed the site for the most winnable war.
Thomas Friedman was forthright about what it meant for Iraq to be se­
lected as the model. "We are not doing nation-building in Iraq. We are doing
nation-creating," he wrote—as if shopping around for a large, oil-rich Arab
nation to create from scratch was a natural, even "noble" thing to do in the
twenty-first century.

10

Friedman is among many of the onetime war advo­

cates who has since claimed that he did not foresee the carnage that would
follow from the invasion. It's hard to see how he could have missed that de­
tail. Iraq was not an empty space on a map; it was and remains a culture as
old as civilization, with fierce anti-imperialist pride, strong Arab nationalism,
deeply held faiths and a majority of the adult male population with military
training. If "nation creating" was going to happen in Iraq, what exactly was
supposed to become of the nation that was already there? The unspoken as­
sumption from the beginning was that much of it would have to disappear,
to clear the ground for the grand experiment—an idea that contained, at its
core, the certainty of extraordinary colonialist violence.
Thirty years earlier, when the Chicago School counterrevolution took its
first leap from the textbook to the real world, it also sought to erase nations
and create new ones in their place. Like Iraq in 2003, Chile in 1973 was
meant to serve as a model for the entire rebellious continent, and for many
years it did. The brutal regimes that implemented Chicago School ideas in
the seventies understood that, for their idealized new nations to be born in
Chile, Argentina, Uruguay and Brazil, whole categories of people and their
cultures would need to be pulled up "from the root."
In the countries that suffered the political cleansings, there have been col­
lective efforts to come to terms with this violent history—truth commissions,
excavations of unmarked graves and the beginnings of war crimes trials for the
perpetrators. But the Latin American juntas did not act alone: they were
propped up before and after their coups by Washington, as has been amply
documented. For instance, in 1976, the year of Argentina's coup, when thou­
sands of young activists were snatched from their homes, the junta had full fi­
nancial support from Washington. ("If there are things that have to be done,
11

you should do them quickly," Kissinger had said.) That year, Gerald Ford
was president, Dick Cheney was his chief of staff, Donald Rumsfeld was his

E R A S I N G IRAQ

331

secretary of defense, and Kissinger's executive assistant was an ambitious
young man named Paul Bremer. These men faced no truth-and-justice pro­
cess for their roles in supporting the juntas and went on to enjoy long and pros­
perous careers. So long, in fact, that they would be around three decades later
to implement a strikingly similar—if far more violent—experiment in Iraq.
In his 2005 inaugural address, George W. Bush described the era be­
tween the end of the Cold War and the start of the War on Terror as "years of
12

repose, years of sabbatical—and then there came a day of fire." The Iraq in­
vasion marked the ferocious return to the early techniques of the free-market
crusade—the use of ultimate shock to forcibly wipe out and erase all obsta­
cles to the construction of model corporatist states free from all interference.
Ewen Cameron, the CIA-funded psychiatrist who had tried to "depattern" his patients by regressing them to infantile states, had believed that if a
little shock was good for this purpose, more was better. He blasted brains
with everything he could think of—electricity, hallucinogens, sensory depri­
vation, sensory overload—anything that would wipe out what was and give
him a blank slate on which to imprint new thoughts, new patterns. With a
far larger canvas, that was the invasion and occupation strategy for Iraq. The
architects of the war surveyed the global arsenal of shock tactics and decided
to go with all of them—blitzkrieg military bombardment supplemented with
elaborate psychological operations, followed up with the fastest and most
sweeping political and economic shock therapy program attempted any­
where, backed up, if there was any resistance, by rounding up those who re­
sisted and subjecting them to "gloves-off" abuse.
Often, in the analyses of the war in Iraq, the conclusion is that the inva­
sion was a "success" but the occupation was a failure. What this assessment
overlooks is that the invasion and occupation were two parts of a unified
stategy—the initial bombardment was designed to erase the canvas on which
the model nation could be built.

War as Mass Torture
For the strategists of the 2003 invasion of Iraq, the answer to the question of
"where to stick the needles" appears to have been: everywhere. During the
1991 Gulf War, roughly three hundred Tomahawk cruise missiles were fired
over the course of five weeks. In 2003, more than three hundred and eighty
were launched in a single day. Between March 20 and May 2, the weeks of
"major combat," the U.S military dropped more than thirty thousand bombs

332

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

on Iraq, as well as twenty thousand precision-guided cruise missiles —67 per­
cent of the total number ever made.

13

"I am so scared," Yasmine Musa, a Baghdad mother of three said during
the bombings. "Not a single minute passes by without hearing and feeling a
drop of a bomb somewhere. I don't think that a single meter in the whole of
14

Iraq is safe." That meant Shock and Awe was doing its job. In open defi­
ance of the laws of war barring collective punishment, Shock and Awe is a
military doctrine that prides itself on not merely targeting the enemy's mili­
tary forces but, as its authors stress, the "society writ large"—mass fear is a
key part of the strategy.
Another element that distinguishes Shock and Awe is its acute conscious­
ness of war as a cable news spectacle, one playing to several audiences at
once: the enemy, Americans at home and anyone else thinking of making
trouble. "When the video results of these attacks are broadcast in real time
worldwide on CNN, the positive impact on coalition support and negative
impact on potential threat support can be decisive," the Shock and Awe man­
ual states.* From the start, the invasion was conceived as a message from
Washington to the world, one spoken in the language of fireballs, deafening
explosions and city-shattering quakes. In The One Percent Doctrine,

Ron

Suskind explains that for Rumsfeld and Cheney, "the primary impetus for
invading Iraq" was the desire "to create a demonstration model to guide the
behavior of anyone with the temerity to acquire destructive weapons or, in
any way, flout the authority of the United States." Less than a war strategy, it
was a "global experiment in behaviorism."

15

Warfare is always partly a performance, always a form of mass communi­
cation, but Rumsfeld's marshaling of his tech and media know-how from the
business world put the marketing of fear at the center of U.S. military doc­
trine. During the Cold War, the fear of a nuclear attack was the core of the
deterrence strategy, but the idea was for the nuclear missiles to stay in their
silos. This attack was different: Rumsfeld's war would use everything short of
a nuclear bomb to put on a show designed to bombard the senses, pull and
play on emotion, and convey lasting messages, with targets carefully chosen
for their symbolic value and their made-for-TV impact. In this way, Rums­
feld's theory of war, part of his project of "transformation," had far less in
common with the "force-on-force" battlefield strategies of the generals, who

*The 1991 Gulf War was the first C N N battle, but since the idea of twenty-four-hour live cov­
erage w a s still young, the military had not by then fully incorporated it into its war planning.

E R A S I N G IRAQ

333

were always slowing him down, and far more in common with the terrorists
against whom Rumsfeld had declared permanent war. Terrorists don't try to
win through direct confrontation; they attempt to break public morale with
spectacular, televisual displays that at once expose their enemy's vulnerabil­
ity and their own capacity for cruelty. That was the theory behind the 9/11 at­
tacks, just as it was the theory behind the invasion of Iraq.
Shock and Awe is often presented as merely a strategy of overwhelming fire­
power, but the authors of the doctrine see it as much more than that: it is, they
claim, a sophisticated psychological blueprint aimed "directly at the public
will of the adversary to resist." The tools are ones familiar from another arm of
the U.S. military complex: sensory deprivation and sensory overload, designed
to induce disorientation and regression. With clear echoes of the CIA's inter­
rogation manuals, "Shock and Awe" states, "In crude terms, Rapid Domi­
nance would seize control of the environment and paralyze or so overload an
adversary's perceptions and understanding of events." The goal is "rendering
the adversary completely impotent." This includes such strategies as "real-time
manipulation of senses and inputs. . . literally 'turning on and off' the 'lights'
that enable any potential aggressor to see or appreciate the conditions and
events concerning his forces and ultimately, his society" as well as "depriving
16

the enemy, in specific areas, of the ability to communicate, observe." The
country of Iraq was subjected to this experiment in mass torture for months,
with the process beginning well before the bombs started falling.

Fear Up

When the Canadian citizen Maher Arar was grabbed by U.S. agents at JFK
airport in 2002 and taken to Syria, a victim of extraordinary rendition, his in­
terrogators engaged in a tried-and-tested torture technique. "They put me on
a chair, and one of the men started asking me questions. . . . If I did not an­
swer quickly enough, he would point to a metal chair in the corner and ask,
'Do you want me to use t h i s ? ' . . . I was terrified, and I did not want to be tor­
17

tured. I would say anything to avoid torture." The technique Arar was being
subjected to is known as "the showing of the instruments," or, in U.S. mili­
tary lingo, "fear up." Torturers know that one of their most potent weapons is
the prisoner's own imagination —often just showing fearsome instruments is
more effective than using them.
As the day of the invasion of Iraq drew closer, U.S. news media outlets
were conscripted by the Pentagon to "fear up" Iraq. "They're calling it 'A-Day,' "

334

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

began a report on CBS News that aired two months before the war began.
" 'A' as in airstrikes so devastating they would leave Saddam's soldiers unable
or unwilling to fight." Viewers were introduced to Harlan Ullman, a Shock
and Awe author, who explained that "you have this simultaneous effect,
rather like the nuclear weapons at Hiroshima, not taking days or weeks but
in minutes." The anchor, Dan Rather, ended the telecast with a disclaimer:
"We assure you this report contains no information that the Defense De­
18

partment thinks could help the Iraqi military." He could have gone further:
the report, like so many others in this period, was an integral part of the De­
partment of Defense's strategy—fear up.
Iraqis, who picked up the terrifying reports on contraband satellites or in
phone calls from relatives abroad spent months imagining the horrors of
Shock and Awe. The phrase itself became a potent psychological weapon.
Would it be worse than 1991? If the Americans really thought Saddam had
W M D s , would they launch a nuclear attack?
One answer was provided a week before the invasion. The Pentagon in­
vited Washington's military press corps on a special field trip to Eglin Air
Force Base in Florida to witness the testing of the MOAB, which officially
stands for Massive Ordnance Air Blast but which everyone in the military
calls the "Mother of All Bombs." At twenty-one thousand pounds, it is the
largest nonnuclear explosive ever built, able to create, in the words of CNN's
Jamie Mclntyre, "a ten-thousand-foot-high mushroom-like cloud that looks
and feels like a nuclear weapon."

19

In his report, Mclntyre said that even if it was never used, the bomb's very
existence "could still pack a psychological wallop"—a tacit acknowledgment
of the role he himself was playing in delivering that wallop. Like prisoners in
interrogation cells, Iraqis were being shown the instruments. "The goal is to
have the capabilities of the coalition so clear and so obvious that there's an
enormous disincentive for the Iraqi military to fight," Rumsfeld explained on
the same program.

20

When the war began, the residents of Baghdad were subjected to sensorydeprivation on a mass scale. One by one, the city's sensory inputs were cut
off; the ears were the first to go.
On the night of March 28, 2003, as U.S. troops drew closer to Baghdad,
the ministry of communication was bombed and set ablaze, as were four
Baghdad telephone exchanges, with massive bunker-busters, cutting off mil­
lions of phones across the city. The targeting of the phone exchanges

E R A S I N G IRAQ

335

continued—twelve in total —until, by April 2, there was barely a phone
21

working in all of Baghdad.* During the same assault, television and radio
transmitters were also hit, making it impossible for families in Baghdad, hud­
dling in their homes, to pick up even a weak signal carrying news of what
was going on outside their doors.
Many Iraqis say that the shredding of their phone system was the most psy­
chologically wrenching part of the air attack. The combination of hearing
and feeling bombs going off everywhere while being unable to call a few
blocks away to find out if loved ones were alive, or to reassure terrified rela­
tives living abroad, was pure torment. Journalists based in Baghdad were
swarmed by desperate local residents begging for a few moments with their
satellite phones or pressing numbers into the reporters' hands along with
pleas to call a brother or an uncle in London or Baltimore. "Tell him every­
thing is okay. Tell him his mother and father are fine. Tell him hello. Tell
22

him not to worry." By then, most drugstores in Baghdad had sold out of
sleeping aids and antidepressants, and the city was completely cleaned out of
Valium.
Next to go were the eyes. "There was no audible explosion, no discernible
change in the early evening bombardments, but in an instant, an entire city
of 5 million people was plunged into an awful, endless night," The

Guardian

reported on April 4. Darkness was "relieved only by the headlights of passing
23

cars." Trapped in their homes, Baghdad's residents could not speak to each
other, hear each other or see outside. Like a prisoner destined for a CIA
black site, the entire city was shackled and hooded. Next it was stripped.

Comfort Items

In hostile interrogations, the first stage of breaking down prisoners is strip­
ping them of their own clothes and any items that have the power to evoke
their sense of self—so-called comfort items. Often objects that are of partic­
ular value to a prisoner, like the Koran or a cherished photograph, are treated

* The official reason for the wholesale annihilation of Baghdad's phone system w a s to sever
Saddam's ability to communicate with his elite c o m m a n d o s . But after the war, U.S. inter­
rogators conducted extensive "interviews" with top Iraqi prisoners and discovered that for
years Saddam had been convinced that spies were tracking him through his phone calls and
therefore had used a phone only twice in the previous thirteen years. A s usual, reliable intel­
ligence wasn't necessary; there would be plenty of ready money for Bechtel to build a new
system.

336

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

with open disrespect. The message is "You are no one, you are who we want
you to be," the essence of dehumanization. Iraqis went through this unmak­
ing process collectively, as they watched their most important institutions
desecrated, their history loaded onto trucks and disappeared. The bombing
badly injured Iraq, but it was the looting, unchecked by occupying troops,
that did the most to erase the heart of the country that was.
"The hundreds of looters who smashed ancient ceramics, stripped display
cases and pocketed gold and other antiquities from the National Museum of
Iraq pillaged nothing less than records of the first human society," reported
the Los Angeles Times. "Gone are 80 per cent of the museum's 170,000
24

priceless objects." The national library, which contained copies of every
book and doctoral thesis ever published in Iraq, was a blackened ruin.
Thousand-year-old illuminated Korans had disappeared from the Ministry of
Religious Affairs, which was left a burned-out shell. "Our national heritage is
25

lost," pronounced a Baghdad high-school teacher. A local merchant said of
the museum, "It was the soul of Iraq. If the museum doesn't recover the
looted treasures, I will feel like a part of my own soul has been stolen."
McGuire Gibson, an archaeologist at the University of Chicago, called it "a
lot like a lobotomy. The deep memory of an entire culture, a culture that has
continued for thousands of years, has been removed."

26

Thanks mostly to the efforts of clerics who organized salvage missions in
the midst of the looting, a portion of the artifacts has been recovered. But
many Iraqis were, and still are, convinced that the memory lobotomy was
intentional—part of Washington's plans to excise the strong, rooted nation
that was and replace it with their own model. "Baghdad is the mother of Arab
culture," seventy-year-old Ahmed Abdullah told The Washington Post, "and
they want to wipe out our culture."

27

As the war planners were quick to point out, the looting was done by
Iraqis, not foreign troops. And it's true that Rumsfeld did not plan for Iraq to
be sacked—but he did not take measures to prevent it from happening ei­
ther, or to stop it once it had begun. These were failures that cannot be dis­
missed as mere oversights.
During the 1991 Gulf War, thirteen Iraqi museums were attacked by loot­
ers, so there was every reason to believe that poverty, anger at the old regime
and the general atmosphere of chaos would prompt some Iraqis to respond
in the same way (especially given that Saddam had emptied the prisons several
months earlier). The Pentagon had been warned by leading archaeologists

E R A S I N G IRAQ

337

that it needed to have an airtight strategy to protect museums and libraries
before any attack, and a March 26 Pentagon memo to coalition command
listed "in order of importance, 16 sites that were crucial to protect in Bagh­
dad." Second on the list was the museum. Other warnings had urged Rums­
feld to send an international police contingent in with the troops to maintain
public order—another suggestion that was ignored.

28

Even without the police, however, there were enough U.S. soldiers in
Baghdad for a few to be dispatched to the key cultural sites, but they weren't
sent. There are numerous reports of U.S. soldiers hanging out by their ar­
mored vehicles and watching as trucks loaded with loot drove by—a reflec­
tion of the "stuff happens" indifference coming straight from Rumsfeld.
Some units took it upon themselves to stop the looting, but in other in­
stances, soldiers joined in. The Baghdad International Airport was com­
pletely trashed by soldiers who, according to Time, smashed furniture and
then moved on to the commercial jets on the runway: "U.S. soldiers looking
for comfortable seats and souvenirs ripped out many of the planes' fittings,
slashed seats, damaged cockpit equipment and popped out every wind­
shield." The result was an estimated $100 million worth of damage to Iraq's
national airline—which was one of the first assets to be put on the auction
block in an early and contentious partial privatization.

29

Some insight into why there was so little official interest in stopping the
looting has since been provided by two men who played pivotal roles in the
occupation —Peter McPherson, the senior economic adviser to Paul Bremer,
and John Agresto, director of higher education reconstruction for the occu­
pation. McPherson said that when he saw Iraqis taking state property—cars,
buses, ministry equipment—it didn't bother him. His job, as Iraq's top eco­
nomic shock therapist, was to radically downsize the state and privatize its as­
sets, which meant that the looters were really just giving him a jump-start. "I
thought the privatization that occurs sort of naturally when somebody took
over their state vehicle, or began to drive a truck that the state used to own,
was just fine," he said. A veteran bureaucrat of the Reagan administration
and a firm believer in Chicago School economics, McPherson termed the
pillage a form of public sector "shrinkage."*

30

* It's a spin that puts Halliburton's overcharging of U.S. taxpayers and the Pentagon's will­
ingness to let it slide in a new light—perhaps the Department of Defense s a w the missing
millions not as theft but a s shrinkage, all part of the campaign to scale back government and
beef up business.

338

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

His colleague John Agresto also saw a silver lining as he watched the loot­
ing of Baghdad on TV. He envisioned his job—"a never to be repeated
adventure"—as the remaking of Iraq's system of higher education from
scratch. In that context, the stripping of the universities and the education
ministry was, he explained, "the opportunity for a clean start," a chance to
give Iraq's schools "the best modern equipment." If the mission was "nation
creating," as so many clearly believed it to be, then everything that remained
of the old country was only going to get in the way. Agresto was the former
president of St. John's College in New Mexico, which specializes in a Great
Books curriculum. He explained that although he knew nothing of Iraq, he
had refrained from reading books about the country before making the trip
31

so that he would arrive "with as open a mind as I could have." Like Iraq's
colleges, Agresto would be a blank slate.
If Agresto had read a book or two, he might have thought twice about the
need to erase everything and start over. He could have learned, for instance,
that before the sanctions strangled the country, Iraq had the best education
system in the region, with the highest literacy rates in the Arab world—in
1985, 89 percent of Iraqis were literate. By contrast, in Agresto's home state
of New Mexico, 46 percent of the population is functionally illiterate, and 20
percent are unable do "basic math to determine the total on a sales re­
32

ceipt."* Yet Agresto was so convinced of the superiority of American sys­
tems that he seemed unable to entertain the possibility that Iraqis might want
to salvage and protect their own culture and that they might feel its destruc­
tion as a wrenching loss.
This neocolonialist blindness is a running theme in the War on Terror. At
the U.S.-run prison at Guantânamo Bay, there is a room known as "the love
shack." Detainees are taken there after their captors have decided they are
not enemy combatants and will soon be released. Inside the love shack, pris­
oners are allowed to watch Hollywood movies and are plied with American
junk food. Asif Iqbal, one of three British detainees known as the "Tipton
Three," was permitted several visits there before he and his two friends were
finally sent home. "We would get to watch DVDs, eat McDonald's, eat Pizza
Hut and basically chill out. We were not shackled in this area. . . . We had
no idea why they were being like that to us. The rest of the week we were
* When Agresto failed miserably at his job of rebuilding Iraq's university system, leaving the
country with the job undone, he revised his early enthusiasm for looting, describing himself
as "a neoconservative who's been mugged by reality." This and other details come from R a ­
jiv Chandrasekaran's vivid account of the Green Zone, Imperial Life in the Emerald City.

E R A S I N G IRAQ

339

back in the cages as usual. . . . On one occasion Lesley [an FBI official]
brought Pringles, ice cream and chocolates, this was the final Sunday before
we came back to England." His friend Rhuhel Ahmed speculated that the
special treatment "was because they knew they had messed us about and tor­
tured us for two and half years and they hoped we would forget it."

33

Ahmed and Iqbal had been grabbed by the Northern Alliance while visit­
ing Afghanistan on their way to a wedding. They had been violently beaten,
injected with unidentified drugs, put in stress positions for hours, sleep de­
prived, forcibly shaven and denied all legal rights for twenty-nine months.

34

And yet they were supposed to "forget it" in the face of the overwhelming al­
lure of Pringles. That was actually the plan.
It's hard to believe —but then again, that was pretty much Washington's
game plan for Iraq: shock and terrorize the entire country, deliberately ruin
its infrastructure, do nothing while its culture and history are ransacked,
then make it all okay with an unlimited supply of cheap household appli­
ances and imported junk food. In Iraq, this cycle of culture erasing and cul­
ture replacing was not theoretical; it all unfolded in a matter of weeks.
Paul Bremer, appointed by Bush to serve as director of the occupation au­
thority in Iraq, admits that when he first arrived in Baghdad, the looting was
still going strong and order was far from restored. "Baghdad was on fire, liter­
ally, as I drove in from the airport. . . . There was no traffic on the streets; there
was no electricity anywhere; no oil production; no economic activity; there
wasn't a single policeman on duty anywhere." And yet his solution to this crisis
was to immediately fling open the country's borders to absolutely unrestricted
imports: no tariffs, no duties, no inspections, no taxes. Iraq, Bremer declared
35

two weeks after he arrived, was "open for business." Overnight, Iraq went
from being one of the most isolated countries in the world, sealed off from the
most basic trade by strict UN sanctions, to becoming the widest-open market
anywhere.
While the pickup trucks stuffed with loot were still being driven to buyers
in Jordan, Syria and Iran, passing them in the opposite direction were con­
voys of flatbeds piled high with Chinese TVs, Hollywood DVDs and Jordan­
ian satellite dishes, ready to be unloaded on the sidewalks of Baghdad's
Karada district. Just as one culture was being burned and stripped for parts,
another was pouring in, prepackaged, to replace it.
One of the U.S. businesses ready and waiting to be the gateway to this ex­
periment in frontier capitalism was New Bridge Strategies, started by Joe
Allbaugh, Bush's ex-head of FEMA. It promised to use its top-level political

340

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

connections to help U.S. multinationals land a piece of the action in Iraq.
"Getting the rights to distribute Procter & Gamble products would be
a gold mine/' one of the company's partners enthused. "One well-stocked
7-Eleven could knock out 30 Iraqi stores; a Wal-Mart could take over the
country."

36

Like the prisoners in Guantanamo's love shack, all of Iraq was going to be
bought off with Pringles and pop culture—that, at least, was the Bush ad­
ministration's idea of a postwar plan.

17

CHAPTER

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK
A VERY C A P I T A L I S T D I S A S T E R

The w o r l d is a m e s s y place, a n d s o m e o n e h a s to clean it up.
—Condoleezza Rice, S e p t e m b e r 2002, on the need to invade Iraq

1

B u s h ' s capacity to imagine a different Middle East m a y actually be
related to his relative ignorance of the region. Had he traveled to
the Middle East a n d s e e n its m a n y dysfunctions, he might have
been disheartened. Freed f r o m looking at the d a y - t o - d a y realities,
B u s h maintained a vision of what the region could look like.
—Fareed Zakaria, Newsweek

columnist

2

A n d the one w h o w a s seated on the throne s a i d , " S e e , I a m m a k i n g
all t h i n g s new." A l s o he s a i d , "Write this, for these w o r d s are
trustworthy and true."
- R e v e l a t i o n 21:5 (NRSV)

The war in Iraq has been in damage control mode for so long that it's easy to
forget the original vision for the way it was supposed to work out. But there
was a vision, one neatly encapsulated at a conference held by the U.S. State
Department in Baghdad in the early months of the occupation. The gather­
ing featured fourteen high-level politicians and bureaucrats from Russia and
Eastern Europe—an assortment of finance ministers, central bank chiefs
and former deputy prime ministers. They were flown to the Baghdad Inter­
national Airport in September 2003, kitted out in combat helmets and body
armor, then raced to the Green Zone, the walled city within a city that

342

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

housed the U.S.-run government of Iraq, the Coalition Provisional Authority
(CPA), and now houses the U.S. embassy. Inside Saddam's former confer­
ence center, the VIP guests gave a small group of influential Iraqis lessons in
capitalist transformation.
One of the main speakers was Marek Belka, Poland's former right-wing fi­
nance minister who worked under Bremer in Iraq for several months. Ac­
cording to an official State Department report on the gathering, Belka
pounded the Iraqis with the message that they had to seize this moment of
chaos to be "forceful" in pushing through policies that "would throw many
people out of work." The first lesson from Poland, Belka said, was that "un­
productive state-owned enterprises should be sold off immediately without
efforts to salvage them with public funds." (He failed to mention that popu­
lar pressure had forced Solidarity to abandon its plans for rapid privatization,
saving Poland from a Russian-style meltdown.) His second lesson was even
bolder. It was five months after the fall of Baghdad, and Iraq was in the midst
of a humanitarian emergency. Unemployment was at 67 percent, malnutri­
tion was rampant and the only thing holding off mass starvation was the fact
that Iraqi households still received government-subsidized food and other es­
sentials, just as they had under the UN-administered oil-for-food program
during the sanctions period. They were also able to fill their gas tanks for
pennies, when gas was available. Belka told the Iraqis that these marketdistorting giveaways had to be scrapped immediately. "Develop the private
sector, starting with the elimination of subsidies." He stressed that these mea­
sures were "much more important and divisive than privatization."

3

Next up was none other than Yegor Gaidar, Yeltsin's former deputy prime
minister, regarded as the architect of Russia's shock therapy program. In invit­
ing Gaidar to come to Baghdad, the State Department seems to have as­
sumed that the Iraqis would not know that he was regarded as a pariah back in
Moscow, tainted by his close association with the oligarchs and by policies
that had impoverished tens of millions of Russians.* While it was true that un­
der Saddam the Iraqis had only limited access to outside news, the people
at the Green Zone conference were mostly recently returned exiles; in the
* Many of the key players in Iraq's invasion and occupation were veterans of the original team
in Washington that had demanded shock therapy in Russia: Dick Cheney was defense secre­
tary when George B u s h Sr. crafted his post-Soviet Russia policy, and Paul Wolfowitz was
Cheney's deputy, while Condoleezza Rice served a s B u s h Sr.'s chief adviser on Russia's tran­
sition. For all these top players, and dozens of lesser ones, Russia's experience in the
nineties, despite its abysmal results for ordinary people, was often invoked, without irony, as
the model for Iraq to emulate in its transition.

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

nineties, while Russia was imploding, they were reading The
Herald

343

International

Tribune.

It was Mohamad Tofiq, Iraq's interim industry minister, who told me about
this strange conference, which wasn't covered in the press at the time. Months
later, when we met in his temporary office in Baghdad (the old ministry was a
charred shell), Tofiq was still laughing about it. He said the Iraqis had blasted
the flak-jacket-wearing visitors, informing them that Paul Bremer's decision to
fling open the borders to unrestricted imports had already dramatically wors­
ened the lives of a war-ravaged people—if it was pushed further by cutting gas
subsidies and eliminating food aid, the occupation would have a revolution on
its hands. As for the star speaker, Tofiq said, "I told some of the people who or­
ganized the conference that if I was to encourage privatization in Iraq, I'd
bring Gaidar to tell them, 'Do exactly the opposite of what we did.' "
When Bremer started issuing legal decrees in Baghdad, Joseph Stiglitz, the
former World Bank chief economist, warned that Iraq was getting "an even
more radical form of shock therapy than pursued in the former Soviet
world." That was quite true. In the original Washington plan, Iraq was going
to become a frontier just as Russia had been in the early nineties, but this
time it would be U.S. firms—not local ones or European, Russian or Chi­
nese competitors—that would be first in line for the easy billions. And noth­
ing would deter even the most painful economic changes because, in
contrast to the former Soviet Union, or Latin America and Africa, the trans­
formation would not involve a mannered dance between I M F officials and
quixotic local politicians while the U.S. Treasury called the shots from the
suite down the hall. In Iraq, Washington cut out the middlemen: the I M F
and the World Bank were relegated to supporting roles, and the U.S. was
front and center. Paul Bremer was the government; as a top U.S. military of­
ficial told the Associated Press, there was no point in negotiating with the lo­
cal government because "at this point, we'd be negotiating with ourselves."

4

This dynamic was what set the economic transformation of Iraq apart
from earlier laboratories. All the careful efforts during the nineties to present
"free trade" as something other than an imperial project were abandoned.
Elsewhere, there would still be free trade lite, with its hothouse negotiations,
but now there would also be free trade heavy, without proxies or puppets,
seizing new markets directly for Western multinationals on the battlefields of
preemptive wars.
The proponents of the "model theory" now claim that this was where their

344

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

war went horribly wrong—as Richard Perle said in late 2006, "the seminal
mistake" was "bringing Bremer in." David Frum concurred, saying they
should have had "any kind of an Iraqi face" on the remaking of Iraq right
5

away. Instead they had Paul Bremer, ensconced in Saddam's turquoisedomed Republican Palace, receiving trade and investment laws by e-mail
from the Department of Defense, printing them out, signing them and im­
posing them by fiat on the Iraqi people. Bremer was no quiet American, ma­
neuvering and manipulating behind the scenes. With his movie-of-the-week
looks and his fondness for news crews, he seemed intent on flaunting his ab­
solute power over Iraqis, crisscrossing the country in a flashy Blackhawk heli­
copter flanked by GI Joe private security guards from Blackwater and always
in his trademark uniform: immaculately pressed Brooks Brothers suits and
beige Timberland boots. The boots were a going-to-Baghdad present from
his son; "Go kick some butt, Dad," the card had said.

6

By his own admission, Bremer knew little of Iraq ("I had lived in
Afghanistan," he told one interviewer). That ignorance hardly mattered,
however, because if there was one thing Bremer knew a great deal about, it
was the central mission in Iraq: disaster capitalism.

7

On September 11, 2001, he had been working as managing director and
"senior political adviser" at the insurance giant Marsh & McLennan. The
company had its offices in the North Tower of the World Trade Center and
was devastated by the attacks. In the first few days, 700 of its workers were un­
accounted for; in the end, 295 were confirmed dead. Exactly one month
later, on October 11, 2001, Paul Bremer launched Crisis Consulting Prac­
tice, a new division of Marsh specializing in helping multinational corpora­
tions prepare for possible terrorist attacks and other crises. Advertising his
experience as ambassador-at-large for counterterrorism under the Reagan ad­
ministration, Bremer and his company offered clients comprehensive coun­
terterrorism services, from political risk insurance to public relations and
even advice on what to stockpile.

8

Bremer's vanguard participation in the homeland security industry was
ideal preparation for Iraq. That's because the Bush administration used the
same formula to rebuild Iraq that it had pioneered to respond to 9/11: it
treated postwar Iraq as if it was an exciting IPO, brimming with free­
wheeling, quick-profit potential. So while Bremer may have stepped on
plenty of toes, his mission never was to win Iraqi hearts and minds. Rather, it
was to get the country ready for the launch of Iraq Inc. Seen in that light, his
early, much-maligned decisions have an unmistakable logical coherence.

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

345

After replacing the cautious general Jay Garner as the top U.S. envoy, Bre­
mer spent his first four months in Iraq almost exclusively focused on economic
transformation, passing a series of laws that together make up a classic Chicago
School shock therapy program. Before the invasion, Iraq's economy had been
anchored by its national oil company and by two hundred state-owned com­
panies, which produced the staples of the Iraqi diet and the raw materials of its
industry, everything from cement to paper and cooking oil. The month after
he arrived in his new job, Bremer announced that the two hundred firms were
going to be privatized immediately. "Getting inefficient state enterprises into
private hands," Bremer said, "is essential for Iraq's economic recovery."

9

Next came the new economic laws. To entice foreign investors to take part
in the privatization auction and to build new factories and retail outlets in
Iraq, Bremer enacted a radical set of laws described by The Economist

in

glowing terms as the "wish-list that foreign investors and donor agencies
10

dream of for developing markets." One law lowered Iraq's corporate tax
rate from roughly 45 percent to a flat 15 percent (straight out of the Milton
Friedman playbook). Another allowed foreign companies to own 100 per­
cent of Iraqi assets—preventing a repeat of Russia, where the prizes went to
the local oligarchs. Even better, investors could take 100 percent of the prof­
its they made in Iraq out of the country; they would not be required to rein­
vest, and they would not be taxed. The decree also stipulated that investors
could sign leases and contracts that would last for forty years and then be el­
igible for renewal, which meant that future elected governments would be
saddled with deals signed by their occupiers. The one area on which Wash­
ington held back was oil: its Iraqi advisers warned that any move to privatize
the state oil company or to lay claim to untapped reserves before an Iraqi
government was in place would be seen as an act of war. But the occupation
authority did take possession of $20 billion worth of revenues from Iraq's na­
tional oil company, to spend as it wished.*

11

The White House was so focused on unveiling a shiny new Iraqi economy
that it decided, in the early days of the occupation, to launch a brand-new

* Some $8.8 billion of this money is often referred to a s "Iraq's missing billions" because it
disappeared into U.S.-controlled Iraqi ministries in 2004, virtually without a trace. Bremer
defended this lax oversight to a U.S. congressional committee in February 2007, saying: "Our
top priority w a s to get the economy moving again. The first step w a s to get money into the
hands of the Iraqi people a s quickly a s possible." When Bremer's financial adviser, the re­
tired admiral David Oliver, w a s asked by the committee about the missing billions, he
replied, "Yeah, I understand. I'm saying what difference does it m a k e ? "

346

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

currency, a massive logistical undertaking. The U.K. firm De La Rue did the
printing, and bills were delivered in fleets of planes and distributed in ar­
mored vehicles and trucks that ran at least a thousand missions throughout
the country—at a time when 50 percent of the people still lacked drinking
water, the traffic lights weren't working and crime was rampant.

12

Although it was Bremer who implemented these plans, the priorities were
coming straight from the top. Testifying before a Senate committee, Rums­
feld described Bremer's "sweeping reforms" as creating "some of the most
enlightened—and inviting—tax and investment laws in the free world." At
first, investors seemed to appreciate the effort. Within a few months, there
was talk of a McDonald's opening in downtown Baghdad—the ultimate
symbol of Iraq joining the global economy—funding was almost in place for
a Starwood luxury hotel, and General Motors was planning to build an auto
plant. On the financial side, H SBC, the international bank headquartered in
London, was awarded a contract to open branches all over Iraq, while Citi­
group announced plans to offer substantial loans guaranteed against future
sales of Iraqi oil. The oil majors—Shell, BP, ExxonMobil, Chevron and Rus­
sia's Lukoil—made tentative approaches, signing agreements to train Iraqi
civil servants in the latest extraction technologies and management models,
confident that their time would soon arrive.

13

Bremer's laws, designed to create the conditions for an investor frenzy,
were not exactly original—they were merely an accelerated version of what
had been implemented in previous shock therapy experiments. But Bush's
disaster capitalism cabinet was not content to wait for the laws to take effect.
Where the Iraq experiment entered bold new terrain was that it transformed
the invasion, occupation and reconstruction into an exciting, fully priva­
tized new market. This market was created, just as the homeland security
complex was, with a huge pot of public money. For reconstruction alone,
the boom was kicked off with $38 billion from the U.S. Congress, $15 billion
from other countries and $20 billion of Iraq's own oil money.

14

When the initial billions were announced, there were, inevitably, lauda­
tory comparisons with the Marshall Plan. Bush invited the parallels, declar­
ing the reconstruction "the greatest financial commitment of its kind since
the Marshall Plan," and stating in a televised address in the early months of
the occupation that "America has done this kind of work before. Following
World War II, we lifted up the defeated nations of Japan and Germany, and
stood with them as they built representative governments."

15

What happened to the billions earmarked for Iraq's reconstruction, how-

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

347

ever, bore no relationship to the history Bush invoked. Under the original
Marshall Plan, American firms benefited by sending equipment and food to
Europe, but the explicit goal was to help war-torn economies recover as selfsufficient markets, creating local jobs and developing tax bases capable of
funding domestic social services—the results of which are in evidence in
Germany's and Japan's mixed economies today.
The Bush cabinet had in fact launched an anti-Marshall Plan, its mirror
opposite in nearly every conceivable way. It was a plan guaranteed from the
start to further undermine Iraq's badly weakened industrial sector and to
send Iraqi unemployment soaring. Where the post-Second World War plan
had barred foreign firms from investing, to avoid the perception that they
were taking advantage of countries in a weakened state, this scheme did
everything possible to entice corporate America (with a few bones tossed to
corporations based in countries that joined the "Coalition of the Willing"). It
was this theft of Iraq's reconstruction funds from Iraqis, justified by unques­
tioned, racist assumptions about U.S. superiority and Iraqi inferiority—and
not merely the generic demons of "corruption" and "inefficiency"—that
doomed the project from the start.
None of the money went to Iraqi factories so they could reopen and form
the foundation of a sustainable economy, create local jobs and fund a social
safety net. Iraqis had virtually no role in this plan at all. Instead, the U.S. fed­
eral government contracts, most of them issued by USAID, commissioned a
kind of country-in-a-box, designed in Virginia and Texas, to be assembled in
Iraq. It was, as the occupation authorities repeatedly said, "a gift from the
people of the United States to the people of Iraq"—all Iraqis needed to do
16

was unwrap it. Even Iraqis' low-wage labor wasn't required for the assembly
process because the major U.S. contractors such as Halliburton, Bechtel and
the California-based engineering giant Parsons preferred to import foreign
workers whom they felt confident they could control. Once again Iraqis were
cast in the role of awed spectators—first awed by U.S. military technology
and then by its engineering and management prowess.
As in the homeland security industry, the role for government employees—
even U.S. government employees—was cut to the bone. Bremer's staff was a
mere fifteen hundred people to govern a sprawling country of 25 million. By
contrast, Halliburton had fifty thousand workers in the region, many of them
lifelong public servants lured into the private sector by offers of better salaries.

17

The weak public presence and the robust corporate one reflected the fact
that the Bush cabinet was using Iraq's reconstruction (over which it had

348

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

complete control, in contrast to the federal bureaucracy back home) to im­
plement its vision of a fully outsourced, hollow government. In Iraq, there
was not a single governmental function that was considered so "core" that it
could not be handed to a contractor, preferably one who provided the Re­
publican Party with financial contributions or Christian foot soldiers during
election campaigns. The usual Bush motto governed all aspects of the for­
eign forces' involvement in Iraq: if a task could be performed by a private en­
tity, it must be.
So while Bremer may have signed the laws, it was private accountants who
designed and managed the economy. (BearingPoint, an offshoot of the major
international accounting and consulting firm KPMG, was paid $240 million
to build a "market-driven system" in Iraq—the 107-page contract mentions
the word "privatization" fifty-one times; much of the original contract was
written by BearingPoint.) Think tanks were paid to think (Britain's Adam
Smith Institute was contracted to help privatize Iraq's companies). Private se­
curity firms and defense contractors trained Iraq's new army and police (DynCorp, Vinnell and the Carlyle Group's USIS, among others). And education
companies drafted the post-Saddam curriculum and printed the new text­
books. (Creative Associates, a management-and-education-consulting firm
based in Washington, D.C., was given contracts worth more than $100 mil­
lion for these tasks.)*

18

Meanwhile, the model pioneered by Cheney for Halliburton in the
Balkans, where bases were transformed into mini Halliburton towns, was
adopted on a vastly larger scale. In addition to Halliburton's construction
and management of military bases across the country, the Green Zone was,
from the start, a Halliburton-run city-state, with the company in charge of
everything from road maintenance to pest control to movie and disco nights.
The CPA was far too understaffed to monitor all the contractors, and be­
sides, the Bush administration saw oversight as a noncore function to be out­
sourced. The Colorado-based engineering and construction company
C H 2 M Hill was paid $28.5 million in a joint venture with Parsons to oversee
four other major contractors. Even the job of building "local democracy" was
privatized, given to the North Carolina-based Research Triangle Institute in
a contract worth up to $466 million, though it's not at all clear what qualified
* Ahmed al-Rahim, an Iraqi American who worked with Creative Associates, explained, "The
initial idea w a s that we would write a curriculum and bring it into Iraq." A s it turned out,
Iraqis complained that "something packaged in America w a s not acceptable, and it w a s
scrapped."

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

349

RTI to bring democracy to a Muslim country. The leadership of the com­
pany's Iraq operation was dominated by high-level Mormons—people like
James Mayfield, who told his mission back in Houston that he thought Mus­
lims could be persuaded to embrace the Book of Mormon as compatible with
the teachings of the prophet Muhammad. In an e-mail home, he imagined
that Iraqis would erect a statue to him as their "founder of democracy."*

19

As these foreign corporations descended on the country, the machinery in
Iraq's two hundred state firms stood still, frozen by chronic power blackouts.
Iraq once had one of the most sophisticated industrial economies in the re­
gion; now its largest firms couldn't even get a subsubsubcontract in their own
country's reconstruction. To participate in the gold rush at all, Iraqi firms
would have needed emergency generators and some basic repairs—which
should not have been insurmountable, given Halliburton's speed in building
military bases that look like Midwestern suburbs.
Mohamad Tofiq at the Industry Ministry told me he had made repeated re­
quests for generators, pointing out that Iraq's seventeen state-owned cement
factories were perfectly positioned both to supply the reconstruction effort
with building materials and to put tens of thousands of Iraqis to work. The fac­
tories received nothing—no contracts, no generators, no help. American com­
panies preferred to import their cement, like their workforce, from abroad, at
up to ten times the price. One of Bremer's economic edicts specifically pro­
hibited Iraq's central bank from offering financing to state-owned enterprises
20

(a fact not reported until years later). The reason for this effective boycott of
Iraqi industry was not practical, Tofiq told me, but ideological. Among those
making the decisions, he said, "no one believes in the public sector."
While private Iraqi firms closed in droves, unable to compete with im­
ports streaming across the open borders, Bremer's staff had few comforting
words to offer. Addressing a gathering of Iraqi businessmen, Michael Fleis­
cher, one of Bremer's deputies, confirmed that many of their businesses
would indeed fail in the face of foreign competition, but that was the beauty
of the free market. "Will you be overwhelmed by foreign businesses?" he
asked rhetorically. "The answer depends on you. Only the best of you will
survive." He sounded like Yegor Gaidar, who reportedly said of small Rus­
sian businesses going under as a result of shock therapy, "So what? One who
is dying deserves to die."

21

* In fact, RTI w a s driven out of the country after it helped block local Islamic parties from
democratically taking power in several cities and towns.

350

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

As is now well known, nothing about Bush's anti-Marshall Plan went as in­
tended. Iraqis did not see the corporate reconstruction as "a gift"; most saw it
as a modernized form of pillage, and U.S. corporations didn't wow anyone
with their speed and efficiency; instead they have managed to turn the word
"reconstruction" into, as one Iraqi engineer put it, "a joke that nobody
laughs at."

22

Each miscalculation provoked escalating levels of resistance,

answered with counterrepression by foreign troops, ultimately sending the
country spiraling into an inferno of violence. As of July 2006, according to
the most credible study, the war in Iraq had taken the lives of 655,000 Iraqis
who would not have died had there been no invasion or occupation.

23

In November 2006, Ralph Peters, a retired U.S. Army officer, wrote in
USA Today that "we did give the Iraqis a unique chance to build a rule-oflaw democracy," but Iraqis "preferred to indulge in old hatreds, confessional
violence, ethnic bigotry and a culture of corruption. It appears that the cyn­
ics were right: Arab societies can't support democracy as we know it. And
people get the government they deserve. . . . The violence staining Bagh­
dad's streets with gore isn't only a symptom of the Iraqi government's incom­
petence, but of the comprehensive inability of the Arab world to progress in
any sphere of organized human endeavor. We are witnessing the collapse of
24

a civilization." Though Peters was particularly blunt, many Western ob­
servers have arrived at the same verdict: blame the Iraqis.
But the sectarian divisions and religious extremism engulfing Iraq cannot
be neatly detached from the invasion and the occupation. Although these
forces were certainly present in advance of the war, they were far weaker be­
fore Iraq was turned into a U.S. shock lab. It's worth remembering that in
February 2004, eleven months after the invasion, an Oxford Research Inter­
national poll found that a majority of Iraqis wanted a secular government:
only 21 percent of respondents said their favored political system was "an Is­
lamic state," and only 14 percent ranked "religious politicians" as their pre­
ferred political actors. Six months later, with the occupation in a new and
more violent phase, another poll found that 70 percent of Iraqis wanted Is­
25

lamic law as the basis of the state. As for sectarian violence, it was virtually
unknown for the first year of the occupation. The first major incident, the
bombing of Shia mosques during the holiday of Ashoura, was in March
2004, a full year after the invasion. There can be no doubt that the occupa­
tion deepened and ignited these hatreds.

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

351

In fact, all the forces tearing Iraq apart today—rampant corruption, fero­
cious sectarianism, the surge in religious fundamentalism and the tyranny of
death squads—escalated in lockstep with the implementation of Bush's a n t i Marshall Plan. After the toppling of Saddam Hussein, Iraq badly needed and
deserved to be repaired and reunited, a process that could only have been
led by Iraqis. Instead, at precisely that precarious moment, the country was
transformed into a cutthroat capitalist laboratory—a system that pitted indi­
viduals and communities against each other, that eliminated hundreds of
thousands of jobs and livelihoods and that replaced the quest for justice with
rampant impunity for foreign occupiers.
Iraq's current state of disaster cannot be reduced either to the incompetence
and cronyism of the Bush White House or to the sectarianism or tribalism of
Iraqis. It is a very capitalist disaster, a nightmare of unfettered greed unleashed
in the wake of war. The "fiasco" of Iraq is one created by a careful and faithful
application of unrestrained Chicago School ideology. What follows is an ini­
tial (and not exhaustive) account of the links between the "civil war" and the
corporatist project at the heart of the invasion. It is a process of ideology
boomeranging on the people who unleashed it—ideological blowback.
The most widely recognized case of blowback was provoked by Bremer's first
major act, the firing of approximately 500,000 state workers, most of them
soldiers, but also doctors, nurses, teachers and engineers. "De-Baathification,"
as it was called, was supposedly driven by a desire to clean out the govern­
ment of Saddam loyalists. No doubt that was part of the motivation, but it
does not explain the scale of the layoffs or how deeply they savaged the pub­
lic sector as a whole, punishing workers who were not high-level officials.
The purge resembled similar attacks on the public sector that have ac­
companied shock therapy programs ever since Milton Friedman advised
Pinochet to slash government spending by 25 percent. Bremer made no se­
cret of his antipathy for Iraq's "Stalinist economy," as he described the coun­
try's state-run companies and large ministries, and he had no appreciation
for the specialized skills and the years of accumulated knowledge possessed
by Iraq's engineers, doctors, electricians and road builders.

26

Bremer knew

people would be upset about losing their jobs, but as his memoir makes
clear, he did not consider how the sudden amputation of Iraq's professional
class would make it impossible for the Iraqi state to function and therefore
hinder his own work. That blindness had little to do with anti-Saddamism

352

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

and everything to do with free-market fervor. Only someone deeply inclined
to see government purely as a burden and public sector workers as dead
wood could have made the choices Bremer did.
That ideological blindness had three concrete effects: it damaged the pos­
sibility of reconstruction by removing skilled people from their posts, it
weakened the voice of secular Iraqis, and it fed the resistance with angry
people. Dozens of senior U.S. military and intelligence officers have ac­
knowledged that many of the 400,000 soldiers Bremer laid off went straight
to the emerging resistance. As Marine Colonel Thomas Hammes put it,
"Now you have a couple hundred thousand people who are armed—
because they took their weapons home with them—who know how to use
the weapons, who have no future, who have a reason to be angry at you."

27

At the same time, Bremer's classic Chicago School decision to fling open
the borders to unrestricted imports while allowing foreign companies to own
100 percent of Iraqi assets infuriated Iraq's business class. Many responded by
funding the resistance with what little revenue they had left. After covering the
first year of the Iraqi resistance in the Sunni Triangle, the investigative reporter
Patrick Graham wrote in Harpers that Iraqi businessmen "are outraged by the
new foreign-investment laws, which allow foreign companies to buy up facto­
ries for very little. Their revenues have collapsed, because the country has been
flooded with foreign goods. . . . The violence, these businessmen realize, is
their only competitive edge. It is simple business logic: the more problems
there are in Iraq, the harder it is for outsiders to get involved."

28

More ideological blowback came from the White House's determination
to prevent future Iraqi governments from changing Bremer's economic
laws—the same drive to "lock in" changes made in the wake of a crisis has
been in effect since the first IMF-issued "structural adjustment" program.
From Washington's perspective, there was no point in having the most en­
lightened investment rules in the world if a sovereign Iraqi government
could take power in a few months and rewrite them. Because most of Bre­
mer's decrees were in a legal gray zone, the Bush administration solution was
to draft a new constitution for Iraq, a goal it pursued with bloody-minded
determination —first with an interim constitution that locked in Bremer's
laws, and then with a permanent constitution that attempted (but failed) to
do the same.
Many legal experts were baffled by Washington's constitutional obses­
sion. On the surface, there was no pressing need to write a new document
from scratch —Iraq's 1970 constitution, ignored by Saddam, was perfectly

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

353

serviceable, and the country had far more urgent needs. More important,
the process of writing a constitution is among the most wrenching any na­
tion can go through, even a nation at peace. It brings every tension, rivalry,
prejudice and latent grievance to the surface. To foist that process—twice —
on a country as divided and shattered as Iraq after Saddam greatly exacer­
bated the possibility of civil strife. The social cleavages cracked open by the
negotiations have in no way healed, and may yet result in the partition of the
country.
Like the lifting of all trade restrictions, Bremer's plan to privatize Iraq's
two hundred state companies was regarded by many Iraqis as yet another
U.S. act of war. Workers learned that in order to make the companies attrac­
tive to foreign investors, as many as two-thirds of them would have to lose
their jobs. At one of Iraq's large state firms —a compound of seven factories
that produced cooking oil, soap, dishwashing liquid and other basics—I
heard a story that brought into sharp relief how many new enemies had been
created by the privatization announcement.
On a tour of the factory complex in a Baghdad suburb, I met Mahmud, a
confident twenty-five-year-old with a neat beard. He said that when he and
his fellow workers heard about the plans to sell their workplace, six months
into the U.S. occupation, they "were shocked. If the private sector buys our
company, the first thing they would do is reduce the staff to make more
money. And we will be forced into a very hard destiny, because the factory is
our only way of living." Frightened by this prospect, a group of seventeen
workers, including Mahmud, went to confront one of the managers in his of­
fice. A fight broke out: one worker struck a manager and the manager's body­
guard fired at the workers, who then turned on him. He spent a month in the
hospital. A couple of months later, there was even more violence. The man­
ager and his son were shot and badly injured on their way to work. At the end
of our meeting, I asked Mahmud what would happen if the plant was sold
despite their objections. "There are two choices," he said, smiling kindly.
"Either we will set the factory on fire and let the flames devour it to the
ground, or we will blow ourselves up inside it. But it will not be privatized."
It was an early warning—one of many—that the Bush team had definitely
overestimated its ability to shock Iraqis into submission.
There was another obstacle to Washington's privatization dreams: the freemarket fundamentalism that shaped the structure of the occupation itself.
Thanks to their rejections of all things "statist," the occupation authority run­
ning out of the Green Zone was far too understaffed and underresourced to

354

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

pull off its own ambitious plans —especially in the face of the kind of hard­
core resistance expressed by workers like Mahmud. As The

Washington

Post's Rajiv Chandrasekaran revealed, the CPA was such a skeletal organiza­
tion that it had just three people assigned to the enormous task of privatizing
Iraq's state-owned factories. "Don't bother starting," the three lonely staffers
were counseled by a delegation from East Germany—which, when it sold
29

off its state assets, had assigned eight thousand people to the project. In
short, the CPA was itself too privatized to privatize Iraq.
The problem wasn't just that the CPA was understaffed, it was also that it
was staffed by people who lacked the baseline belief in the public sphere that
is required for the complex task of reconstructing a state from the ground
up. As the political scientist Michael Wolfe puts it, "Conservatives cannot
govern well for the same reason that vegetarians cannot prepare a world-class
boeuf bourguignon: If you believe that what you are called upon to do is
wrong, you are unlikely to do it very well." He adds, "As a way of governing,
conservatism is another name for disaster."

50

It certainly was in Iraq. Much has been made of the youth and inexperi­
ence of the U.S. political appointees in the CPA—the fact that a handful of
twentysomething Republicans were given key roles overseeing Iraq's $13 bil­
31

lion budget. While there is no question that the members of the so-called
brat pack were alarmingly young, that was not their greatest liability. These
were not just any political cronies; they were frontline warriors from America's
counterrevolution against all relics of Keynesianism, many of them linked to
the Heritage Foundation, ground zero of Friedmanism since it was launched
in 1973. So whether they were twenty-two-year-old Dick Cheney interns or sixtysomething university presidents, they shared a cultural antipathy to govern­
ment and governing that, while invaluable for the dismantling of social
security and the public education system back home, had little use when the
job was actually to build up public institutions that had been destroyed.
In fact, many seemed to believe that the process was unnecessary. James
Haveman, in charge of rebuilding Iraq's health care system, was so ideologi­
cally opposed to free, public health care that, in a country where 70 percent
of child deaths are caused by treatable illnesses such as diarrhea, and incu­
bators are held together with duct tape, he decided that an overarching pri­
ority was to privatize the drug distribution system.

32

The paucity of experienced civil servants in the Green Zone was not an
oversight—it was an expression of the fact that the occupation of Iraq was,
from the start, a radical experiment in hollow governance. By the time the

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

355

think-tank lifers arrived in Baghdad, the crucial roles in the reconstruction
had already all been outsourced to Halliburton and KPMG. Their job as the
public servants was simply to administer the petty cash, which in Iraq took
the form of handing shrink-wrapped bricks of hundred-dollar bills to con­
tractors. It was a graphic glimpse into the acceptable role of government in a
corporatist state—to act as conveyor belt for getting public money into pri­
vate hands, a job for which ideological commitment is far more relevant
than elaborate field experience.
That nonstop conveyor belt was part of what was so enraging to Iraqis
about the U.S. insistence that they adapt to a strict free market, without state
subsidies or trade protections. In one of his many lectures to Iraqi businesspeople, Michael Fleischer explained that "protected businesses never, never
33

become competitive." He appeared to be impervious to the irony that Hal­
liburton, Bechtel, Parsons, KPMG, RTI, Blackwater and all the other U.S.
corporations that were in Iraq to take advantage of the reconstruction were
part of a vast protectionist racket whereby the U.S. government had created
their markets with war, barred their competitors from even entering the race,
then paid them to do the work, while guaranteeing them a profit to boot—all
at taxpayer expense. The Chicago School crusade, which emerged with the
core purpose of dismantling the welfare statism of the New Deal, had finally
reached its zenith in this corporate New Deal. It was a simpler, more
stripped-down form of privatization—the transfer of bulky assets wasn't even
necessary: just straight-up corporate gorging on state coffers. No investment,
no accountability, astronomical profits.
The double standards were explosive, as was the systematic exclusion of
Iraqis from the plan. Having suffered through the sanctions and the inva­
sion, most Iraqis naturally assumed that they had the right to benefit from the
reconstruction of their country—not just from the final product but from the
jobs created along the way. When tens of thousands of foreign workers
poured across Iraq's borders to take up jobs with foreign contractors, it was
seen as an extension of the invasion. Rather than reconstruction, this was de­
struction in a different guise—the wholesale wiping out of the country's in­
dustry, which had been a powerful source of national pride, one that cut
across sectarian lines. Only fifteen thousand Iraqis were hired to work for the
U.S.-funded reconstruction during Bremer's tenure, a staggeringly low fig­
34

ure. "When the Iraqi people see all these contracts going to foreigners and
these people bring in their own security guards and all their own engineers,
and we're just supposed to watch them, what do you expect?" Nouri Sitto, an

356

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Iraqi American, told me when we met in the Green Zone. Sitto had moved
back to Baghdad to assist the CPA with the reconstruction, but he was tired
of being diplomatic. "The economy is the number-one reason for the terror­
ism and the lack of security."
Much of the violence took direct aim at the foreign-run occupation, its
projects and its workers. Some of the attacks clearly came from elements in
Iraq, like al Qaeda, that are guided by a strategy of spreading chaos. However,
if the reconstruction had been seen as part of a national project from the start,
the general Iraqi population might have defended it as an extension of their
communities, making the work of provocateurs far more difficult.
The Bush administration could easily have stipulated that any company
receiving U.S. tax dollars had to staff its projects with Iraqis. It could also
have contracted for many jobs directly with Iraqi firms. Such simple,
common-sense measures did not happen for years because they conflicted
with the underlying strategy of turning Iraq into an emerging market eco­
nomic bubble—and everyone knows that bubbles are not inflated with rules
and regulations but by their absence. So, in the name of speed and effi­
ciency, contractors could hire whomever they wished, import from wherever
they liked and subcontract to whatever company they wanted.
If within six months of the invasion, Iraqis had found themselves drinking
clean water from Bechtel pipes, their homes illuminated by G E lights, their
infirm treated in sanitary Parsons-built hospitals, their streets patrolled by com­
petent DynCorp-trained police, many citizens (though not all) would proba­
bly have overcome their anger at being excluded from the reconstruction
process. But none of this happened, and well before Iraqi resistance forces be­
gan systematically targeting reconstruction sites it was clear that applying
laissez-faire principles to such a huge government task had been a disaster.
Freed of all regulations, largely protected from criminal prosecution and
on contracts that guaranteed their costs would be covered, plus a profit, many
foreign corporations did something entirely predictable: they scammed
wildly. Known in Iraq as "the primes," the big contractors engaged in elabo­
rate subcontracting schemes. They set up offices in the Green Zone, or even
Kuwait City and Amman, then subcontracted to Kuwaiti companies, who
subcontracted to Saudis, who, when the security situation got too rough, fi­
nally subcontracted to Iraqi firms, often from Kurdistan, for a fraction of what
the contracts were worth. The Democratic senator Byron Dorgan described
this web, using an air-conditioning contract in Baghdad as an example: "The
contract goes to a subcontractor, which goes to another subcontractor, and a

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

357

fourth-level subcontractor. And the payment for air-conditioning turns out to
be payments to four contractors, the fourth of which puts a fan in a room. Yes,
the American taxpayer paid for an air-conditioner and, after the money goes
through four hands like ice cubes travel around the room, there is a fan put in
35

a room in Iraq." More to the point, all this time Iraqis watched their aid
money stolen as their country boiled.
When Bechtel packed up and left Iraq in November 2006, it blamed "the
overlay of violence" for its inability to fulfill its projects. But the contractor
failure began well before the armed resistance in Iraq built up steam. The
first schools that Bechtel reconstructed drew complaints immediately.

36

In

early April 2004, before Iraq had spiraled into violence, I visited the Baghdad
Central Children's Hospital. It had supposedly been rebuilt by a different
U.S. contractor, but there was raw sewage in the hallways, none of the toilets
worked and the men trying to fix the mess were so poor that they didn't have
shoes—they were subsubsubcontractors, like the women who sew piecework
at their kitchen tables for a Wal-Mart contractor's contractor's contractor.
The mismanagement continued for three and a half years until all the
major U.S. reconstruction contractors pulled out of Iraq, their billions spent,
the bulk of the work still undone. Parsons was handed $186 million to build
142 health clinics. Only 6 were ever completed. Even the projects held up
as reconstruction success stories have been called into question. In April
2007, U.S. inspectors in Iraq looked into eight projects completed by U.S.
contractors—including a maternity hospital and a water purification system —
and found that "seven were no longer operating as designed," according to The
New York Times. The paper also reported that Iraq's power grid was producing
significantly less electricity in 2007 than it did in 2006.

37

As of December

2006, when all the main reconstruction contracts were ending, the Inspector
General's Office was investigating eighty-seven cases of possible fraud relating
38

to U.S. contractors in Iraq. Corruption during the occupation was not the
result of poor management but of a policy decision: if Iraq was to be the next
frontier for Wild West capitalism, it needed to be liberated from laws."
Bremer's CPA would not try to stop the various scams, side deals and shell
games because the CPA was itself a shell game. Though it was billed as the
U.S. occupation authority, it's unclear that it held that distinction in any­
thing other than name. This point was forcefully made by a judge in the in­
famous Custer Battles corruption case.
Two former employees of the security firm launched a whistle-blower
lawsuit against the company, accusing it of cheating on reconstruction-related

358

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

contracts with the CPA and defrauding the U.S. government of millions of dol­
lars, mostly for work done at the Baghdad International Airport. The case was
based on documents produced by the company that clearly showed it was keep­
ing two sets of numbers—one for itself, one for invoicing the CPA. Retired
Brigadier General Hugh Tant testified that the company's performance was
"probably the worst I've ever seen in my 30 years in the army." (Among Custer
Battles' many alleged violations, it is said to have appropriated Iraqi-owned forklifts from the airport, repainted them and billed the CPA for the cost of leasing
the machines.)

39

In March 2006, a federal jury in Virginia ruled against the company, find­
ing it guilty of fraud, and forced it to pay $10 million in damages. The com­
pany then asked the judge to overturn the verdict, with a revealing defense. It
claimed that the CPA was not part of the U.S. government, and therefore not
subject to its laws, including the False Claims Act. The implications of this
defense were enormous: the Bush administration had indemnified U.S. cor­
porations working in Iraq from any liability under Iraqi laws; if the CPA
wasn't subject to U.S. law either, it meant that the contractors weren't subject
to any law at all —U.S. or Iraqi. This time, the judge ruled in the company's
favor: he said there was plenty of evidence that Custer Battles had submitted
to the CPA "false and fraudulently inflated invoices," but he ruled that the
plaintiffs had "failed to prove that the claims were presented to the United
40

States." In other words, the U.S. government presence in Iraq during the
first year of its economic experiment had been a mirage—there had been no
government, just a funnel to get U.S. taxpayer and Iraqi oil dollars to foreign
corporations, completely outside the law. In this way, Iraq represented the
most extreme expression of the anti-state counterrevolution—a hollow state,
where, as the courts finally established, there was no there, there.
After handing out its billions to contractors, the CPA melted away. Its for­
mer staffers returned to the private sector and, when the scandals hit, there
was no one left to defend the Green Zone's dismal record. But in Iraq, the
missing billions were keenly felt. "The situation now is much worse and it
seems not to be improving despite the huge contracts signed with American
companies," remarked an engineer with the Ministry of Electricity the week
after Bechtel announced its departure from Iraq. "It is strange how billions of
dollars spent on electricity brought no improvement whatsoever, but in fact
worsened the situation." A taxi driver in Mosul asked, "What reconstruction?
Today we are drinking untreated water from a plant built decades ago that
was never maintained. The electricity only visits us two hours a day. And

IDEOLOGICAL BLOWBACK

359

now we are going backward. We cook on the firewood we gather from the
forests because of the gas shortage."

41

The catastrophic failure to reconstruct also shared direct responsibility for
the most lethal form of blowback—the dangerous rise of religious funda­
mentalism and sectarian conflict. When the occupation proved unable to
provide the most basic services, including security, the mosques and local
militias filled the vacuum. The young Shia cleric Moqtada al-Sadr proved
particularly adept at exposing the failures of Bremer's privatized reconstruc­
tion by running his own shadow reconstruction in Shia slums from Baghdad
to Basra, earning himself a devoted following. Funded through donations to
mosques, and perhaps later with help from Iran, the centers dispatched elec­
tricians to fix power and phone lines, organized local garbage collection, set
up emergency generators, ran blood drives and directed traffic. "I found a
vacuum, and no one filled the vacuum," al-Sadr said in the early days of the
occupation, adding, "What I can do, I do."

42

He also took the young men

who saw no jobs and no hope in Bremer's Iraq, dressed them in black and
armed them with rusty Kalashnikovs. The result was the Mahdi Army, now
one of the most brutal forces in Iraqi's sectarian battles. These militias are
corporatism's legacy too: if the reconstruction had provided jobs, security
and services to Iraqis, al-Sadr would have been deprived of both his mission
and many of his newfound followers. As it was, corporate America's failures
laid the groundwork for al-Sadr's successes.
Iraq under Bremer was the logical conclusion of Chicago School theory: a
public sector reduced to a minimal number of employees, mostly contract
workers, living in a Halliburton city state, tasked with signing corporatefriendly laws drafted by KPMG and handing out duffle bags of cash to West­
ern contractors protected by mercenary soldiers, themselves shielded by full
legal immunity. All around them were furious people, increasingly turning
to religious fundamentalism because it's the only source of power in a
hollowed-out state. Like Russia's gangsterism and Bush's cronyism, contem­
porary Iraq is a creation of the fifty-year crusade to privatize the world.
Rather than being disowned by its creators, it deserves to be seen as the
purest incarnation yet of the ideology that gave it birth.

CHAPTER

l8

FULL CIRCLE
F R O M B L A N K S L A T E TO S C O R C H E D EARTH

W o u l d it not be e a s i e r
In that c a s e for the g o v e r n m e n t
To dissolve the people
A n d elect a n o t h e r ?
—Bertolt Brecht, " T h e S o l u t i o n , " 1 9 5 3

1

Iraq is the last great frontier in the Middle East

In Iraq, 80 per

cent of the oil w e l l s ever drilled have been discoveries.
—David H o r g a n , chief executive of the Irish oil c o m p a n y Petrel, J a n ­
uary 2 0 0 7

2

Is it possible that the Bush administration was unaware that its economic
program had the potential to spark a violent backlash in Iraq? One person
likely to have been aware of possible negative consequences was the man
who implemented the policies, Paul Bremer. In November 2001, shortly af­
ter he had launched his new counter-terrorism company, Crisis Consulting
Practice, Bremer wrote a policy paper for his clients explaining why multi­
national corporations faced increased risks of terrorist attacks at home and
abroad. In the paper, titled "New Risks in International Business," he told his
elite clients that they faced increased dangers because of the economic
model that had made them so wealthy. Free trade, he wrote, has led to "the
creation of unprecedented wealth," but it has "immediate negative conse­
quences for many." It "requires laying off workers. And opening markets to for­
eign trade puts enormous pressure on traditional retailers and trade

FULL CIRCLE

361

monopolies." All these changes lead to "growing income gaps and social ten­
sions," which in turn can lead to a range of attacks on U.S. firms, including
terrorist attacks.

3

That certainly is what happened in Iraq. If the war's architects convinced
themselves that there would be no political blowback from their economic
program, it was probably not because they believed Iraqis would actively
consent to such policies of systematic dispossession. Rather, the war planners
were banking on something else—the disorientation of Iraqis, their collec­
tive regression, their inability to keep up with the pace of transformation.
They were banking, in other words, on the power of shock. The guiding as­
sumption of Iraq's military and economic shock therapists, best articulated
by the former deputy secretary of state Richard Armitage, was that Iraqis
would be so stunned by U.S. firepower, and so relieved to be rid of Saddam,
4

"that they could be easily marshaled from point A to point B . " Then, after a
few months, they would emerge from their postwar daze, pleasantly sur­
prised to be living in an Arabic Singapore, a "Tiger on the Tigris," as some
market analysts were excitedly calling it.
Instead, a great many Iraqis immediately demanded a say in the transfor­
mation of their country. And it was the Bush administration's response to this
unexpected turn of events that generated the most blowback of all.

Dismantling Democracy
In the summer after Iraq's invasion, there was so much pent-up hunger for
political participation that Baghdad, for all its daily hardships, displayed an
almost carnival-like atmosphere. There was anger at Bremer's layoffs, and
frustration with the blackouts and the foreign contractors, but for months
that anger was primarily expressed through outbursts of unregulated, exu­
berant free speech. All summer there were daily protests outside the gates of
the Green Zone, many by workers demanding their old jobs back. Hundreds
of new newspapers flew off printing presses, filled with articles critical of
Bremer and his economic program. Clerics preached politics during the Fri­
day sermons, a freedom impossible under Saddam.
Most exciting of all, there were spontaneous elections breaking out in
cities, towns and provinces across the country. Finally free of Saddam's iron
grip, neighbors were convening town hall meetings and electing leaders to
represent them in this new era. In cities like Samarra, Hilla and Mosul, re­
ligious leaders, secular professionals and tribespeople worked together to

362

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

set local priorities for reconstruction, defying the worst predictions about
sectarianism and fundamentalism. Meetings were heated, but by many ac­
counts they were also joyous: the challenges were enormous but freedom
was becoming a reality. In many cases, U.S. forces, believing their presi­
dent when he said the army had been sent to Iraq to spread democracy,
played a facilitating role, helping to organize the elections, even building
ballot boxes.
The democratic enthusiasm, combined with the clear rejection of Bre­
mer's economic program, put the Bush administration in an extremely diffi­
cult position. It had made bold promises to hand over power to an elected
Iraqi government in a matter of months and to include Iraqis in decision
making right away. But that first summer left no doubt that any relinquishing
of power would mean abandoning the dream of turning Iraq into a model
privatized economy dotted with sprawling U.S. military bases; economic na­
tionalism was far too deeply ingrained in the populace, particularly when it
came to the national oil reserves, the greatest prize of all. So Washington
abandoned its democratic promises and instead ordered increases in the
shock levels in the hope that a higher dosage would finally do the trick. It
was a decision that brought the crusade for a pure free market back full cir­
cle to its roots in the Southern Cone of Latin America, when economic
shock therapy was enforced by brutally suppressing democracy and by disap­
pearing and torturing anyone who stood in the way.
When Paul Bremer first arrived, the U.S. plan was to convene a large con­
stituent assembly, representing all sectors of Iraqi society, where delegates
would vote for the members of an interim executive council. After spending
two weeks in Baghdad, Bremer scrapped the idea. Instead, he decided to
handpick the members of an Iraqi Governing Council. In a message to Pres­
ident Bush, Bremer described his process for selecting the Iraqi members of
the council as "a cross between blind man's bluff and three-dimensional tictac-toe."

5

Bremer had said that the council would have governing power, but once
again he changed his mind. "My experience with the Governing Council at
this point suggested this would not be a great idea," the former envoy later
said, explaining that the council members were too slow and deliberative—
traits unsuitable for his shock therapy plans. "They couldn't organize a twocar parade," Bremer said. "They were simply not able to make decisions in a
timely fashion, or any decisions. Moreover, I still felt very strongly about the

FULL CIRCLE

363

importance of getting a constitution in place before we handed sovereignty
to anybody."

6

Bremer's next problem was the elections breaking out in towns and cities
across the country. At the end of June, only his second month in Iraq, Bre­
mer sent word that all local elections must stop immediately. The new plan
was for Iraq's local leaders to be appointed by the occupation, just as the
Governing Council had been. A defining showdown took place in Najaf, the
holiest city for Iraq's Shia, the largest religious denomination in the country.
Najaf was in the process of organizing citywide elections with the help of
U.S. troops when, only one day before registration, the lieutenant colonel in
charge got a call from Marine Major General Jim Mattis. "The election had
to be canceled. Bremer was concerned that an unfriendly Islamic candidate
would prevail. . . . Bremer would not allow the wrong guy to win the elec­
tion. The Marines were advised to select a group of Iraqis they thought were
safe and have them pick a mayor. That was how the United States would
control the process," wrote Michael Gordon and General Bernard Trainor,
the authors of Cobra II, regarded as the definitive military history of the in­
vasion. In the end, the U.S. military appointed a Saddam-era army colonel as
Najaf's mayor, as they did in cities and towns across the country.*

7

In some cases, Bremer's ban came after Iraqis had already voted in elec­
tions for local representatives. Undaunted, Bremer ordered the creation of
new councils. In the province of Taji, RTI, the Mormon-dominated contrac­
tor tasked with building local government, dismantled the council that local
people had elected months before it arrived and insisted on starting from
scratch. "We feel we are going backwards," one man complained. Bremer
insisted that there was "no blanket prohibition" against democracy. "I'm not
opposed to it, but I want to do it a way that takes care of our concerns. . . .
Elections that are held too early can be destructive. It's got to be done very
carefully."

8

At that point, Iraqis were still expecting Washington to make good on its
promise to organize national elections and hand over power directly to a gov­
ernment elected by the majority of citizens. But in November 2003, after he
canceled local elections, Bremer flew back to Washington for huddled
meetings at the White House. When he returned to Baghdad, he announced
* This w a s one of the reasons why "de-Baathification" inspired such rage: while low-level
soldiers had all lost their jobs, along with teachers and doctors who had been required to join
the party in order to advance professionally, top-level Baathist military officials, well known
for their human rights abuses, were being enlisted to bring order to the cities and towns.

364

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

that general elections were off the table. Iraq's first "sovereign" government
would be appointed, not elected.
The about-turn may well have had something to do with a poll, con­
ducted in this period by the Washington-based International Republican In­
stitute. It asked Iraqis what kind of politicians they would vote for if they had
the chance. The results were a wake-up call for the Green Zone corporatists:
49 percent of Iraqi respondents said they would vote for a party promising to
create "more government jobs." Asked if they would vote for a party promis­
ing to create "more private sector jobs," only 4.6 percent said yes. Asked if
they would vote for a party promising to "keep coalition forces until security
9

is good," only 4.2 percent said they would. Put simply, if Iraqis were allowed
to freely elect the next government, and if that government had real power,
Washington would have to give up on two of the war's main goals: access to
Iraq for U.S. military bases and full access to Iraq for U.S. multinationals.
Some critics of the neocon wing of the Bush regime fault its Iraq plan for
relying too heavily on democracy, for displaying a wide-eyed faith in selfdetermination. Airbrushed from this narrative is the actual track record of
the entire first year of occupation, when Bremer cut down democracy wher­
ever it reared its hydra head. Within his first six months in the job, he had
canceled a constituent assembly, nixed the idea of electing the drafters of the
constitution, annulled and called off dozens of local and provincial elec­
tions and then vanquished the beast of national elections—hardly the ac­
tions of an idealistic democrat. And not one of the high-profile neocons who
now blame the problems in Iraq on the absence of "an Iraqi face" supported
the calls for direct elections coming from the streets of Baghdad and Basra.
Many who were posted in Iraq in the early months draw a direct link be­
tween the various decisions to delay and defang democracy and the fero­
cious rise of the armed resistance. Salim Lone, a UN diplomat who was in
Iraq after the invasion, saw the pivotal moment as Bremer's first antidemo­
cratic decision. "The first devastating attacks on the foreign presence in Iraq,
for example, came soon after the United States selected in July 2003 the first
Iraqi leadership body, the Iraqi Governing Council: The Jordanian mission
and then, soon after, the UN's Baghdad headquarters were blown up, killing
scores of innocents. . . the anger over the composition of this council, and
for UN support for it, was palpable in Iraq." Lone lost many friends and col­
leagues in the attack.

10

Bremer's canceling of national elections was a bitter betrayal for Iraq's
Shia. As the largest ethnic group, they were certain to dominate an elected

FULL CIRCLE

365

government after decades of subjugation. At first, Shia resistance took the
form of massive peaceful demonstrations: 100,000 protesters in Baghdad,
30,000 in Basra. Their unified chant was "Yes, yes, elections. No, no selec­
tions." "Our main demand in this process is to establish all the constitu­
tional institutions through elections and not appointments," wrote Ali Abdel
Hakim al-Safi, the second most senior Shia cleric in Iraq, in a letter to
George Bush and Tony Blair. He declared Bremer's new plan "nothing other
than replacing one dictatorship with another" and warned that if they went
11

ahead with it, they would find themselves fighting a losing battle. Bush and
Blair were unmoved—they praised the demonstrations as evidence of free­
dom's flowering but bulldozed ahead with the plan to appoint Iraq's first
post-Saddam government.
It was at this juncture that Moqtada al-Sadr became a political force to be
reckoned with. When the other main Shia parties decided to participate in
the appointed government and to abide by an interim constitution that was
written inside the Green Zone, al-Sadr broke ranks, denouncing the process
and the constitution as illegitimate and openly comparing Bremer to Sad­
dam Hussein. He also started building up the Mahdi Army in earnest. After
peaceful protests had no effect, many Shia became convinced that if
majority-rule democracy was ever to become a reality, they would have to
fight for it.
Had the Bush administration kept its promise to hand over power quickly
to an elected Iraqi government, there is every chance that the resistance
would have remained small and containable, rather than becoming a coun­
trywide rebellion. But keeping that promise would have meant sacrificing
the economic agenda behind the war, something that was never going to
happen—and that is why the violent repercussions of America's denial of
democracy in Iraq must also be counted as a form of ideological blowback.

Body Shocks

As resistance mounted, the occupation forces fought back with escalating
shock tactics. These came late at night or very early in the morning, with sol­
diers bursting through doors, shining flashlights into darkened homes, shout­
ing in English (a few words are understood: "motherfucker," "Ali Baba,"
"Osama bin Laden"). Women reached frantically for scarves to cover their
heads in front of intruding strangers; men's heads were forcibly bagged be­
fore they were thrown into army trucks and sped to prisons and holding

366

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

camps. In the first three and half years of occupation, an estimated 61,500
Iraqis were captured and imprisoned by U.S. forces, usually with methods
designed to "maximize capture shock." Roughly 19,000 remained in cus­
tody in the spring of 2 0 0 7 .

12

Inside the prisons, more shocks followed: buck­

ets of freezing water; snarling, teeth-baring German shepherds; punching
and kicking; and sometimes the shock of electrical currents running from
live wires.
Three decades earlier, the neoliberal crusade had begun with tactics like
these—with so-called subversives and alleged terrorists grabbed from their
homes, blindfolded and hooded, taken to dark cells where they faced beat­
ings and worse. Now, to defend the hope of a model free market in Iraq, the
project had come full circle.
One factor that made the surge in torture tactics all but inevitable was
Donald Rumsfeld's determination to run the military like a modern, out­
sourced corporation. He had planned the troop deployment less like a de­
fense secretary and more like a Wal-Mart vice president looking to shave a
few more hours from the payroll. Having whittled the generals down from
their early requests for 500,000 troops to fewer than 200,000, he still saw fat
to trim: at the last minute, satisfying his inner C E O , he cut tens of thousands
more troops from the battle plans.

13

Although his just-in-time forces were capable of toppling Saddam, they
had no hope of handling what Bremer's edicts created in Iraq—a population
in open rebellion and a gaping hole where Iraq's army and police used to be.
Lacking the numbers to bring control to the streets, the occupation forces
did the next best thing: they scooped the people off the streets and put them
in the jails. The thousands of prisoners rounded up in the raids were brought
to CIA agents, U.S. soldiers and private contractors—many of them
untrained—who conducted aggressive interrogations to find out whatever
they could about the resistance.
In the early days of the occupation, the Green Zone had played host to
economic shock therapists from Poland and Russia; now it became a magnet
for a different breed of shock experts, those specializing in the darker arts of
suppressing resistance movements. The private security companies padded
their ranks with veterans of the dirty wars in Colombia, South Africa and
Nepal. According to journalist Jeremy Scahill, Blackwater and other private
security firms hired more than seven hundred Chilean troops—many of
them special forces operators—for Iraq deployment, some of whom had
trained and served under Pinochet.

14

FULL CIRCLE

367

One of the highest-ranking shock specialists was the U.S. commander
James Steele, who arrived in Iraq in May 2003. Steele had been a key figure
in Central America's right-wing crusades, where he had served as chief U.S.
adviser to several Salvadoran army battalions accused of being death squads.
More recently, he had been a vice president at Enron and had originally
gone to Iraq as an energy consultant, but when the resistance rose up, he
switched back to his old persona, becoming Bremer's chief security adviser.
Steele was eventually directed to bring to Iraq what unnamed sources at the
Pentagon were chillingly calling "the Salvador option."

15

John Sifton, senior researcher at Human Rights Watch, told me that the
abuse of prisoners in Iraq did not fit the usual pattern. Usually in conflict
zones, abuses take place early on, in the so-called fog of war, when the bat­
tlefield is chaotic and no one knows the rules. That's what happened in
Afghanistan, Sifton said, "but Iraq was different—things started off profes­
sional and then they got worse, not better." He dates the shift to late August
2003—four months after Baghdad fell. It was at that point, he says, that the
reports of abuse began streaming in.
According to this timeline, the shock of the torture chamber emerged
immediately following Bremer's most controversial economic shocks. Late
August was the end of Bremer's long summer of lawmaking and election
canceling. As those moves sent ever more recruits to the resistance, U.S. sol­
diers were sent to break down doors and try to shake the defiance out of Iraq,
one military-age man at a time.
The timing of this shift can be clearly tracked through a series of declassi­
fied documents that came to light in the wake of the Abu Ghraib scandal.
The paper trail begins on August 14, 2003, when Captain William Ponce,
an intelligence officer at the top U.S. military headquarters in Iraq, sent an
e-mail to his fellow officers stationed around the country. It contained the
now notorious statement: "The gloves are coming off gentlemen regarding
these detainees . . . [a colonel] has made it clear that we want these individ­
uals broken. Casualties are mounting and we need to start gathering info to
help protect our fellow soldiers from any further attacks." Ponce solicited
ideas for the techniques that interrogators would like to use on prisoners—
what he called a "wish list." Suggestions came shooting back into his inbox,
including "low-voltage electrocution."

16

Two weeks later, on August 31, Major General Geoffrey Miller, warden
of the Guantânamo Bay prison, was brought to Iraq on his mission to "Gitmoize" the Abu Ghraib prison.

17

Two weeks after that, on September 14,

368

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

Lieutenant General Ricardo Sanchez, top commander in Iraq, authorized
a wide range of new interrogation procedures based on the Guantânamo
model, including deliberate humiliation (called "pride and ego down"), "ex­
ploiting] Arab fear of dogs," sensory deprivation (called "light control"), sen­
sory overload (yelling, loud music) and "stress positions." It was shortly after
the Sanchez memo was sent out, in early October, that the incidents docu­
mented in the infamous Abu Ghraib photographs took place.

18

The Bush team had failed to shock Iraqis into obedience either with
Shock and Awe or with economic shock therapy. Now the shock tactics be­
came more personal, using the Kubark interrogation manual's unmistakable
formula for inducing regression.
Many of the most important prisoners were taken to a secured area near
the Baghdad International Airport, run by a military task force and the CIA.
Accessible only by special ID and kept hidden from the Red Cross, the facil­
ity was so clandestine that even high-level military officials were denied en­
try. To maintain its cover it repeatedly changed names—from Task Force 20
to 121 to 6-26 to Task Force 145.

19

Prisoners were held in a small generic building, designed to create the
textbook Kubark conditions, including complete sensory deprivation. The
building was divided into five areas: a medical exam room, a "soft room" that
looked like a living room (for co-operative prisoners), a red room, a blue
room and the much-feared black room—a small cell with every surface
painted black and speakers in all four corners.
The existence of the secret facility became public only when a sergeant
who worked there, using the pseudonym Jeff Perry, approached Human
Rights Watch to describe this strange place. Compared with the bedlam of
Abu Ghraib, with its untrained guards mostly making it up as they went
along, the CIA's airport facility was spookily ordered and clinical. According
to Perry, when interrogators wanted to use "harsh tactics" against prisoners in
the black room, they went to a computer terminal and printed out a form that
was a kind of torture menu. "It was all already typed out for you," Perry re­
called, "environmental controls, hot and cold, you know, strobe lights, music,
so forth. Working dogs. . . you would just check what you want to use off."
When they completed the forms, the interrogators took them to a superior of­
ficer for authorization. "I never saw a sheet that wasn't signed," Perry said.
He and other interrogators became concerned that the techniques vio­
lated the Geneva Conventions' prohibition against "humiliating and degrad­
ing treatment." Worried that they could face prosecution if their work ever

FULL CIRCLE

369

became public, Perry and three others confronted their colonel and "told
him we were uneasy about this type of abuse." The secret prison was so effi­
cient that within two hours, a team of military lawyers descended on the
facility with a PowerPoint presentation on why the detainees were not pro­
tected by the Geneva Conventions, and why sensory deprivation—despite
the CIA's own research to the contrary—was not torture. "Oh, it was very
fast," Perry said of the response time. "It was like they were ready. I mean
they had this two hour slide show all prepared."
There were other facilities dotted around Iraq where prisoners were sub­
jected to the same Kubark-sty\e sensory deprivation tactics, some even more
reminiscent of the McGill experiments all those years ago. Another sergeant
told of a prison on a military base called Tiger, near al Qaim, close to the
Syrian border, which held twenty to forty prisoners. They were blindfolded,
shackled and put in sweltering hot metal shipping containers for twenty-four
hours —"no sleep, no food, no water," the sergeant reported. After they had
been softened up by the sensory deprivation box, prisoners were blasted with
strobe lights and heavy-metal music.

20

Similar methods were used at a Special Operations base near Tikrit—
except that prisoners there were put in boxes even smaller: four feet by four
feet and twenty inches deep, too small for an adult to stand or lie down,
strongly reminiscent of many of the cells described in Latin America's
Southern Cone. They were kept in that extreme sensory isolation for up to a
week. At least one of the prisoners also reported being electrocuted by U.S.
21

soldiers, though the soldiers denied it. There is, however, a significant and
little discussed body of evidence suggesting that U.S. soldiers have indeed
used electrocution as a torture technique in Iraq. On May 14, 2004, in a
case that received almost no publicity, two Marines were sentenced to prison
for electrocuting an Iraqi prisoner one month earlier. According to govern­
ment documents obtained by the American Civil Liberties Union, one sol­
dier "shock[ed] an Iraqi detainee with an electric transformer . . . held the
wires against the shoulder area of the detainee" until "the detainee 'danced'
as he was shocked."

22

When the infamous Abu Ghraib photographs were published, including
the one of a hooded prisoner standing on a box with electrical wires dan­
gling from his arms, the military had a strange problem: "We have had sev­
eral detainees claim they were the person depicted in the photograph in
question," explained the spokesperson for the Army's Criminal Investigation
Command, the agency charged with investigating prisoner abuse. One of

370

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

those detainees was Haj Ali, a former district mayor. Ali said that he too had
been hooded, made to stand on a box and had electrical wires attached to
his body parts. But, contradicting the accounts of the guards at Abu Ghraib
who claimed the wires were not live, Ali told PBS, "When they shocked me
with electricity, it felt like my eyeballs were coming out of their sockets."

23

Like thousands of his fellow prisoners, Ali was released from Abu Ghraib
without charge, pushed off a truck after being told "You were arrested by
mistake." The Red Cross has said that U.S. military officials have admitted
that somewhere between 70 and 90 percent of the detentions in Iraq were
"mistakes." According to Ali, many of those human errors emerged from
U.S.-run jails looking for revenge. "Abu Ghraib is a breeding ground for in­
surgents. . . . All the insults and torture make them ready to do just about
anything. Who can blame them?"

24

Many U.S. soldiers understand and fear this response. "If he's a good guy,
you know, now he's a bad guy because of the way we treated him," said a ser­
geant with the 82nd Airborne, who had been stationed at a particularly bru­
tal makeshift prison on a U.S. army base outside Fallujah, home to a
battalion proudly known as the "Murderous Maniacs."

25

The situation is far worse in jails run by Iraqis. Saddam had always relied
heavily on torture to hold on to power. If torture was to recede in postSaddam Iraq, it would have required a focused effort to repudiate such tac­
tics on the part of a new government. Instead, the U.S. embraced torture for
its own purposes, setting a degraded standard at the very time it was training
and supervising the new Iraqi police force.
In January 2005, Human Rights Watch found that torture within Iraqirun (and U.S.-supervised) jails and detention facilities was "systematic," in­
cluding the use of electroshock. An internal report from the 1st Cavalry
Division states that "electrical shock and choking" are "consistently used to
achieve confessions" by Iraqi police and soldiers. Iraqi jailers were also us­
ing the ubiquitous symbol of Latin American torture, the picana, the elec­
tric cattle prod. In December 2006, The New York Times reported on the
case of Faraj Mahmoud, who "was stripped and hanged from the ceiling.
An electric prod applied to his genitals made his body bounce off the walls,
he said."

26

In March 2005, The New York Times Magazine

reporter Peter Maass was

embedded with a Special Police Commando unit that had been trained
by James Steele. Maass visited a public library in Samarra that had been
converted into a macabre prison. Inside, he saw blindfolded and shackled

FULL CIRCLE

371

prisoners, some beaten bloody, as well as a desk with "bloodstains running
down its side." He heard vomiting and screams that he described as "chill­
ing, like the screams of a madman, or of someone being driven mad." He
also clearly heard the sound of two gunshots "from within or behind the
detention center."

27

In El Salvador, death squads were notorious for using murder not just to get
rid of political opponents but to send messages of terror to the broader pub­
lic. Mutilated bodies that appeared on roadsides told the wider community
that if individuals stepped out of line, they could be the next corpse. Often the
tortured bodies were left with a sign bearing the signature of the death squad:
Mano Blanco or Maximiliano Hernandez Brigade. By 2005, these sorts of
messages had become a regular sight on roadsides in Iraq: prisoners, last seen
in the custody of Iraqi commandos who were usually linked to the Ministry
of Interior, found with a single bullet hole in the head, hands still cuffed be­
hind their backs, or with holes in the skull made by electric drills. In No­
vember 2005, the Los Angeles Times reported that at the Baghdad morgue,
"dozens of bodies arrive at the same time on a weekly basis, including scores
of corpses with wrists bound by police handcuffs." Often the morgues kept
the metal cuffs and returned them to the police.

28

In Iraq, there are also more high-tech ways of conveying messages of ter­
ror. Terrorism in the Grip of Justice is a widely watched T V show on the U.S.funded Al Iraqiya network. The series is produced in conjunction with the
Salvadorized Iraqi commandos. Several released prisoners have explained
how the show's content is produced: detainees, often grabbed at random in
neighborhood sweeps, are beaten and tortured, and threats are made against
their families until they are ready to confess to any crime—even crimes that
lawyers have proved never took place. Then the video cameras come out to
record the prisoners "confessing" to being insurgents, as well as thieves, ho­
mosexuals and liars. Every night, Iraqis watch these confessions, coming
from the bruised and swollen faces of the unmistakably tortured. "The show
has a good effect on civilians," Adnan Thabit, leader of the Salvadorized
commandos, told Maass.

29

Ten months after "the Salvador option" was first mentioned in the press,
its full terrifying implications became clear. The Iraqi commandos, origi­
nally trained by Steele, were officially working under Iraq's Ministry of the
Interior, which had insisted, when Maass questioned them about what he
had seen in the library, that it "does not allow any human rights abuses of
prisoners that are in the hands of Ministry of Interior Security Forces." But in

372

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

November 2005, 173 Iraqis were discovered in an Interior Ministry dungeon,
some tortured so badly that their skin was falling off, others with drill marks
in their skulls and teeth and toenails removed. The released prisoners said
that not everyone made it out alive. They compiled a list of 18 people who
had been tortured to death inside the ministry dungeon —Iraq's disap­
peared.

30

When I was researching Ewen Cameron's electroshock experiments in the
1950s, I came across an observation made by one of his colleagues, a psychi­
atrist named Fred Lowy. "The Freudians had developed all these subtle
methods of peeling the onion to get at the heart of the problem," he said.
"Cameron wanted to drill right through and to hell with the layers. But, as
31

we later discovered, the layers are all there is." Cameron thought he could
blast away all his patients' layers and start again; he dreamed of creating
brand-new personalities. But his patients weren't reborn: they were con­
fused, injured, broken.
Iraq's shock therapists blasted away at the layers too, seeking that elusive
blank slate on which to create their new model country. They found only the
piles of rubble that they themselves had created, and millions of psychologi­
cally and physically shattered people—shattered by Saddam, shattered by
war, shattered by one another. Bush's in-house disaster capitalists didn't wipe
Iraq clean, they just stirred it up. Rather than a tabula rasa, purified of his­
tory, they found ancient feuds, brought to the surface to merge with fresh
vendettas from each new attack—on a mosque in Karbala, in Samarra, on a
market, a ministry, a hospital. Countries, like people, don't reboot to zero
with a good shock; they just break and keep on breaking.
Which of course requires more blasting—upping the dosage, holding
down the button longer, more pain, more bombs, more torture. Former
deputy secretary of state Richard Armitage, who had predicted that Iraqis
would be easily marshaled from A to B , has since concluded that the real
problem was that the U.S. was too soft. "The humane way in which the co­
alition fought the war," he said, "actually has led to a situation where it is
more difficult to get people to come together, not less. In Germany and
Japan [after the Second World War], the population was exhausted and
deeply shocked by what had happened, but in Iraq it's been the opposite. A
very rapid victory over enemy forces has meant we've not had the cowed
population we had in Japan and Germany. . . . The US is dealing with an
32

Iraqi population that is un-shocked and un-awed." By January 2007, Bush

FULL CIRCLE

373

and his advisers were still convinced that they could gain control of Iraq
with one good "surge," one that wiped out Moqtada al-Sadr—"a cancer that
undermines" the Iraq government. The report on which the surge strategy
was based aimed for "the successful clearing of central Baghdad" and, when
al-Sadr's forces moved to Sadr City, to "clear that Shiite stronghold by
force" as well.

33

In the seventies, when the corporatist crusade began, it used tactics that
courts ruled were overtly genocidal: the deliberate erasure of a segment of
the population. In Iraq, something even more monstrous has happened—
the erasure not of a segment of the population but of an entire country; Iraq
is disappearing, disintegrating. It began, as it often does, with the disappear­
ance of women behind veils and doors, then the children disappeared from
the schools —as of 2006, two-thirds of them stayed home. Next came the pro­
fessionals: doctors, professors, entrepreneurs, scientists, pharmacists, judges,
lawyers. An estimated three hundred Iraqi academics have been assassinated
by death squads since the U.S. invasion, including several deans of depart­
ments; thousands more have fled. Doctors have fared even worse: by Febru­
ary 2007, an estimated two thousand had been killed and twelve thousand
had fled. In November 2006, the UN High Commission for Refugees esti­
mated that three thousand Iraqis were fleeing the country every day. By April
2007, the organization reported that four million people had been forced to
leave their homes—roughly one in seven Iraqis. Only a few hundred of
those refugees had been welcomed into the United States.

34

With Iraqi industry all but collapsed, one of the only local businesses
booming is kidnapping. Over just three and a half months in early 2006,
nearly twenty thousand people were kidnapped in Iraq. The only time the
international media pays attention is when a Westerner is taken, but the vast
majority of abductions are Iraqi professionals, grabbed as they travel to and
from work. Their families either come up with tens of thousands in U.S. dol­
lars for the ransom money or identify their bodies at the morgue. Torture has
also emerged as a thriving industry. Human rights groups have documented
numerous cases of Iraqi police demanding thousands of dollars from the
35

families of prisoners in exchange for a halt to torture. It's Iraq's own domes­
tic version of disaster capitalism.
This was not what the Bush administration intended for Iraq when it was
selected as the model nation for the rest of the Arab world. The occupation
had begun with cheerful talk of clean slates and fresh starts. It didn't take long,
however, for the quest for cleanliness to slip into talk of "pulling Islamism up

374

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

from the root" in Sadr City or Najaf and removing "the cancer of radical Is­
lam" from Fallujah and Ramadi—what was not clean would be scrubbed
out by force.
That is what happens with projects to build model societies in other peo­
ple's countries. The cleansing campaigns are rarely premeditated. It is only
when the people who live on the land refuse to abandon their past that the
dream of the clean slate morphs into its doppelganger, the scorched earth —
only then that the dream of total creation morphs into a campaign of total
destruction.
The unanticipated violence that now engulfs Iraq is the creation of the
lethally optimistic architects of the war—it was preordained in that original
seemingly innocuous, even idealistic phrase: "a model for a new Middle
East." The disintegration of Iraq has its roots in the ideology that demanded
a tabula rasa on which to write its new story. And when no such pristine
tableau presented itself, the supporters of that ideology proceeded to blast
and surge and blast again in the hope of reaching that promised land.

Failure: The New Face of Success
On my flight leaving Baghdad, every seat was filled by a foreign contractor
fleeing the violence. It was April 2004, and both Fallujah and Najaf were un­
der siege; fifteen hundred contractors pulled out of Iraq that week alone.
Many more would follow. At the time, I was convinced that we were seeing
the first full-blown defeat of the corporatist crusade. Iraq had been blasted
with every shock weapon short of a nuclear bomb, and yet nothing could
subdue this country. The experiment, clearly, had failed.
Now I'm not sure. On one level, there is no question that parts of the proj­
ect were a disaster. Bremer was sent to Iraq to build a corporate Utopia; in­
stead, Iraq became a ghoulish dystopia where going to a simple business
meeting could get you lynched, burned alive or beheaded. By May 2007,
more than 900 contractors had been reported killed and "more than 12,000
wounded in battle or injured on the job," according to a New York Times
analysis. The investors Bremer had done so much to attract had never shown
up —not H S B C , or Procter & Gamble, which put its joint venture on hold,
as did General Motors. New Bridge Strategies, the company that had gushed
about how "a Wal-Mart could take over the country," conceded that "Mc­
36

Donald's is not opening any time soon." Bechtel's reconstruction contracts
did not roll easily into long-term contracts to run the water and electricity

FULL CIRCLE

375

systems. And by late 2006, the privatized reconstruction efforts that were at
the center of the anti-Marshall Plan had almost all been abandoned on the
ground—and some rather dramatic policy reversals were in evidence.
Stuart Bowen, U.S. special inspector general for Iraq reconstruction, re­
ported that in the few cases where contracts were awarded directly to Iraqi
firms, "it was more efficient and cheaper. And it has energized the economy
because it puts the Iraqis to work." It turns out that funding Iraqis to rebuild
their own country is more efficient than hiring lumbering multinationals
who don't know the country or the language, surround themselves with
$900-a-day mercenaries and spend as much as 5 5 percent of their contract
37

budgets on overhead. Jon C. Bowersox, who worked as the health adviser at
the U.S. embassy in Baghdad, offered this radical observation: the problem
with Iraq's reconstruction, he said, was its desire to build everything from
scratch. "We could have gone in and done low-cost rehabs, and not tried to
transform their health-care system in two years."

38

An even more dramatic about-face came from the Pentagon. In Decem­
ber 2006, it announced a new project to get Iraq's state-owned factories up
and running—the same ones that Bremer had refused to supply with emer­
gency generators because they were Stalinist throwbacks. Now the Pentagon
realized that instead of buying cement and machine parts from Jordan and
Kuwait, it could be purchasing them from languishing Iraqi factories, put­
ting tens of thousands to work and sending revenue to surrounding commu­
nities. Paul Brinkley, U.S. deputy undersecretary of defense for business
transformation in Iraq, said, "We've looked at some of these factories more
closely and found they aren't quite the rundown Soviet-era enterprises we
thought they were"—though he did admit that some of his colleagues had
begun calling him a Stalinist.

39

Army Lieutenant General Peter W. Chiarelli, the top U.S. field com­
mander in Iraq, explained that "we need to put the angry young men to
work. . . . A relatively small decrease in unemployment would have a very
serious effect on the level of sectarian killing going on." He couldn't help
adding, "I find it unbelievable after four years that we haven't come to that
realization. . . . To me, it's huge. It's as important as just about any other part
of the campaign plan."

40

Do these about-faces signal the death of disaster capitalism? Hardly. By
the time U.S. officials came to the realization that they didn't need to re­
build a shiny new country from scratch, that it was more important to pro­
vide Iraqis with jobs and for their industry to share in the billions raised for

376

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

reconstruction, the money that would have financed such an undertaking
had already been spent.
Meanwhile, in the midst of the wave of neo-Keynesian epiphanies, Iraq
was hit with the boldest attempt at crisis exploitation yet. In December 2006,
the bipartisan Iraq Study Group fronted by James Baker issued its longawaited report. It called for the U.S. to "assist Iraqi leaders to reorganize the
national oil industry as a commercial enterprise" and to "encourage invest­
ment in Iraq's oil sector by the international community and by international
energy companies."

41

Most of the Iraq Study Group's recommendations were ignored by the
White House, but not this one: the Bush administration immediately pushed
ahead by helping to draft a radical new oil law for Iraq, which would allow
companies like Shell and BP to sign thirty-year contracts in which they
could keep a large share of Iraq's oil profits, amounting to tens or even hun­
dreds of billions of dollars—unheard of in countries with as much easily ac­
cessible oil as Iraq, and a sentence to perpetual poverty in a country where
42

95 percent of government revenues come from oil. This was a proposal so
wildly unpopular that even Paul Bremer had not dared make it in the first
year of occupation. Yet it was coming up now, thanks to deepening chaos.
Explaining why it was justified for such a large percentage of the profits to
leave Iraq, the oil companies cited the security risks. In other words, it was
the disaster that made the radical proposed law possible.
Washington's timing was extremely revealing. At the point when the law
was pushed forward, Iraq was facing its most profound crisis to date: the
country was being torn apart by sectarian conflict with an average of one
thousand Iraqis killed every week. Saddam Hussein had just been put to
death in a depraved and provocative episode. Simultaneously, Bush was un­
leashing his "surge" of troops in Iraq, operating with "less restricted" rules of
engagement. Iraq in this period was far too volatile for the oil giants to make
major investments, so there was no pressing need for a new law—except to
use the chaos to bypass a public debate on the most contentious issue facing
the country. Many elected Iraqi legislators said they had no idea that a new
law was even being drafted, and had certainly not been included in shaping
its outcome. Greg Muttitt, a researcher with the oil-watch group Platform,
reported. "I was recently at a meeting of Iraqi MPs and asked them how
many of them had seen the law. Out of 20, only one MP had seen it." Ac­
cording to Muttitt, if the law was passed, Iraqis "would lose out massively be­
cause they don't have the capacity at the moment to strike a good deal."

43

FULL CIRCLE

377

Iraq's main labor unions declared that "the privatization of oil is a red line
that may not be crossed" and, in a joint statement, condemned the law as an
attempt to seize Iraq's "energy resources at a time when the Iraqi people are
seeking to determine their own future while still under conditions of occupa­
44

tion." The law that was finally adopted by Iraq's cabinet in February 2007
was even worse than anticipated: it placed no limits on the amount of profits
that foreign companies can take from the country and made no specific re­
quirements about how much or how little foreign investors would partner with
Iraqi companies or hire Iraqis to work in the oil fields. Most brazenly, it ex­
cluded Iraq's elected parliamentarians from having any say in the terms for
future oil contracts. Instead, it created a new body, the Federal Oil and Gas
Council, which, according to The New York Times, would be advised by "a
panel of oil experts from inside and outside Iraq." This unelected body, ad­
vised by unspecified foreigners, would have ultimate decision-making power
on all oil matters, with the full authority to decide which contracts Iraq did
and did not sign. In effect, the law called for Iraq's publicly owned oil reserves,
the country's main source of revenues, to be exempted from democratic con­
trol and run instead by a powerful, wealthy oil dictatorship, which would ex­
ist alongside Iraq's broken and ineffective government.

45

It's hard to overstate the disgrace of this attempted resource grab. Iraq's oil
profits are the country's only hope of financing its own reconstruction when
some semblance of peace returns. To lay claim to that future wealth in a mo­
ment of national disintegration was disaster capitalism at its most shameless.
There was another, little discussed, consequence of the chaos in Iraq: the
longer it wore on, the more privatized the foreign presence became, ulti­
mately forging a new paradigm for the way wars are fought and how human
catastrophes are responded to.
This is where the ideology of radical privatization at the heart of the
anti-Marshall Plan paid off handsomely. The Bush administration's stead­
fast refusal to staff the war in Iraq—whether with troops or with civilian
administrators under its control—had some very clear benefits for its other
war, the one to outsource the U.S. government. This crusade, while it ceased
to be the subject of the administration's public rhetoric, has remained a driv­
ing obsession behind the scenes, and it has been far more successful than all
the administration's more public battles combined.
Because Rumsfeld designed the war as a just-in-time invasion, with sol­
diers there to provide only core combat functions, and because he eliminated

378

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

fifty-five thousand jobs in the Department of Defense and the Department of
Veterans Affairs in the first year of the Iraq deployment, the private sector was
46

left to fill in the gaps at every level. In practice, what this configuration
meant was that, as Iraq spiraled into turmoil, an ever more elaborate priva­
tized war industry took shape to prop up the bare-bones army—whether on
the ground in Iraq or back home treating soldiers at the Walter Reed Med­
ical Center.
Since Rumsfeld steadfastly rejected all solutions that required increasing
the size of the army, the military had to find ways to get more soldiers into
combat roles. Private security companies flooded into Iraq to perform func­
tions that had previously been done by soldiers—providing security for top
officials, guarding bases, escorting other contractors. Once they were there,
their roles expanded further in response to the chaos. Blackwater's original
contract in Iraq was to provide private security for Bremer, but a year into the
occupation, it was engaging in all-out street combat. During the April 2004
uprising of Moqtada al-Sadr's movement in Najaf, Blackwater actually as­
sumed command over active-duty U.S. marines in a daylong battle with the
Mahdi Army, during which dozens of Iraqis were killed.

47

At the start of the occupation, there were an estimated ten thousand pri­
vate soldiers in Iraq, already far more than during the first Gulf War. Three
years later, a report by the U.S. Government Accountability Office found
that there were forty-eight thousand private soldiers, from around the world,
deployed in Iraq. Mercenaries represented the largest contingent of soldiers
after the U.S. military—more than all the other members of the "Coalition
of the Willing" combined. The "Baghdad boom," as it was called in the fi­
nancial press, took what was a frowned-upon, shadowy sector and fully in­
corporated it into the U.S. and U.K. war-fighting machines. Blackwater
hired aggressive Washington lobbyists to erase the word "mercenary" from
the public vocabulary and turn its company into an all-American brand. Ac­
cording to its C E O , Erik Prince, "This goes back to our corporate mantra:
We're trying to do for the national security apparatus what FedEx did for the
postal service."

48

When the war moved inside the jails, the military was so short on trained
interrogators and Arabic translators that it couldn't get information out of its
new prisoners. Desperate for more interrogators and translators, it turned to
the defense contractor CACI International Inc. In its original contract,
CACI's role in Iraq was to provide information technology services to the mil­
itary, but the wording of the work order was vague enough that "information

FULL CIRCLE

379

49

technology" could be stretched to mean interrogation. The flexibility was in­
tentional: CACI is part of a new breed of contractor that acts as a temp
agency for the federal government—it has ongoing, loosely worded contracts
and keeps large numbers of potential workers on call, ready to fill whatever
positions come up. Calling CACI, whose workers did not need to meet the
rigorous training and security clearances required of government employees,
was as easy as ordering new office supplies; dozens of new interrogators ar­
rived in a flash.*
The corporation that gained most from the chaos was Halliburton. Before
the invasion, it had been awarded a contract to put out oil fires set by Sad­
dam's retreating armies. When those fires did not materialize, Halliburton's
contract was stretched to include a new function: providing fuel for the en­
tire nation, a job so big that "it bought up every available tanker truck in
50

Kuwait, and imported hundreds more." In the name of freeing up soldiers
for the battlefield, Halliburton took on dozens more of the army's traditional
functions, including maintaining army vehicles and radios.
Even recruiting, long since seen as the job of soldiers, rapidly became a
for-profit business as the war wore on. By 2006, new soldiers were being re­
cruited by private head-hunting firms such as Serco or a division of the
weapons giant L-3 Communications. The private recruiters, many of whom
had never sewed in the military, were paid bonuses every time they signed up
a soldier, so, one company spokesperson bragged, "If you want to eat steak,
51

you have to put people in the army." Rumsfeld's reign also fueled a boom
in outsourced training: companies such as Cubic Defense Applications and
Blackwater ran soldiers through live combat training and war games, bring­
ing them to privately owned training facilities, where they practiced houseto-house combat in simulated villages.
And thanks to Rumsfeld's privatization obsession, as he first suggested in his
speech on September 10, 2001, when soldiers came home sick or suffering
from posttraumatic stress, they were treated by private health care companies
* The catch is that the contractors were operating with little supervision. A s the U.S. military's
own investigation into the Abu Ghraib scandal concluded, the government officials in charge
of overseeing the interrogators' performance were not even in Iraq, let alone in Abu Ghraib,
making it "very difficult, if not impossible, to effectively administer a contract." Army General
George Fay, author of the report, concluded that the government's "interrogators, analysts,
and leaders were unprepared for the arrival of contract interrogators and had no training to
fall back on in the management, control, and discipline of these personnel. . . . It is apparent
that there was no credible exercise of appropriate oversight of contract performance at Abu
Ghraib."

380

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

for whom the trauma-heavy war in Iraq generated windfall profits. One of
these companies, Health Net, became the seventh-strongest performer in the
Fortune 500 in 2005, owing largely to the number of traumatized soldiers re­
turning from Iraq. Another was IAP Worldwide Services Inc., which won the
contract to take over many of the services at the military hospital Walter
Reed. The move to privatize the running of the medical center allegedly
contributed to a shocking deterioration in maintenance and care, as more
than a hundred skilled federal employees left the facility.

52

The greatly expanded role of private companies was never openly debated
as a question of policy (much in the way Iraq's proposed oil law suddenly ma­
terialized). Rumsfeld did not have to engage in pitched battles with federal
employees' unions or high-ranking generals. Instead, it all just happened on
the fly in the field, in what the military describes as mission creep. The
longer the war wore on, the more it became a privatized war, and soon
enough, this was simply the new way of war. Crisis was the enabler of the
boom, just as it had been for so many before.
The numbers tell the dramatic story of corporate mission creep. During
the first Gulf War in 1991, there was one contractor for every hundred sol­
diers. At the start of the 2003 Iraq invasion, the ratio had jumped to one con­
tractor for every ten soldiers. Three years into the U.S. occupation, the ratio
had reached one to three. Less than a year later, with the occupation ap­
proaching its fourth year, there was one contractor for every 1.4 U.S. soldiers.
But that figure includes only contractors working directly for the U.S. gov­
ernment, not for other coalition partners or the Iraqi government, and it
doesn't account for the contractors based in Kuwait and Jordan who had
farmed out their jobs to subcontractors.

53

British soldiers in Iraq are already far outnumbered by their countrymen
working for private security firms at a ratio of three to one. When Tony Blair
announced in February 2007 that he was pulling sixteen hundred soldiers
out of Iraq, the press reported instantly that "civil servants hope 'mercenar­
ies' can help fill the gap left behind," with the companies paid directly by the
British government. At the same time, the Associated Press put the number
of contractors in Iraq at 120,000, almost equivalent to the number of U.S.
54

troops. In scale, this kind of privatized warfare has already overshadowed
the United Nations. The UN's budget for peacekeeping in 2006-2007 was
$5.25 billion—that's less than a quarter of the $20 billion Halliburton got in
Iraq contracts, and the latest estimates are that the mercenary industry alone
is worth $4 billion.

55

FULL CIRCLE

381

So while the reconstruction of Iraq was certainly a failure for Iraqis and
for U.S. taxpayers, it has been anything but for the disaster capitalism com­
plex. Made possible by the September 11 attacks, the war in Iraq represented
nothing less than the violent birth of a new economy. This was the genius of
Rumsfeld's "transformation" plan: since every possible aspect of both de­
struction and reconstruction has been outsourced and privatized, there's an
economic boom when the bombs start falling, when they stop and when they
start up again —a closed profit-loop of destruction and reconstruction, of
tearing down and building up. For companies that are clever and farsighted,
like Halliburton and the Carlyle Group, the destroyers and rebuilders are
different divisions of the same corporations.*

56

The Bush administration has taken several important and little-examined
measures to institutionalize the privatized warfare model forged in Iraq, mak­
ing it a permanent fixture of foreign policy. In July 2006, Bowen, the inspec­
tor general for Iraq reconstruction, issued a report on "lessons learned" from
the various contractor debacles. It concluded that the problems stemmed
from insufficient planning and called for the creation of "a déployable reserve
corps of contracting personnel who are trained to execute rapid relief and re­
construction contracting during contingency operations" and to "pre-qualify
a diverse pool of contractors with expertise in specialized reconstruction
areas"—in other words, a standing contractor army. In his 2007 State of the
Union address, Bush championed the idea, announcing the creation of a
brand-new civilian reserve corps. "Such a corps would function much like
our military reserve. It would ease the burden on the Armed Forces by allow­
ing us to hire civilians with critical skills to serve on missions abroad when
America needs them," he said. "It would give people across America who do
not wear the uniform a chance to serve in the defining struggle of our time."

57

A year and half into the Iraq occupation, the U.S. State Department
launched a new branch: the Office of Reconstruction and Stabilization. On
any given day, it is paying private contractors to draw up detailed plans to re­
construct twenty-five different countries that may, for one reason or another,

* Lockheed Martin has gone furthest in this direction. In early 2007, it began "buying compa­
nies in the $1,000bn-a-year healthcare market," according to The Financial Times, and it also
snapped up the engineering giant Pacific Architects and Engineers. The wave of acquisitions
signified a new era of morbid vertical integration in the disaster capitalism complex: in fu­
ture conflicts, Lockheed is poised to profit not only from making the weapons and fighter jets
but from rebuilding what they destroy, and even from the treating the people injured by its
own weapons.

382

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

find themselves the target of U.S.-sponsored destruction, from Venezuela to
Iran. Corporations and consultants are lined up on "presigned contracts" so
58

that they are ready to leap into action as soon as disaster strikes. For the
Bush administration, it was a natural evolution: after claiming it had a right
to cause unlimited preemptive destruction, it then pioneered preemptive
reconstruction —rebuilding places that have not yet been destroyed.
So in the end, the war in Iraq did create a model economy—it was just
not the Tiger on the Tigris that the neocons had advertised. Instead, it was a
model for privatized war and reconstruction—a model that quickly became
export-ready. Until Iraq, the frontiers of the Chicago crusade had been
bound by geography: Russia, Argentina, South Korea. Now a new frontier
can open up wherever the next disaster strikes.

PART 7

THE MOVABLE
GREEN ZONE
BUFFER ZONES AND BLAST

WALLS

Because you are able to start new, you can start funda­
mentally at the leading edge, which is a very good
thing. It is a privilege for you to have that opportunity,
because there are other places that haven't had such
systems or are burdened with systems that are a
hundred or two hundred years old. In a way, this is an
advantage for Afghanistan to start anew with the best
ideas and the best technical knowledge.
—Paul O'Neill, U.S. Treasury secretary, November 2002,
in postinvasion Kabul

CHAPTER

19

BLANKING THE BEACH
"THE S E C O N D T S U N A M I "

The t s u n a m i that cleared the shoreline like a giant bulldozer h a s
presented developers with an u n d r e a m e d - o f opportunity, a n d
they have moved quickly to seize it.
— S e t h M y d a n s , International Herald Tribune, M a r c h 10, 2 0 0 5

1

I went to the beach at sunrise, hoping to meet some fishing people before
they went out on the turquoise waters for the day. It was July 2005 and the
beach was almost deserted, but there was a small cluster of hand-painted
wooden catamarans, and beside one of them a small family was getting
ready to go to sea. Roger, forty years old and sitting shirtless in his sarong on
the sand, was repairing a tangled red net with his twenty-year-old son, Ivan.
Jenita, Roger's wife, was circling the boat, waving a small tin of smoldering
incense. "Asking for luck," she explained of the ritual, "and safety."
Not so long ago, this beach and dozens like it up and down Sri Lanka's
coast had been the site of a frantic rescue mission after the most devastating
natural disaster in recent memory—the December 26, 2004, tsunami, which
took the lives of 250,000 people and left 2.5 million people homeless
2

throughout the region. I had come to Sri Lanka, one of the hardest-hit
countries, six months later to see how the reconstruction efforts here com­
pared with those in Iraq.
My travel companion, Kumari, an activist from Colombo, had been a
part of the rescue and rehabilitation effort and had agreed to act as guide and
translator through the tsunami-struck region. Our trip began in Arugam Bay,
a fishing and faded resort village on the east coast of the island, which was

386

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

being held up by the government's reconstruction team as the showcase for
its plans to "build back better."
That's where we met Roger, who gave us, after only a few minutes, a very
different version. He called it "a plan to drive the fishing people from the
beach." He claimed that this mass eviction plan long predated the giant
wave, but the tsunami, like so many other disasters, was being harnessed to
push through a deeply unpopular agenda. For fifteen years, Roger told us,
his family had spent fishing season in a thatched hut on the beach in
Arugam Bay, near where we were sitting. Along with dozens of other fishing
families, they had kept their boats beside their huts and dried their catch on
banana leaves in the fine white sand. They mingled easily with tourists, most
of whom were Australian and European surfers staying in hostels along the
beach, the kind of place with ratty hammocks out front and London club
music playing on speakers lodged in palm trees. The restaurants bought fish
straight off the boats, and the fishing people, with their colorful traditional
lifestyles, provided just the splash of authenticity most rugged travelers were
looking for.
For a long time, there was no particular conflict between the hotels and
the fishing people in Arugum Bay, in part because the ongoing civil war in
Sri Lanka ensured that neither industry could grow beyond a small scale.
The east coast of Sri Lanka saw some of the worst of the fighting as it was
claimed by both sides—the Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam (known as the
Tamil Tigers) in the North, and the Sinhalese central government in
Colombo—but was never fully controlled by either. Reaching Arugam Bay
required navigating a maze of checkpoints and running the risk of getting
caught in a shootout or a suicide bombing (the Tamil Tigers are credited
with having invented the exploding suicide belt). All the guidebooks con­
tained stern warnings about steering clear of Sri Lanka's volatile east coast;
the wave breaks were notoriously good, but only worth the trouble for the se­
riously hard core.
The

breakthrough came in February 2002, when Colombo and the

Tigers signed a cease-fire agreement. It wasn't exactly peace but more like a
taut pause in the action, one punctured by the occasional bombing or assas­
sination. Despite this precarious state, as soon as the roads were opened, the
guidebooks began pumping up the east coast as the next Phuket: great surf­
ing, beautiful beaches, funky hotels, spicy food, full-moon r a v e s . . . "a hot
3

party spot," according to Lonely Planet.

And Arugam Bay was the center of

the action. At the same time, the opening of checkpoints meant that fishing

B L A N K I N G THE BEACH

387

people from around the country could return in large numbers to some of
the most plentiful waters along the eastern coast, including Arugam Bay.
The beach was getting crowded. Arugam Bay was zoned as a fishing port,
but local hotel owners began complaining that the huts blocked their views,
that the fragrance of drying fish turned off their customers (one hotelier, a
Dutch expat, told me that "there is such a thing as smell pollution"). Some of
the hoteliers started lobbying the local government to relocate the boats and
fishing huts to a different bay, one less popular with foreigners. The villagers
pushed back, pointing out that they had been living on these lands for gener­
ations, and that Arugam Bay was more than a boat launch —it was fresh water
and electricity, schools for their children and buyers for their catch.
These tensions threatened to explode six months before the tsunami hit,
when there was a mysterious fire on the beach in the middle of the night.
Twenty-four fishing huts were reduced to ash. Roger and his family, he told
me, "lost everything, our belongings, our nets and ropes." Kumari and I
spoke with many fishing people in Arugam Bay, and all insisted that the fire
was arson. They blamed the hotel owners, who obviously wanted the beach
to themselves.
But if the fire really was a bid to scare off the fishing people, it didn't work;
the villagers became more determined than ever to stay, and the people who
lost their huts quickly rebuilt.
When the tsunami came, it did what the fire couldn't: it cleared the beach
completely. Every single fragile structure was washed away—every boat,
every fishing hut, as well as every tourist cabana and bungalow. In a commu­
nity of only 4,000, about 350 were killed, most of them people like Roger,
4

Ivan and Jenita, who make their living from the sea. And yet, underneath
the rubble and the carnage was what the tourism industry had been angling
for all along—a pristine beach, scrubbed clean of all the messy signs of peo­
ple working, a vacation Eden. It was the same up and down the coast: once
the rubble was cleared away, what was left was. . . paradise.
When the emergency subsided and fishing families returned to the spots
where their homes once stood, they were greeted by police who forbade
them to rebuild. "New rules," they were told —no homes on the beach, and
everything had to be at least two hundred meters back from the high-water
mark. Most would have accepted building farther from the water, but there
was no available land there, leaving the fishing people with nowhere to go.
And the new "buffer zone" was being imposed not only in Arugam Bay but
along the entire east coast. The beaches were off-limits.

388

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

The tsunami killed approximately thirty-five thousand Sri Lankans and
displaced nearly a million. Small-boat fishing people like Roger made up 80
percent of the victims; in some areas the number was closer to 98 percent. In
order to receive food rations and small relief allowances, hundreds of thou­
sands of people moved away from the beach and into temporary camps in­
land, many of them long, grim barracks made of tin sheet that trapped the
heat so unbearably that many abandoned them to sleep outside. As time
dragged on, the camps became dirty and disease ridden and were patrolled
by menacing, machine-gun-wielding soldiers.
Officially, the government said the buffer zone was a safety measure,
meant to prevent a repeat of the devastation should another tsunami strike.
On the surface it made sense, but there was a glaring problem with that
rationale —it was not being applied to the tourism industry. On the contrary,
hotels were being encouraged to expand onto the valuable oceanfront where
fishing people had lived and worked. Resorts were completely exempted
from the buffer-zone rule—as long as they classified their construction, no
matter how elaborate or close to the water, as "repair," they were free and
clear. So all along the beach in Arugam Bay, construction workers ham­
mered and drilled. "Don't tourists have to fear a tsunami?" Roger wanted to
know.
To him and his colleagues, the buffer zone looked like little more than an
excuse for the government to do what it had wanted to do before the wave:
clear the beach of fishing people. The catch they used to pull from the wa­
ters had been enough to sustain their families, but it did not contribute to
economic growth as measured by institutions like the World Bank, and the
land where their huts once stood could clearly be put to more profitable use.
Shortly before I arrived, a document called the "Arugam Bay Resource De­
velopment Plan" was leaked to the press, and it confirmed the fishing com­
munity's worst fears. The federal government had commissioned a team of
international consultants to develop a reconstruction blueprint for Arugam
Bay, and this plan was the result. Even though it had been only the beach­
front properties that were damaged by the tsunami, with most of the town
still standing, it called for Arugam Bay to be leveled and rebuilt, transformed
from a hippie-charming seaside town into a high-end "boutique tourism
destination"—five-star resorts, luxury $300-a-night ecotourism chalets, a
floatplane pier and a helipad. The report enthused that Arugam Bay was to
serve as a model for up to thirty new nearby "tourism zones," turning the pre­
viously war-torn east coast of Sri Lanka into a South Asian Riviera.

5

B L A N K I N G THE BEACH

389

Missing from all the artists' impressions and blueprints were the victims
of the tsunami—the hundreds of fishing families who used to live and work
on the beach. The report explained that villagers would be moved to more
suitable locations, some several kilometers away and far from the ocean.
Making matters worse, the $80 million redevelopment project was to be fi­
nanced with aid money raised in the name of the victims of the tsunami.
It was the weeping faces of these fishing families and others like them in
Thailand and Indonesia that had triggered the historic outpouring of interna­
tional generosity after the tsunami —it had been their relatives piled up in
mosques, their wailing mothers trying to identify a drowned baby, their chil­
dren swept to sea. Yet for communities like Arugam Bay, the "reconstruction"
meant nothing less than the deliberate destruction of their culture and way of
life and the theft of their land. As Kumari said, the entire reconstruction pro­
cess would result in "victimizing the victims, exploiting the exploited."
When the plan got out, it sparked outrage across the country, and nowhere
more than in Arugam Bay. As soon as we arrived in town, Kumari and I stum­
bled into a crowd of several hundred demonstrators dressed in a kaleidoscopic
mix of saris, sarongs, hijabs and flip-flops. They were gathered on the beach
and were just beginning a march that would pass in front of the hotels, then
on to the neighboring town of Pottuvil, home of the local government.
As they marched past the hotels, a young man in a white T-shirt with a red
megaphone led the demonstrators in a call-and-response. "We don't want,
we don't want. . ." he called out, and the crowd shouted back, "Tourist ho­
tels!" Then he shouted, "Whites. . ." and they cried, "Get out!" (Kumari
translated from Tamil with apologies.) Another young man, skin toughened
by the sun and the ocean, took over megaphone duties and yelled, "We do
want, we do want. . ." and the answers came flying: "Our land back!" "Our
homes back!" "A fishing port!" "Our aid money!" "Famine, famine!" he
shouted, and the crowd replied, "Fisher people are facing famine!"
Outside the gates of the district government, leaders of the march accused
their elected representatives of abandonment, of corruption, of spending aid
money meant for the fishing people "on dowries for their daughters and jew­
elry for their wives." They spoke of special favors handed out to the Sin­
halese, of discrimination against Muslims, of the "foreigners profiting from
our misery."
It seemed unlikely that their chants would have much effect. In Colombo
I spoke with the director general of the Sri Lankan Tourist Board, Seenivasagam Kalaiselvam, a middle-aged bureaucrat with a bad habit of quoting

390

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

from his country's multimillion-dollar "brand personality profile." I asked
him what would become of the fishing people in places like Arugam Bay.
He leaned back in a rattan chair and explained. "In the past, in the coastal
belt, there were a lot of unauthorized establishments. . . not constructed ac­
cording to the tourism plan. With the tsunami, the good thing that hap­
pened to tourism is that most of these unauthorized establishments [have
been] affected by the tsunami, and the buildings are no longer there." If fish­
ing people come back and rebuilt, he explained, "We again will be forced to
demolish. . . . The beach will be clean."
It hadn't started this way. When Kumari first came to the east coast in the
days after the tsunami, none of the official aid had arrived yet. That meant
everyone was a relief worker, a medic, a gravedigger. The ethnic barriers that
had divided this region suddenly melted away. "The Muslim side was run­
ning to the Tamil side to bury the dead," she recalled, "and Tamil people
were running to the Muslim side to eat and drink. People from the interior of
the country were sending two lunch parcels each day from each house,
which was a lot because they are very poor. It was not to get anything back; it
was just the feeling 1 have to support my neighbor; we have to support the
sisters, the brothers, the daughters, the mothers.' Just that."
Similar cross-cultural aid was breaking out across the country. Tamil
teenagers drove their tractors from the farms to help find bodies. Christian
children donated their school uniforms to be turned into white Muslim fu­
neral shrouds, while Hindu women gave their white saris. It was as if this in­
vasion of salt water and rubble was so humblingly powerful that, in addition
to grinding up homes and buckling highways, it also scrubbed away in­
tractable hatreds, blood feuds and the tally of who last killed whom. For Ku­
mari, who had done years of frustrating work with peace groups trying to
bridge the divides, it was overwhelming to see such tragedy met with such
decency. Instead of endlessly talking about peace, Sri Lankans, in their mo­
ment of greatest stress, were actually living it.
It also seemed that the country could count on international support for its
recovery efforts. At first, the help wasn't coming from governments, which
were slow to respond, but from individuals who saw the disaster on TV:
schoolchildren in Europe held bake sales and bottle drives, musicians orga­
nized star-studded concerts, religious groups collected clothes, blankets and
money. Citizens then demanded that their governments match their generos­
ity with official aid. In six months, $13 billion was raised—a world record.

6

B L A N K I N G THE BEACH

391

In the first months, much of the reconstruction money reached its in­
tended recipients: NGOs and aid agencies brought emergency food and wa­
ter, tents and temporary lean-tos; rich countries sent medical teams and
supplies. The camps were built as a stopgap, to give people a roof while per­
manent homes were constructed. There was certainly enough money to get
those homes built. But when I was in Sri Lanka six months later, progress
had all but stopped; there were almost no permanent homes, and the tem­
porary camps were starting to look less like emergency shelters and more like
entrenched shantytowns.
Aid workers complained that the Sri Lankan government was putting up
roadblocks at every turn—first declaring the buffer zone, then refusing to pro­
vide alternative land to build on, then commissioning an endless series of stud­
ies and master plans from outside experts. As the bureaucrats argued, survivors
of the tsunami waited in the sweltering inland camps, living off rations, too far
from the ocean to begin fishing again. While the delays were often blamed on
"red tape" and poor management, there was in fact far more at stake.

Before the Wave: Foiled Plans
The grand plan to remake Sri Lanka predated the tsunami by two years. It
began when the civil war ended and the usual players descended on the
country to plot Sri Lanka's entry into the world economy—most promi­
nently USAID, the World Bank and its offshoot the Asian Development
Bank. A consensus emerged that Sri Lanka's most significant competitive ad­
vantage lay in the fact that it was one of last places left uncolonized by go-go
globalization, a by-product of its long war. For such a small country, Sri
Lanka still had a remarkable amount of surviving wildlife—leopards, mon­
keys, thousands of wild elephants. Its beaches were strangers to high-rises,
and its mountains were dotted with Hindu, Buddhist and Muslim temples
and holy sites. Best of all, raved USAID, it was "all contained in a space the
size of West Virginia."

7

Under the plan, Sri Lanka's jungles, which provided such effective cover
for guerrilla fighters, would be opened up to adventure ecotourists, who would
ride the elephants and swing like Tarzan through the canopies the way they do
in Costa Rica. Its religions, accomplices in so much bloodshed, would be
retrofitted to nourish the spiritual needs of Western visitors—Buddhist monks
could run meditation centers, Hindu women could perform colorful dances at
hotels, Ayurvedic medical clinics could soothe aches and pains.

392

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

In short, the rest of Asia could keep the sweatshops, call centers and fre­
netic stock markets; Sri Lanka would be there waiting when the captains of
those industries needed a place to rest up. Precisely because of the enor­
mous wealth created in the other outposts of deregulated capitalism, money
would be no object when it came to enjoying the perfectly calibrated com­
bination of luxury and wilderness, adventure and attentive service. Sri
Lanka's future, the foreign consultants were convinced, rested with chains
like Aman Resorts, which has recently opened two stunning properties on
the southern coast, with rooms going for $800 a night and plunge pools in
every suite.
The U.S. government was so enthusiastic about Sri Lanka's potential as a
high-end tourism destination, with all the possibilities for resort chains and
tour operators, that USAID launched a program to organize the Sri Lankan
tourism industry into a powerful Washington-style lobby group. It takes
credit for increasing the budget for tourism promotion "from less than
8

$500,000 a year up to approximately $10 million a year." The U.S. embassy,
meanwhile, launched the Competitiveness Program, an outpost mandated
to advance U.S. economic interests in the country. The program's director,
a graying economist named John Varley, told me that he thought the Sri
Lanka Tourist Board was thinking small when it talked about attracting a
million tourists a year by the end of the decade. "Personally, I think they
could double that." Peter Harrold, an Englishman who directs the World
Bank operation in Sri Lanka, told me, "I've always thought of Bali as the per­
fect comparator."
There is no question that high-end tourism is a bankable growth market.
The overall revenues for luxury hotels, where rooms cost an average of $405 a
night, went up a rather striking 70 percent between 2001 and 2005 —not bad
for a period that included the post-September 11 slump, the war in Iraq and
spiraling fuel costs. In many ways, the phenomenal growth of the sector is a
by-product of the extreme inequality that resulted from the generalized tri­
umph of Chicago School economics. Regardless of the overall state of the
economy, there is now a large enough elite made up of new multi-millionaires
and billionaires for Wall Street to see the group as "superconsumers," able to
carry consumer demand all on their own. Ajay Kapur, the former head of Cit­
igroup Smith Barney's global equity strategy group in New York, encourages
his clients to invest in his "Plutonomy basket" of stocks, featuring companies
like Bulgari, Porsche, Four Seasons and Sotheby's. "If plutonomy continues,

BLANKING THE BEACH

393

which we think it will, if income inequality is allowed to persist and widen,
the plutonomy basket should continue to do very well."

9

But before Sri Lanka could fulfill its destiny as a playground for the pluton­
omy set, there were a few areas that needed some drastic improvements—fast.
First off, to attract top-notch resorts, the government had to drop the barriers to
private land ownership (roughly 80 percent of Sri Lanka's land was owned by
10

the state). It needed more "flexible" labor laws under which investors would
staff their resorts. And it needed to modernize its infrastructure—highways,
swank airports, better water and electricity systems. However, since Sri Lanka
had driven itself deep into debt buying weapons, the government could not
pay for all these rapid upgrades on its own. The usual deals were on offer: loans
from the World Bank and I M F in exchange for agreements to open the econ­
omy to privatization and "public-private partnerships."
All these plans and terms were neatly laid out in Regaining Sri Lanka, the
country's World Bank-approved shock therapy program finalized in early
2003. Its prime local advocate was a Sri Lankan politician/entrepreneur
named Mano Tittawella, a man who bears a striking resemblance to Newt
Gingrich, both physically and ideologically.

11

Like all such shock therapy plans, Regaining Sri Lanka demanded many
sacrifices in the name of kick-starting rapid economic growth. Millions of peo­
ple would have to leave traditional villages to free up the beaches for tourists
and the land for resorts and highways. What fishing remained would be dom­
inated by large industrial trawlers operating out of deep ports—not wooden
12

boats that launch from the beaches. And of course, as has been the case in
similar circumstances from Buenos Aires to Baghdad, there would be mass
layoffs at state companies, and the prices of services would have to go up.
The problem for the plan's advocates was that many Sri Lankans simply
didn't believe that the sacrifices would pay off. This was 2003, and the starryeyed faith in globalization had long since been extinguished, especially after
the horrors of the Asian economic crisis. The legacy of war also proved to be
an obstacle. Tens of thousands of Sri Lankans had lost their lives in the con­
flict in the name of "nation," "homeland" and "territory." Now, when peace
had finally arrived, the poorest among them were being asked to give up the
little plots of land and property they had —a vegetable garden, a simple
house, a boat—so that a Marriott or a Hilton could build a golf course (and
villagers could pursue careers as street hawkers in Colombo). It seemed like
a lousy deal, and Sri Lankans responded accordingly.

394

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

Regaining

Sri Lanka was rejected first through a wave of militant strikes

and street protests, then, decisively, at the polls. In April 2004, Sri Lankans
defied all the foreign experts and their local partners and voted in a coalition
of center-leftists and self-identified Marxists who vowed to scrap the entire
Regaining

Sri Lanka

plan.

13

At the time, many of the key privatization

schemes had not yet gone through, including water and electricity, and the
highway projects were being challenged in court. For those dreaming of
building a plutonomy playground, it was a major setback: 2004 was sup­
posed to have been Year One of the new investor-friendly, privatized Sri
Lanka; now all bets were off.
Eight months after those fateful elections, the tsunami hit. Among those
mourning the demise of Regaining Sri Lanka,

the significance of the event

was understood immediately. The newly elected government would need
billions from foreign creditors to reconstruct the homes, roads, schools and
railways destroyed in the storm—and those creditors knew well that when
faced with a devastating crisis, even the most committed economic national­
ists suddenly become flexible. As for the militant farmers and fishing people
who had blocked roadways and staged mass rallies to derail their previous at­
tempts to clear the land for development, well, Sri Lanka's villagers were
otherwise occupied at the moment.

After the Wave: A Second Chance
In Colombo, the national government moved instantly to prove to the
wealthy countries who control the aid dollars that it was ready to renounce
its past. President Chandrika Kumaratunga, elected on an overtly antiprivatization platform, claimed that the tsunami had been, for her, a kind of reli­
gious epiphany, helping her to see the free-market light. She traveled to the
storm-ravaged coast and, standing amid the rubble, announced, "We are a
country blessed with so many natural resources, and we have not made use
of them fully. . . . So nature itself must have thought 'enough is enough' and
14

whacked us from all sides and taught us a lesson to be together." It was a
novel interpretation—the tsunami as divine punishment for failing to sell off
Sri Lanka's beaches and forests.
The penance began immediately. Just four days after the wave hit, her
government pushed a bill through that paved the way for water privatization,
a plan citizens had been forcefully resisting for years. O f course now, with
the country still swamped with sea water and graves not yet dug, few even

B L A N K I N G THE BEACH

395

knew it had happened —much like the timing of Iraq's new oil law. The gov­
ernment also chose this moment of extreme hardship to make life even
harder by raising the price of gasoline —a move designed to send lenders an
unmistakable message about Colombo's fiscal responsibility. It also began
developing legislation to break up the national electricity company, with
plans to open it up to the private sector.

15

Herman Kumara, the head of Sri Lanka's National Fisheries Solidarity
Movement, which represents the small boats, referred to the reconstruc­
tion as "a second tsunami of corporate globalization." He saw it as a delib­
erate attempt to exploit his constituents when they were most injured and
weakened —as pillage follows war, so this second tsunami rushed in after
the first. "People were vehemently opposed to these policies in the past," he
told me. "But now they are starving in the camps, and they are just think­
ing about how to survive the next day—they don't have a place to sleep,
they don't have a place to be, they have lost their source of income, they
have no idea how they will feed themselves in the future. So it's in that sit­
uation that the government pushes ahead with this plan. When people re­
cover, they will find out what had been decided, but by then the damage
will already be done."
If the Washington lenders were able to move quickly to exploit the tsunami,
it was because they had done something remarkably similar before. The
dress rehearsal for posttsunami disaster capitalism took place in a littleexamined episode following Hurricane Mitch.
In October 1998, for an entire interminable week, Mitch had parked it­
self over Central America, lashing the coasts and mountains of Honduras,
Guatemala and Nicaragua, swallowing villages whole and killing more than
nine thousand people. The already impoverished countries could not dig
themselves out without generous foreign aid—and it came, but at a steep
price. In the two months after Mitch struck, with the country still knee-deep
in rubble, corpses and mud, the Honduran congress passed laws allowing
the privatization of airports, seaports and highways and fast-tracked plans to
privatize the state telephone company, the national electric company and
parts of the water sector. It overturned progressive land-reform laws, making
it far easier for foreigners to buy and sell property, and rammed through a
radically pro-business mining law (drafted by industry) that lowered environ­
mental standards and made it easier to evict people from homes that stood in
the way of new mines.

16

396

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

It was much the same in neighboring countries: in the same two months
post-Mitch, Guatemala announced plans to sell off its phone system, and
Nicaragua did likewise, along with its electric company and its petroleum
sector. According to The Wall Street Journal, "The World Bank and Interna­
tional Monetary Fund had thrown their weight behind the [telecom] sale,
making it a condition for release of roughly $47 million in aid annually over
three years and linking it to about $4.4 billion in foreign-debt relief for
17

Nicaragua." Phone privatization had nothing to do with hurricane recon­
struction, of course, except inside the logic of the disaster capitalists at Wash­
ington's financial institutions.
Over the next few years, the sales went through, often at prices far below
market value. The buyers, for the most part, were former state-owned compa­
nies from other countries that had been privatized themselves and were now
scouring the globe for new purchases that would increase their share prices.
Telmex, Mexico's privatized phone company, snapped up Guatemala's
telecom company; the Spanish energy company Union Fenosa bought up
Nicaragua's energy companies; San Francisco International Airport, now a
private company, bought all four Honduran airports. And Nicaragua sold
off 40 percent of its telephone company for only $33 million, when
18

PricewaterhouseCoopers had estimated the value at $80 million. "De­
struction carries with it an opportunity for foreign investment," announced
Guatemala's foreign minister on a trip to the World Economic Forum in
Davos in 1 9 9 9 .

19

By the time the tsunami hit, Washington was ready to take the Mitch model
to the next level—aiming not just at individual new laws but at direct corpo­
rate control over the reconstruction. Any country hit by a disaster on the
scale of the 2004 tsunami needs a comprehensive plan for reconstruction,
one that will make the wisest use of the influx of foreign aid and ensure that
the funds reach their intended recipients. But Sri Lanka's president, under
pressure from Washington lenders, decided that the planning could not be
entrusted to her government's elected politicians. Instead, just one week after
the tsunami leveled the coasts, she created a brand-new body called the Task
Force to Rebuild the Nation. This group, and not Sri Lanka's Parliament,
would have full power to develop and implement a master plan for a new Sri
Lanka. The task force was made up of the country's most powerful business
executives from banking and industry. And not just any industry—five of the
ten members of the task force had direct holdings in the beach tourism sector,

BLANKING THE BEACH

397

20

representing some of the largest resorts in the country. There was no one
from the fishing or farming sectors on the task force, not a single environ­
mental expert or scientist or even a disaster-reconstruction specialist. The
chair was Mano Tittawella, the former privatization czar. "This is an oppor­
tunity to build a model nation," he declared.

21

The creation of the task force represented a new kind of corporate coup
d'état, one achieved through the force of a natural disaster. As in so many
other countries, in Sri Lanka, Chicago School policies had been blocked by
the normal rules of democracy; the 2004 elections proved that. But with the
country's citizens pulling together to meet a national emergency, and politi­
cians desperate to unlock aid money, the express wishes of voters could
be summarily brushed aside and replaced with direct unelected rule by
industry—a first for disaster capitalism.
Somehow, in only ten days, and without leaving the capital, the business
leaders on the task force were able to draft a complete national reconstruc­
tion blueprint, from housing to highways. It was this plan that called for the
buffer zones and that kindly exempted hotels. The task force also redirected
the aid money to the superhighways and industrial fishing ports that had met
so much resistance before the catastrophe. "We see this economic agenda as
a bigger disaster than the tsunami, which is why we had been fighting so
hard to prevent it before and why we defeated it in the last elections," Sarath
Fernando, a Sri Lankan land-rights activist told me. "But now, just three
weeks after the tsunami, they give us the same plan. It's obvious that they had
it all ready to go before."*
Washington backed up the task force with the kind of reconstruction aid
that was by now familiar from Iraq: megacontracts to its own companies.
CH2M Hill, the engineering and construction giant from Colorado, had
been awarded $28.5 million to oversee other major contractors in Iraq. De­
spite its central role in the Baghdad reconstruction debacle, it was given an
additional $33 million contract in Sri Lanka (later expanded to $48 million),
primarily to work on three deep-water harbors for industrial fishing fleets
and to build a new bridge to Arugam Bay, part of the plan to turn the town
22

into a "tourist paradise." Both of these programs —carried out in the name
of tsunami relief—were disastrous for the primary victims of the tsunami,

* Fernando is head of the Movement for Land and Agricultural Reform (MONLAR), a coalition
of Sri Lankan NGOs that began calling for "a people's reconstruction process" shortly after
the disaster.

398

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

since the trawlers scooped up their fish, and the hotels didn't want them on
the beach. As Kumari put it, "It's not just that the 'aid' isn't aiding, it is that it
is hurting."
When I asked him why the U.S. government was spending its aid money
on projects that ensured the displacement of tsunami survivors, John Varley,
director of USAID's Competitiveness Program, explained that "you don't
want to restrict the aid so it only goes to tsunami victims. . . . Let it be for the
benefit of all Sri Lanka; let it contribute to growth." Varley compared the
plan to an elevator in a high-rise building: on the first trip it picks up one
group of passengers and takes them to the top, where they create wealth that
allows the elevator to go back down and pick more people up. The people
waiting at the bottom have to know that the elevator will be back for them
too —eventually.
The only direct money that the U.S. government was spending on smallscale fishing people was a $1 million grant to "upgrade" the temporary shelters
23

where they were being warehoused while the beaches were redeveloped. It
was a good indication that the tin-and-particle-board shelters were temporary
in name only; that they were indeed destined to become permanent
shantytowns—the kind that ring most major cities in the global South. There
are no great relief drives to help the people who live in those slums, of course,
but the tsunami victims were supposed to be different. The world watched
them lose their homes and livelihoods on live TV, and the arbitrariness of
their fate provoked a visceral, global feeling that what was lost needed and de­
served to be replaced —not through trickle-down economics, but directly,
with hand-to-hand aid. But the World Bank and USAID understood some­
thing that most of us did not: that soon enough, the distinctiveness of the
tsunami survivors would fade and they would melt into the billions of faceless
poor worldwide, so many of whom already live in tin shacks without water.
The proliferation of these shacks has become as much an accepted feature of
the global economy as the explosion of $800-a-night hotels.
In one of the most desolate inland camps on the southern coast of Sri
Lanka, I met a young mother named Renuka, arrestingly beautiful even in
rags, and one of the people waiting for Varley's elevator. Her youngest child,
a girl, was six months old, born two days after the tsunami. Renuka had sum­
moned superhuman strength to grab both of her boys and run, nine months
pregnant and in water up to her neck, away from the wave. Yet after this ex­
traordinary feat of survival, she and her family were now quietly going hun­
gry on a parched piece of land in the middle of nowhere. A couple of canoes,

B L A N K I N G THE BEACH

399

donated by a well-meaning NGO, made a pitiful sight: three kilometers
from the water, and with not even a bicycle for transportation, they were lit­
tle more than a cruel reminder of a former life. She asked us to carry a mes­
sage to everyone who was trying to help the tsunami survivors. "If you have
something for me," she said, "put it in my hand."

The W i d e r W a v e

Sri Lanka wasn't the only country that got hit by this second tsunami —
similar stories of land and law grabs have come out of Thailand, the Mal­
dives, and Indonesia. In India, tsunami survivors in Tamil Nadu were left so
impoverished that up to 150 women were driven to sell their kidneys in order
to buy food. An aid worker explained to The Guardian

that the state govern­

ment "would prefer the coast was used to build hotels, but the result is des­
perate people." All the tsunami-struck countries imposed "buffer zones"
preventing villagers from rebuilding on the coasts, freeing up the land for in­
creased development. (In Aceh, Indonesia, the zones were two kilometers
wide, though the government was eventually forced to repeal the edict.)

24

A year after the tsunami, the respected N G O ActionAid, which monitors
foreign aid spending, published the results of an extensive survey of fifty
thousand tsunami survivors in five countries. The same patterns repeated
everywhere: residents were barred from rebuilding, but hotels were showered
with incentives; temporary camps were miserable militarized holding pens,
and almost no permanent reconstruction had been done; entire ways of life
were being extinguished. It concluded that the setbacks could not be
chalked up to the usual villains of poor communication, underfunding or
corruption. The problems were structural and deliberate: "Governments
have largely failed in their responsibility to provide land for permanent hous­
ing," the report concluded. "They have stood by or been complicit as land
has been grabbed and coastal communities pushed aside in favour of com­
mercial interests."

25

When it came to posttsunami opportunism, however, nowhere compared
with the Maldives, perhaps the least understood of the affected countries.
There, the government wasn't satisfied with merely clearing the poor people
from the coasts—it used the tsunami to try to clear its citizens out of the vast
majority of the country's livable zones.
The Maldives, a chain of roughly two hundred inhabited islands off the
coast of India, is a tourism republic in the same way that certain Central

400

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

American countries used to be called banana republics. Its export product is
not tropical fruit but tropical leisure, with a staggering 90 percent of the
26

state's revenues coming directly from beach holidays. The leisure that the
Maldives sells is a particularly decadent, enticing kind. Nearly one hundred
of its islands are "resort islands," patches of lush vegetation surrounded by
halos of white sand that are entirely controlled by hotels, cruise lines or
wealthy individuals. Some are leased for up to fifty years. The most luxurious
of the Maldivian islands cater to an elite clientele (Tom Cruise and Katie
Holmes on their honeymoon, as an example) that is drawn not just to the
beauty and the diving but to the promise of total seclusion that only private
islands can provide.
With architecture "inspired" by traditional fishing villages, the spa-resorts
compete over who can pack their thatched huts on stilts with the most excit­
ing array of plutonomy toys and perks —Bose Surround Sound home enter­
tainment, Philippe Starck fixtures in outdoor bathrooms, sheets so fine that
they practically dissolve on touch. The islands also outdo one another to
erase the boundaries between land and sea—the villas at Coco Palm are
built over the lagoon and have rope ladders from the decks into the water
beneath, the Four Seasons' sleeping quarters "float" on the ocean, and the
Hilton boasts the first underwater restaurant, built on a coral reef. Many
suites feature maids' quarters, and on one private island, a twenty-four-houra-day "dedicated Maldivian butler—a 'Thakuru' " who takes care of such de­
tails as "how you like your martini—shaken or stirred." Villas at these James
Bondian resorts go as high as $5,000 a night.

27

The man who reigns over this pleasure kingdom is Asia's longest-running
ruler, President Maumoon Abdul Gayoom, who has held on to power since
1978. During his tenure, the government has jailed opposition leaders and
been accused of torturing "dissidents" for such crimes as writing for antigov28

ernment Web sites. With critics kept out of sight on prison islands, Gay­
oom and his entourage have been free to lavish their attention on the
tourism business.
Before the tsunami, the Maldives government had been looking to ex­
pand the number of resort islands to meet the growing demand for luxury
getaways. It faced the usual obstacle: people. Maldivians are subsistence
fishers, many of whom live in traditional villages scattered throughout the
island atolls. This way of life created some challenges because the rustic
charm of seeing fish skinned on the beach is definitely not the Maldives
scene. Well before the tsunami, the Gayoom government had been trying to

BLANKING THE BEACH

401

persuade its citizens to move to a handful of larger, more heavily populated
islands that tourists rarely visit. Those islands were supposed to offer better
protection from rising waters caused by global warming. But it was difficult
even for a repressive regime to uproot tens of thousands of people from their
ancestral islands, and the "population consolidation" program was largely
unsuccessful.

29

After the tsunami, Gayoom's government immediately announced that
the disaster proved that many islands were "unsafe and unsuitable for habi­
tation" and launched a far more aggressive relocation program than it had
previously attempted, declaring that anyone who wanted state assistance
with tsunami recovery would need to move to one of five designated "safe is­
30

lands." The entire populations of several islands have already been evacu­
ated and more are in process, conveniently freeing up more land for
tourism.
The Maldives government claims that the Safe Island Program, supported
and funded by the World Bank and other agencies, is being driven by public
demand to live on "bigger and safer islands." But many islanders say they
would have stayed on their home islands if the infrastructure had been fixed.
As ActionAid put it, "People are left with no choice but to move as it is a pre­
condition of housing and livelihood rehabilitation."

31

Attracting further cynicism about the safety rationale was the fact that the
government's concerns evaporated when it came to all the hotels built with
precarious architecture on low-lying islands. Not only were the resorts sub­
ject to no safety evacuations but, in December 2005, one year after the
tsunami, the Gayoom government announced that thirty-five new islands
32

were available to be leased to resorts for up to fifty years. Meanwhile, on
the so-called safe islands, unemployment was rampant, and violence was
breaking out between the newcomers and the original residents.

Militarized Gentrification

In a way, the second tsunami was just a particularly shocking dose of eco­
nomic shock therapy: because the storm did such an effective job of clearing
the beach, a process of displacement and gentrification that would normally
unfold over years took place in a matter of days or weeks. What it looked like
was hundreds of thousands of poor, brown-skinned people (the fishing people
deemed "unproductive" by the World Bank) being moved against their wishes
to make room for ultrarich, mostly light-skinned people (the "high-yield"

402

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

tourists). The two economic poles of globalization, the ones that seem to live
in different centuries, not countries, were suddenly put in direct conflict over
the same pieces of coastline, one demanding the right to work, the other de­
manding the right to play. Backed up by the guns of local police and private
security, it was militarized gentrification, class war on the beach.
Some of the most direct clashes took place in Thailand, where, within
twenty-four hours of the wave, developers sent in armed private security
guards to fence in land they had been coveting for resorts. In some cases the
guards wouldn't even let survivors search their old properties for the bodies
33

of their children. The Thailand Tsunami Survivors and Supporters group
was hastily convened to deal with the land grabs. One of its first statements
declared that, for "businessmen-politicians, the tsunami was the answer to
their prayers, since it literally wiped these coastal areas clean of the commu­
nities which had previously stood in the way of their plans for resorts, hotels,
casinos and shrimp farms. To them, all these coastal areas are now open
land!"

34

Open land. In colonial times, it was a quasi-legal doctrine—terra nullius.
If the land was declared empty or "wasted," it could be seized and its people
eliminated without remorse. In the countries where the tsunami hit, the idea
of open land is weighted with this ugly historical resonance, evoking stolen
wealth and violent attempts to "civilize" the natives. Nijam, a fisherman I
met on the beach in Arugam Bay, saw no real difference. "The government
thinks our nets and our fish are ugly and messy, that's why they want us off
the beach. In order to satisfy foreigners, they are treating their own people as
if they are uncivilized." Rubble, it seemed, was the new terra nullius.
When I met Nijam, he was with a group of fishing people who had just re­
turned from the sea, their eyes bloodshot from the salt water. When I raised
the government's plan to move the small-boat fishers to another beach, several
of them waved broad fish-gutting knives and vowed to "gather their people
and strength" and fight for their land. At first, they said they had welcomed
the restaurants and hotels. "But now," said a fisherman named Abdul, "because
we gave them a little of our land, they want it all." Another, Mansoor, pointed
overhead to the palm trees giving us shade, strong enough to withstand the
force of the tsunami. "It was my great-great-grandparents who planted these
trees. Why should we move to another beach?" One of his relatives made a
pledge: "We will leave here only when the sea runs dry."
The influx of reconstruction aid from the tsunami was supposed to offer
Sri Lankans a chance to build a lasting peace after suffering so much more

B L A N K I N G THE BEACH

403

than their share of loss. In Arugam Bay, and all along the eastern coast, it
seemed to be starting another kind of war, one over who would benefit from
those funds —Sinhalese, Tamil or Muslim—and, most of all, whether the
real benefits would go to foreigners, at the expense of all locals.
I started to get a sinking feeling of déjà vu, as if the wind was changing
and this was about to become another "reconstructed" country slipping back
into perpetual destruction. I had heard very similar grievances a year earlier
in Iraq, about the reconstruction favoring the Kurds and certain select Shia.
Several aid workers I met in Colombo had told me how much more they
liked working in Sri Lanka over Iraq or Afghanistan —here, NGOs were still
seen as neutral, even helpful, and reconstruction wasn't yet a dirty word. But
that was changing. In the capital, I had seen posters featuring crude carica­
tures of Western aid workers stuffing themselves with money while Sri
Lankans starved.
The NGOs bore the brunt of the anger at the reconstruction because they
were intensely visible, slapping their logos on every available surface along
the coast, while the World Bank, USAID and government officials dreaming
up Bali plans rarely left their urban offices. It was ironic, since the aid organ­
izers were the only ones offering any kind of help at all —but also inevitable,
because what they offered was so inadequate. Part of the problem was that
the aid complex had become so large and so cut off from the people it was
serving that the lifestyles of its staffers became, in Sri Lanka, a kind of na­
tional obsession. Almost everyone I met commented on what one priest
called "the N G O wild life": high-end hotels, beachfront villas and the ulti­
mate lightning rod for popular rage, the brand-new white sport utility vehi­
cles. All the aid organizations had them, monstrous things that were far too
wide and powerful for the country's narrow dirt roads. All day long they went
roaring past the camps, forcing everyone to eat their dust, their logos billow­
ing on flags in the breeze —Oxfam, World Vision, Save the Children —as if
they were visitors from a far-off N G O World. In a country as hot as Sri
Lanka, these cars, with their tinted windows and blasting air conditioners,
were more than modes of transportation; they were rolling microclimates.
Seeing this resentment build, I couldn't help wondering how long before
Sri Lanka went the way of Iraq and Afghanistan, where the reconstruction
looked so much like robbery that aid workers became targets. It happened
shortly after I left: seventeen Sri Lankans working on tsunami relief for the
international N G O Action Against Hunger were massacred in their office
near the east-coast port city of Trincomelee. It sparked a new wave of vicious

404

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

fighting, and tsunami reconstruction was stopped in its tracks. Many aid or­
ganizations, fearing for the safety of their staff after several more attacks, left
the country. Others shifted focus to the south, the government-controlled
area, leaving the harder-hit east and Tamil-controlled north without aid.
These decisions only deepened the sense that the reconstruction funds were
being spent unfairly, especially after a study conducted in late 2006 found
that even though the majority of tsunami-hit homes were still in ruins, the
one exception was the president's own electoral district in the south, where a
miraculous 173 percent of the homes had been rebuilt.

35

The aid workers still on the ground in the east, near Arugam Bay, were
now dealing with a new wave of displaced people—the hundreds of thou­
sands forced to leave their homes because of the violence. United Nations
workers "who originally were contracted to rebuild schools destroyed by the
tsunami have been redirected to build toilets for people displaced by the
fighting," reported The New York

6

Times}

In July 2006, the Tamil Tigers announced that the cease-fire was officially
over; the reconstruction was off, and the war was back on. Less than a year
later, over four thousand people had been killed in posttsunami fighting.
Only a fraction of the homes hit by the tsunami had ever been rebuilt along
the east coast, but of the new structures, hundreds were already punctured
with bullet holes, just-installed windows were shattered by explosives and
brand-new roofs had collapsed from shelling.
It's impossible to say how much the decision to use the tsunami as an op­
portunity for disaster capitalism contributed to the return to civil war. The
peace had always been precarious, and there was bad faith on all sides. One
thing was certain, though: if peace was to take root in Sri Lanka, it needed to
outweigh the benefits of war including the tangible economic benefits flow­
ing from a war economy, in which the army takes care of the families of its
soldiers and the Tamil Tigers look after the families of its fighters and suicide
bombers.
The enormous outpouring of generosity after the tsunami had held out
the rare possibility of a genuine peace dividend—the resources to imagine a
more equitable country, to repair shattered communities in ways that would
rebuild trust as well as buildings and roads. Instead, Sri Lanka (like Iraq) re­
ceived what the University of Ottawa political scientist Roland Paris has
termed "a peace penalty"—the imposition of a cutthroat, combative eco­
nomic model that made life harder for a majority of people at the very mo­
ment when what they needed most was reconciliation and an easing of

BLANKING THE BEACH

405

37

tensions. In truth, the brand of peace Sri Lanka was offered was its own
kind of war. Continued violence promised land, sovereignty and glory. What
did corporate peace offer, besides the certainty of landlessness in the imme­
diate term and John Varley's elusive elevator in the long term?
Everywhere the Chicago School crusade has triumphed, it has created a
permanent underclass of between 25 and 60 percent of the population. It is
always a form of war. But when that warlike economic model of mass evic­
tions and discarded cultures is imposed in a country that is already ravaged
by disaster and scarred by ethnic conflict, the dangers are far greater. There
are, as Keynes argued all those years ago, political consequences to this kind
of punitive peace—including the outbreak of even bloodier wars.

CHAPTER

20

D I S A S T E R APARTHEID
A W O R L D OF G R E E N Z O N E S
AND RED ZONES

Shelve the abiding fiction that d i s a s t e r s do not discriminate—that
they flatten everything in their path with "democratic" disregard.
P l a g u e s zero in on the d i s p o s s e s s e d , on those forced to build their
lives in the path of danger. A I D S is no different.
—Hein M a r a i s , S o u t h African writer, 2 0 0 6

1

Katrina w a s not unforeseeable. It w a s the result of a political
structure that subcontracts its responsibility to private contrac­
tors a n d abdicates its responsibility altogether.
— H a r r y Belafonte, A m e r i c a n m u s i c i a n and civil rights activist, S e p ­
tember 2005

2

During the second week of September 2005,1 was in New Orleans with my
husband, Avi, as well as Andrew, with whom I had traveled in Iraq, shooting
documentary footage in the still partially flooded city. As the nightly six
o'clock curfew descended, we found ourselves driving in circles, unable to
find our way. The traffic lights were out, and half the street signs had been
blown over or twisted sideways by the storm. Debris and water obstructed
passage along many roads, and most of the people trying to navigate the ob­
stacles were, like us, out-of-towners with no idea where they were going.
The accident was a bad one: a T-bone at full speed in the middle of a ma­
jor intersection. Our car spun out into a traffic light, went through a wroughtiron fence and parked in a porch. The injuries to the people in both cars were
thankfully minor, but before I knew it I was being strapped to a stretcher and

DISASTER APARTHEID

407

driven away. Through the haze of concussion, I was aware that wherever the
ambulance was going, it wouldn't be good. I had visions of the horrific scene
at the makeshift health clinic at the New Orleans airport—there were so few
doctors and nurses that elderly evacuees were being left unattended for hours,
slumped in their wheelchairs. I thought about Charity Hospital, New Or­
leans' primary public emergency room, which we had passed earlier in the
day. It flooded during the storm, and its staff had struggled without power to
keep patients alive. I pleaded with the paramedics to let me out. I remember
telling them that I was fine, really, then I must have passed out.
I came to as we arrived at the most modern and calm hospital I have ever
been in. Unlike the clinics crowded with evacuees, at the Ochsner Medical
Center—offering "healthcare with peace of mind"—doctors, nurses and or­
derlies far outnumbered the patients. In fact, there seemed to be only a
handful of other patients in the immaculate ward. In minutes I was settled
into a spacious private room, my cuts and bruises attended to by a small
army of medical staff. Three nurses immediately took me in for a neck X-ray;
a genteel Southern doctor removed some glass fragments and put in a cou­
ple of stitches.
To a veteran of the Canadian public health care system, these were wholly
unfamiliar experiences; I usually wait for forty minutes to see my general
practitioner. And this was downtown New Orleans —ground zero of the
largest public health emergency in recent U.S. history. A polite administrator
came into my room and explained that "in America we pay for health care. I
am so sorry, dear—it's really terrible. We wish we had your system. Just fill
out this form."
Within a couple of hours, I would have been free to go, were it not for the
curfew that had locked down the city. "The biggest problem," a private secu­
rity guard told me in the lobby where we were both biding time, "is all the
junkies; they're jonesing and want to get into the pharmacy."
Since the pharmacy was locked tight, a medical intern was kind enough
to slip me a few painkillers. I asked him what it had been like at the hospital
at the peak of the storm. "I wasn't on duty, thank God," he said. "I live out­
side the city."
When I asked if he had gone to any of the shelters to help, he seemed
taken aback by the question and a little embarrassed. "I hadn't thought of
that," he said. I quickly changed the subject to what I hoped was safer
ground: the fate of Charity Hospital. It was so underfunded that it was barely
functioning before the storm, and people were already speculating that with

408

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the water damage it might never reopen. "They'd better reopen it," he said.
"We can't treat those people here."
It occurred to me that this affable young doctor, and the spa-like medical
care I had just received, were the embodiment of the culture that had made
the horrors of Hurricane Katrina possible, the culture that had left New Or­
leans' poorest residents to drown. As a graduate of a private medical school
and then an intern at a private hospital, he had been trained simply not to
see New Orleans' uninsured, overwhelmingly African-American residents as
potential patients. That was true before the storm, and it continued to be
true even when all of New Orleans turned into a giant emergency room: he
had sympathy for the evacuees, but that didn't change the fact that he still
could not see them as potential patients of his.
When Katrina hit, the sharp divide between the worlds of Ochsner Hos­
pital and Charity Hospital suddenly played out on the world stage. The eco­
nomically secure drove out of town, checked into hotels and called their
insurance companies. The 120,000 people in New Orleans without cars,
who depended on the state to organize their evacuation, waited for help that
did not arrive, making desperate S O S signs or rafts out of their refrigerator
doors. Those images shocked the world because, even if most of us had re­
signed ourselves to the daily inequalities of who has access to health care
and whose schools have decent equipment, there was still a widespread as­
sumption that disasters were supposed to be different. It was taken for
granted that the state —at least in a rich country—would come to the aid of
the people during a cataclysmic event. The images from New Orleans
showed that this general belief—that disasters are a kind of time-out for cut­
throat capitalism, when we all pull together and the state switches into
higher gear—had already been abandoned, and with no public debate.
There was a brief window of two or three weeks when it seemed that the
drowning of New Orleans would provoke a crisis for the economic logic that
had greatly exacerbated the human disaster with its relentless attacks on the
public sphere. "The storm exposed the consequences of neoliberalism's lies
and mystifications, in a single locale and all at once," wrote the political sci­
3

entist and New Orleans native Adolph Reed Jr. The facts of this exposure
are well known—from the levees that were never repaired, to the under­
funded public transit system that failed, to the fact that the city's idea of dis­
aster preparedness was passing out DVDs telling people that if a hurricane
came, they should get out of town.
Then there was the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), a

DISASTER APARTHEID

409

laboratory for the Bush administration's vision of government run by corpo­
rations. In the summer of 2004, more than a year before Katrina hit, the
State of Louisiana put in a request to F E M A for funds to develop an indepth contingency plan for a powerful hurricane. The request was refused.
"Disaster mitigation"—advance government measures to make the effects of
disasters less devastating—was one of the programs gutted under Bush. Yet
that same summer F E M A awarded a $500,000 contract to a private firm
called Innovative Emergency Management. Its task was to come up with a
"catastrophic hurricane disaster plan for Southeast Louisiana and the City of
New Orleans."

4

The private company spared no expense. It brought together more than a
hundred experts, and when money ran out, it went back to F E M A for more;
eventually the bill for the exercise doubled to $1 million. The company
came up with scenarios for a mass evacuation covering everything from de­
livering water to instructing neighboring communities to identify empty lots
that could immediately be transformed into trailer parks for evacuees—all
the sensible things that didn't happen when a hurricane like the one they
were imagining actually hit. That's partly because, eight months after the
contractor submitted its report, no action had been taken. "Money was not
available to do the follow-up," explained Michael Brown, head of F E M A at
5

the time. The story is typical of the lopsided state that Bush built: a weak,
underfunded, ineffective public sector on the one hand, and a parallel richly
funded corporate infrastructure on the other. When it comes to paying con­
tractors, the sky is the limit; when it comes to financing the basic functions of
the state, the coffers are empty.
Just as the U.S. occupation authority in Iraq turned out to be an empty
shell, when Katrina hit, so did the U.S. federal government at home. In fact, it
was so thoroughly absent that FEMA could not seem to locate the New Or­
leans superdome, where twenty-three thousand people were stranded without
food or water, despite the fact that the world media had been there for days.
For some free-market ideologues, this spectacle of what the New York
Times columnist Paul Krugman termed "the can't do government" provoked
a crisis of faith. "The collapsed levees of New Orleans will have conse­
quences for neoconservatism just as long and deep as the collapse of the
Wall in East Berlin had on Soviet Communism," wrote the repentant true
believer Martin Kelly in a much-circulated essay. "Hopefully all of those
who urged the ideology on, myself included, will have a long time to con­
sider the error of our ways." Even neocon stalwarts like Jonah Goldberg were

410

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

begging "big government" to ride to the rescue: "When a city is sinking into
the sea and rioting runs rampant, government probably should saddle-up."

6

No such soul-searching was in evidence at the Heritage Foundation, where
the true disciples of Friedmanism can always be found. Katrina was a tragedy,
but, as Milton Friedman wrote in his Wall Street Journal op-ed, it was "also an
opportunity." On September 13, 2005—fourteen days after the levees were
breached—the Heritage Foundation hosted a meeting of like-minded ideo­
logues and Republican lawmakers. They came up with a list of "Pro-FreeMarket Ideas for Responding to Hurricane

Katrina and

High Gas

Prices"—thirty-two policies in all, each one straight out of the Chicago School
playbook, and all of them packaged as "hurricane relief." The first three items
were "automatically suspend Davis-Bacon prevailing wage laws in disaster ar­
eas," a reference to the law that required federal contractors to pay a living
wage; "make the entire affected area a flat-tax free-enterprise zone"; and
"make the entire region an economic competitiveness zone (comprehensive
tax incentives and waiving of regulations)." Another demand called for giving
7

parents vouchers to use at charter schools. All these measures were an­
nounced by President Bush within the week. He was eventually forced to rein­
state the labor standards, though they were largely ignored by contractors.
The meeting produced more ideas that gained presidential support. Cli­
mate scientists have directly linked the increased intensity of hurricanes to
8

warming ocean temperatures. This connection, however, didn't stop the
working group at the Heritage Foundation from calling on Congress to re­
peal environmental regulations on the Gulf Coast, give permission for new
oil refineries in the United States and green-light "drilling in the Arctic Na­
9

tional Wildlife Refuge." All these measures would increase greenhouse gas
emissions, the major human contributor to climate change, yet they were
immediately championed by the president under the guise of responding to
the Katrina disaster.
Within weeks, the Gulf Coast became a domestic laboratory for the
same kind of government-run-by-contractors that had been pioneered in
Iraq. The companies that snatched up the biggest contracts were the famil­
iar Baghdad gang: Halliburton's K B R unit had a $60 million gig to recon­
struct military bases along the coast. Blackwater was hired to protect FEMA
employees from looters. Parsons, infamous for its sloppy Iraq work, was
brought in for a major bridge construction project in Mississippi. Fluor,
Shaw, Bechtel, C H 2 M Hill —all top contractors in Iraq—were hired by the

DISASTER APARTHEID

411

government to provide mobile homes to evacuees just ten days after the lev­
ees broke. Their contracts ended up totaling $3.4 billion, no open bidding
required.

10

As many remarked at the time, within days of the storm it was as if Bagh­
dad's Green Zone had lifted off from its perch on the Tigris and landed on the
bayou. The parallels were undeniable. To spearhead its Katrina operation,
Shaw hired the former head of the U.S. Army's Iraq reconstruction office.
Fluor sent its senior project manager from Iraq to the flood zone. "Our re­
building work in Iraq is slowing down and this has made some people avail­
able to respond to our work in Louisiana," a company representative
explained. Joe Allbaugh, whose company New Bridge Strategies had promised
to bring Wal-Mart and 7-Eleven to Iraq, was the lobbyist in the middle of many
of the deals. The similarities were so striking that some of the mercenary sol­
diers, fresh from Baghdad, were having trouble adjusting. When David Enders, a reporter, asked an armed guard outside a New Orleans hotel if there
had been much action, he replied, "Nope. It's pretty Green Zone here."

11

Other things were pretty Green Zone too. On contracts valued at $8.75
billion, congressional investigators found "significant overcharges, wasteful
spending, or mismanagement."

12

(The fact that exactly the same errors as

those made in Iraq were instantly repeated in New Orleans should put to rest
the claim that Iraq's occupation was merely a string of mishaps and mistakes
marked by incompetence and lack of oversight. When the same mistakes are
repeated over and over again, it's time to consider the possibility that they are
not mistakes at all.)
In New Orleans, as in Iraq, no opportunity for profit was left untapped.
Kenyon, a division of the mega funeral conglomerate Service Corporation
International (a major Bush campaign donor), was hired to retrieve the dead
from homes and streets. The work was extraordinarily slow, and bodies were
left in the broiling sun for days. Emergency workers and local volunteer mor­
ticians were forbidden to step in to help because handling the bodies im­
pinged on Kenyon's commercial territory. The company charged the state,
on average, $12,500 a victim, and it has since been accused of failing to
properly label many bodies. For almost a year after the flood, decayed
corpses were still being discovered in attics.

13

Another pretty Green Zone touch: relevant experience often appeared to
have nothing to do with how contracts were allocated. AshBritt, the company
paid half a billion dollars to remove debris, reportedly didn't own a single

412

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE
14

dump truck and farmed out the entire job to contractors. Even more strik­
ing was the company that F E M A paid $5.2 million to perform the crucial role
of building a base camp for emergency workers in St. Bernard Parish, a sub­
urb of New Orleans. The camp construction fell behind schedule and was
never completed. When the contractor was investigated, it emerged that the
company, Lighthouse Disaster Relief, was actually a religious group. "About
the closest thing I have done to this is just organize a youth camp with my
church," confessed Lighthouse's director, Pastor Gary Heldreth.

15

As in Iraq, government once again played the role of a cash machine
equipped for both withdrawals and deposits. Corporations withdrew funds
through massive contracts, then repaid the government not with reliable
work but with campaign contributions and/or loyal foot soldiers for the next
elections. (According to The New York Times, "the top 20 service contractors
have spent nearly $300 million since 2000 on lobbying and have donated
$23 million to political campaigns." The Bush administration, in turn, in­
creased the amount spent on contractors by roughly $200 billion between
2000 and 2 0 0 6 . )

16

Something else was familiar: the contractors' aversion to hiring local peo­
ple who might have seen the reconstruction of New Orleans not only as a job
but as part of healing and reempowering their communities. Washington
could easily have made it a condition of every Katrina contract that compa­
nies hire local people at decent wages to help them put their lives back to­
gether. Instead, the residents of the Gulf Coast, like the people of Iraq, were
expected to watch as contractors created an economic boom based on easy
taxpayer money and relaxed regulations.
The result, predictably, was that after all the layers of subcontractors had
taken their cut, there was next to nothing left for the people doing the work.
For instance, the author Mike Davis tracked the way F E M A paid Shaw $175
a square foot to install blue tarps on damaged roofs, even though the tarps
themselves were provided by the government. Once all the subcontractors
took their share, the workers who actually hammered in the tarps were paid
as little as $2 a square foot. "Every level of the contracting food chain, in
other words, is grotesquely overfed except the bottom rung," Davis wrote,
"where the actual work is carried out."

17

According to one study, "a quarter of the workers rebuilding the city were
immigrants lacking papers, almost all of them Hispanic, making far less
money than legal workers." In Mississippi, a class-action lawsuit forced several
companies to pay hundreds of thousands of dollars in back wages to immigrant

DISASTER APARTHEID

413

workers. Some were not paid at all. On one Halliburton/KBR job site, undoc­
umented immigrant workers reported being wakened in the middle of the
night by their employer (a subsubcontractor), who allegedly told them that
immigration agents were on their way. Most workers fled to avoid arrest; after
all, they could end up in one of the new immigration prisons that Hallibur­
ton/KBR had been contracted to build for the federal government.*

18

The attacks on the disadvantaged, carried out in the name of reconstruc­
tion and relief, did not stop there. In order to offset the tens of billions going
to private companies in contracts and tax breaks, in November 2005 the
Republican-controlled Congress announced that it needed to cut $40 bil­
lion from the federal budget. Among the programs that were slashed were
19

student loans, Medicaid and food stamps. In other words, the poorest citi­
zens in the country subsidized the contractor bonanza twice—first when Ka­
trina relief morphed into unregulated corporate handouts, providing neither
decent jobs nor functional public services, and second when the few pro­
grams that directly assist the unemployed and working poor nationwide were
gutted to pay those bloated bills.
Not so long ago, disasters were periods of social leveling, rare moments when
atomized communities put divisions aside and pulled together. Increasingly,
however, disasters are the opposite: they provide windows into a cruel and
ruthlessly divided future in which money and race buy survival.
Baghdad's Green Zone is the starkest expression of this world order. It has
its own electrical grid, its own phone and sewage systems, its own oil supply
and its own state-of-the-art hospital with pristine operating theaters—all pro­
tected by five-meter-thick walls. It feels, oddly, like a giant fortified Carnival
Cruise Ship parked in the middle of a sea of violence and despair, the boil­
ing Red Zone that is Iraq. If you can get on board, there are poolside drinks,
bad Hollywood movies and Nautilus machines. If you are not among the
chosen, you can get yourself shot just by standing too close to the wall.
Everywhere in Iraq, the wildly divergent value assigned to different cate­
gories of people is crudely evident. Westerners and their Iraqi colleagues
have checkpoints at the entrance to their streets, blast walls in front of their
houses, body armor and private security guards on call at all hours. They

* No extensive studies have been conducted on New Orleans labor conditions, but the A d ­
vancement Project, a grassroots advocacy group in N e w Orleans, estimates that 60 percent
of the immigrant workers in New Orleans have not been paid for at least part of their work.

4H

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

travel the country in menacing armored convoys, with mercenaries pointing
guns out the windows as they follow their prime directive to "protect the
principal." With every move they broadcast the same unapologetic message:
we are the chosen; our lives are infinitely more precious. Middle-class Iraqis,
meanwhile, cling to the next rung down the ladder: they can afford to buy
protection from local militias, and they are able to pay off kidnappers to have
a family member released. But the vast majority of Iraqis have no protection
at all. They walk the streets wide open to any possible violence, with nothing
between them and the next car bomb but a thin layer of fabric. In Iraq, the
lucky get Kevlar, the rest get prayer beads.
At first I thought the Green Zone phenomenon was unique to the war in
Iraq. Now, after years spent in other disaster zones, I realize that the Green
Zone emerges everywhere that the disaster capitalism complex descends,
with the same stark partitions between the included and the excluded, the
protected and the damned.
It happened in New Orleans. After the flood, an already divided city
turned into a battleground between gated green zones and raging red
zones—the result not of water damage but of the "free-market solutions" em­
braced by the president. The Bush administration refused to allow emer­
gency funds to pay public sector salaries, and the City of New Orleans,
which lost its tax base, had to fire three thousand workers in the months after
Katrina. Among them were sixteen of the city's planning staff—with shades
of "de-Baathification," laid off at the precise moment when New Orleans was
in desperate need of planners. Instead, millions of public dollars went to out­
20

side consultants, many of whom were powerful real estate developers. And
of course thousands of teachers were also fired, paving the way for the con­
version of dozens of public schools into charter schools, just as Friedman
had called for.
Almost two years after the storm, Charity Hospital was still closed. The
court system was barely functioning, and the privatized electricity company,
Entergy, had failed to get the whole city back online. After threatening to raise
rates dramatically, the company managed to extract a controversial $200 mil­
lion bailout from the federal government. The public transit system was gutted
and lost almost half its workers. The vast majority of publicly owned housing
projects stood boarded up and empty, with five thousand units slotted for de­
21

molition by the federal housing authority. Much as the tourism lobby in Asia
had longed to be rid of the beachfront fishing villages, New Orleans' powerful

DISASTER APARTHEID

415

tourism lobby had been eyeing the housing projects, several of them on prime
land close to the French Quarter, the city's tourism magnet.
Endesha Juakali helped set up a protest camp outside one of the boardedup projects, St. Bernard Public Housing, explaining that "they've had an
agenda for St. Bernard a long time, but as long as people lived here, they
couldn't do it. So they used the disaster as a way of cleansing the neighbor­
hood when the neighborhood is weakest. . . . This is a great location for big­
ger houses and condos. The only problem is you got all these poor black
people sitting on it!"

22

Amid the schools, the homes, the hospitals, the transit system and the lack
of clean water in many parts of town, New Orleans' public sphere was not
being rebuilt, it was being erased, with the storm used as the excuse. At an
earlier stage of capitalist "creative destruction," large swaths of the United
States lost their manufacturing bases and degenerated into rust belts of shut­
tered factories and neglected neighborhoods. Post-Katrina New Orleans may
be providing the first Western-world image of a new kind of wasted urban
landscape: the mold belt, destroyed by the deadly combination of weathered
public infrastructure and extreme weather.
The American Society of Civil Engineers said in 2007 that the U.S. had
fallen so far behind in maintaining its public infrastructure —roads, bridges,
schools, dams—that it would take more than a trillion and half dollars over
five years to bring it back up to standard. Instead, these types of expenditures
23

are being cut back. At the same time, public infrastructure around the
world is facing unprecedented stress, with hurricanes, cyclones, floods and
forest fires all increasing in frequency and intensity. It's easy to imagine a fu­
ture in which growing numbers of cities have their frail and long-neglected
infrastructures knocked out by disasters and then are left to rot, their core ser­
vices never repaired or rehabilitated. The well-off, meanwhile, will withdraw
into gated communities, their needs met by privatized providers.
Signs of that future were already in evidence by the time hurricane season
rolled around in 2006. In just one year, the disaster-response industry had
exploded, with a slew of new corporations entering the market, promising
safety and security should the next Big One hit. One of the more ambitious
ventures was launched by an airline in West Palm Beach, Florida. Help Jet
bills itself as "the first hurricane escape plan that turns a hurricane evacua­
tion into a jet-setter vacation." When a storm is coming, the airline books
holidays for its members at five-star golf resorts, spas or Disneyland. With the

416

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

reservations all made, the evacuees are then whisked out of the hurricane
zone on a luxury jet. "No standing in lines, no hassle with crowds, just a first
class experience that turns a problem into a vacation. . . . Enjoy the feeling
of avoiding the usual hurricane evacuation nightmare."

24

For the people left behind, there is a different kind of privatized solution.
In 2006, the Red Cross signed a new disaster-response partnership with WalMart. "It's all going to be private enterprise before it's over," said Billy Wag­
ner, chief of emergency management for the Florida Keys. "They've got the
expertise. They've got the resources." He was speaking at the National Hurri­
cane Conference in Orlando, Florida, a fast-growing annual trade show for
the companies selling everything that might come in handy during the next
disaster. "Some folks here said, 'Man, this is huge business—this is my new
business. I'm not in the landscaping business anymore; I'm going to be a
hurricane debris contractor,' " said Dave Blandford, an exhibitor at the con­
ference, showing off his "self-heating meals."

25

Much of the parallel disaster economy has been built with taxpayers' money,
thanks to the boom in privatized war-zone reconstruction. The giant contrac­
tors that have served as "the primes" in Iraq and Afghanistan have come under
frequent political fire for spending large portions of their income from govern­
ment contracts on their own corporate overhead—between 20 and 55 percent,
26

according to a 2006 audit of Iraq contractors. Much of those funds have,
quite legally, gone into huge investments in corporate infrastructure—
Bechtel's battalions of earth-moving equipment, Halliburton's planes and fleets
of trucks, and the surveillance architecture built by 1^3, CACI and Booz Allen.
Most dramatic has been Blackwater's investment in its paramilitary infra­
structure. Founded in 1996, the company has used the steady stream of con­
tracts during the Bush years to build up a private army of twenty thousand
mercenary soldiers on call and a massive military base in North Carolina
worth between $40 million and $50 million. According to one account,
Blackwater's capacity now includes the following: "A burgeoning logistics
operation that can deliver 100- or 200-ton self-contained humanitarian relief
response packages faster than the Red Cross. A Florida aviation division with
26 different platforms, from helicopter gunships to a massive Boeing 767.
The company even has a Zeppelin. The country's largest tactical driving
track. . . . A 20-acre man-made lake with shipping containers that have been
mocked up with ship rails and portholes, floating on pontoons, used to teach
how to board a hostile ship. A K-9 training facility that currently has 80 dog

DISASTER APARTHEID

417

teams deployed around the world. . . . A 1,200-yard-long firing range for
sniper training."*

27

A right-wing journal in the U.S. pronounced Blackwater "al Qaeda for
the good guys."

28

It's a striking analogy. Wherever the disaster capitalism

complex has landed, it has produced a proliferation of armed groupings out­
side the state. That is hardly a surprise: when countries are rebuilt by people
who don't believe in governments, the states they build are invariably weak,
creating a market for alternative security forces, whether Hezbollah, Blackwater, the Mahdi Army or the gang down the street in New Orleans.
The emergence of this parallel privatized infrastructure reaches far be­
yond policing. When the contractor infrastructure built up during the Bush
years is looked at as a whole, what is seen is a fully articulated state-withina-state that is as muscular and capable as the actual state is frail and feeble.
This corporate shadow state has been built almost exclusively with public
resources (90 percent of Blackwater's revenues come from state contracts),
including the training of its staff (overwhelmingly former civil servants,
29

politicians and soldiers). Yet the vast infrastructure is all privately owned
and controlled. The citizens who have funded it have absolutely no claim to
this parallel economy or its resources.
The actual state, meanwhile, has lost the ability to perform its core func­
tions without the help of contractors. Its own equipment is out of date, and
the best experts have fled to the private sector. When Katrina hit, FEMA had to
hire a contractor to award contracts to contractors. Similarly, when it came
time to update the Army Manual on the rules for dealing with contractors, the
army contracted out the job to one of its major contractors, MPRI —it no
longer had the know-how in-house. The CIA is losing so many staffers to the
parallel privatized spy sector that it has had to bar contractors from recruiting
in the agency dining room. "One recently retired case officer said he had
been approached twice while in line for coffee," reported the Los Angeles
Times. And when the Department of Homeland Security decided it needed
to build "virtual fences" on the U.S. borders with Mexico and Canada,
Michael P. Jackson, deputy secretary of the department, told contractors,
* One of the most worrying aspects of this industry is how unabashedly partisan it is.
Blackwater, for instance, is closely aligned with the antiabortion movement and other rightwing causes. It donates almost exclusively to the Republican Party, rather than hedging its
bets like most big corporations. Halliburton sends 87 percent of its campaign contributions
to Republicans, CH2M Hill 70 percent. Is it beyond the realm of the imagination to conceive of
a day when political parties will hire these companies to spy on their rivals during an election
campaign—or to engage in covert operations too shady even for the C I A ?

418

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

"This is an unusual invitation. . . . We're asking you to come back and tell us
how to do our business." The department's inspector general explained that
Homeland Security "does not have the capacity needed to effectively plan,
oversee and execute the [Secure Border Initiative] program."

30

Under Bush, the state still has all the trappings of a government—the im­
pressive buildings, presidential press briefings, policy battles—but it no more
does the actual work of governing than the employees at Nike's Beaverton
campus stitch running shoes.
The implications of the decision by the current crop of politicians to system­
atically outsource their elected responsibilities will reach far beyond a single
administration. Once a market has been created, it needs to be protected.
The companies at the heart of the disaster capitalism complex increasingly
regard both the state and nonprofits as competitors—from the corporate per­
spective, whenever governments or charities fulfill their traditional roles,
they are denying contractors work that could be performed at a profit.
"Neglected Defense: Mobilizing the Private Sector to Support Homeland
Security," a 2006 report whose advisory committee included some of the
largest corporations in the sector, warned that "the compassionate federal
impulse to provide emergency assistance to the victims of disasters affects
31

the market's approach to managing its exposure to risk." Published by the
Council on Foreign Relations, the report argued that if people know the gov­
ernment will come to the rescue, they have no incentive to pay for privatized
protection. In a similar vein, a year after Katrina, C E O s from thirty of the
largest corporations in the United States joined together under the umbrella
of the Business Roundtable, which includes in its membership Fluor, Bech­
tel and Chevron. The group, calling itself Partnership for Disaster Response,
complained of "mission creep" by the nonprofit sector in the aftermath of
disasters. Apparently charities and NGOs were infringing on their market by
donating building supplies rather than having Home Depot supply them for
a fee. The mercenary firms, meanwhile, have been loudly claiming that they
are better equipped to engage in peacekeeping in Darfur than the UN.

32

Much of this new aggressivenessflowsfrom the fact that the corporate world
knows that the golden era of bottomless federal contracts cannot last much
longer. The U.S. government is barreling toward an economic crisis, in no
small part thanks to the deficit spending that has bankrolled the construction of
the privatized disaster economy. That means that sooner rather than later, the
contracts are going to dip significantly. In late 2006, defense analysts began

DISASTER APARTHEID

419

predicting that the Pentagon's acquisitions budget could shrink by as much as
25 percent in the coming decade.

33

When the disaster bubble bursts, firms such as Bechtel, Fluor and Blackwater will lose much of their primary revenue streams. They will still have all
the high-tech gear and equipment bought at taxpayer expense, but they will
need to find a new business model, a new way to cover their high costs. The
next phase of the disaster capitalism complex is all too clear: with emergen­
cies on the rise, government no longer able to foot the bill, and citizens
stranded by their can't-do state, the parallel corporate state will rent back its
disaster infrastructure to whoever can afford it, at whatever price the market
will bear. For sale will be everything from helicopter rides off rooftops to
drinking water to beds in shelters.
Already wealth provides an escape hatch from most disasters—it buys
early-warning systems for tsunami-prone regions and stockpiles of Tamiflu
for the next outbreak. It buys bottled water, generators, satellite phones and
rent-a-cops. During the Israeli attack on Lebanon in 2006, the U.S. govern­
ment initially tried to charge its citizens for the cost of their own evacuations,
34

though it was eventually forced to back down. If we continue in this direc­
tion, the images of people stranded on New Orleans rooftops will not only
be a glimpse of America's unresolved past of racial inequality but will also
foreshadow a collective future of disaster apartheid in which survival is de­
termined by who can afford to pay for escape.
Looking ahead to coming disasters, ecological and political, we often as­
sume that we are all going to face them together, that what's needed are lead­
ers who recognize the destructive course we are on. But I'm not so sure.
Perhaps part of the reason why so many of our elites, both political and cor­
porate, are so sanguine about climate change is that they are confident they
will be able to buy their way out of the worst of it. This may also partially ex­
plain why so many Bush supporters are Christian end-timers. It's not just
that they need to believe there is an escape hatch from the world they are
creating. It's that the Rapture is a parable for what they are building down
here —a system that invites destruction and disaster, then swoops in with pri­
vate helicopters and airlifts them and their friends to divine safety.
As contractors rush to develop alternative stable sources of revenue, one
avenue is disaster-proofing other corporations. This was Paul Bremer's line of
business before he went to Iraq: turning multinationals into security bubbles,
able to function smoothly even if the states in which they are functioning are

420

THE SHOCK DOCTRINE

crumbling around them. The early results can be seen in the lobbies of
many major office buildings in New York or London—airport-style checkins complete with photo-ID requirements and X-ray machines—but the in­
dustry has far greater ambitions, including privatized global communications
networks, emergency health and electricity, and the ability to locate and pro­
vide transportation for a global workforce in the midst of a major disaster.
Another potential growth area identified by the disaster capitalism complex
is municipal government: the contracting-out of police and fire departments
to private security companies. "What they do for the military in downtown
Falluja, they can do for the police in downtown Reno," a spokesperson for
Lockheed Martin said in November 2 0 0 4 .

35

The industry predicts that these new markets will expand dramatically
over the next decade. A frank vision of where these trends are leading is pro­
vided by John Robb, a former covert-action mission commander with Delta
Force turned successful management consultant. In a widely circulated
manifesto for Fast Company

magazine, he describes the "end result" of the

war on terror as "a new, more resilient approach to national security, one
built not around the state but around private citizens and companies. . . .
Security will become a function of where you live and whom you work for,
much as health care is allocated already."

36

Robb writes, "Wealthy individuals and multinational corporations will be
the first to bail out of our collective system, opting instead to hire private
military companies, such as Blackwater and Triple Canopy, to protect their
homes and facilities and establish a protective perimeter around daily life.
Parallel transportation networks—evolving out of the time-share aircraft
companies such as Warren Buffett's Netjets—will cater to this group, leapfrog­
ging its members from one secure, well-appointed lily pad to the next." That
elite world is already largely in place, but Robb predicts that the middle class
will soon follow suit, "forming suburban collectives to share the costs of secu­
rity." These " 'armored suburbs' will deploy and maintain backup generators
and communications links" and be patrolled by private militias "that have re­
ceived corporate training and boast their own state-of-the-art emergencyresponse systems."
In other words, a world of suburban Green Zones. As for those outside the
secured perimeter, "they will have to make do with the remains of the national
system. They will gravitate to America's cities, where they will be subject to
ubiquitous surveillance and marginal or nonexistent services. For the poor,
there will be no other refuge."

DISASTER APARTHEID

421

The future Robb described sounds very much like the present in New Or­
leans, where two very different kinds of gated communities emerged from the
rubble. On the one hand were the so-called FEMA-villes: desolate, out-of-theway trailer camps for low-income evacuees, built by Bechtel or Fluor subcon­
tractors, administered by private security companies who patrolled the gravel
lots, restricted visitors, kept journalists out and treated survivors like criminals.
On the other hand were the gated communities built in the wealthy areas of
the city, such as Audubon and the Garden District, bubbles of functionality
that seemed to have seceded from the state altogether. Within weeks of the
storm, residents there had water and powerful emergency generators. Their
sick were treated in private hospitals, and their children went to new charter
schools. As usual, they had no need for public transit. In St. Bernard Parish, a
New Orleans suburb, DynCorp had taken over much of the policing; other
neighborhoods hired security companies directly. Between the two kinds of
privatized sovereign states was the New Orleans version of the Red Zone,
where the murder rate soared and neighborhoods like the storied Lower Ninth
Ward descended into a post-apocalyptic no-man's-land. A hit song by the rap­
per Juvenile in the summer after Katrina summed up the atmosphere: "We
livin' like Haiti without no government"—failed state U.S.A.

37

Bill Quigley, a local lawyer and activist, observed, "What is happening in
New Orleans is just a more concentrated, more graphic version of what is go­
ing on all over our country. Every city in our country has some serious simi­
larities to New Orleans. Every city has some abandoned neighborhoods.
Every city in our country has abandoned some public education, public
housing, public healthcare, and criminal justice. Those who do not support
public education, healthcare, and housing will continue to turn all of our
country into the Lower Ninth Ward unless we stop them."

38

The process is already well under way. Another glimpse of a disaster
apartheid future can be found in a wealthy Republican suburb outside At­
lanta. Its residents decided that they were tired of watching their property
taxes subsidize schools and police in the county's low-income AfricanAmerican neighborhoods. They voted to incorporate as their own city, Sandy
Springs, which could spend its taxes on services for its 100,000 citizens and
not have the revenues redistributed throughout the larger Fulton County.
The only difficulty was that Sandy Springs had no government structures
and needed to build them from scratch —everything from tax collection, to
zoning, to parks and recreation. In September 2005, the same month that

422

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

New Orleans flooded, the residents of Sandy Springs were approached by
the construction and consulting giant C H 2 M Hill with a unique pitch: let
us do it for you. For the starting price of $27 million a year, the contractor
pledged to build a complete city from the ground up.

39

A few months later, Sandy Springs became the first "contract city." Only
four people worked directly for the new municipality—everyone else was a
contractor. Rick Hirsekorn, heading up the project for C H 2 M Hill, de­
scribed Sandy Springs as "a clean sheet of paper with no governmental pro­
cesses in place." He told another journalist that "no one in our industry has
done a complete city of this size before."
The Atlanta Journal-Constitution

40

reported that "when Sandy Springs hired

corporate workers to run the new city, it was considered a bold experiment."
Within a year, however, contract-city mania was tearing through Atlanta's
wealthy suburbs, and it had become "standard procedure in north Fulton
[County]." Neighboring communities took their cue from Sandy Springs and
also voted to become stand-alone cities and contract out their government.
One new city, Milton, immediately hired C H 2 M Hill for the job—after all, it
had the experience. Soon, a campaign began for the new corporate cities to
join together to form their own county, which would mean that none of their
tax dollars would go to the poor neighborhoods nearby. The plan has encoun­
tered fierce opposition outside the proposed enclave, where politicians say that
without those tax dollars, they will no longer be able to afford their large pub­
lic hospital and public transit system; that partitioning the county would create
a failed state on the one hand and a hyperserviced one on the other. What they
were describing sounded a lot like New Orleans and a little like Baghdad.

41

In these wealthy Atlanta suburbs, the three-decade corporatist crusade to
strip-mine the state was complete: it wasn't just every government service
that had been outsourced but also the very function of government, which is
to govern. It was particularly fitting that the new ground was broken by
C H 2 M Hill. The corporation was a multimillion-dollar contractor in Iraq,
paid to perform the core government function of overseeing other contrac­
tors. In Sri Lanka after the tsunami, it had not only built ports and bridges
but was "responsible for the overall management of the infrastructure pro­
42

gram." In post-Katrina New Orleans, it was awarded $500 million to build
FEMA-villes and put on standby to be ready to do the same for the next di­
saster. A master of privatizing the state during extraordinary circumstances, it
was now doing the same under ordinary ones. If Iraq was a laboratory of ex­
treme privatization, the testing phase was clearly over.

C H A P T E R 21

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE
ISRAEL AS WARNING

Big border fences belong not to the w o r l d of the g u l a g but to the
w o r l d of noise b a r r i e r s along h i g h w a y s , luxury boxes in s p o r t s
s t a d i u m s , n o - s m o k i n g a r e a s , security zones in a i r p o r t s and
"gated communities." . . . They m a k e explicit the privileges of the
haves and the envy of the h a v e - n o t s in a w a y that is e m b a r r a s s i n g
for both. That is not the s a m e a s s a y i n g they do not w o r k .
— C h r i s t o p h e r Caldwell, s e n i o r editor, The Weekly Standard, N o ­
vember 2006

1

For decades, the conventional wisdom was that generalized mayhem was a
drain on the global economy. Individual shocks and crises could be har­
nessed as leverage to force open new markets, of course, but after the initial
shock had done its work, relative peace and stability were required for sus­
tained economic growth. That was the accepted explanation for why the
nineties had been such prosperous years: with the Cold War over, economies
were liberated to concentrate on trade and investment, and as countries be­
came more enmeshed and interdependent, they were far less likely to bomb
each other.
At the 2007 World Economic Forum in Davos, Switzerland, however, po­
litical and corporate leaders were scratching their heads over a state of affairs
that seemed to flout this conventional wisdom. It was being called the "Davos
Dilemma," which the Financial

Times columnist Martin Wolf described as

"the contrast between the world's favourable economics and troublesome
politics." As he put it, the economy had faced "a series of shocks: the stock

U2k

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

market crash after 2000; the terrorist outrages of September 11, 2001; wars in
Afghanistan and Iraq; friction over US policies; a jump in real oil prices to
levels not seen since the 1970s; the cessation of negotiations in the Doha
round

[of W T O . talks]; and

the confrontation

over Iran's nuclear

ambitions"—and yet it found itself in "a golden period of broadly shared
growth." Put bluntly, the world was going to hell, there was no stability in
sight and the global economy was roaring its approval. Soon after, former
U.S. Treasury Secretary Lawrence Summers described the "near complete
disconnect" between politics and markets as "something out of Dickens, you
talk to international relations experts and it's the worst of all times. Then you
talk to potential investors and it's one of the best of all times."

2

This puzzling trend has also been observed through an economic indica­
tor called "the guns-to-caviar index." The index tracks the sales of fighter jets
(guns) and executive jets (caviar). For seventeen years, it consistently found
that when fighter jets were selling briskly, sales of luxury executive jets went
down and vice versa: when executive jet sales were on the rise, fighter jet
sales dipped. O f course, a handful of war profiteers always managed to get
rich from selling guns, but they were economically insignificant. It was a tru­
ism of the contemporary market that you couldn't have booming economic
growth in the midst of violence and instability.
But that truism is no longer true. Since 2003, the year of the Iraq invasion,
the index found that spending has been going up on both fighter jets and ex­
ecutive jets rapidly and simultaneously, which means that the world is be­
3

coming less peaceful while accumulating significantly more profit. The
galloping economic growth in China and India played a part in the in­
creased demand for luxury items, but so did the expansion of the narrow
military-industrial complex into the sprawling disaster capitalism complex.
Today, global instability does not just benefit a small group of arms dealers;
it generates huge profits for the high-tech security sector, for heavy construc­
tion, for private health care companies treating wounded soldiers, for the oil
and gas sectors—and of course for defense contractors.
The scale of the revenues at stake is certainly enough to fuel an economic
boom. Lockheed Martin, whose former vice president chaired the commit­
tee loudly agitating for war in Iraq, received $25 billion of U.S. taxpayer dol­
lars in 2005 alone. The Democratic congressman Henry Waxman noted
that the sum "exceeded the gross domestic product of 103 countries, includ­
ing Iceland, Jordan, and Costa Rica . . . [and] was also larger than the com­
bined budgets of the Department of Commerce, the Department of the

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

425

Interior, the Small Business Administration, and the entire legislative branch
of government." Lockheed itself was an "emerging market." Companies like
Lockheed (whose stock price tripled between 2000 and 2005) are a large
part of the reason why the U.S. stock markets were saved from a prolonged
crash following September 11. While conventional stock prices have underperformed, the Spade Defense Index, "a benchmark for defense, homeland
security and aerospace stocks," went up every year from 2001 to 2006 by an
average of 15 percent—seven and a half times the Standard & Poor's 500 av­
erage increase in that same period.

4

The Davos Dilemma is being further fueled by the intensely profitable
model of privatized

reconstruction that was forged in Iraq. Heavy-

construction stocks, which include the big engineering firms that land juicy
no-bid contracts after wars and natural disasters, went up 250 percent be­
tween 2001 and April 2007. Reconstruction is now such big business that
every new destruction is greeted with the excitement of hot initial public
stock offerings: $30 billion for Iraq reconstruction, $13 billion for tsunami
reconstruction, $100 billion for New Orleans and the Gulf Coast, $7.6 bil­
lion for Lebanon.

5

Terrorist attacks, which used to send the stock market spiraling down­
ward, now receive a similarly upbeat market reception. After September 11,
2001, the Dow Jones plummeted 685 points as soon as markets reopened. In
sharp contrast, on July 7, 2005, the day four bombs ripped through London's
public transport system, killing dozens and injuring hundreds, the U.S. stock
market closed higher than it did the day before, with the Nasdaq up 7 points.
The following August, on the day British law enforcement agencies arrested
twenty-four suspects allegedly planning to blow up jetliners headed to the
U.S., the Nasdaq closed 11.4 points higher, largely thanks to soaring home­
land security stocks.
Then there are the outrageous fortunes of the oil sector—a $40 billion
profit in 2006 for ExxonMobil alone, the largest profit ever recorded, and its
6

colleagues at rival companies like Chevron were not far behind. Like those
corporations linked to defense, heavy construction and homeland security,
the oil sector's fortunes improve with every war, terrorist attack and Cate­
gory 5 hurricane. In addition to reaping the short-term benefits of high
prices linked to uncertainty in key oil-producing regions, the oil industry
has consistently managed to turn disasters to its long-term advantage,
whether by ensuring that a large portion of the reconstruction funds in
Afghanistan went into the expensive road infrastructure for a new pipeline

426

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

(while most other major reconstruction projects stalled), by pushing
through Iraq's oil law while the country burned, or by piggybacking on Hur­
ricane Katrina to plan the first new refineries in the United States since the
seventies. The oil and gas industry is so intimately entwined with the econ­
omy of disaster—both as root cause behind many disasters and as a benefi­
ciary from them—that it deserves to be treated as an honorary adjunct of the
disaster capitalism complex.

No Conspiracies Required
The recent spate of disasters has translated into such spectacular profits that
many people around the world have come to the same conclusion: the rich
and powerful must be deliberately causing the catastrophes so that they can
exploit them. In July 2006, a national poll of U.S. residents found that more
than a third of respondents believed that the government had a hand in the
9/11 attacks or took no action to stop them "because they wanted the United
States to go to war in the Middle East." Similar suspicions dog most of the
catastrophes of recent years. In Louisiana in the aftermath of Katrina, the
shelters were alive with rumors that the levees hadn't broken but had been
covertly blown up in order "to destroy the black part of town and keep the
white part dry," as the Nation of Islam's leader, Louis Farrakhan, suggested.

7

In Sri Lanka I often heard that the tsunami had been caused by underwater
explosions detonated by the United States so that it could send troops into
Southeast Asia and take full control over the region's economies.
The truth is at once less sinister and more dangerous. An economic sys­
tem that requires constant growth, while bucking almost all serious attempts
at environmental regulation, generates a steady stream of disasters all on its
own, whether military, ecological or financial. The appetite for easy, shortterm profits offered by purely speculative investment has turned the stock,
currency and real estate markets into crisis-creation machines, as the Asian
financial crisis, the Mexican peso crisis and the dot-com collapse all demon­
strate. Our common addiction to dirty, nonrenewable energy sources keeps
other kinds of emergencies coming: natural disasters (up 430 percent since
1975) and wars waged for control over scarce resources (not just Iraq and
Afghanistan but lower-intensity conflicts such as those that rage in Nigeria,
Colombia and Sudan), which in turn create terrorist blowback (a 2007 study
calculated that the number of terrorist attacks since the start of the Iraq war
had increased sevenfold).

8

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

427

Given the boiling temperatures, both climatic and political, future disas­
ters need not be cooked up in dark conspiracies. All indications are that sim­
ply by staying the current course, they will keep coming with ever more
ferocious intensity. Disaster generation can therefore be left to the market's
invisible hand. This is one area in which it actually delivers.
While the disaster capitalism complex does not deliberately scheme to cre­
ate the cataclysms on which it feeds (though Iraq may be a notable exception),
there is plenty of evidence that its component industries work very hard indeed
to make sure that current disastrous trends continue unchallenged. Large oil
companies have bankrolled the climate-change-denial movement for years;
ExxonMobil has spent an estimated $16 million on the crusade over the past
decade. While this phenomenon is well known, the interplay between disaster
contractors and elite opinion-makers is far less understood. Several influential
Washington think tanks—including the National Institute for Public Policy
and the Center for Security Policy—are heavily funded by weapons and
homeland security contractors, which profit directly from these institutes'
ceaseless portrayal of the world as a dark and menacing place, its troubles re­
sponsive only to force. The homeland security sector is also becoming increas­
ingly integrated with media corporations, a development with Orwellian
implications. In 2004, the digital communications giant LexisNexis paid $775
million for Seisint, a data-mining company that works closely on surveillance
with federal and state agencies. That same year, General Electric, which owns
NBC,

purchased InVision, the major producer of controversial high-tech

bomb-detection devices used in airports and other public spaces. InVision re­
ceived a staggering $15 billion in Homeland Security contracts between 2001
and 2006, more of such contracts than any other company.

9

The creeping expansion of the disaster capitalism complex into media
may prove to be a new kind of corporate synergy, one building on the verti­
cal integration so popular in the nineties. It certainly makes sound business
sense. The more panicked our societies become, convinced that there are
terrorists lurking in every mosque, the higher the news ratings soar, the more
biométrie IDs and liquid-explosive-detection devices the complex sells, and
the more high-tech fences it builds. If the dream of the open, borderless
"small planet" was the ticket to profits in the nineties, the nightmare of the
menacing, fortressed Western continents, under siege from jihadists and ille­
gal immigrants, plays the same role in the new millennium. The only
prospect that threatens the booming disaster economy on which so much
wealth depends—from weapons to oil to engineering to surveillance to

428

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

patented drugs—is the possibility of achieving some measure of climatic sta­
bility and geopolitical peace.

Israel and the Standing Disaster Apartheid State
As analysts struggle to understand the Davos Dilemma, a new consensus is
emerging. It is not that the market has become immune to instability, at least
not exactly. It is that a steady flow of disasters is now so expected that the everadaptable market has changed to fit this new status quo—instability is the new
stability. In discussions of this post-9/11 economic phenomenon, Israel is often
held up as a sort of Exhibit A. For much of the past decade, Israel has been ex­
periencing its own miniaturized Davos Dilemma: wars and terrorist attacks
have been increasing, but the Tel Aviv Stock Exchange has been rising to
record levels right alongside this violence. As one stock analyst noted on Fox
News after the July 7 London bombings, "In Israel they deal with the threat of
10

terror daily, and that market is up for the year." Like the global economy in
general, Israel's political situation is, most agree, disastrous, but its economy has
never been stronger, with 2007 growth rates rivaling those of China and India.
What makes Israel interesting as a guns-and-caviar model is not only that
its economy is resilient in the face of major political shocks such as the 2006
war with Lebanon or Hamas's 2007 takeover of Gaza, but also that Israel has
crafted an economy that expands markedly in direct response to escalating
violence. The reasons for Israeli industry's comfort level with disaster are not
mysterious. Years before U.S. and European companies grasped the poten­
tial of the global security boom, Israeli technology firms were busily pio­
neering the homeland security industry, and they continue to dominate the
sector today. The Israeli Export Institute estimates that Israel has 350 corpo­
rations dedicated to selling homeland security products, and 30 new ones
entered the market in 2007. From a corporate perspective, this development
has made Israel a model to be emulated in the post-9/11 market. From a so­
cial and political perspective, however, Israel should serve as something
else—a stark warning. The fact that Israel continues to enjoy booming pros­
perity, even as it wages war against its neighbors and escalates the brutality in
the occupied territories, demonstrates just how perilous it is to build an
economy based on the premise of continual war and deepening disasters.
Israel's current ability to combine guns and caviar is the culmination of a
dramatic shift in the nature of its economy over the past fifteen years, one

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

429

that has had a profound and little-examined impact on the parallel disinte­
gration of prospects for peace. The last time there was a credible prospect
of peace breaking out in the Middle East was the early nineties, a time when
a powerful constituency of Israelis believed that continued conflict was no
longer an option. Communism had collapsed, the information revolution
was beginning, and there was a widespread conviction inside Israel's busi­
ness community that the bloody occupation of Gaza and the West Bank,
compounded by the boycott of Israel by Arab states, was putting Israel's eco­
nomic future in peril. Seeing the explosion of "emerging markets" around
the world, Israeli corporations were tired of being held back by war; they
wanted to be part of the high-profit borderless world, not penned in by re­
gional strife. If the Israeli government could negotiate some sort of peace
agreement with the Palestinians, Israel's neighbors would have to lift their
boycotts, and the country would be perfectly positioned to be the Middle
East's free-trade hub.
In 1993, Dan Gillerman, then president of the Federation of Israeli
Chambers of Commerce, was a vocal proponent of this position. "Israel
could become just another state . . . or, it could become the strategic, logis­
tic and marketing center of the whole region like a Middle Eastern Singa­
pore or Hong Kong where multinational companies base their head
offices. . . . We are talking about an utterly different economy. . . . Israel
must act and fast to adjust or this once in a lifetime economic opportunity
will be missed only for us to say: 'we could have.' "

n

That same year, Shimon Peres, then foreign minister, explained to a
group of Israeli journalists that peace was now inevitable. It was a very partic­
ular kind of peace, however. "We are not seeking a peace of flags," Peres said,
12

"we are interested in a peace of markets." A few months later, the Israeli
prime minister, Yitzhak Rabin, and the Palestinian Liberation Organization
chairman, Yasser Arafat, shook hands on the White House lawn to mark the
inauguration of the Oslo Accords. The world cheered, the three men shared
the 1994 Nobel Peace Prize—and then it all went horribly wrong.
Oslo may have been the most optimistic period in Israeli-Palestinian rela­
tions, but the famous handshake did not mark the sealing of a deal. It was
merely an agreement to start a process, with all the most contentious questions
left unresolved. Arafat was in a terrible bargaining position, having to negotiate
his own return to the occupied territories, and he secured no agreement on the
fate of Jerusalem, on Palestinian refugees, on Jewish settlers or even on the
right to Palestinian self-determination. The Oslo strategy, the negotiators

430

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

claimed, was to push ahead with the "peace of markets" based on the idea that
the rest would fall into place: by flinging open borders and joining the global­
ization juggernaut, both Israelis and Palestinians were supposed to experience
such concrete improvements in daily life that a more hospitable context would
be created for a "peace of flags" in the negotiations to come. That, at least, was
the Oslo promise.
Many factors contributed to the subsequent breakdown. Israelis tend to
blame suicide bombings and Rabin's assassination. Palestinians point to Is­
rael's frenetic expansion of illegal settlements during the Oslo period as
proof that the peace process was founded, in the words of Shlomo Ben-Ami,
Israel's foreign minister in the Labor government of Ehud Barak, "on a neocolonialist basis," designed so that "when there will finally be peace between
us and the Palestinians, there will be a situation of dependence, of a struc­
13

tured lack of equality between the two entities." The debates about who
derailed the peace process, or whether peace was ever the real goal of the
process, are well known and have been exhaustively explored. However, two
factors that contributed to Israel's retreat into unilateralism are little under­
stood and rarely discussed, both related to the unique ways that the Chicago
School free-market crusade played out in Israel. One was the influx of Soviet
Jews, which was a direct result of Russia's shock therapy experiment. The
other was the flipping of Israel's export economy from one based on tradi­
tional goods and high technology to one disproportionately dependent on
selling expertise and devices relating to counterterrorism. Both factors were
greatly disruptive to the Oslo process: the arrival of Russians reduced Israel's
reliance on Palestinian labor and allowed it to seal in the occupied territo­
ries, while the rapid expansion of the high-tech security economy created a
powerful appetite inside Israel's wealthy and most powerful sectors for aban­
doning peace in favor of fighting a continual, and continuously expanding,
War on Terror.
By unfortunate historical coincidence, the start of the Oslo period coincided
precisely with the most painful phase of the Chicago School experiment in
Russia. The handshake on the White House lawn was on September 13,
1993; exactly three weeks later, Yeltsin sent in the tanks to set fire to the par­
liament building, paving the way for his most brutal dose of economic shock.
Over the course of the 1990s, roughly 1 million Jews left the former So­
viet Union and moved to Israel. Immigrants who came from the former
Soviet Union in this period now make up more than 18 percent of Israel's

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

431

14

total Jewish population. It's hard to overstate the impact of such a large and
rapid population transfer to a country as small as Israel. Proportionally, it
would be the equivalent of every person in Angola, Cambodia and Peru
packing their bags and moving to the United States all at once. In Europe, it
would be equivalent to all of Greece moving to France.
When the first wave of Soviet Jews headed for Israel, many were choos­
ing to live in a Jewish state after a lifetime of religious persecution. Follow­
ing that initial wave, however, the number of Russian immigrants to Israel
increased dramatically and in direct relation to the amount of pain being
inflicted on the Russian people by their economic shock doctors. These
later waves of Soviet immigrants were not idealistic Zionists (many had
quite tenuous claims to being Jewish); they were desperate economic
refugees. "It is not where we are going that is most important, but from
where we are coming," an emigrant waiting outside the Israeli embassy in
Moscow told The Washington Times in 1992. A spokesperson for the Soviet
Jewry Zionist Forum confessed of the exodus that "they are not drawn to Is­
rael, they feel expelled from the U S S R by the political instability and eco­
nomic deterioration there." By far the largest wave came in the wake of
Yeltsin's coup in 1993 —just as the peace process was beginning in Israel.
After that, an additional 600,000 people moved from former Soviet states to
Israel.

15

This demographic transformation upended the agreement's already pre­
carious dynamic. Before the arrival of the Soviet refugees, Israel could not
have severed itself for any length of time from the Palestinian populations in
Gaza and the West Bank; its economy could no more survive without Pales­
tinian labor than California could run without Mexicans. Roughly 150,000
Palestinians left their homes in Gaza and the West Bank every day and trav­
eled to Israel to clean streets and build roads, while Palestinian farmers and
tradespeople filled trucks with goods and sold them in Israel and in other
16

parts of the territories. Each side depended on the other economically, and
Israel took aggressive measures to prevent the Palestinian territories from de­
veloping autonomous trade relationships with Arab states.
Then, just as Oslo came into effect, that deeply interdependent relation­
ship was abruptly severed. Unlike Palestinian workers, whose presence in Is­
rael challenged the Zionist project by making demands on the Israeli state
for restitution of stolen land and for equal citizenship rights, the hundreds of
thousands of Russians who came to Israel at this juncture had the opposite
effect. They bolstered Zionist goals by markedly increasing the ratio of Jews

432

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

to Arabs, while simultaneously providing a new pool of cheap labor. Sud­
denly, Tel Aviv had the power to launch a new era in Palestinian relations.
On March 30, 1993, Israel began its policy of "closure," sealing off the bor­
der between Israel and the occupied territories, often for days or weeks at a
time, preventing Palestinians from getting to their jobs and selling their
goods. Closure began as a temporary measure, ostensibly as an emergency
response to the threat of terrorism. It quickly became the new status quo,
with territories sealed off not just from Israel but from each other, policed
through an ever more elaborate and demeaning system of checkpoints.
Nineteen ninety-three had been held up as the dawn of a new hopeful
era; instead, it was the year that the occupied territories were transformed
from run-down dormitories housing the underclass of the Israeli state into
suffocating prisons. In this same period, between 1993 and 2000, the Israeli
17

settlers living in the occupied territories doubled their numbers. What had
been in many places rough-hewn settler outposts were transformed into
lush, fortified suburbs with their own restricted-access roads, clearly de­
signed to be an addition to the Israeli state. During the Oslo years, Israel also
continued to claim key water reserves in the West Bank, feeding the settle­
ments and diverting scarce water back to Israel.
The new immigrants played a little-examined part here as well. Many res­
idents of the former Soviet Union who arrived in Israel penniless after seeing
their life savings disappear in the shock therapy devaluations were easily
lured into the occupied territories, where houses and apartments were far
cheaper, and special loans and bonuses were on offer. Some of the most am­
bitious settlements —such as Ariel in the West Bank, which boasts a univer­
sity, a hotel and a Texas mini golf course—aggressively recruited in the
former Soviet Union, sending scouts and launching Russian-language Web
sites. Ariel managed to double its population thanks to this approach, and to­
day it stands as a kind of mini-Moscow, with store signs advertising in both
Hebrew and Russian. Half its residents are new immigrants from the former
Soviet Union. The Israeli group Peace Now estimates that about twenty-five
thousand Israeli citizens living in illegal settlements fall into this category,
and it also notes that many Russians made the move "without a clear under­
standing of where they were going."

18

In Israel, the years after the Oslo Accords delivered on their promise of
trading conflict for prosperity in dramatic fashion. In the mid- and late
nineties, Israeli companies took the global economy by storm, particularly
high-tech firms specializing in telecommunications and Web technology,

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

433

with Tel Aviv and Haifa becoming Middle Eastern outposts of Silicon Val­
ley. At the peak of the dot-com bubble, 15 percent of Israel's gross domestic
product came from high tech and about half its exports. That made Israel's
economy "the most tech-dependent in the world," according to Business­
Week—twice

as dependent as the United States.

19

Once again, the new arrivals played a decisive role in the boom. Among the
hundreds of thousands of Soviets who came to Israel in the nineties were more
highly trained scientists than Israel's top tech institute had graduated in the
eighty years of its existence. These were many of the scientists who had kept up
the Soviet side of the Cold War—and as one Israeli economist put it, they be­
came "the rocket fuel for [Israel's] tech industry." Shlomo Ben-Ami describes
the years after the White House handshake as "one of the most breathtaking
eras of economic growth and opening up of markets in [Israel's] history."

20

That opening of markets had promised to benefit both sides in the con­
flict, but with the exception of a corrupt elite around Arafat, Palestinians
were conspicuously absent from the post-Oslo boom. The biggest obstacle
was closure, a policy that was never once lifted in the fourteen years since it
was first imposed in 1993. According to the Harvard Middle East specialist
Sara Roy, when the borders were abruptly sealed in 1993, the effects on
Palestinian economic life were catastrophic. "Closure has been the single
most damaging feature to the economy during the Oslo period and since,
the one measure that has imposed the greatest damage on an already com­
promised economy," she said in an interview.
Workers couldn't work, traders couldn't sell their goods, farmers couldn't
reach their fields. In 1993 per capita GNP in the occupied territories plum­
meted close to 30 percent; by the following year, poverty among Palestinians
was up 33 percent. By 1996, says Roy, who has extensively documented the
economic impact of closure, "66 per cent of the Palestinian labor force was
either unemployed or severely under-employed."

21

Far from a "peace of mar­

kets," what Oslo meant for Palestinians was disappearing markets, less work,
less freedom—and, crucially, as the settlements expanded, less land. It was
this utterly untenable situation that turned the occupied territories into the
tinderbox that went up in flames when Ariel Sharon visited the site in
Jerusalem called al-Haram al-Sharif by Muslims (by Jews, the Temple
Mount) in September 2000, setting off the second intifada.
In Israel and the international press, it is generally argued that the reason the
peace process collapsed was that Ehud Barak's offer at Camp David in July

434

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

2000 was the best deal the Palestinians were ever going to get, and Arafat
turned his back on Israel's generosity, thus proving that he was never gen­
uine in the quest for peace. After that experience, and the eruption of the
second intifada, Israelis lost faith in negotiation, elected Ariel Sharon and
started building what they call the security barrier, and Palestinians call the
Apartheid Wall—the network of concrete walls and steel fences that pro­
trudes from the 1967 green-line border, reaching hungrily into Palestinian
territory and pulling huge settlement blocks into the Israeli state, as well as
30 percent of the water sources in some areas.

22

There is no doubt that Arafat wanted a better deal than the ones produced
either at Camp David or Taba in January 2001, but these deals were also not
the prizes they have been made out to be. Though consistently presented by Is­
raelis as an offer unparalleled in its generosity, Camp David would have pro­
vided almost no redress to Palestinians who had been forced from their homes
and land when the Israeli state was created in 1948, and it did not come close
to satisfying the minimal rights of Palestinians to self-determination. In 2006,
Shlomo Ben-Ami, a lead negotiator for the Israeli government at both Camp
David and Taba, broke ranks with the party line and admitted that "Camp
David was not the missed opportunity for the Palestinians, and if I were Pales­
tinian I would have rejected Camp David, as well."

23

There were other factors contributing to Tel Aviv's abandonment of seri­
ous negotiations at peace talks post-2001 —factors just as powerful as Arafat's
alleged intransigence or Sharon's personal drive to create a "greater Israel."
One related to the rise of Israel's tech economy. In the early nineties, Israel's
economic elites wanted peace for prosperity, but the kind of prosperity they
then built during the Oslo years ended up relying far less on peace than they
had originally assumed. When Israel's niche in the global economy turned
out to be information technologies, it meant that the key to growth was send­
ing software and computer chips to Los Angeles and London, not shipping
heavy cargo to Beirut and Damascus. Success in the tech sector did not re­
quire Israel to have friendly relationships with its Arab neighbors or to end its
occupation of the territories. The rise of the tech economy was only the first
phase of Israel's fateful economic transformation, however. The second
came after the dot-com economy crashed in 2000, and Israel's leading com­
panies needed to find a new niche in the global market.
With the most tech-dependent economy in the world, Israel was hit
harder by the dot-com crash than anywhere else. The country went into im­
mediate free fall, and by June 2001, analysts were predicting that roughly

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

635

three hundred high-tech Israeli firms would go bankrupt, with tens of thou­
sands of layoffs. The Tel Aviv business newspaper Globes declared in a head­
line that 2002 was the "Worst Year for Israeli Economy Since 1953."

24

The only reason the recession was not even worse, the newspaper ob­
served, was that the Israeli government quickly intervened with a powerful
10.7 percent increase in military spending, partially financed through cut­
backs in social services. The government also encouraged the tech industry
to branch out from information and communication technologies and into
security and surveillance. In this period, the Israeli Defence Forces played a
role similar to a business incubator. Young Israeli soldiers experimented with
network systems and surveillance devices while they fulfilled their manda­
tory military service, then turned their findings into business plans when
they returned to civilian life. A slew of new start-ups were launched, special­
izing in everything from "search and nail" data mining, to surveillance cam­
25

eras, to terrorist profiling. When the market for these services and devices
exploded in the years after September 11, the Israeli state openly embraced
a new national economic vision: the growth provided by the dot-com bubble
would be replaced with a homeland security boom. It was the perfect mar­
riage of the Likud Party's hawkishness and its radical embrace of Chicago
School economics, as embodied by Sharon's finance minister, Benjamin
Netanyahu, and Israel's new central bank chief, Stanley Fischer, chief archi­
tect of the IMF's shock therapy adventures in Russia and Asia.
By 2003, Israel was already making a stunning recovery, and by 2004 the
country had seemed to pull off a miracle: after its calamitous crash, it was
performing better than almost any Western economy. Much of this growth
was due to Israel's savvy positioning of itself as a kind of shopping mall for
homeland security technologies. The timing was perfect. Governments
around the world were suddenly desperate for terrorist hunting tools, as well
as for human intelligence know-how in the Arab world. Under the leadership
of the Likud Party, the Israeli state billed itself as a showroom for the cuttingedge homeland security state, drawing on its decades of experience and ex­
pertise fighting Arab and Muslim threats. Israel's pitch to North America and
Europe was straightforward: the War on Terror you are just embarking on is
one we have been fighting since our birth. Let our high-tech firms and pri­
vatized spy companies show you how it's done.
Overnight, Israel became, in the words of Forbes magazine, "the go-to
26

country for antiterrorism technologies." Every year since 2002, Israel has
played host to at least half a dozen major homeland security conferences for

636

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

lawmakers, police chiefs, sheriffs and C E O s from around the world, with
their size and scope growing annually. As traditional tourism suffered in the
face of security fears, this kind of official counterterror tourism emerged to
partially fill the gap.
During one such gathering in February 2006, billed as a "behind-thescenes tour of [Israel's] struggle against terrorism," delegates from the FBI, Mi­
crosoft and Singapore's Mass Transit System (among others) traveled to some
of Israel's most popular tourism destinations: the Knesset, the Temple Mount,
the Wailing Wall. At each location, the visitors examined and admired the
fortress-style security systems to see what they could apply at home. In May
2007, Israel hosted the directors of several large U.S. airports, who attended
workshops on the types of aggressive passenger profiling and screening used at
Ben Gurion International Airport near Tel Aviv. Steven Grossman, head of
aviation at the international airport in Oakland, California, explained that he
was there because "the Israelis are legendary for their security." Some of the
events are macabre and theatrical. At the International Homeland Security
Conference 2006, for instance, the Israeli military staged an elaborate "simu­
lation of a mass casualty disaster that started in the City of Ness Ziona and con­
cluded in Asaf Harofeh Hospital," according to the organizers.

27

These are not policy conferences, but highly lucrative trade shows de­
signed to demonstrate the prowess of Israeli security firms. As a result, Israel's
exports in counter terrorism-related products and services increased by 15
percent in 2006 and were projected to grow by 20 percent in 2007, totalling
$1.2 billion annually. The country's defense exports in 2006 reached a record
$3.4 billion (compared to $1.6 billion in 1992), making Israel the fourth
largest arms dealer in the world, larger than the U.K. Israel has more technol­
ogy stocks listed on the Nasdaq exchange — many of them security related—
than any other foreign country, and it has more tech patents registered in the
U.S. than China and India combined. Its technology sector, much of it
linked to security, now makes up 60 percent of all exports.

28

Len Rosen, a prominent Israeli investment banker, told Fortune magazine,
"It's security that matters more than peace." During Oslo, "people were looking
for peace to provide growth. Now they're looking for security so violence doesn't
29

curtail growth." He could have gone much further: the business of providing
"security"—in Israel and around the world—is directly responsible for much of
Israel's meteoric economic growth in recent years. It is not an exaggeration to
say that the War on Terror industry saved Israel's faltering economy, much as
the disaster capitalism complex helped rescue the global stock markets.

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

437

ere is a small sample of the industry's reach:
A call made to the New York Police Department will be recorded
and analyzed on technology created by Nice Systems, an Israeli
firm. Nice also monitors communication for the L.A. Police and
Time Warner, as well as providing video surveillance cameras to
Ronald Reagan National Airport, among dozens of other top
clients.

30

Images captured in the London tube system are recorded on Verint
video surveillance cameras, owned by the Israeli technology giant
Comverse. Verint surveillance gear is also used at the U.S. Depart­
ment of Defense, Washington's Dulles International Airport, on
Capitol Hill and the Montreal Métro. The company has surveillance
clients in more than fifty countries and also helps corporate giants
like Home Depot and Target keep an eye on their workers.

31

Employees of the cities of Los Angeles and Columbus, Ohio, carry
electronic "smartcard" IDs made by the Israeli company SuperCom,
which boasts the former CIA director James Woolsey as the chair of its
advisory board. An unnamed European country has gone with Super­
Com for a national ID program; another has commissioned a pilot pro­
gram for "biométrie passports," both highly controversial initiatives.

32

The firewalls in the computer networks of some of the largest elec­
tricity companies in the U.S. were built by the Israeli tech giant
Check Point, though the corporations have chosen to keep their
names secret. According to the company, "89% of Fortune 500 com­
panies use Check Point security solutions."

33

In the run-up to the 2007 Super Bowl, all the workers at the Miami
International Airport received training to identify "bad people, not
just bad things" using a psychological system called Behavior Pattern
Recognition, developed by the Israeli firm New Age Security Solu­
tions. The company's C E O is the former head of security at Israel's
Ben Gurion Airport. Other airports that have contracted with New
Age in recent years to train workers in passenger profiling include
Boston, San Francisco, Glasgow, Athens and London Heathrow, as
well as many others. Port workers in the conflict-ridden Niger Delta
have received New Age training, as have employees at the Nether­
lands Ministry of Justice, guards for the Statue of Liberty and agents
with the New York Police Department's Counter Terrorism Bureau.

34

438

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

• When the wealthy New Orleans neighborhood of Audubon Place de­
cided it needed its own police force after Hurricane Katrina, it hired
the Israel private security firm Instinctive Shooting International.

35

• Agents with the Royal Canadian Mounted Police, Canada's federal
police agency, have received training from International Security In­
structors, a Virginia-based company that specializes in training law
enforcement and soldiers. Advertising its "hard won Israeli experience,"
its instructors are "veterans of Israeli special task forces from . . . Israel
Defense Force, Israel National Police Counter Terrorism units [and]
General Security Services (GSS or 'Shin Beit')." The company's elite
list of clients includes the FBI, the U.S. Army, the U.S. Marine Corps,
the U.S. Navy SEALs, and London's Metropolitan Police Service.

36

• In April 2007, special immigration agents with the U.S. Department
of Homeland Security, working along the Mexican border, went
through an intensive eight-day training course put on by the Golan
Group. The Golan Group was founded by ex-Israeli Special Forces
officers and boasts more than 3,500 employees in seven countries.
"Essentially we put an Israeli security spin on our procedures,"
Thomas Pearson, the company's head of operations, explained of the
training course, which covered everything from hand-to-hand com­
bat to target practice to "getting really proactive with their SUV."
The Golan Group, now based in Florida but still marketing its Israeli
advantage, also produces X-ray machines, metal detectors and rifles.
In addition to many governments and celebrities, its clients include
ExxonMobil, Shell, Texaco, Levi's, Sony, Citigroup and Pizza Hut.

37

• When Buckingham Palace needed a new security system, it selected
a design by Magal, one of two Israeli companies that have been most
involved in building the Israeli "security barrier."

38

• When Boeing begins building the planned $2.5 billion "virtual
fences" on the U.S. borders with Mexico and Canada—complete
with electronic sensors, unmanned aircraft, surveillance cameras and
eighteen hundred towers—one of its main partners will be Elbit. Elbit is the other Israeli firm most involved in building Israel's hugely
controversial wall, which is "the largest construction project in Is­
rael's history" and has also cost $2.5 billion.

39

With more and more countries turning themselves into fortresses (walls and
high-tech fences are going up on the border between India and Kashmir, Saudi

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

439

Arabia and Iraq, Afghanistan and Pakistan), "security barriers" may prove to be
the biggest disaster market of all. That's why Elbit and Magal don't mind the re­
lentless negative publicity that Israel's wall attracts around the world—in fact,
they consider it free advertising. "People believe we are the only ones who have
experience testing this equipment in real life," explained Magal C E O Jacob
40

Even-Ezra. Elbit and Magal have seen their stock prices more than double
since September 11, a standard performance for Israeli homeland security
stocks. Verint—dubbed "the granddaddy of the video surveillance space"—
wasn't profitable at all before September 11, but between 2002 and 2006 its
stock price has more than tripled, thanks to the surveillance boom.

41

The extraordinary performance of Israel's homeland security companies
is well known to stock watchers, but it is rarely discussed as a factor in the
politics of the region. It should be. It is not a coincidence that the Israeli
state's decision to put "counterterrorism" at the center of its export economy
has coincided precisely with its abandonment of peace negotiations, as well
as a clear strategy to reframe its conflict with the Palestinians not as a battle
against a nationalist movement with specific goals for land and rights but
rather as part of the global War on Terror—one against illogical, fanatical
forces bent only on destruction.
Economics is by no means the primary motivator for the escalation in the
region since 2001. There is, of course, no shortage of fuel for violence on all
sides. Yet within this context that is so weighted against peace, economics
has, at certain points, been a countervailing force, pushing reluctant politi­
cal leaders into negotiations, as was the case in the early nineties. What the
homeland security boom has done is change the direction of that pressure,
creating yet another powerful sector invested in continued violence.
As has been the case on previous Chicago School frontiers, Israel's post9/1 1 growth spurt has been marked by the rapid stratification of society
between rich and poor inside the state. The security buildup has been ac­
companied by a wave of privatizations and funding cuts to social programs
that has virtually annihilated the economic legacy of Labor Zionism and
created an epidemic of inequality the likes of which Israelis have never
known. In 2007, 24.4 percent of Israelis were living below the poverty line,
with 35.2 percent of all children in poverty—compared with 8 percent
of children twenty years earlier.

42

Yet even though the benefits of the

boom have not been widely shared, they have been so lucrative for a small
sector of Israelis, particularly the powerful segment that is seamlessly
integrated into both the military and government (with all the familiar

440

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

corporatist corruption scandals), that a crucial incentive for peace has been
obliterated.
The Israeli business sector's shift in political direction has been dramatic.
The vision that captivates the Tel Aviv Stock Exchange today is no longer
that of Israel as a regional trade hub but rather as a futuristic fortress, able to
survive even in a sea of determined enemies. The revised attitude was most
pronounced in the summer of 2006, when the Israeli government turned
what should have been a prisoner exchange negotiation with Hezbollah into
a full-scale war. Israel's largest corporations didn't just support the war, they
sponsored it. Bank Leumi, Israel's newly privatized megabank, distributed
bumper stickers with the slogans "We Will Be Victorious" and "We Are
Strong," while, as the Israeli journalist and novelist Yitzhak Laor wrote at the
time, "the current war is the first to become a branding opportunity for one
of our largest mobile phone companies, which is using it to run a huge pro­
motional campaign."

43

Clearly, Israeli industry no longer has reason to fear war. In contrast to
1993, when conflict was seen as a barrier to growth, the Tel Aviv Stock Ex­
change went up in August 2006, the month of the devastating war with
Lebanon. In the final quarter of the year, which had also included the
bloody escalation in the West Bank and Gaza following the election of
Hamas, Israel's overall economy grew by a staggering 8 percent—more than
triple the growth rate of the U.S. economy in the same period. The Palestin­
ian economy, meanwhile, contracted by between 10 and 15 percent in
2006, with poverty rates reaching close to 70 percent.

44

One month after the UN declared a cease-fire between Israel and Hezbol­
lah, the New York Stock Exchange hosted a special conference on investing
in Israel. More than two hundred Israeli firms attended, many of them in the
homeland security sector. At that moment in Lebanon, economic activity
was at a virtual standstill and roughly 140 factories—manufacturers of every­
thing from prefab homes to medical products to milk—were clearing away
the rubble after being hit by Israeli bombs and missiles. Impervious to the im­
pact of the war, the message of the New York gatherings was upbeat: "Israel is
open for business—has always been open for business," announced Israel's
ambassador to the United Nations, Dan Gillerman, welcoming delegates to
the event.

45

Only a decade earlier, this kind of wartime exuberance would have been
unimaginable. It was Gillerman who, as head of the Israeli Federation of
Chambers of Commerce, had called for Israel to seize the historic opportu-

LOSING THE PEACE INCENTIVE

441

nity and become "a Middle Eastern Singapore." Now he was one of the most
inflammatory of Israel's pro-war hawks, pushing for an even wider escalation.
On CNN, Gillerman said that "while it may be politically incorrect and
maybe even untrue to say that all Muslims are terrorists, it happens to be very
true that nearly all terrorists are Muslim. So this is not just Israel's war. This
is the world's war."

46

This recipe for endless worldwide war is the same one that the Bush ad­
ministration offered as a business prospectus to the nascent disaster capitalism
complex after September 11. It is not a war that can be won by any country,
but winning is not the point. The point is to create "security" inside fortress
states bolstered by endless low-level conflict outside their walls. In a way, it is
the same goal that the private security companies have in Iraq: secure the
perimeter, protect the principal. Baghdad, New Orleans and Sandy Springs
provide glimpses of a kind of gated future built and run by the disaster capi­
talism complex. It is in Israel, however, that this process is most advanced: an
entire country has turned itself into a fortified gated community, surrounded
by locked-out people living in permanently excluded red zones. This is what
a society looks like when it has lost its economic incentive for peace and is
heavily invested in fighting and profiting from an endless and unwinnable
War on Terror. One part looks like Israel; the other part looks like Gaza.
Israel's case is extreme, but the kind of society it is creating may not be
unique. The disaster capitalism complex thrives in conditions of lowintensity grinding conflict. That seems to be the end point in all the disaster
zones, from New Orleans to Iraq. In April 2007, U.S. soldiers began imple­
menting a plan to turn several volatile Baghdad neighborhoods into "gated
communities," surrounded by checkpoints and concrete walls, where resi­
dents would be tracked using biométrie technology. "We'll be like the Pales­
tinians," predicted one resident of Adhamiya, watching his neighborhood
47

being sealed in by the barrier. After it becomes clear that Baghdad is never
going to be Dubai, and New Orleans won't be Disneyland, Plan B is to settle
into another Colombia or Nigeria —never-ending war, fought in large mea­
sure by private soldiers and paramilitaries, damped down just enough to get
the natural resources out of the ground, helped along by mercenaries guard­
ing the pipelines, platforms and water reserves.
It has become commonplace to compare the militarized ghettos of Gaza
and the West Bank, with their concrete walls, electrified fences and check­
points, to the Bantustan system in South Africa, which kept blacks in ghettos
and demanded passes when they left. "Israel's laws and practices in the O P T

U2

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

[occupied Palestinian territories] certainly resemble aspects of apartheid,"
said John Dugard, the South African lawyer who is the UN's special rappor­
48

teur on human rights in the Palestinian territories, in February 2007. The
similarities are stark, but there are differences too. South Africa's Bantustans
were essentially work camps, a way to keep African laborers under tight sur­
veillance and control so they would work cheaply in the mines. What Israel
has constructed is a system designed to do the opposite: to keep workers from
working, a network of open holding pens for millions of people who have
been categorized as surplus humanity.
Palestinians are not the only people in the world who have been so cate­
gorized: millions of Russians also became surplus in their own country,
which is why so many fled their homes in the hope of finding a job and a de­
cent life in Israel. Although the original Bantustans have been dismantled in
South Africa, the one in four people who live in shacks in fast-expanding
49

slums are also surplus in the new, neoliberal South Africa. This discarding
of 25 to 60 percent of the population has been the hallmark of the Chicago
School crusade since the "misery villages" began mushrooming throughout
the Southern Cone in the seventies. In South Africa, Russia and New Or­
leans the rich build walls around themselves. Israel has taken this disposal
process a step further: it has built walls around the dangerous poor.

CONCLUSION

SHOCK W E A R S OFF
THE R I S E OF P E O P L E ' S R E C O N S T R U C T I O N

I want to s a y to y o u , m y Indian brothers concentrated here in
Bolivia, that the five-hundred-year c a m p a i g n of resistance h a s not
been in vain. This democratic, cultural fight is part of the fight of
our a n c e s t o r s , it is the continuity of the fight of [the i n d i g e n o u s
anticolonial leader] Tupac Katari, it is a continuity of the fight of
Che Guevara.
— E v o M o r a l e s , after being s w o r n in a s president of Bolivia, J a n u a r y
22, 2 0 0 6

1

People know best. They k n o w every corner and every detail of
their community best. They a l s o k n o w their w e a k points.
—Pichit Ratakul, executive director of the A s i a n D i s a s t e r P r e p a r e d ­
n e s s Center, October 30, 2 0 0 6

2

The people from the barrio built the city twice: during the day we
built the h o u s e s of the well-off. At night and at w e e k e n d s , with
solidarity, we built our own h o m e s , our barrio.
— A n d r e s Antillano, resident of C a r a c a s , April 15, 2 0 0 4

3

When Milton Friedman died in November 2006, many of the obituaries
were imbued with a sense of fear that his death marked the end of an era. In
Canada's National Post, Terence Corcoran, one of Friedman's most devoted
disciples, wondered whether the global movement the economist

had

launched could carry on. "As the last great lion of free market economics,

UkU

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

Friedman leaves a void. . . . There is no one alive today of equal stature. Will
the principles Friedman fought for and articulated survive over the long
term without a new generation of solid, charismatic and able intellectual
leadership? Hard to say."

4

Corcoran's grim assessment did not begin to encompass the state of disar­
ray in which the quest for unfettered capitalism found itself that November.
Friedman's intellectual heirs in the United States, the neocons who
launched the disaster capitalism complex, were at the lowest point in their
history. The movement's pinnacle had been the winning of the U.S. Con­
gress by the Republicans in 1994; just nine days before Friedman's death,
they lost it again to a Democratic majority. The three key issues that con­
tributed to the Republican defeat in the 2006 midterm elections were politi­
cal corruption, the mismanagement of the Iraq war and the perception, best
articulated by a winning Democratic candidate for the U.S. Senate, Jim
Webb, that the country had drifted "toward a class-based system, the likes of
5

which we have not seen since the 19th century." In each case, the core
tenets of Chicago School economics—privatization, deregulation and cuts
to government services—had laid the foundation for the breakdowns.
In 1976, Orlando Letelier, one of the counterrevolution's first victims,
had insisted that the massive wealth inequalities that the Chicago Boys
opened up in Chile were "not an economic liability but a temporary politi­
cal success." For Letelier, it was obvious that the dictatorship's "free market"
rules were doing exactly what they were designed to do: they were not creat­
ing a perfectly harmonious economy but turning the already wealthy into
the superrich and the organized working class into the disposable poor.
These patterns of stratification have been repeated everywhere that the
Chicago School ideology has triumphed. In China, despite its stunning eco­
nomic growth, the gap between the incomes of city dwellers and the 800
million rural poor has doubled over the past twenty years. In Argentina,
where in 1970 the richest 10 percent of the population earned 12 times as
much as the poorest, the rich were by 2002 earning 43 times as much. Chile's
"political success" has truly been globalized. In December 2006, a month af­
ter Friedman died, a UN study found that "the richest 2 per cent of adults in
the world own more than half of global household wealth." The shift has
been starkest in the U.S., where C E O s made 43 times what the average
worker earned in 1980, when Reagan kicked off the Friedmanite crusade. By
2005, C E O s earned 411 times as much. For those executives, the counter­
revolution that began in the basement of the Social Sciences building in the

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

445

1950s has indeed been a success, but the cost of that victory has been the
widespread loss of faith in the core free-market promise—that increased
wealth will be shared. As Webb said during the midterm campaign, "Trickledown economics didn't happen."

6

The hoarding of so much wealth by a tiny minority of the world's popula­
tion was not a peaceful process, as we have seen, nor, often, was it a legal
one. Corcoran was right to question the caliber of the movement's leader­
ship, but the problem was not simply that there were no figureheads of
Friedman's stature. It was that many of the men who had been on the front
lines of the international drive to liberate the markets from all restrictions
were at that moment caught up in an astonishing array of scandals and crim­
inal proceedings, dating from the earliest laboratories in Latin America to
the most recent one in Iraq. Throughout its thirty-five-year history, the
Chicago School agenda has advanced through the intimate cooperation of
powerful business figures, crusading ideologues and strong-arm political
leaders. By 2006, key players from each camp were either in jail or up on
charges.
Augusto Pinochet, the first leader to put Friedman's shock treatment into
effect, was under house arrest (though he died before trials could go ahead
on either the corruption or murder charges). The day after Friedman died,
Uruguayan police came to arrest to Juan Maria Bordaberry on charges re­
lated to the killing of four prominent leftists in 1976. Bordaberry had led
Uruguay during its brutal embrace of Chicago School economics, with
Friedman's colleagues and students serving as prominent advisers. In Ar­
gentina, the courts have stripped the country's former junta leaders of im­
munity, sending ex-president Jorge Videla and Admiral Emilio Massera to
jail for life. Domingo Cavallo, who had headed the central bank during the
dictatorship and had gone on to impose the sweeping shock therapy pro­
gram under democracy, was also indicted on charges of "fraud in public ad­
ministration." A debt deal that Cavallo engineered with foreign banks in
2001 cost the country tens of billions of dollars, and the judge, who froze $10
million of Cavallo's personal assets, asserted that the administration had
acted with "absolute consciousness" of the detrimental outcome.

7

In Bolivia, former president Gonzalo Sanchez de Lozada, in whose living
room the economic "atomic bomb" had been built, was wanted on several
charges relating to the gunning down of protesters and his signing of con­
8

tracts with foreign gas companies that allegedly violated Bolivian laws. In
Russia, not only had the Harvard Men been found guilty of fraud but many

U6

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

of the Russian oligarchs, the well-connected businessmen who made bil­
lions from the overnight privatizations that the Harvard team had helped en­
gineer, were either in jail or living in exile. Mikhail Khodorkovsky, former
head of the oil giant Yukos, was serving an eight-year sentence in a Siberian
prison. His colleague and principal shareholder, Leonid Nevzlin, was in ex­
ile in Israel, as was fellow oligarch Vladimir Gusinsky, while the infamous
Boris Berezovsky had settled in London, unable to return to Moscow for fear
9

of arrest on fraud charges; yet all these men deny wrongdoing. Conrad
Black, who, with his newspaper chain, was the most powerful ideological
amplifier of Friedmanism in Canada, was facing charges in the U.S. that he
had defrauded the shareholders of Hollinger International, treating the com­
pany, according to prosecutors, like "the bank of Conrad Black." Also in the
United States, Enron's Ken Lay—the poster boy for the ill effects of energy
deregulation —died in July 2006, having been convicted of conspiracy and
fraud. And Grover Norquist, the Friedmanite think-tanker who had made
progressives' hair stand on end by declaring, "I don't want to abolish govern­
ment. I simply want to reduce it to the size where I can drag it into the bath­
room and drown it in the bathtub," was neck-deep in the influence-peddling
scandal surrounding the Washington lobbyist Jack Abramoff, though no
charges had been laid.

10

Despite the attempts of everyone from Pinochet to Cavallo to Berezovsky
to Black to portray himself as a victim of baseless political persecution, this
list, by no means complete, represents a radical departure from the neolib­
eral creation myth. The economic crusade managed to cling to a veneer of
respectability and lawfulness as it progressed. Now that veneer was being very
publicly stripped away to reveal a system of gross wealth inequalities, often
opened up with the aid of grotesque criminality.
Besides legal trouble, there was another cloud on the horizon. The effects
of the shocks that had been so integral to creating the illusion of ideological
consensus were beginning to wear off. Rodolfo Walsh, another early casu­
alty, had regarded the Chicago School ascendancy in Argentina as a setback,
not a lasting defeat. The terror tactics used by the junta had put his country
into a state of shock, but Walsh knew that shock, by its very nature, is a tempo­
rary state. Before he was gunned down on the streets of Buenos Aires, Walsh es­
timated that it would take twenty to thirty years until the effects of the terror
receded and Argentines regained their footing, courage and confidence, ready
once again to fight for economic and social equality. It was in 2001, twentyfour years later, that Argentina erupted in protest against IMF-prescribed

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

kkl

austerity measures and then proceeded to force out five presidents in only
three weeks.
I was living in Buenos Aires in that period, and people kept exclaiming,
"The dictatorship just ended!" At the time I didn't understand the meaning
behind the jubilation, since the dictatorship had been over for seventeen
years. Now I think I do: the state of shock had finally worn off, just as Walsh
predicted.
In the years since, that wide-awake shock resistance has spread to many
other former shock labs—Chile, Bolivia, China, Lebanon. And as people
shed the collective fear that was first instilled with tanks and cattle prods,
with sudden flights of capital and brutal cutbacks, many are demanding
more democracy and more control over markets. These demands represent
the greatest threat of all to Friedman's legacy because they challenge his
most central claim: that capitalism and freedom are part of the same indivis­
ible project.
The Bush administration remains so committed to perpetuating this false
union that, in 2002, it embedded it in the National Security Strategy of the
United States of America. "The great struggles of the twentieth century be­
tween liberty and totalitarianism ended with a decisive victory for the forces
of freedom—a single sustainable model for national success: freedom,
11

democracy and free enterprise." This assertion, made with the full force of
the U.S. military arsenal behind it, was not enough to hold back the tide of
citizens using their various freedoms to reject free-market orthodoxy—even
in the United States. As a headline in The Miami Herald

after the 2006

midterm elections put it, "Democrats won big by opposing free-trade agree­
ments." A New York Times/CBS

poll a few months later found that 64 per­

cent of U.S. citizens believed the government should guarantee health care
coverage to all and "showed a striking willingness... to make tradeoffs" to
achieve that goal, including paying up to $500 a year more in taxes.

12

On the international stage, the staunchest opponents of neoliberal eco­
nomics were winning election after election. The Venezuelan president
Hugo Chavez, running on a platform of "21st Century Socialism," was re­
elected in 2006 for a third term with 63 percent of the vote. Despite attempts
by the Bush administration to paint Venezuela as a pseudodemocracy, a poll
that same year recorded that 57 percent of Venezuelans were happy with the
state of their democracy, an approval rating on the continent second only to
Uruguay's, where the left-wing coalition party Frente Amplio had been
elected to government and where a series of référendums had blocked major

US

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

13

privatizations. In other words, in the two Latin American states where vot­
ing had resulted in real challenges to the Washington Consensus, citizens
had renewed their faith in the power of democracy to improve their lives. In
stark contrast to this enthusiasm, in countries where economic policies re­
main largely unchanged regardless of the promises made during campaigns,
polls consistently track an eroding faith in democracy, reflected in dwindling
turnout for elections, deep cynicism toward politicians and a rise in religious
fundamentalism.
More clashes between free markets and free people took place in Europe
in 2005, when the European Constitution was rejected in two national
référendums. In France, the document came to be seen as the codification
of the corporatist order. It was the first time citizens had ever been asked for
their direct input into whether free-market rules should reign in Europe, and
they seized the opportunity to say no. As the Paris-based author and activist
Susan George put it, "People really didn't know Europe was all encapsu­
lated, all written down in a single document. . . . Once you start to quote it,
and people find out what's actually in this and find out what's going to be
constitutionalized and not révisable and not amendable, they get scared to
death."

14

The powerful rejection of what the French call "savage capitalism" takes
many different forms, including reactionary and racist ones. In the U.S., rage
at the shrinking of the middle class has been easily redirected to calls for bor­
der fences, with CNN's Lou Dobbs leading a nightly campaign against the
"invasion of illegal aliens" waging "war on the American middle class" —
stealing jobs, spreading crime, as well as bringing in "highly contagious dis­
15

eases." (This kind of scapegoating provoked the largest immigrants' rights
protests in U.S. history, with more than a million people participating in a
series of marches in 2006—another sign of a new fearlessness among casual­
ties of economic shocks.)
In the Netherlands, the 2005 referendum on the European Constitution
was similarly hijacked by anti-immigration parties, turning it into a vote less
against a corporate order than against the specter of Polish tradespeople
flooding into Western Europe to push down wages. What drove many voters
in both the French and Dutch référendums was "fear of the Polish
plumber"—or "plumber phobia," in the words of the former European
Union commissioner Pascal Lamy.

16

In Poland, meanwhile, the backlash against the policies that impoverished
so many in the nineties has unleashed its own set of disturbing phobias.

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

U9

When Solidarity betrayed the workers who had built the movement, many
Poles turned to new organizations, eventually putting the ultraconservative
Law and Justice Party into power. Poland is now ruled by President Lech
Kaczyriski, a disaffected Solidarity activist who, when he was mayor of War­
saw, made a name for himself by banning a gay-pride-day march and partic­
ipating in a "normal people pride" event.* Kaczyriski and his twin brother,
Jaroslaw (now prime minister), won the 2005 elections with a campaign
largely based on rhetoric attacking Chicago School policies. Their main op­
ponents were promising to do away with the public pension system and to in­
troduce a 15 percent flat tax—both straight out of the Friedman playbook.
The twins pointed out that these policies would steal from the poor and en­
rich a nexus of big-business and on-the-take politicians. When the Law and
Justice Party came to power, however, it switched its aim to easier targets:
gays, Jews, feminists, foreigners, Communists. As one Polish newspaper edi­
tor put it, "Their project is definitely an indictment of the past 17 years."

17

In Russia, the Putin era is seen by many as a similar backlash against the
shock therapy era. With tens of millions of impoverished citizens still ex­
cluded from the fast-growing economy, politicians have no difficulty riling up
public sentiment about the events of the early nineties, which are frequently
portrayed as a foreign conspiracy to bring the Soviet empire to its knees and
18

put Russia "under external management." Despite the fact that Putin's legal
moves against several oligarchs have mostly been symbolic—with a new
breed of "state oligarch" rising around the Kremlin—the memory of the
chaos of the nineties has made many Russians grateful for the order Putin has
restored, even as growing numbers of journalists and other critics die mysteri­
ously, and the secret police enjoy seemingly total impunity.
With socialism still closely associated with the decades of brutality carried
out in its name, public anger has few outlets for expression except national­
ism and protofascism. Incidents of ethnic-based violence are up roughly 30
percent a year and in 2006 were reported almost daily. The slogan "Russia for
Russians" is supported by close to 60 percent of the population.

19

"The au­

thorities are fully aware that their social and economic policy is very flawed
with respect to providing acceptable living conditions to the majority of the
population," said Yuri Vdovin, an antifascist activist. Yet "all the failures are

* This prejudice is not unique to Poland. In March 2007, London's mayor, Ken Livingstone,
warned of a dangerous "gale of reaction against lesbian and gay rights blowing across east­
ern Europe."

450

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

allegedly due to the presence of other people with the wrong religion, the
wrong skin colour or other ethnic background."

20

It is a bitter irony that when shock therapy was prescribed in Russia and
Eastern Europe, its painful effects were often justified as the only way to pre­
vent a repeat of the conditions in Weimar Germany that led to the rise of
Nazism. The casual exclusion of tens of millions of people by free-market
ideologues has reproduced frighteningly similar explosive conditions: proud
populations that perceive themselves as humiliated by foreign forces, looking
to regain their national pride by targeting the most vulnerable in their midst.
In Latin America, the original Chicago School laboratory, the backlash
takes a distinctly more hopeful form. It is not directed at the weak or the vul­
nerable but focuses squarely on the ideology at the root of economic exclu­
sion. And unlike the situation in Russia and Eastern Europe, there is an
irrepressible enthusiasm for trying the ideas that were subverted in the past.
Despite the Bush administration's claim that the twentieth century ended
with a "decisive victory" for free markets over all forms of socialism, many
Latin Americans understand perfectly well that it was authoritarian commu­
nism that failed in Eastern Europe and parts of Asia. Democratic socialism,
meaning not only socialist parties brought to power through elections but
also democratically run workplaces and land holdings, has worked in many
regions, from Scandinavia to the thriving and historic cooperative economy
in Italy's Emilia-Romagna region. It was a version of this combination of
democracy and socialism that Allende was attempting to bring to Chile be­
tween 1970 and 1973. Gorbachev had a similar, though less radical, vision
to turn the Soviet Union into a "socialist beacon" on the Scandinavian
model. South Africa's Freedom Charter, the dream that animated the long
liberation struggle, was a version of this same third way: not state commu­
nism, but markets existing alongside the nationalization of the banks and
mines, with the income used to build comfortable neighborhoods and de­
cent schools—economic as well as political democracy. The workers who
founded Solidarity in 1980 pledged to struggle not against socialism but for
it, with workers eventually winning the power to run their workplaces and
country democratically.
The dirty secret of the neoliberal era is that these ideas were never de­
feated in a great battle of ideas, nor were they voted down in elections. They
were shocked out of the way at key political junctures. When resistance was
fierce, they were defeated with overt violence —rolled over by Pinochet's,

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

451

Yeltsin's and Deng Xiaoping's tanks. At other times, they were simply be­
trayed through what John Williamson called "voodoo politics": the Bolivian
president Victor Paz Estenssoro's postelection secret economic team (and
mass kidnapping of union leaders); the ANC's backroom bargaining-away of
the Freedom Charter in favor of Thabo Mbeki's top-secret economic pro­
gram; Solidarity's exhausted adherents succumbing to economic shock ther­
apy after the elections in exchange for a bailout. It is precisely because the
dream of economic equality is so popular, and so difficult to defeat in a fair
fight, that the shock doctrine was embraced in the first place.
Washington has always regarded democratic socialism as a greater threat
than totalitarian Communism, which was easy to vilify and made for a
handy enemy. In the sixties and seventies, the favored tactic for dealing with
the inconvenient popularity of developmentalism and democratic socialism
was to try to equate them with Stalinism, deliberately blurring the clear dif­
ferences between the worldviews. (Conflating all opposition with terrorism
plays a similar role today.) A stark example of this strategy comes from the
early days of the Chicago crusade, deep inside the declassified Chile docu­
ments. Despite the CIA-funded propaganda campaign painting Allende as a
Soviet-style dictator, Washington's real concerns about the Allende election
victory were relayed by Henry Kissinger in a 1970 memo to Nixon: "The ex­
ample of a successful elected Marxist government in Chile would surely
have an impact on—and even precedent value for—other parts of the world,
especially in Italy; the imitative spread of similar phenomena elsewhere
would in turn significantly affect the world balance and our own position in
21

it." In other words, Allende needed to be taken out before his democratic
third way spread.
The dream he represented was never defeated. It was, as Walsh noted,
temporarily silenced, pushed under the surface by fear. Which is why, as
Latin America emerges from its decades of shock, the old ideas are bubbling
back up—along with the "imitative spread" Kissinger so feared. Ever since
the Argentine collapse in 2001, opposition to privatization has become the
defining issue of the continent, able to make governments and break them; by
late 2006, it was practically creating a domino effect. Luiz Inâcio Lula da Silva
was reelected as president of Brazil largely because he turned the vote into a
referendum on privatization. His opponent, from the party responsible for
Brazil's major sell-offs in the nineties, resorted to appearing in public looking
like a socialist NASCAR driver, wearing a jacket and baseball hat covered in
logos from the public companies that had not yet been sold. Voters weren't

452

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

persuaded, and Lula got 61 percent of the vote, despite disillusionment with
the corruption scandals plaguing his government. Shortly afterward in
Nicaragua, Daniel Ortega, former head of the Sandinistas, made the coun­
try's frequent blackouts the center of his winning campaign; the sale of the
national electricity company to the Spanish firm Union Fenosa after Hurri­
cane Mitch, he asserted, was the source of the problem. "You, brothers, are
suffering the effects of these outages every day!" he bellowed. "Who brought
Union Fenosa to this country? The government of the rich did, those who
are in the service of barbarian capitalism."

22

In November 2006, Ecuador's presidential elections turned into a similar
ideological battleground. Rafael Correa, a forty-three-year-old

left-wing

economist, won the vote against Alvaro Noboa, a banana tycoon and one of
the richest men in the country. With Twisted Sister's "We're Not Going to
Take It" as his official campaign song, Correa called for the country "to over­
come all the fallacies of neo-liberalism." When he won, the new president of
23

Ecuador declared himself "no fan of Milton Friedman." By then, the Boli­
vian president Evo Morales was already approaching the end of his first year
in office. After sending in the army to take back the gas fields from multina­
tional "plunderers," he moved on to nationalize parts of the mining sector.
In this same period in Mexico, the results of the fraud-tainted 2006 elections
were being contested through the creation of an unprecedented "parallel
government" of the people, with votes held in the streets and plaza outside
the seat of government in Mexico City. In the Mexican state of Oaxaca, the
right-wing government sent in riot police to break a strike by teachers who
were demanding an annual pay raise. It provoked a statewide rebellion
against the corruption of the corporatist state that raged for months.
Chile and Argentina are both led by politicians who define themselves
against their countries' Chicago School experiments, though the extent to
which they provide genuine alternatives remains a subject of intense debate.
The symbolism, however, represents its own kind of victory. Several of the
people in the cabinet of the Argentine president, Nestor Kirchner, including
Kirchner himself, were imprisoned during the dictatorship. On March 24,
2006, the thirtieth anniversary of the 1976 military coup, Kirchner addressed
demonstrators in the Plaza de Mayo, where the mothers of the disappeared
held their weekly vigils. "We are back," he declared, referring to the genera­
tion that had been terrorized in the seventies. In the huge assembled crowd,
he said, were "the faces of the 30,000 disappeared companeros returning to
this plaza today."

24

Chile's president, Michelle Bachelet, was one of the

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

453

thousands who were victims of Pinochet's reign of terror. In 1975, she and
her mother were imprisoned and tortured in Villa Grimaldi, known for its
wooden isolation cubicles, so small that prisoners could only crouch. Her fa­
ther, a military officer, had refused to go along with the coup and was mur­
dered by Pinochet's men.
In December 2006, a month after Friedman's death, Latin America's
leaders gathered for a historic summit in Bolivia, held in the city of
Cochabamba, where a popular uprising against water privatization had
forced Bechtel out of the country several years earlier. Morales began the
25

proceedings with a vow to close "the open veins of Latin America." It was a
reference to Eduardo Galeano's book Open Veins of Latin America:
Centuries of the Pillage of a Continent,

Five

a lyrical accounting of the violent

plunder that had turned a rich continent into a poor one. The book was first
published in 1971, two years before Allende was overthrown for daring to try
to close those open veins by nationalizing his country's copper mines. That
event ushered in a new era of furious pillage, during which the structures
built by the continent's developmentalist movements were sacked, stripped
and sold off.
Today Latin Americans are picking up the project that was so brutally in­
terrupted all those years ago. Many of the policies cropping up are familiar:
nationalization of key sectors of the economy, land reform, major new in­
vestments in education, literacy and health care. These are not revolutionary
ideas, but in their unapologetic vision of a government that helps reach for
equality, they are certainly a rebuke to Friedman's 1975 assertion to
Pinochet that "the major error, in my opinion, w a s . . . to believe that it is
possible to do good with other people's money."
Though clearly drawing on a long militant history, Latin America's contem­
porary movements are not direct replicas of their predecessors. O f all the dif­
ferences, the most striking is an acute awareness of the need for protection
from the shocks of the past—the coups, the foreign shock therapists, the
U.S.-trained torturers, as well as the debt shocks and currency collapses of
the eighties and nineties. Latin America's mass movements, which have
powered the wave of election victories for left-wing candidates, are learning
how to build shock absorbers into their organizing models. They are, for ex­
ample, less centralized than in the sixties, making it harder to demobilize
whole movements by eliminating a few leaders. Despite the overwhelming
cult of personality surrounding Chavez, and his moves to centralize power at

454

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

the state level, the progressive networks in Venezuela are at the same time
highly decentralized, with power dispersed at the grass roots and community
level, through thousands of neighborhood councils and co-ops. In Bolivia,
the indigenous people's movements that put Morales in office function sim­
ilarly and have made it clear that Morales does not have their unconditional
support: the barrios will back him as long as he stays true to his democratic
mandate, and not a moment longer. This kind of network approach is what
allowed Chavez to survive the 2002 coup attempt: when their revolution was
threatened, his supporters poured down from the shantytowns surrounding
Caracas to demand his reinstatement, a kind of popular mobilization that
did not happen during the coups of the seventies.
Latin America's new leaders are also taking bold measures to block any
future U.S.-backed coups that could attempt to undermine their democratic
victories. The governments of Venezuela, Costa Rica, Argentina and
Uruguay have all announced that they will no longer send students to the
School of the Americas (now called the Western Hemisphere Institute for
Security Cooperation)—the infamous police and military training center in
Fort Benning, Georgia, where so many of the continent's notorious killers
learned the latest in "counterterrorism" techniques, then promptly directed
26

them against farmers in El Salvador and auto workers in Argentina. Bolivia
looks set to cut its ties with the school, as does Ecuador. Chavez has let it be
known that if an extremist right-wing element in Bolivia's Santa Cruz
province makes good on its threats against the government of Evo Morales,
Venezuelan troops will help defend Bolivia's democracy. Rafael Correa is set
to take the most radical step of all. The Ecuadorean port city of Manta cur­
rently hosts the largest U.S. military base in South America, which serves as
a staging area for the "war on drugs," largely fought in Colombia. Correa's
government has announced that when the agreement for the base expires in
2009, it will not be renewed. "Ecuador is a sovereign nation," said the minis­
ter of foreign relations, Maria Fernanda Espinosa. "We do not need any for­
eign troops in our country."

27

If the U.S. military does not have bases or

training programs, its power to inflict shocks will be greatly eroded.
The new leaders in Latin America are also becoming better prepared for
the kinds of shocks inflicted by volatile markets. One of the most destabiliz­
ing forces of recent decades has been the speed with which capital can pick
up and move, or how a sudden drop in commodity prices can devastate an
entire agricultural sector. But in much of Latin America these shocks have
already happened, leaving behind ghostly industrial suburbs and huge

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

455

stretches of fallow farmland. The task of the region's new left, therefore, has
become a matter of taking the detritus of globalization and putting it back to
work. In Brazil, the phenomenon is best seen in the million and a half farmers
of the Landless Peoples Movement ( M S T ) who have formed hundreds of
cooperatives to reclaim unused land. In Argentina, it is clearest in the move­
ment of "recovered companies," two hundred bankrupt businesses that have
been resuscitated by their workers, who have turned them into democratically
run cooperatives. For the cooperatives, there is no fear of facing an economic
shock of investors leaving, because the investors have already left. In a way, the
reclamation experiments are a new kind of post-disaster reconstruction—
reconstruction from the slow-motion disaster of neoliberalism. In sharp con­
trast to the model offered by the disaster capitalism complex in Iraq,
Afghanistan and the Gulf Coast, the leaders of Latin America's rebuilding ef­
forts are the people most affected by the devastation. And unsurprisingly, their
spontaneous solutions look very much like the real third way that had been so
effectively shocked out of the way by the Chicago School campaign around
the world—democracy in daily life.
In Venezuela, Chavez has made the co-ops a top political priority, giving
them first refusal on government contracts and offering them economic in­
centives to trade with one another. By 2006, there were roughly 100,000 co­
28

operatives in the country, employing more than 700,000 workers. Many
are pieces of state infrastructure—toll booths, highway maintenance, health
clinics—handed over to the communities to run. It's a reverse of the logic of
government outsourcing—rather than auctioning off pieces of the state to
large corporations and losing democratic control, the people who use the re­
sources are given the power to manage them, creating, at least in theory,
both jobs and more responsive public services. Chavez's many critics have
derided these initiatives as handouts and unfair subsidies, of course. Yet in
an era when Halliburton treats the U.S. government as its personal ATM for
six years, withdraws upward of $20 billion in Iraq contracts alone, refuses to
hire local workers either on the Gulf Coast or in Iraq, then expresses its grat­
itude to U.S. taxpayers by moving its corporate headquarters to Dubai (with
all the attendant tax and legal benefits), Chavez's direct subsidies to regular
people look significantly less radical.
Latin America's most significant protection from future shocks (and therefore
from the shock doctrine) flows from the continent's emerging independence
from Washington's financial institutions, the result of greater integration

456

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

among regional governments. The Bolivian Alternative for the Americas
(ALBA) is the continent's retort to the Free Trade Area of the Americas, the
now buried corporatist dream of a free-trade zone stretching from Alaska to
Tierra del Fuego. Though ALBA is still in its early stages, Emir Sader, the
Brazil-based sociologist, describes its promise as "a perfect example of gen­
uinely fair trade: each country provides what it is best placed to produce, in
29

return for what it most needs, independent of global market prices." So Bo­
livia provides gas at stable discounted prices; Venezuela offers heavily subsi­
dized oil to poorer countries and shares expertise in developing reserves; and
Cuba sends thousands of doctors to deliver free health care all over the con­
tinent, while training students from other countries at its medical schools.
This is a very different model from the kind of academic exchange that be­
gan at the University of Chicago in the mid-fifties, when Latin American stu­
dents learned a single rigid ideology and were sent home to impose it with
uniformity across the continent. The major benefit is that ALBA is essen­
tially a barter system, in which countries decide for themselves what any
given commodity or service is worth, rather than letting traders in New York,
Chicago or London set the prices for them. That makes trade far less vulner­
able to the kind of sudden price fluctuations that devastated Latin American
economies in the recent past. Surrounded by turbulent financial waters,
Latin America is creating a zone of relative economic calm and predictabil­
ity, a feat presumed impossible in the globalization era.
When one country does face a financial shortfall, this increased integra­
tion means that it does not need to turn to the I M F or the U.S. Treasury for
a bailout. That's fortunate because the 2006 U.S. National Security Strategy
makes it clear that for Washington, the shock doctrine is still very much
alive: "If crises occur, the IMF's response must reinforce each country's re­
sponsibility for its own economic choices," the document states. "A refocused I M F will strengthen market institutions and market discipline over
financial decisions." This kind of "market discipline" can only be enforced if
governments actually go to Washington for help—as Stanley Fischer ex­
plained during the Asian financial crisis, the I M F can help only if it is asked,
"but when [a country is] out of money, it hasn't got many places to turn."

30

That is no longer the case. Thanks to high oil prices, Venezuela has emerged
as a major lender to other developing countries, allowing them to do an end
run around Washington.
The results have been dramatic. Brazil, so long shackled to Washington
by its enormous debt, is refusing to enter into a new agreement with the

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

457

IMF. Nicaragua is negotiating to quit the fund, Venezuela has withdrawn
from both the I M F and the World Bank, and even Argentina, Washington's
former "model pupil," has been part of the trend. In his 2007 State of the
Union address, President Nestor Kirchner said that the country's foreign
creditors had told him, " 'You must have an agreement with the International
Fund to be able to pay the debt.' We say to them, 'Sirs, we are sovereign. We
want to pay the debt, but no way in hell are we going to make an agreement
again with the IMF.' " As a result, the IMF, supremely powerful in the eight­
ies and nineties, is no longer a force on the continent. In 2005, Latin Amer­
ica made up 80 percent of the IMF's total lending portfolio; in 2007, the
continent represented just 1 percent—a sea change in only two years.
"There is life after the IMF," Kirchner declared, "and it's a good life."

31

The transformation reaches beyond Latin America. In just three years,
the IMF's worldwide lending portfolio had shrunk from $81 billion to $11.8
billion, with almost all of that going to Turkey. The IMF, a pariah in so many
countries where it has treated crises as profit-making opportunities, is start­
ing to wither away. The World Bank faces an equally grim future. In April
2007, Ecuador's president, Rafael Correa, revealed that he had suspended
all loans from the bank and declared the institution's representative in Ecua­
dor persona non grata —an extraordinary step. Two years earlier, Correa ex­
plained, the World Bank had used a $100-million loan to defeat economic
legislation that would have redistributed oil revenues to the country's poor.
"Ecuador is a sovereign country, and we will not stand for extortion from this
international bureaucracy," he said. At the same time, Evo Morales an­
nounced that Bolivia would quit the World Bank's arbitration court, the
body that allows multinational corporations to sue national governments for
measures that cost them profits. "The governments of Latin America, and I
think the world, never win the cases. The multinationals always win,"
Morales said. When Paul Wolfowitz was forced to announce his resignation
as president of the World Bank in May 2007, it was clear that the institution
needed to take desperate measures to rescue itself from its profound crisis of
credibility. In the midst of the Wolfowitz affair, The Financial

Times reported

that when World Bank managers dispensed advice in the developing world,
32

"they were now laughed at." Add the collapse of the World Trade Organiza­
tion talks in 2006 (prompting declarations that "globalization is dead"), and
the futures of the three main institutions that had imposed the Chicago
School ideology under the guise of economic inevitability are at risk of ex­
tinction.

458

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

It stands to reason that the revolt against neoliberalism would be in its
most advanced stage in Latin America—as inhabitants of the first shock
lab, Latin Americans have had the most time to recover their bearings.
Years of street protests have created new political groupings, eventually
gaining the strength not just to take state power but to begin to change the
power structures of the state. There are signs that other former shock labo­
ratories are on the same path. In South Africa, 2005 and 2006 were the
years that the long-neglected slums decisively abandoned their party loy­
alty to the ANC and began protesting against the broken promises of the
Freedom Charter. Foreign journalists commented that this kind of up­
heaval had not been seen since the townships rose up against apartheid.
But the most remarkable mood change is taking place in China. For many
years, the raw terror of the Tiananmen Square massacre succeeded in
supressing popular anger at the erosion of workers' rights and deepening
rural poverty. Not anymore. According to official government sources, in
2005 there were a staggering eighty-seven thousand large protests in China,
involving more than 4 million workers and peasants.*

33

China's activist

wave has been met with the most extreme state repression since 1989, but
it has also resulted in several concrete victories: major new spending in ru­
ral areas, better health care, pledges to eliminate education fees. China too
is coming out of shock.
Any strategy based on exploiting the window of opportunity opened by a
traumatic shock relies heavily on the element of surprise. A state of shock, by
definition, is a moment when there is a gap between fast-moving events and
the information that exists to explain them. The late French theorist Jean
Baudrillard described terrorist events as an "excess of reality"; in this sense,
in North America, the September 11 attacks were, at first, pure event, raw re­
ality, unprocessed by story, narrative or anything that could bridge the gap
34

between reality and understanding. Without a story, we are, as many of us
were after September 11, intensely vulnerable to those people who are ready
to take advantage of the chaos for their own ends. As soon as we have a new
narrative that offers a perspective on the shocking events, we become re­
oriented and the world begins to make sense once again.

* "Four million workers!" exclaimed a group of U.S. labor writers. "In the U S we celebrated
the birth of a new global social movement when 60,000 people showed up for the 'Battle of
Seattle' in 1999."

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

459

Prison interrogators intent on inducing shock and regression understand
this process well. It is the reason the CIA's manuals stress the importance of
cutting detainees off from anything that will help them establish a new
narrative —their own sensory input, other prisoners, even communication
with guards. "Prisoners should be segregated immediately," the 1983 manual
states. "Isolation, both physical and psychological, must be maintained from
the moment of apprehension."

35

The interrogators know that prisoners talk.

They warn each other about what's to come; they pass notes between the
bars. Once that happens, the captors lose their edge. They still have the
power to inflict bodily pain, but they have lost their most effective psycho­
logical tools to manipulate and "break" their prisoners: confusion, disorien­
tation and surprise. Without those elements, there is no shock.
The same is true for wider societies. Once the mechanics of the shock
doctrine are deeply and collectively understood, whole communities be­
come harder to take by surprise, more difficult to confuse—shock resistant.
The intensely violent brand of disaster capitalism that has dominated since
September 11 emerged in part because lesser shocks—debt crises, currency
crashes, the threat of being left behind "in history"—were already losing
much of their potency, largely because of overuse. Yet today, even the cata­
clysmic shocks of wars and natural disasters do not always provoke the level
of disorientation required to impose unwanted economic shock therapy.
There are just too many people in the world who have had direct experience
with the shock doctrine: they know how it works, have talked to other prison­
ers, passed notes between the bars; the crucial element of surprise is missing.
A striking example is the response of millions of Lebanese to attempts by in­
ternational lenders to impose free-market "reforms" as a condition of recon­
struction aid after the Israeli attacks in 2006. By all rights, that scheme should
have worked: the country could not have been more desperate for funds. Even
before the war, Lebanon had one of the heaviest debts in the world, while the
new losses from attacks on roads, bridges and airport runways were estimated
at $9 billion. So when delegates from thirty wealthy nations got together in
Paris in January 2007 to pledge $7.6 billion in reconstruction loans and grants,
they naturally assumed that Lebanon's government would accept whatever
strings they attached to the aid. The conditions were the usual ones: phone
and electricity privatizations, price increases on fuel, cuts to the public service
and an increase to an already controversial tax on consumer purchases. Kamal
Hamdan, a Lebanese economist, estimated that, as a result, "household bills
[would] increase by 15 percent because of increased taxes and adjusted

460

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

prices"—a classic peace penalty. As for the reconstruction itself, the jobs
would of course go to the giants of disaster capitalism, with no requirement to
hire or subcontract locally.

36

The U.S. secretary of state, Condoleezza Rice, was questioned about
whether such sweeping demands constituted foreign interference in Lebanon's
affairs. She replied, "Lebanon is a democracy. That said, Lebanon is also un­
dertaking some important economic reforms that are critical to making any
of this work." Fouad Siniora, Lebanon's prime minister, backed by the West,
easily agreed to the terms, shrugging and saying that "Lebanon did not in­
vent privatization." Further demonstrating his willingness to play ball, he
hired the Bush-connected surveillance giant Booz Allen Hamilton to broker
Lebanon's telecom privatization.

37

Many Lebanese citizens, however, were distinctly less cooperative. De­
spite the fact that a lot of their homes still lay in ruins, thousands participated
in a general strike, organized by a coalition of unions and political parties,
including the Islamist party Hezbollah. The demonstrators insisted that if re­
ceiving reconstruction funds meant raising the cost of living for a warravaged people, it hardly deserved to be called aid. So while Siniora was
reassuring donors in Paris, strikes and road blockades brought the country to
a halt—the first national revolt specifically targeting postwar disaster capital­
ism. Demonstrators also staged a sit-in, which went on for two months, turn­
ing downtown Beirut into a cross between a tent city and a street carnival.
Most reporters characterized these events as shows of strength by Hezbollah,
but Mohamad Bazzi, the Middle East bureau chief for New York's Newsday,
said that this interpretation missed their true significance: "The biggest mo­
tivator driving many of those camped out in downtown isn't Iran or Syria, or
Sunni versus Shiite. It's the economic inequality that has haunted Lebanese
Shiites for decades. It's a poor and working-class people's revolt."

38

The location of the sit-in provided the most eloquent explanation for why
Lebanon was proving so shock resistant. The protest was in the part of down­
town Beirut that residents refer to as Solidere, after the private development
company that built and owns almost everything in its confines. Solidere is
the result of Lebanon's last reconstruction effort. In the early nineties, after
the fifteen-year civil war, the country was shattered and the state was in debt,
with no money to rebuild. The billionaire businessman (and later prime
minister) Rafiq Hariri made a proposal: give him the land rights to the entire
downtown core and let him and his new real estate company, Solidere, turn
it into the "Singapore of the Middle East." Hariri, who was killed in a car

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

461

bombing in February 2005, bulldozed almost all the standing structures,
turning the city into a blank slate. Marinas, luxurious condominiums (some
with elevators for limousines) and lavish shopping malls replaced the an­
59

cient souks. Almost everything in the business district—buildings, plazas,
security forces—is owned by Solidere.
To the outside world, Solidere was the shining symbol of Lebanon's post­
war rebirth, but for many Lebanese it had always been a kind of holograph.
Outside the ultramodern downtown core, much of Beirut lacked basic infra­
structure, from electricity to public transit, and the bullet holes inflicted dur­
ing the civil war were never repaired on the facades of many buildings. It was
in those neglected slums surrounding the gleaming center that Hezbollah
built its loyal base, rigging up generators and transmitters, organizing trash
removal, providing security—becoming the much vilified "state within a
state." When the residents of the run-down suburbs ventured into the Soli­
dere enclave, they were often thrown out by Hariri's private security guards;
their presence frightened the tourists.
Raida Hatoum, a social justice activist in Beirut, told me that when Soli­
dere began its reconstruction, "people were so happy the war was over and
the streets were being rebuilt. By the time we became aware that the streets
had been sold, that they were privately owned, it was too late. We didn't know
that the money was a loan and we'd have to pay it back later." That rude
awakening of finding out that the least advantaged people had been stuck
with the bill for a makeover that benefited only a small elite has made the
Lebanese experts in the mechanics of disaster capitalism. It is this experi­
ence that helped keep the country oriented and organized after the 2006
war. By choosing to hold their mass sit-in inside the Solidere bubble, with
Palestinian refugees camped outside the Virgin megastore and high-end
latte joints ("If I ate a sandwich here, I'd be broke for a week," one protester
remarked), the demonstrators were sending a clear message. They did not
want another reconstruction of Solidere-style bubbles and rotting suburbs—
of fortressed green zones and raging red zones—but a reconstruction for the
entire country. "How can we still accept this government that steals?" one
demonstrator asked. "This government that built this downtown and accu­
mulated this huge debt? Who's going to pay for it? I have to pay for it, and
my son is going to pay for it after me."

40

Lebanon's shock resistance went beyond protest. It was also expressed
through a far-reaching parallel reconstruction effort. Within days of the
cease-fire, Hezbollah's neighborhood committees had visited many of the

462

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

homes hit by the air attacks, assessed the damage and were already handing
out $12,000 in cash to displaced families to cover a year's worth of rent and
furnishings. As the independent journalists Ana Nogueira and Saseen
Kawzally observed from Beirut, "That is six times the dollar amount that sur­
vivors of Hurricane Katrina received from FEMA." And in what would have
been music to the ears of Katrina survivors, the Hezbollah leader, Sheik Has­
san Nasrallah, promised the country in a televised address, "You won't need
to ask a favor of anyone, queue up anywhere." Hezbollah's version of aid did
not filter through the government or foreign NGOs. It did not go to build
five-star hotels, as in Kabul, or Olympic swimming pools for police trainers,
as in Iraq. Instead, Hezbollah did what Renuka, the Sri Lankan tsunami sur­
vivor, told me she wished someone would do for her family: put the help in
their hands.

Hezbollah also included

community members in the

reconstruction —it hired local construction crews (working in exchange for
the scrap metal they collected), mobilized fifteen hundred engineers and or­
ganized teams of volunteers. All that help meant that a week after the bomb­
ing stopped, the reconstruction was already well under way.

41

In the U.S. press, these initiatives were almost universally derided as
bribery or clientelism — Hezbollah's attempt to purchase popular support af­
ter it had provoked the attack from which the country was reeling (David
Frum even suggested that the bills Hezbollah was handing out were coun­
42

terfeit). There is no question that Hezbollah is engaged in politics as well
as charity, and that Iranian funds made Hezbollah's generosity possible.
Equally important to its efficiency, however, was Hezbollah's status as a lo­
cal, indigenous organization, one that rose up from the neighborhoods be­
ing rebuilt. Unlike the alien corporate reconstruction agencies imposing
their designs from far-off bureaucracies via imported management, private
security and translators, Hezbollah could act fast because it knew every back
alley and every jury-rigged transmitter, as well as who could be trusted to get
the work done. If the residents of Lebanon were grateful for the results, it was
also because they knew the alternative. The alternative was Solidere.
We do not always respond to shocks with regression. Sometimes, in the face
of crisis, we grow up—fast. This impulse was in powerful evidence in Spain,
on March 11, 2004, when ten bombs ripped through commuter trains and
rail stations in Madrid, killing nearly two hundred people. President José
Maria Aznar immediately went on television and told Spaniards to blame

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

463

the Basque separatists and to give him their support for the war in Iraq. "No
negotiation is possible or desirable with these assassins who so many times
have sown death all around Spain. Only with firmness can we end the at­
tacks/' he said.

43

Spaniards reacted badly to that kind of talk. "We are still hearing the
echoes of Franco," said José Antonio Martines Soler, a prominent Madrid
newspaper editor who had been persecuted under Francisco Franco's dicta­
torship. "In every act, in every gesture, in every sentence, Aznar told the peo­
ple he was right, that he was the owner of the truth and those who disagreed
44

with him were his enemies." In other words, the very same qualities that
Americans identified as "strong leadership" in their president after Septem­
ber 11 were, in Spain, regarded as ominous signs of a rising fascism. The
country was three days away from national elections, and, remembering a
time when fear governed politics, voters defeated Aznar and chose a party
that would pull troops out of Iraq. As in Lebanon, it was the collective mem­
ory of past shocks that made Spain resistant to the new ones.
All shock therapists are intent on the erasure of memory. Ewen Cameron
was convinced that he needed to wipe out the minds of his patients before
he could rebuild them. The U.S. occupiers of Iraq felt no need to stop the
looting of Iraq's museums and libraries, thinking it might make their jobs
easier. But like Cameron's former patient Gail Kastner, with her intricate ar­
chitecture of papers, books and lists, recollections can be rebuilt, new narra­
tives can be created. Memory, both individual and collective, turns out to be
the greatest shock absorber of all.
Despite all the successful attempts to exploit the 2004 tsunami, memory also
proved to be an effective tool of resistance in some areas where it struck, par­
ticularly in Thailand. Dozens of coastal villages were flattened by the wave,
but unlike in Sri Lanka, many Thai settlements were successfully rebuilt
within months. The difference did not come from the government. Thai­
land's politicians were just as eager as those elsewhere to use the storm as an
excuse to evict fishing people and hand over land tenure to large resorts. Yet
what set Thailand apart was that villagers approached all government prom­
ises with intense skepticism and refused to wait patiently in camps for an of­
ficial reconstruction plan. Instead, within weeks, hundreds of villagers
engaged in what they called land "reinvasions." They marched past the
armed guards on the payroll of developers, tools in hand, and began marking

464

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

off the sites where their old houses had been. In some cases, reconstruction
began immediately. "I am willing to bet my life on this land, because it is
4

ours," said Ratree Kongwatmai, who lost most of her family in the tsunami. '
The most daring reinvasions were performed by Thailand's indigenous
fishing peoples called the Moken, or "sea gypsies." After centuries of disenfranchisement, the Moken had no illusions that a benevolent state would
give them a decent piece of land in exchange for the coastal properties that
had been seized. So, in one dramatic case, the residents of the Ban Tung
Wah Village in the Phang Nga province "gathered themselves together and
marched right back home, where they encircled their wrecked village with
rope, in a symbolic gesture to mark their land ownership," explained a report
by a Thai N G O . "With the entire community camping out there, it became
difficult for the authorities to chase them away, especially given the intense
media attention being focused on tsunami rehabilitation." In the end, the
villagers negotiated a deal with the government to give up part of their
oceanfront property in exchange for legal security on the rest of their ances­
tral land. Today, the rebuilt village is a showcase of Moken culture, com­
plete with museum, community center, school and market. "Now, officials
from the sub-district come to Ban Tung Wah to learn about 'peoplemanaged tsunami rehabilitation' while researchers and university students
turn up there by the bus-full to study 'indigenous people's wisdom.' "

4 6

All along the Thai coast where the tsunami hit, this kind of direct-action re­
construction is the norm. The key to their success, community leaders say, is
that "people negotiate for their land rights from a position of being in occupa­
47

tion"; some have dubbed the practice "negotiating with your hands." Thai­
land's survivors have also insisted on a different kind of aid—rather than
settling for handouts, they have demanded the tools to carry out their own re­
construction. Dozens of Thai architecture students and professors, for exam­
ple, volunteered to help community members design their new houses and
draw their own rebuilding plans; master boat builders trained villagers to make
their own, more sophisticated fishing vessels. The results are communities
stronger than they were before the wave. The houses on stilts built by Thai vil­
lagers in Ban Tung Wah and Baan Nairai are beautiful and sturdy; they are
also cheaper, larger and cooler than the sweltering prefab cubicles on offer
there from foreign contractors. A manifesto drafted by a coalition of Thai
tsunami survivor communities explains the philosophy: "The rebuilding work
should be done by local communities themselves, as much as possible. Keep
contractors out, let communities take responsibility for their own housing."

48

S H O C K W E A R S OFF

465

A year after Katrina hit, a remarkable exchange took place in Thailand
between the leaders of that country's grassroots reconstruction effort and a
small delegation of hurricane survivors from New Orleans. The visitors from
the United States toured several rebuilt Thai villages and were taken aback
by the speed with which rehabilitation had become a reality. "In New Or­
leans, we're waiting around on the government to do things for us, but here
you all are doing by yourselves," said Endesha Juakali, founder of the "sur­
vivors' village" in New Orleans. "When we go back," he pledged, "your
model is our new goal."

49

After the community leaders from New Orleans returned home, there was
indeed a wave of direct action in the city. Juakali, whose own neighborhood
was still in ruins, organized teams of local contractors and volunteers to gut
the flood-damaged interiors in every house on the block; then they moved on
to the next one. He said that his trip to the tsunami region gave him "a good
perspective on . . . how the people of New Orleans are going to have to put
FEMA aside and the city and state government aside and begin to say, 'What
can we do right now to start to bring our neighborhoods back in spite of the
government, not because of it?'" Another veteran of the Asia trip, Viola
Washington, also returned to her New Orleans neighborhood, Gentilly, with
an entirely new attitude. She "broke down a map of Gentilly into sections,
organized representative committees for each section and appointed leaders
who meet to discuss rebuilding needs." She explained that "as we fight the
government to get our money we don't want to be doing nothing to try and
get ourselves back."

50

There was still more direct action in New Orleans. In February 2007,
groups of residents who had lived in the public housing projects that the
Bush administration was planning to demolish began "reinvading" their old
homes and taking up residence. Volunteers helped clean out apartments and
raised money to buy generators and solar panels. "My home is my castle, and
I'm taking it back," announced Gloria Williams, a resident of the housing
project C. J. Peete. The reinvasion turned into a block party complete with a
New Orleans brass band.

51

There was much to celebrate: at least for now,

this one community had escaped the great cultural bulldozer that calls itself
reconstruction.
Uniting all these examples of people rebuilding for themselves is a com­
mon theme: participants say they are not just repairing buildings but healing
themselves. It makes perfect sense. The universal experience of living
through a great shock is the feeling of being completely powerless: in the

466

THE SHOCK

DOCTRINE

face of awesome forces, parents lose the ability to save their children, spouses
are separated, homes—places of protection—become death traps. The best
way to recover from helplessness turns out to be helping—having the right to
be part of a communal recovery. "Reopening our school says this is a very
special community, tied together by more than location but by spirituality,
by bloodlines and by a desire to come home," said the assistant principal of
Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Elementary School in the Lower Ninth Ward of
New Orleans.

52

Such people's reconstruction efforts represent the antithesis of the disaster
capitalism complex's ethos, with its perpetual quest for clean sheets and
blank slates on which to build model states. Like Latin America's farm and
factory co-ops, they are inherently improvisational, making do with whoever
is left behind and whatever rusty tools have not been swept away, broken or
stolen. Unlike the fantasy of the Rapture, the apocalyptic erasure that allows
the ethereal escape of true believers, local people's renewal movements be­
gin from the premise that there is no escape from the substantial messes we
have created and that there has already been enough erasure—of history, of
culture, of memory. These are movements that do not seek to start from
scratch but rather from scrap, from the rubble that is all around. As the corporatist crusade continues its violent decline, turning up the shock dial to
blast through the mounting resistance it encounters, these projects point a
way forward between fundamentalisms. Radical only in their intense practi­
cality, rooted in the communities where they live, these men and women see
themselves as mere repair people, taking what's there and fixing it, reinforc­
ing it, making it better and more equal. Most of all, they are building in
resilience—for when the next shock hits.

NOTES
N . B . : Quotations and facts that come from interviews with the author are generally not
cited in the notes.
U n l e s s otherwise indicated, all translations from S p a n i s h to E n g l i s h were done by
S h a n a Yael S h u b s .
All dollar a m o u n t s in the book are in U . S . currency.
In s o m e c a s e s where there are s o u r c e s for multiple facts in a p a r a g r a p h , one s u p e r ­
script note n u m b e r a p p e a r s at the end of the p a r a g r a p h rather than a n u m b e r after
each individual fact. In the notes section here, the s o u r c e s are listed in the order in
which the facts a p p e a r in the p a r a g r a p h .
If there is a s o u r c e for a footnote, it is cited in the n u m b e r e d endnote m o s t closely
following the asterisk in the text; s u c h s o u r c e s are m a r k e d F O O T N O T E .
Web a d d r e s s e s for n e w s articles available online are not included b e c a u s e of the
transient nature of W e b architecture. In c a s e s w h e r e a d o c u m e n t is available exclu­
sively online, the h o m e page where it a p p e a r s is cited, not the longer U R L for the s p e ­
cific text, once again because links c h a n g e frequently.
M a n y original d o c u m e n t s cited in the text, a s well a s Web links a n d a n extensive bib­
liography and filmography, can be found at w w w . n a o m i k l e i n . o r g .

INTRODUCTION
Blank Is Beautiful: Three Decades of Erasing and Remaking the World
1. Bud Edney, "Appendix A: Thoughts on Rapid D o m i n a n c e / ' in Harlan K. U l l m a n and
James P. Wade, Shock

and Awe: Achieving

Rapid

Dominance

(Washington, D C :

N D U Press Book, 1 9 9 6 ) , 110.
2. John Harwood, "Washington Wire: A Special Weekly Report from T h e Wall Street
Journal's Capital Bureau/' Wall Street Journal,

September 9, 2 0 0 5 .

3. Gary Rivlin, "A Mogul W h o Would Rebuild New Orleans," New York Times,

Septem­

ber 2 9 , 2 0 0 5 .
4.

" T h e Promise o f Vouchers," Wall Street Journal,

5.

Ibid.

6.

Milton Friedman, Capitalism

and Freedom

D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 5 .

( 1 9 6 2 , repr. Chicago: University o f Chicago

Press, 1982), 2.
7. Interview with Joe D e R o s e , United Teachers of New Orleans, September 18, 2 0 0 6 ;
Michael Kunzelman, "Post-Katrina, Educators, Students E m b r a c e Charter Schools,"
Associated Press, April 17, 2 0 0 7 .
8. Steve Ritea, "N.O. Teachers Union Loses Its Force in Storm's Wake,"

Times-Picayune

(New Orleans), M a r c h 6, 2 0 0 6 .
9.

Susan Saulny, " U . S . Gives Charter Schools a Big Push in New Orleans," New York

668

N O T E S TO P A G E S 6 TO U

Times,

June 13, 2 0 0 6 ; Véronique de Rugy and Kathryn G . Newmark, "Hope after

Katrina" Education

Next, O c t o b e r 1, 2 0 0 6 , www.aei.org.

10. "Educational Land Grab," Rethinking
11. Milton Friedman, Inflation:

Schools,

Causes

Fall 2 0 0 6 .

and Consequences

(New York: Asia Publishing

House, 1 9 6 3 ) , 1.
12. Friedman, Capitalism

and Freedom,

ix.

13. Milton Friedman and Rose Friedman, Tyranny

of the Status

Quo

(San Diego:

Harcourt B r a c e Jovanovich, 1 9 8 4 ) , 3.
14. Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

People:

Memoirs

(Chicago:

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 5 9 2 .
15. Eduardo G a l e a n o , Days and Nights of Love and War, trans. Judith Brister (New York:
Monthly Review Press, 1 9 8 3 ) , 130.
16. U l l m a n and Wade, Shock

and Awe, xxviii.

17. T h o m a s Crampton, "Iraq Official Warns on Fast E c o n o m i c Shift,"
Herald

Tribune

International

(Paris), O c t o b e r 14, 2 0 0 3 .

18. Alison R i c e , Post-Tsunami

Tourism and Reconstruction:

Tourism C o n c e r n , O c t o b e r 2 0 0 5 ) ,

A Second

Disaster?

(London:

August

31, 2006,

www.tourismconcern.org.uk.

19. Nicholas Powers, " T h e G r o u n d

below Zero," Indypendent,

www.indypendent.org.
20. Neil King Jr. and Yochi J . Dreazen, "Amid C h a o s in Iraq, T i n y Security Firm Found
Opportunity," Wall Street Journal,

August 13, 2 0 0 4 .

2 1 . E r i c E c k h o l m , " U . S . Contractor Found Guilty o f $3 Million Fraud in Iraq," New York
Times,

M a r c h 10, 2 0 0 6 .

22. Davison L. B u d h o o , Enough
Resignation

to the Managing

Is Enough:
Director

Dear

Mr. Camdessus.

of the International

. . Open

Monetary

Letter

of

Fund (New York:

New Horizons Press, 1 9 9 0 ) , 102.
23. M i c h a e l Lewis, " T h e World's Biggest Going-Out-of-Business Sale," The New
Times Magazine,

York

May 3 1 , 1 9 9 8 .

24. B o b S i p c h e n , "Are Public Schools Worth the Effort?" Los Angeles

Times, July 3, 2 0 0 6 .

25. Paul Tough, David Frum, W i l l i a m Kristol et al., "A Revolution or Business as Usual?:
A Harper's Forum," Harper's,

March 1995.

26. R a c h e l M o n a h a n and E l e n a Herrero B e a u m o n t , "Big T i m e Security," Forbes,

August

3, 2 0 0 6 ; Gary Stoller, "Homeland Security Generates Multibillion Dollar Business,"
USA Today,

S e p t e m b e r 10, 2 0 0 6 .

27. Evan Ratliff, "Fear, Inc.," Wired,
28. Véronique de

Rugy, American

December 2005.
Enterprise

Institute,

"Facts and

Figures

about

H o m e l a n d Security Spending," D e c e m b e r 14, 2 0 0 6 , www.aei.org.
29. Bryan Bender, "Economists Say Cost o f War C o u l d Top $2 Trillion," Boston

Globe,

January 8, 2 0 0 6 .
30. T h o m a s L. Friedman, "Big M a c I," New York Times,

D e c e m b e r 8, 1996.

31. Steve Q u i n n , "Halliburton's 3 Q Earnings Hit $ 6 1 1 M , " Associated Press, October 22,
2006.
32. Steven R. Hurst, " O c t o b e r Deadliest M o n t h

Ever in Iraq," Associated Press,

November 2 2 , 2 0 0 6 .
33. James G l a n z and Floyd Norris, "Report Says Iraq Contractor Is Hiding Data from
U.S.," New York Times,

October 28, 2006.

34. W e n c y Leung, "Success T h r o u g h Disaster: B . C . - M a d e Wood Houses Hold Great
Potential for Disaster Relief," Vancouver

Sun, May 15, 2 0 0 6 .

N O T E S TO P A G E S 14 TO 32

35. Joseph B . Treaster, "Earnings for Insurers Are Soaring," New York Times,

469

O c t o b e r 14,

2006.
36. Central Intelligence Agency, Kubark

Counterintelligence

Interrogation,

July 1 9 6 3 , 1,

101. Declassified manual is available in full, www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.
37. Ibid, 6 6 .
38. M a o Tse-Tung, "Introducing a Cooperative," Peking Review 1, no. 15 (June 10, 1958): 6.
39. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

594.

40. Ibid.
4 1 . " T h e Rising Risk o f Recession," Time, D e c e m b e r 19, 1 9 6 9 .
42. George Jones, " T h a t c h e r Praises Friedman, Her Freedom Fighter," Daily

Telegraph

(London), November 17, 2 0 0 6 ; Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,
43. Francis Fukuyama, " T h e E n d of History?" The National
44. Justin Fox, " T h e Curious Capitalist," Fortune,

Interest,

November

388-89.

Summer 1989.
16, 2 0 0 6 ; House o f

Representatives, 109th Congr., 2nd Sess., "H. Res. 1 0 8 9 : Honoring the Life o f Milton
Friedman," D e c e m b e r 6, 2 0 0 6 ; Jon Ortiz, "State to Honor Friedman,"
Bee,

January 2 4 , 2 0 0 7 ; T h o m a s Sowell, "Freedom M a n , " Wall

Sacramento

Street

Journal,

November 18, 2 0 0 6 .
45. Stéphane Courtois et al., The Black

Book of Communism:

Crimes,

Terror,

Repression,

trans. Jonathan Murphy and Mark Kramer (Cambridge, MA: Harvard University
Press, 1999), 2.

1. The Torture Lab: Ewen Cameron, the CIA and the Maniacal Quest to Erase and Remake
the Human Mind
1. Cyril J . C . Kennedy and David Anchel, "Regressive Electric-Shock in Schizophrenics
Refractory to Other Shock Therapies," Psychiatric
2.

Quarterly

Ugo Cerletti, " E l e c t r o s h o c k Therapy," Journal
Psychopathology

and Quarterly

Review

of Psychiatry

of

22, no. 2 (April 1948): 3 1 8 .

Clinical

and

and Neurology

Experimental
15 ( S e p t e m b e r

1954): 1 9 2 - 9 3 .
3.

Judy Foreman, "How C I A Stole T h e i r Minds," Boston

Globe,

October 30, 1998;

Stephen Bindman, "Brainwashing Victims to G e t $ 1 0 0 , 0 0 0 , " Gazette

(Montreal),

November 18, 1992.
4.

Gordon T h o m a s , Journey

5.

Harvey M . Weinstein, Psychiatry

into Madness

(New York: B a n t a m Books, 1 9 8 9 ) , 1 4 8 .

and the CIA: Victims of Mind

Control

(Washington,

D C : American Psychiatric Press, 1 9 9 0 ) , 9 2 , 9 9 .
6.

D . Ewen C a m e r o n , "Psychic Driving," American

Journal

of Psychiatry

112, no. 7

(1956): 502-509.
7.

D . Ewen Cameron and S. K. Pande, "Treatment of the Chronic Paranoid Schizophrenic

8.

Aristotle, "On the Soul, Book III," in Aristotle I, Great Booh

Patient," Canadian

Medical

Association

Journal

7 8 (January 15, 1 9 5 8 ) : 9 5 .
of the Western World, vol. 8,

ed. Mortimer J. Adler, trans. W. D . Ross (Chicago: Encyclopaedia Britannica, 1952), 6 6 2 .
9.

Berton R o u c h é , "As Empty as Eve," The New Yorker, S e p t e m b e r 9, 1 9 7 4 .

10. D . Ewen C a m e r o n , "Production o f Differential Amnesia as a Factor in the Treatment
of Schizophrenia," Comprehensive

Psychiatry

11. D . Ewen C a m e r o n , J . G . Lohrenz and
Treatment of Schizophrenia," Comprehensive
12. Cameron, "Psychic Driving," 5 0 3 - 5 0 4 .

1, no. 1 ( 1 9 6 0 ) : 3 2 - 3 3 .
K. A. Handcock, " T h e
Psychiatry

Depatterning

3, no. 2 ( 1 9 6 2 ) : 6 7 .

470

N O T E S TO P A G E S 32 TO 37

B . W e i n s t e i n , Psychiatry
Madness,

and

the

CIA,

120. F O O T N O T E : T h o m a s , Journey

into

129.

14. " C I A , M e m o r a n d u m for the Record, Subject: Project A R T I C H O K E , " January 3 1 ,
1975,

www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.

15. Alfred W . M c C o y , "Cruel S c i e n c e : C I A Torture & Foreign Policy," New
Journal

of Public

Policy

16. Alfred W . M c C o y , A Question
War

England

19, no. 2 (Winter 2 0 0 5 ) : 2 1 8 .
of Torture: CIA Interrogation,

from the Cold

War to the

on Terror (New York: Metropolitan Books, 2 0 0 6 ) , 2 2 , 30.

17. T h o s e who found themselves taking L S D in this period o f experimentation included
North Korean P O W s ; a group o f patients at a drug treatment center in Lexington,
Kentucky; seven thousand American soldiers at Maryland's Edgewood C h e m i c a l
Arsenal; and inmates o f California's Vacaville Prison. Ibid., 27, 2 9 .
18. "[A]n anonymous handwritten note found in the archives identifies Dr. Caryl Haskins
and C o m m a n d e r R. J . Williams as C I A representatives at the meeting." David
V i e n n e a u , "Ottawa Paid for '50s Brainwashing Experiments, Files Show,"
Star,

April

Toronto

14, 1 9 8 6 ; "Minutes o f June 1, 1 9 5 1 , C a n a d a / U S / U K Meeting Re:

C o m m u n i s t 'Brainwashing' Techniques during the Korean War," meeting at RitzCarlton Hotel, Montreal, June 1, 1951, page 5.
19. D . O . H e b b , W . Heron and W . H. Bexton, Annual

Report,

Contract D R B X 3 8 ,

Experimental Studies o f Attitude, 1 9 5 3 .
20. Defense

Research

Board

Report

to Treasury

Board,

August 3, 1 9 5 4 , declassified, 2.

21. "Distribution o f Proceedings o f Fourth Symposium, Military Medicine, 1952," declas­
sified.
22. Zuhair Kashmeri, "Data Show C I A Monitored Deprivation Experiments," Globe
Mail

and

(Toronto), February 18, 1 9 8 4 .

23. Ibid.
24. H e b b , Heron and Bexton, Annual

Report,

Contract D R B X 3 8 ,

25. Juliet O'Neill, "Brain Washing Tests Assailed by Experts," Globe

1-2.
and Mail (Toronto),

November 2 7 , 1 9 8 6 .
26. Weinstein, Psychiatry
Marks, The Search

and the CIA, 122. T h o m a s , Journey into Madness,

for the Manchurian

Candidate:

The CIA and Mind

103; John D .
Control

(New

York: T i m e s Books, 1 9 7 9 ) , 133.
27. R. J . Russell, L. G . M . Page and R. L. Jillett, "Intensified Electroconvulsant Therapy,"
Lancet

( D e c e m b e r 5, 1 9 5 3 ) : 1 1 7 8 .

28. C a m e r o n , Lohrenz and H a n d c o c k , " T h e Depatterning Treatment o f Schizophre­
nia," 6 8 .
29. C a m e r o n , "Psychic Driving," 5 0 4 .
30. T h o m a s , Journey

into Madness,

180.

31. D . E w e n C a m e r o n et a l , "Sensory Deprivation: Effects upon the
H u m a n in Space Systems," Symposium
Flight,

on Psychophysiological

Functioning

Aspects

of

Space

ed. Bernard E . Flaherty (New York: C o l u m b i a University Press, 1961), 2 3 1 ;

C a m e r o n , "Psychic Driving," 504.
32. Marks, The Search

for the Manchurian

Candidate,

138.

33. C a m e r o n and Pande, "Treatment o f the C h r o n i c Paranoid Schizophrenic Patient," 92.
34. D . E w e n C a m e r o n , "Production o f Differential Amnesia as a Factor in the Treatment
of Schizophrenia," 2 7 .
35. T h o m a s , Journey

into Madness,

234.

36. C a m e r o n et al., "Sensory Deprivation," 2 2 6 , 2 3 2 .

N O T E S TO P A G E S 37 TO 42

37. Lawrence Weschler, A Miracle,

a Universe:

Settling

Accounts

471

with Torturers

(New

quoted in T h o m a s ,

Journey

York: Pantheon Books, 1 9 9 0 ) , 125.
38. Interview appeared in the Canadian magazine Weekend,
into Madness,

169.

39. C a m e r o n , "Psychic Driving," 5 0 8 .
40. C a m e r o n was citing another researcher, Norman Rosenzweig, to support his thesis.
C a m e r o n et al., "Sensory Deprivation," 2 2 9 .
4 1 . Weinstein, Psychiatry

and the CIA, 2 2 2 .

42. "Project M K U l t r a , T h e CIA's Program o f Research in Behavioral Modification,"
Joint Hearings
Health

Before

and Scientific

the Select
Research

Committee

on Intelligence

of the Committee

and the Subcommittee

on Human

Resources,

on

United States

Senate, 95th Congr., 1st Sess., August 3, 1 9 7 7 . Q u o t e d in Weinstein, Psychiatry

and

the CIA, 178.
4 3 . Ibid., 143.
44. James L e M o y n e , "Testifying to Torture," New York Times,
45. J e n n i f e r Harbury,
Consequences

Truth,

Torture

of U.S. Involvement

and

the

J u n e 5, 1 9 8 8 .

American

Way:

The

History

and

in Torture (Boston: B e a c o n Press, 2 0 0 5 ) , 87.

46. Senate Select C o m m i t t e e on Intelligence, "Transcript o f Proceedings before the
Select C o m m i t t e e on Intelligence: Honduran Interrogation Manual Hearing," June
16, 1988 ( B o x 1 C I A Training Manuals, Folder: Interrogation Manual Hearings,
National Security Archives). Quoted in M c C o y , A Question
47. T i m Weiner, "Interrogation, C.I.A.-Style," New York Times,

of Torture, 9 6 .
February 9, 1 9 9 7 ; Steven

M. Kleinman, " K U B A R K Counterintelligence Interrogation Review: Observations o f
an Interrogator," February 2 0 0 6 in Intelligence S c i e n c e Board, Educing

Information

(Washington D . C . : National Defense Intelligence C o l l e g e , D e c e m b e r 2 0 0 6 ) , 9 6 .
48. Central Intelligence Agency, Kubark

Counterintelligence

Interrogation,

July 1 9 6 3 ,

pages 1 and 8. Declassified manual is available in full from the National Security
Archives, www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv. Emphasis added.
49. Ibid., 1 , 3 8 .
50. Ibid., 1-2.
51. Ibid., 8 8 .
52. Ibid., 9 0 .
53. Central Intelligence Agency, Human

Resource

Exploitation

Training

Manual-1983.

Declassified manual is available in full from the National Security Archives, www
.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv. F O O T N O T E : Ibid.
54. Central Intelligence Agency, Kubark

Counterintelligence

Interrogation,

July 1 9 6 3 ,

49-50, 76-77.
55. Ibid., 4 1 , 6 6 .
56. M c C o y , A Question

of Torture,

8.

57. M c C o y , "Cruel S c i e n c e , " 2 2 0 .
58. Frantz Fanon, A Dying Colonialism,

trans. Haakon Chevalier ( 1 9 6 5 , repr. New York:

Grove Press, 1 9 6 7 ) , 138.
59. Pierre Messmer, F r e n c h minister o f defense from

1 9 6 0 to 1 9 6 9 , says that the

Americans invited the F r e n c h to train soldiers in the U . S . In response, G e n e r a l Paul
Aussaresses, the most notorious and unrepentant o f France's torture experts, went to
Fort Bragg and instructed U . S . soldiers on "seizure, interrogation, torture" techniques.
Death

Squadrons:

The French

Robin (Idéale Audience, 2 0 0 3 ) .

School,

documentary directed by Marie-Monique

472

N O T E S TO P A G E S 42 TO 48

60. M c C o y , A Question

of Torture, 6 5 .

6 1 . D i a n n a Ortiz, The Blindfold's

Eyes (New York: Orbis Books, 2 0 0 2 ) , 32.

62. Harbury, Truth, Torture and the American
63. United Nations, Geneva
Adopted August

Convention

Way.

Relative

to the Treatment

12, 1 9 4 9 , www.ohchr.org;

Uniform

Code

of Prisoners
of

of War,

Military

Justice,

Subchapter 10: Punitive Articles, Section 8 9 3 , Article 9 3 , www.au.af.mil.
64. Central Intelligence Agency, Kubark
Intelligence Agency, Human

Resource

Counterintelligence
Exploitation

65. Craig Gilbert, "War W i l l B e Stealthy," Milwaukee
2001;

Garry Wills, Reagan's

America:

Interrogation,

Training
Journal

Innocents

Sentinel,

at Home

2; Central

Manual—1983.
September 17,

(New York: Doubleday,

1987), 378.
66. Katharine Q. Seelye, "A Nation Challenged," New York Times, March 2 9 , 2002; Alberto
R. Gonzales, Memorandum

for the President,

January 2 5 , 2 0 0 2 , www.nsbc.msn.com.

6 7 . J e r a l d Phifer, "Subject: Request for Approval o f Counter-Resistance Strategies,"
Memorandum

for

Commander,

Joint

Task

Force

170,

October

1 1 , 2 0 0 2 : 6.

Declassified, www.npr.org.
68. U . S . Department o f Justice, Office o f Legal C o u n s e l , Office o f the Assistant Attorney
G e n e r a l , Memorandum

for Alberto

2 0 0 2 , www.washingtonpost.com.

R. Gonzales,

Counsel

to the President,

August 1,

F O O T N O T E : "Military Commissions Act o f

2 0 0 6 , " Subchapter V I I , S e c . 6, thomas.loc.gov; Alfred W . M c C o y , " T h e U.S. Has a
History o f Using Torture," History News Network,

George Mason

University,

D e c e m b e r 4 , 2 0 0 6 , www.hnn.us; " T h e Imperial Presidency at Work," New
Times,

York

January 15, 2 0 0 6 .

69. Kleinman, " K U B A R K Counterintelligence Interrogation Review," 9 5 .
70. D a n E g g e n , "Padilla C a s e Raises Questions about Anti-Terror Tactics,"

Washington

Post, November 19, 2 0 0 6 .
7 1 . C u r t Anderson, "Lawyers Show Images o f Padilla in Chains," Associated Press,
D e c e m b e r 4 , 2 0 0 6 ; John Grant, " W h y Did T h e y Torture Jose Padilla,"
Daily

Philadelphia

News, D e c e m b e r 12, 2 0 0 6 .

72. AAP, " U S Handling o f Hicks Poor: P M , " Sydney Morning

Herald,

73. Shafiq Rasul, Asif Iqbal and R h u h e l Ahmed, Composite
Afghanistan

and Guantânamo

February 6, 2 0 0 7 .

Statement:

Detention

in

Bay (New York: C e n t e r for Constitutional Rights, July

26, 2 0 0 4 ) , 9 5 , www.ccr-ny.org.
74. Adam Zagorin and M i c h a e l Duffy, "Inside the Interrogation o f D e t a i n e e 063,"

Time,

June 2 0 , 2 0 0 5 .
75. James Yee and Aimee Molloy, For God and Country:

Faith and Patriotism

under

Fire

(New York: Public Affairs, 2 0 0 5 ) , 1 0 1 - 1 0 2 ; T i m G o l d e n and Margot Williams,
"Hunger Strike Breaks O u t at G u a n t â n a m o , " New York Times, April 8, 2 0 0 7 .
76. Craig Whitlock, "In Letter, Radical C l e r i c Details C I A Abduction, Egyptian Torture,"
Washington

Post, November 10, 2 0 0 6 .

77.Ibid.
78. Amnesty International, "Italy, Abu O m a r : Italian Authorities Must Cooperate Fully
with All Investigations," Public Statement, November 16, 2 0 0 6 , www.amnesty.org.
79. Jumah al-Dossari, "Days of Adverse Hardship in U.S. Detention Camps—Testimony of
G u a n t â n a m o Detainee Jumah al-Dossari," Amnesty International, D e c e m b e r 16, 2005.
80. Mark Landler and Souad M e k h e n n e t , "Freed G e r m a n D e t a i n e e Questions His
Country's Role," New York Times,

November 4 , 2 0 0 6 .

8 1 . A. E . Schwartzman and P. E . Termansen, "Intensive Electroconvulsive Therapy: A
Follow-Up Study," Canadian

Psychiatric

Association

Journal

12, no. 2 ( 1 9 6 7 ) : 2 1 7 .

N O T E S TO P A G E S 49 TO 59

82. Erik E c k h o l m , "Winning Hearts o f Iraqis with a Sewage Pipeline," New York

473

Times,

September 5, 2 0 0 4 .

2. The Other Doctor Shock: Milton Friedman and the Search for a Laissez-Faire Laboratory
1. Arnold C . Harberger, "Letter to a Younger Generation," Journal of Applied

Economics

l , n o . 1 ( 1 9 9 8 ) : 2.
2.

Katherine Anderson and T h o m a s Skinner, " T h e Power o f C h o i c e : T h e Life and
T i m e s o f Milton Friedman," aired on P B S on January 2 9 , 2 0 0 7 .

3. Jonathan Peterson, "Milton Friedman, 1 9 1 2 - 2 0 0 6 , " Los Angeles

Times,

November

17, 2 0 0 6 .
4.

Frank H. Knight, " T h e Newer E c o n o m i c s and the Control o f E c o n o m i c Activity,"
Journal

of Political

Economy

4 0 , no. 4 (August 1 9 3 2 ) : 4 5 5 .

5. Daniel Bell, "Models and Reality in E c o n o m i c Discourse," The Crisis in
Theory,
6.

Economic

eds. Daniel Bell and Irving Kristol (New York: Basic Books, 1 9 8 1 ) , 5 7 - 5 8 .

Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

People:

Memoirs

(Chicago:

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 2 4 .
7.

Larry Kudlow, " T h e Hand o f Friedman," T h e C o r n e r web log on the National Review
O n l i n e , November 16, 2 0 0 6 , www.nationalreview.com.

8.

Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky

9.

Milton Friedman, Capitalism

People, 2 1 .

and Freedom

( 1 9 6 2 , repr. C h i c a g o : University o f

C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 8 2 ) , 15.
10. D o n

Patinkin, Essays

on and

in the

Chicago

Tradition

(Durham,

NC:

Duke

University Press, 1 9 8 1 ) , 4 .
11. Friedrich A. Hayek, The Road to Serfdom

(Chicago: University of C h i c a g o Press, 1944).

12. Interview with Arnold Harberger conducted O c t o b e r 3, 2 0 0 0 , for
Heights:

The Battle

for the World

Economy

Commanding

[television series for P B S ] , executive

producers Daniel Yergin and S u e L e n a T h o m p s o n , series producer W i l l i a m Cran
(Boston:

Heights

Productions,

2002),

full

interview

transcript

available

at

www.pbs.org.
13. John Maynard Keynes, The End of Laissez-Faire

(London: L & Virginia Woolf, 1 9 2 6 ) .

14. John Maynard Keynes, "From Keynes to Roosevelt: O u r Recovery Plan Assayed," New
York Times,

December 31, 1933.

15. John Kenneth Galbraith, The Great

Crash

of 1929 ( 1 9 5 4 , repr. New York: Avon,

1979), 168.
16. John Maynard

Keynes, The

Economic

Consequences

of

the Peace

( 1 9 1 9 , repr.

Westminster, UK: Labour Research Department, 1 9 2 0 ) , 2 5 1 .
17. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky
18. Stephen Kinzer, All the Shah's

People, 5 9 4 .

Men: An American

Coup

and the Roots of Middle

Terror (Hoboken, NJ: John Wiley & Sons, 2 0 0 3 ) , 1 5 3 - 5 4 ; Stephen Kinzer,
America's

Century

of Regime

Change

from Hawaii

East

Overthrow:

to Iraq (New York: T i m e s Books,

2006), 4.
19. El Imparcial,

M a r c h 16, 1 9 5 1 , cited in Stephen C . Schlesinger, Stephen Kinzer and

John H. Coatsworth, Bitter

Fruit:

The Story of the American

Coup

in

Guatemala

(Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1 9 9 9 ) , 52.
20. Patterson described Argentine and Brazilian economists as "pink" in an interview with
Juan Gabriel Valdés. He spoke o f the need to "change the formation o f the m e n " to
the U.S. ambassador to C h i l e , Willard B e a u l a c . Juan Gabriel Valdés,

Pinochet's

UlU

N O T E S TO P A G E S 60 TO 67

Economists:

The Chicago

School

in Chile

(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press,

1995), 110-13.
21. Ibid., 8 9 .
22. T h e quotation c o m e s from Joseph Grunwald, a C o l u m b i a University economist
working at the time at the University o f C h i l e . Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

135.

23. Harberger, "Letter to a Younger Generation," 2.
24. André G u n d e r
Humanity

Frank, Economic

Genocide

in Chile:

Monetarist

Theory

Versus

(Nottingham, U K : Spokesman Books, 1 9 7 6 ) , 7 - 8 .

25. K e n n e t h

W. Clements,

International

Money

26. G u n d e r Frank, Economic
27. M e m o r a n d u m

"Larry

and Finance

Sjaastad, T h e

Last C h i c a g o a n , " Journal

of

24 (2005): 867-69.

Genocide

in Chile,

8.

to W i l l i a m C a r m i c h a e l , via Jeffrey

Puryear,

Trowbridge, O c t o b e r 2 4 , 1 9 8 4 , page 4 , cited in Valdés, Pinochet's

from

James W .

Economists,

194.

28. Ibid., 2 0 6 . F O O T N O T E : " T h e Rising Risk o f Recession," Time, D e c e m b e r 19, 1969.
29. In 1 9 6 3 , de Castro himself was on leave from Santiago to further his studies at the
University o f C h i c a g o . He b e c a m e chairman in 1965. Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

140, 165.
30. Ibid., 159. T h e quotation comes from Ernesto Fontaine, a C h i c a g o grad and a pro­
fessor at the C a t h o l i c University in Santiago.
31. Ibid., 6, 13.
32. T h i r d report to the C a t h o l i c University o f C h i l e and the International Cooperation
Administration, August 1957, signed by Gregg Lewis, University o f C h i c a g o , page 3,
cited in Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

132.

33. Interview with Ricardo Lagos conducted January 19, 2 0 0 2 , for Commanding
The Battle

for the World Economy,

34. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky
35. Central

Heights:

www.pbs.org.
People,

Intelligence Agency, Notes

388.

on Meeting

with

the

President

on

Chile,

September 15, 1 9 7 0 , declassified, www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.
36. " T h e Last D o p e from C h i l e , " m i m e o signed "Al H.," dated Santiago, September 7,
1970, cited in Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

37. S u e Branford and Bernardo Kucinski, Debt
America

242-43.
Squads:

The U.S., the Banks,

and

Latin

(London: Zed Books, 1 9 8 8 ) , 4 0 , 5 1 - 5 2 .

38. S u b c o m m i t t e e on Multinational Corporations, " T h e International Telephone and
Telegraph C o m p a n y and C h i l e , 1 9 7 0 - 7 1 , " Report
Relations

United

States

Senate

by the Subcommittee

to the Committee
on Multinational

on

Foreign

Corporations,

June 2 1 , 1 9 7 3 , 13.
39. Ibid., 15.
4 0 . Francisco Letelier, interview, Democracy

Now! S e p t e m b e r 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 .

4 1 . S u b c o m m i t t e e on Multinational Corporations, " T h e International Telephone and
Telegraph C o m p a n y and C h i l e , 1 9 7 0 - 7 1 , " 4 , 18.
4 2 . Ibid., 11, 15.
4 3 . Ibid., 17.
44. Archdiocese o f Sâo Paulo, Torture
of

Torture

by Brazilian

Military

in Brazil:
Governments,

A Shocking

Report

1964-1979,

on the Pervasive

Use

ed. Joan Dassin, trans.

J a i m e Wright (Austin: University o f Texas Press, 1 9 8 6 ) , 53.
45. William B l u m , Killing

Hope:

U.S.

Military

and

CIA

Interventions

Since

WWII

(Monroe, M E : C o m m o n Courage Press, 1995), 195; "Times Diary: Liquidating
Sukarno," Times (London), August 8, 1986.

N O T E S TO P A G E S 67 TO 71

46. Kathy Kadane, "U.S. Officials' Lists Aided Indonesian Bloodbath in '60s,"

675

Washington

Post, May 2 1 , 1 9 9 0 .
47. Kadane first published the a c c o u n t o f the lists, based on taped on-the-record inter­
views with top U . S . officials posted in Indonesia at the time, in The Washington
The

Post.

information about radios and weapons appears in a letter to the editor written by

Kadane in The New York Review

of Books,

April 10, 1 9 9 7 , based on the same inter­

views. Kadane's interview transcripts are now with the National Security Archive in
Washington, D C . Kadane, " U . S . Officials' Lists Aided Indonesian Bloodbath in '60s."
48. J o h n Hughes, Indonesian

Upheaval

(New York: David M c K a y C o m p a n y , I n c . ,

1 9 6 7 ) , 132.
49. T h e 5 0 0 , 0 0 0 figure is the most c o m m o n l y used, including by The Washington
1966.

Post in

Britain's ambassador to Indonesia estimated the n u m b e r at 4 0 0 , 0 0 0 , but he

reported that the Swedish ambassador, who had done additional research, d e e m e d it
"a very serious under-estimate." S o m e put the n u m b e r as high as a million, though
the C I A claimed in a 1968 report that 2 5 0 , 0 0 0 had b e e n killed, calling it "one o f the
worst mass murders o f the 20th century." "Silent Settlement," Time,
1965; John Pilger, The New Rulers of the World

D e c e m b e r 17,

(London: Verso, 2 0 0 2 ) , 34; Kadane,

"U.S. Officials' Lists Aided Indonesian Bloodbath in '60s."
50. "Silent Settlement."
51. David Ransom, "Ford Country: Building an Elite for Indonesia," The Trojan
A Radical

Look

at Foreign

Horse:

Aid, ed. Steve Weissman (Palo Alto, CA: Ramparts Press,

1975), 9 9 .
52. F O O T N O T E : Ibid., 100.
53. Robert Lubar, "Indonesia's Potholed Road Back," Fortune,
54. Goenawan M o h a m a d , Celebrating
1953-2003

Indonesia:

June 1, 1 9 6 8 .

Fifty Years with the Ford

Foundation

(Jakarta: Ford Foundation, 2 0 0 3 ) , 59.

55. In the original text, the author spells the general's n a m e Soeharto; I changed it to the
more c o m m o n spelling Suharto for the sake o f consistency. M o h a m m a d Sadli,
"Recollections o f M y Career," Bulletin

of Indonesian

Economic

Studies

29, no. 1

(April 1993): 4 0 .
56. T h e following posts were filled with graduates o f the Ford program: minister o f
finance, minister o f trade and c o m m e r c e , chair o f the National Planning Board, vicechair of the National Planning Board, secretary-general o f Marketing and Trade
Research, chairman o f the T e c h n i c a l T e a m o f Foreign Investment, secretary-general
of industry and ambassador to Washington. Ransom, "Ford Country," 1 1 0 .
57. Richard Nixon, "Asia After Vietnam," Foreign

Affairs

F O O T N O T E : Arnold C . Harberger, Curriculum

4 6 , no. 1 ( O c t o b e r 1 9 6 7 ) : 1 1 1 .
Vitae,

November 2 0 0 3 , www

.econ.ucla.edu.
58. Pilger, The New Rulers of the World,

36-37.

59. CIA, "Secret C a b l e from Headquarters [Blueprint for Fomenting a C o u p C l i m a t e ] ,
September 27, 1970," in Peter Kornbluh, The Pinochet
Atrocity and Accountability
60. Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

File: A Declassified

Dossier

on

(New York: New Press, 2 0 0 3 ) , 4 9 - 5 6 .
251.

61. Ibid., 2 4 8 - 4 9 .
62. Ibid., 2 5 0 .
63. Select C o m m i t t e e to Study Governmental Operations with Respect to Intelligence
Activities, United States Senate, Covert Action in Chile

1963-1973

U.S. Government Printing Office, D e c e m b e r 18, 1 9 7 5 ) , 30.

(Washington, D C :

476

N O T E S TO P A G E S 75 TO 81

64. Ibid., 4 0 .
6 5 . E d u a r d o Silva, The State
Market

Economics

and Capital

in Chile:

Business

Elites,

Technocrats,

and

(Boulder, C O : Westview Press, 1 9 9 6 ) , 7 4 .

66. Orlando Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e : E c o n o m i c Freedom's Awful Toll,"
The

Nation,

August 2 8 , 1 9 7 6 .

3. States of Shock: The Bloody Birth of the Counterrevolution
1. N i c c o l ô Machiavelli, The Prince,

trans. W . K. Marriott (Toronto: Alfred A. Knopf,

1992), 42.
2.

Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

People:

Memoirs

(Chicago:

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 5 9 2 .
3.

Batalla

de Chile

[three-part documentary film series] compiled by Patricia G u z m a n ,

originally produced 1 9 7 5 - 7 9 (New York: First Run/Icarus Films, 1993).
4.

J o h n Dinges and Saul Landau, Assassination

on Embassy

Row (New York: Pantheon

Books, 1 9 8 0 ) , 6 4 .
5.

Report of the Chilean

National

Commission

on Truth and Reconciliation,

vol. 1, trans.

Phillip E . Berryman (Notre D a m e : University o f Notre D a m e Press, 1993), 153; Peter
Kornbluh, The Pinochet

File: A Declassified

Dossier

on Atrocity and

Accountability

(New York: New Press, 2 0 0 3 ) , 1 5 3 - 5 4 .
6.

Kornbluh, The Pinochet

7.

T h e s e numbers are contested because the military government was notorious for cov­

File,

155-56.

ering up and denying its crimes. Jonathan Kandell, "Augusto Pinochet, 9 1 , Dictator
Who

Ruled by Terror in C h i l e , Dies," New York Times,

Since

Independence,

D e c e m b e r 11, 2 0 0 6 ;

Chile

ed. Leslie Bethell (New York: Cambridge University Press,

1 9 9 3 ) , 1 7 8 ; Rupert Cornwell, " T h e G e n e r a l Willing to Kill His People to W i n the
Battle against C o m m u n i s m , " Independent
8.

Juan

G a b r i e l Valdés, Pinochet's

( L o n d o n ) , D e c e m b e r 11, 2 0 0 6 .

Economists:

The

Chicago

School

in

Chile

(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1 9 9 5 ) , 2 5 2 .
9.

Pamela Constable and Arturo Valenzuela, A Nation
Pinochet

of Enemies:

Chile

Under

(New York: W . W . Norton & Company, 1 9 9 1 ) , 187.

10. Robert Harvey, "Chile's Counter-Revolution: T h e Fight G o e s On," The

Economist,

February 2, 1 9 8 0 .
11. José Pinera, "How the Power o f Ideas C a n Transform a Country," www.josepinera.com.
12. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation

of Enemies,

74-75.

of Enemies,

70.

13. Ibid., 6 9 .
14. Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

31.

15. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation

16. Pinochet's only trade barrier was a 10 percent tariff on imports, which does not con­
stitute a trade barrier but a minor import tax. André G u n d e r Frank,
Genocide

in

Chile:

Monetarist

Theory

versus

Humanity

Economic

(Nottingham,

UK:

Spokesman Books, 1 9 7 6 ) , 8 1 .
17. T h e s e are conservative estimates. Gunder Frank writes that in the first year of junta rule,
inflation reached 508 percent and may have been close to 1,000 percent for "basic neces­
sities." In 1972, Allende's last year in office, inflation reached 163 percent. Constable and
Valenzuela, A Nation of Enemies,

170; Gunder Frank, Economic

Genocide

18. Que Pasa (Santiago), January 16, 1 9 7 5 , cited in G u n d e r Frank, Economic
in Chile,

26.

in Chile, 62.
Genocide

N O T E S TO P A G E S 81 TO 87

477

19. La Tercera (Santiago), April 9, 1 9 7 5 , cited in Orlando Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in
Chile," The Nation,
20. El Mercurio

August 2 8 , 1 9 7 6 .

(Santiago), M a r c h 2 3 , 1 9 7 6 , cited in ibid.

21. Que Pasa (Santiago), April 3, 1 9 7 5 , cited in ibid.
22. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

399.

23. Ibid., 5 9 3 - 9 4 .
24. Ibid., 5 9 2 - 9 4 .
25. Ibid., 594.
26. G u n d e r Frank, Economic

Genocide

27. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation

in Chile,

34.

of Enemies,

172-73.

28. "In 1980, public spending on health had decreased by 17.6 per cent compared to 1970,
and education by 11.3 per cent." Valdés, Pinochet's
Valenzuela, A Nation

of

Revolution," The Economist,
29. Valdés, Pinochet's

Enemies,

Economists,

2 3 , 2 6 ; Constable and

1 7 2 - 7 3 ; Robert Harvey,

"Chile's

Counter-

February 2, 1980.

Economists,

22.

30. Albert O . Hirschman, " T h e Political E c o n o m y o f Latin American
Seven Exercises in Retrospection," Latin American

Research

Review

Development:

12, no. 3 ( 1 9 8 7 ) :

15.
31. Public Citizen, " T h e Uses of Chile: How Politics Trumped Truth in the Neo-Liberal
Revision of Chile's Development," discussion paper, September 2 0 0 6 , www.citizen.org.
32. "A Draconian C u r e for Chile's E c o n o m i c Ills?" BusinessWeek,

January 12, 1 9 7 6 .

33. Peter Dworkin, "Chile's Brave New World o f Reaganomics," Fortune,
1981; Valdés, Pinochet's

Economists,

November 2,

2 3 ; Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e . "

34. Hirschman, " T h e Political E c o n o m y o f Latin American Development," 15.
35. Junta finance minister Jorge Cauas made the statement. Constable and Valenzuela,
Nation

of Enemies,

173.

36. Ann Crittenden, "Loans from Abroad Flow to Chile's Rightist Junta," New York

Times,

February 2 0 , 1 9 7 6 .
37. "A Draconian C u r e for Chile's E c o n o m i c Ills?" BusinessWeek,
38. Gunder Frank, Economic

Genocide

in Chile,

January 12, 1 9 7 6 .

58.

39. Ibid., 6 5 - 6 6 .
40. Harvey, "Chile's Counter-Revolution"; Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e . "
4 1 . Gunder Frank, Economic

Genocide

in Chile,

42.

42. Pinera, "How the Power o f Ideas C a n Transform a Country."
43. Robert M . Bleiberg, " W h y Attack C h i l e ? " Barron's,

June 2 2 , 1 9 8 7 .

44. Jonathan Kandell, " C h i l e , Lab Test for a Theorist," New York Times,

March 2 1 , 1976.

45. Kandell, "Augusto Pinochet, 9 1 , Dictator W h o Ruled by Terror in C h i l e , Dies"; "A
Dictator's D o u b l e Standard," Washington
46. Greg Grandin, Empire's

Workshop:

Post, D e c e m b e r 12, 2 0 0 6 .

Latin America

and the Roots of U.S.

Imperialism

(New York: Metropolitan Books, 2 0 0 6 ) , 1 7 1 .
47. Ibid., 1 7 1 .
48. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation

of Enemies,

197-98.

49. José Pinera, "Wealth through Ownership: Creating Property Rights in
Mining," Cato Journal

50. Interview with Alejandro Foxley conducted
Heights:

Chilean

2 4 , no. 3 (Fall 2 0 0 4 ) : 2 9 6 .

The Battle for the World Economy,

51. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation

M a r c h 2 6 , 2 0 0 1 , for

Commanding

www.pbs.org.

of Enemies,

219.

52. Central Intelligence Agency, "Field Listing—Distribution o f family i n c o m e —Gini
index," World Factbook

2007,

www.cia.gov.

478

N O T E S TO P A G E S 88 TO 94

53. Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e . "
54. Milton Friedman, " E c o n o m i c Miracles," Newsweek,

January 2 1 , 1974.

55. G l e n Biglaiser, " T h e Internationalization o f Chicago's E c o n o m i c s in Latin America,"
Economic

Development

and Cultural

56. Lawrence Weschler, A Miracle,

Change

50 ( 2 0 0 2 ) : 2 8 0 .

a Universe:

Settling

Accounts

with Torturers

(New

York: Pantheon Books, 1 9 9 0 ) , 149.
57. T h e quotation c o m e s from notes taken by Brazil's ambassador to Argentina at the
time, Joâo Baptista Pinheiro. Reuters, "Argentine Military Warned Brazil, C h i l e of
7 6 Coup," C N N , March 2 1 , 2007.
58. M a r i o I. B l e j e r was Argentina's secretary o f finance during the dictatorship. He
received a P h D in e c o n o m i c s at the University o f C h i c a g o the year before the coup.
Adolfo D i z , P h D , University o f C h i c a g o , was president o f the central bank dur­
ing the dictatorship. Fernando D e Santibânes, C h i c a g o P h D , worked in the cen­
tral bank during the dictatorship. Ricardo Lopez Murphy, M A in C h i c a g o , nation­
al director o f the Office o f E c o n o m i c Research and Fiscal Analysis in the Treasury
Department

o f the

Finance

Ministry

(1974-1983).

Several other

Chicago

grads held lower-level e c o n o m i c positions in the dictatorship, as consultants and
advisers.
59. M i c h a e l M c C a u g h a n , True Crimes:

Rodolfo

Walsh

(London: Latin America Bureau,

2 0 0 2 ) , 2 8 4 - 9 0 ; " T h e Province o f Buenos Aires: Vibrant Growth and
BusinessWeek,

Opportunity,"

July 14, 1 9 8 0 , special advertising section.

60. Henry Kissinger and César Augusto Guzzetti, M e m o r a n d u m o f Conversation, June
10, 1 9 7 6 , declassified,

www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.

6 1 . " T h e Province o f B u e n o s Aires." F O O T N O T E : Ibid.
62. M c C a u g h a n , True Crimes,

299.

63. Reuters, "Argentine Military Warned Brazil, C h i l e o f 7 6 Coup."
64. Report of the Chilean

National

Commission

on Truth and Reconciliation,

vol. 2, trans.

Phillip E . Berryman (Notre D a m e : University o f Notre D a m e Press, 1993), 5 0 1 .
65. Marguerite Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of Terror: Argentina

and the Legacies

of

Torture

(New York: Oxford University Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , ix.
66. Ibid., 149, 1 7 5 .
67. Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of Terror, 165.

68. Weschler, A Miracle,

a Universe,

170.

69. Amnesty International, Report on an Amnesty International

Mission

to Argentina

6-15

November

1976 (London: Amnesty International Publications, 1 9 7 7 ) , 35; Feitlowitz,

A Lexicon

of Terror, 158.

70. Alex S a n c h e z , C o u n c i l on Hemispheric Affairs, "Uruguay: Keeping the Military in
C h e c k , " November 2 0 , 2 0 0 6 , www.coha.org.
7 1 . G u n d e r Frank, Economic

Genocide

in Chile,

4 3 ; Batalla

de

Chile.

72. United States Senate, S e l e c t C o m m i t t e e to Study Governmental Operations with
Respect to Intelligence Activities, Covert
DC:

Action

in Chile

1963-1973

(Washington,

U . S . G o v e r n m e n t Printing Office, D e c e m b e r 18, 1 9 7 5 ) , 4 0 .

73. Archdiocese o f Sào Paulo, Brasil: Nunca Mais/Torture
the Pervasive

Use of Torture by Brazilian

Military

in Brazil: A Shocking

Governments,

Report

1964-1979,

on

ed. Joan

Dassin, trans. J a i m e Wright (Austin: University o f Texas Press, 1986), 1 3 - 1 4 .
74. Eduardo G a l e a n o , "A Century o f Wind," Memory

of Fire,

vol. 3, trans. Cedric

Belfrage (London: Quartet Books, 1 9 8 9 ) , 2 0 8 .
75. Report

of the Chilean

76. Kornbluh, The Pinochet

National

Commission

File, 162.

on Truth and Reconciliation,

vol. 1, 153.

N O T E S TO P A G E S 95 TO 102

77. Weschler, A Miracle,

a Universe,

479

145. F O O T N O T E : J a n e Mayer, " T h e Experiment,"

The New Yorker, July 1 1 , 2 0 0 5 .
78. T h i s estimate is based on the fact that Brazil had 8 , 4 0 0 political prisoners in this
period, and thousands o f t h e m were tortured. Uruguay had 6 0 , 0 0 0 political prison­
ers, and according to the Red Cross, torture in the jails was systemic. An estimated
5 0 , 0 0 0 C h i l e a n s faced torture and at least 3 0 , 0 0 0 Argentines did, which would
make the 1 0 0 , 0 0 0 figure very conservative. Larry Rohter, "Brazil Rights G r o u p
Hopes to B a r Doctors Linked to Torture," New York Times,

M a r c h 1 1 , 1 9 9 9 ; Orga­

nization of A m e r i c a n States, Inter-American C o m m i s s i o n on H u m a n Rights,
on the Situation

of Human

Rights

in Uruguay,

Report

January 3 1 , 1 9 7 8 , www.cidh.org;

D u n c a n C a m p b e l l and Jonathan Franklin, "Last C h a n c e to C l e a n the Slate o f the
P i n o c h e t Era," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , S e p t e m b e r 1, 2 0 0 3 ; Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of

Terror, ix.
79. M c C a u g h a n , True Crimes,

290.

80. Ibid., 2 7 4 .
81. Ibid., 2 8 5 - 8 9 .
82. Ibid., 2 8 0 - 8 2 .
83. Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of Terror, 2 5 - 2 6 .

84. "Covert Action in C h i l e 1 9 6 3 - 1 9 7 3 , " 4 5 .
85. Weschler, A Miracle,

a Universe,

110; Department o f State, " S u b j e c t : Secretary's

Meeting with Argentine Foreign Minister Guzzetti," M e m o r a n d u m o f Conversation,
October 7, 1 9 7 6 , declassified,

www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.

86. In Attendance — Friday, M a r c h 2 6 , 1 9 7 6 , declassified d o c u m e n t available from the
National Security Archive,

www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.

6. Cleaning the Slate: Terror Does Its Work
1. Daniel Feierstein and G u i l l e r m o Levy, Hasta
sociales
2.

genocidas

en America

Latina

Marguerite Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

que la muerte

nos sépare:

Prâcticas

(Buenos Aires: Ediciones al margen, 2 0 0 4 ) , 7 6 .
of Terror: Argentina

and the Legacies

of

Torture

(New York: Oxford University Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , xii.
3.

Orlando Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e , " The Nation,

4.

Ibid.

5.

John Dinges and Saul Landau, Assassination

on Embassy

August 2 8 , 1 9 7 6 .

Row (New York: Pantheon

Books, 1980), 2 0 7 - 1 0 .
6.

Pamela Constable and Arturo Valenzuela, A Nation
Pinochet
The

of Enemies:

Chile

Under

(New York: W. W. Norton & Company, 1 9 9 1 ) , 1 0 3 - 1 0 7 ; Peter Kornbluh,

Pinochet

File: A Declassified

Dossier

on Atrocity and Accountability

(New York:

New Press, 2 0 0 3 ) , 167.
7.

Eduardo Gallardo, "In Posthumous Letter, Lonely Ex-Dictator Justifies 1973 C h i l e
Coup," Associated Press, D e c e m b e r 2 4 , 2 0 0 6 .

8.

"Dos Veces Desaparecido," Pagina 12, S e p t e m b e r 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 .

9.

Carlos Rozanski was the lead author o f the ruling, which was cowritten by judges
Norberto Lorenzo and Horacio A. Insaurralde. Federal Oral C o u r t N o . 1, Case N E
2 2 5 1 / 0 6 , September 2 0 0 6 , www.rodolfowalsh.org.

10. Federal Oral Court No. 1, Case N E 2 2 5 1 / 0 6 , September 2 0 0 6 , www.rodolfowalsh.org.
11.Ibid.
12. United Nations Office o f the High Commissioner for H u m a n Rights, "Convention on

480

N O T E S TO P A G E S 102 TO 108

the Prevention and Punishment o f the C r i m e o f G e n o c i d e , " approved D e c e m b e r 9,
1948,

www.ohchr.org.

13. L e o Kuper, "Genocide: Its Political Use in the Twentieth Century," in Alexander Laban
Hinton, ed., Genocide:

An Anthropological

Reader

(Maiden, MA: Blackwell, 2 0 0 2 ) , 56.

14. Beth Van Schaack, " T h e C r i m e o f Political G e n o c i d e : Repairing the Genocide
Convention's Blind Spot," Yale Law Journal

107, no. 7 (May 1997).

15. "Auto de la Sala de lo Penal de la Audiencia Nacional confirmando la jurisdiction de
Espana para c o n o c e r de los crimines de genocidio y terrorismo cometidos durante la
dictadura argentina," Madrid, November 4 , 1 9 9 8 , www.derechos.org. F O O T N O T E :
Van

S c h a a c k , " T h e C r i m e o f Political G e n o c i d e . "

16. Baltasar Garzôn, "Auto de Procesamiento a Militares Argentinos," Madrid, November
2, 1 9 9 9 , www.derechos.org.
17. M i c h a e l M c C a u g h a n , True Crimes:

Rodolfo

Walsh

(London: Latin America Bureau,

2 0 0 2 ) , 182.
18. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation of Enemies,
19. G u i l l e r m o Levy, "Considerations
E c o n o m i c s , and G e n o c i d e , " Journal
20. Juan

Gabriel

16.

on the C o n n e c t i o n s between

Valdés, Pinochet's

of Genocide

Research

Economists:

The

Race, Politics,

8, no. 2 (June 2 0 0 6 ) : 142.
Chicago

School

in

Chile

(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1 9 9 5 ) , 7 - 8 and 113.
2 1 . Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation of Enemies,
22. Ibid., 39; Alfred Rosenberg, Myth
Spiritual-Intellectual

16.

of the Twentieth

Confrontations

Century:

An Evaluation

of the

of Our Age ( 1 9 3 0 , repr. Newport B e a c h , CA:

Noontide Press, 1 9 9 3 ) , 3 3 3 .
23. André G u n d e r
Humanity

Frank, Economic

Genocide

in Chile:

Monetarist

Theory

Versus

(Nottingham, UK: Spokesman Books, 1 9 7 6 ) , 4 1 .

24. Ibid.
2 5. Amnesty International, Report on an Amnesty International
November

Mission

to Argentina

6-15

1976 (London: Amnesty International Publications, 1 9 7 7 ) , 6 5 .

26. Ibid.
27. Marguerite Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of Terror: Argentina

and the Legacies

of

Torture

(New York: Oxford University Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 159.
28. D i a n a

Taylor, Disappearing

Argentina's

Acts:

Spectacles

of

Gender

and

Nationalism

in

"Dirty War" ( D u r h a m , N C : D u k e University Press, 1997), 105.

29. Report of the Chilean

National

Commission

on Truth and Reconciliation,

vol. 1, trans.

Phillip E . Berryman (South B e n d , IN: University o f Notre D a m e Press, 1993), 140.
30. T h e editorial appeared in La Prensa (Buenos Aires). Cited in Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of

Terror, 153.
31. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation of Enemies,

153.

32. Archdiocese o f Sâo Paulo, Brasil: Nunca Mais/Torture
the Pervasive

Use of Torture by Brazilian

Military

in Brazil: A Shocking

Governments,

Report

1964-1979,

on

ed. Joan

Dassin, trans. J a i m e Wright (Austin: University o f Texas Press, 1 9 8 6 ) , 1 0 6 - 1 1 0 .
33. Report

of the Chilean

National

Commission

on Truth and Reconciliation,

vol. 1, 149.

34. Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e . "
35. Nunca

Mas (Never again): The Report

Disappeared

of the Argentine

National

Commission

of the

(New York: Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 1 9 8 6 ) , 3 6 9 .

36. Ibid., 3 7 1 .
37. Amnesty International, Report on an Amnesty
November

1976, 9.

38.Taylor, Disappearing

Acts, 1 1 1 .

International

Mission

to Argentina

6-15

N O T E S TO P A G E S 108 TO 1 U

39. Archdiocese of Sào Paulo, Torture in Brazil,

481

64.

40. Karen Robert, " T h e Falcon R e m e m b e r e d , " N A C L A Report

on the Americas

39, no. 3

( N o v e m b e r - D e c e m b e r 2 0 0 5 ) : 12.
4 1 . Victoria Basualdo, "Complicidad patronal-militar en la ultima dictadura argentina,"
Engranajes:

Boletin

de FETIA,

no. 5, special edition, M a r c h 2 0 0 6 .

42. Transcript o f interviews conducted by Rodrigo Gutierrez with Pedro Troiani and
Carlos Alberto Propato, both former Ford workers and union activists, for a forth­
coming documentary film on the Ford Falcon,

Falcon.

43. " D e m a n d a n a la Ford por el secuestro de gremialistas durante la dictadura,"

Pagina

12, February 2 4 , 2 0 0 6 .
44. Robert, " T h e Falcon R e m e m b e r e d , ' T 3 - 1 5 ; transcript o f Gutierrez's interviews with
Troiani and Propato.
45. "Demandan a la Ford por el secuestro de gremialistas durante la dictadura."
46.Ibid.
47. Larry Rohter, "Ford Motor Is Linked to Argentina's 'Dirty War,' " New York

Times,

November 27, 2 0 0 2 .
48. Ibid.; Sergio Correa, "Los desaparecidos de Mercedes-Benz " BBC Mundo,

November

5, 2 0 0 2 .
49. Robert, " T h e Falcon R e m e m b e r e d , " 14.
50. M c C a u g h a n , True Crimes,

290.

51. Nunca Mas: The Report of the Argentine National
52. Quoting

Padre

Argentina

Commission

Santano. Patricia Marchak, God's

of the Disappeared,

Assassins:

State

22.

Terrorism

in

in the 1970s (Montreal: M c G i l l - Q u e e n ' s University Press, 1 9 9 9 ) , 2 4 1 .

53. Marchak, God's Assassins,

155.

54. Levy, "Considerations on the C o n n e c t i o n s between R a c e , Politics, E c o n o m i c s , and
Genocide," 142.
55. Marchak, God's Assassins,
56. Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

161.

of Terror, 4 2 .

57. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation of Enemies,

171, 188.

58. Ibid., 147.
59. T h e editorial appeared in La Prensa

(Buenos Aires), cited in Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of

Terror, 153.
60. Constable and Valenzuela, A Nation
"A C u r e for Devils," Medical
Frank, ed., History of Shock
61. M c C a u g h a n , True Crimes,
62. Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of Enemies,

World

7 8 . F O O T N O T E : L . M . Shirlaw,

9 4 (January 1961): 56, cited in Leonard Roy

Treatment

(San Francisco: Frank, S e p t e m b e r 1 9 7 8 ) , 2.

295.

of Terror,

63. David Rose, " G u a n t â n a m o

77.
Briton 'in Handcuff Torture,'" Observer

(London),

January 2, 2 0 0 5 .
64. Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

People:

Memoirs

(Chicago:

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 5 9 6 . F O O T N O T E : David Rose, " G u a n t â n a m o
Briton 'in Handcuff Torture,'" Observer

( L o n d o n ) , January 2, 2 0 0 5 .

65. Arnold C . Harberger, "Letter to a Younger Generation," Journal

of Applied

Economics

l , n o . 1 (1998): 4.
66. Amnesty International, Report on an Amnesty International
November

Mission

to Argentina

6-15

1976, 3 4 - 3 5 .

67. Robert Jay Lifton, The Nazi Doctors:

Medical

Killing

and the Psychology

of

(1986, repr. New York: Basic Books, 2 0 0 0 ) , 16; François Ponchaud, Cambodia

Genocide
Year

Zero, trans. Nancy Amphoux ( 1 9 7 7 , repr. New York: Rinehart and Winston, 1 9 7 8 ) , 50.

482

N O T E S TO P A G E S 1 U TO 121

6 8 . United Nations Office o f the High Commissioner for H u m a n Rights, "Convention on
the Prevention and Punishment o f the C r i m e o f G e n o c i d e , " approved D e c e m b e r 9,
1948,

www.ohchr.org.

69. H I J O S (a h u m a n rights organization o f the children o f the disappeared) estimate over
five hundred children. H I J O S , "Lineamientos," www.hijos.org.ar; the figure o f two
hundred cases cited in H u m a n Rights W a t c h , Annual

Report 2001, www.hrw.org.

70. Silvana Boschi, "Desapariciôn de menores durante la dictadura militar: Presentan un
d o c u m e n t o clave," Clarin
7 1 . Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

(Buenos Aires), S e p t e m b e r 14, 1997.

of Terror, 8 9 .

5. "Entirely Unrelated": How an Ideology Was Cleansed of Its Crimes
1. D o n a l d Rumsfeld, Secretary
to

Milton

Friedman,

of Defense

White

Donald

House,

H. Rumsfeld

Washington,

Speaking

at

Tribute

DC,

May 9, 2002,

www

Accounts

with Torturers

(New

.defenselink.mil.
2.

Lawrence Weschler, A Miracle,

a Universe:

Settling

York: Pantheon Books, 1 9 9 0 ) , 147.
3.

Anthony Lewis, "For W h i c h W e Stand: II," New York Times,

4.

"A Draconian C u r e for Chile's E c o n o m i c Ills?" BusinessWeek,
Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

O c t o b e r 2, 1 9 7 5 .

People:

January 12, 1976;
Memoirs

(Chicago:

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 6 0 1 .
5.

Milton Friedman, "Free Markets and the Generals," Newsweek,

January 2 5 , 1982; Juan

Gabriel Valdés, Pinochet's

in Chile

(Cambridge:

Interview with Milton Friedman conducted O c t o b e r 1, 2 0 0 0 , for

Commanding

Economists:

The Chicago

School

Cambridge University Press, 1 9 9 5 ) , 156.
6.

Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

7.

Ibid., 3 9 8 .

8.

Heights:
9.

The Battle

for the World Economy,

596.

www.pbs.org.

T h e Nobel Prize in E c o n o m i c s is separate from other prizes chosen by the Nobel
C o m m i t t e e . T h e award's full n a m e is the Sveriges Riksbank Prize in E c o n o m i c
S c i e n c e s in M e m o r y o f Alfred Nobel.

10. M i l t o n

Friedman,

"Inflation

and

Unemployment,"

Nobel

Memorial

Lecture,

D e c e m b e r 13, 1 9 7 6 , www.nobelprize.org.
11. Orlando Letelier, " T h e C h i c a g o Boys in C h i l e , " The Nation,

August 2 8 , 1976.

12. Neil S h e e h a n , "Aid by C I A Groups Put in the Millions," New York Times,

February

19, 1967.
13. Amnesty International, Report on an Amnesty
November

International

Mission

to Argentina

6-15

1976 (London: Amnesty International Publications, 1 9 7 7 ) , copyright page;

Yves Dezalay and Bryant G . Garth, The Internationalization
Economists,

and the Contest

to Transform

Latin American

of Palace

Wars:

Lawyers,

States (Chicago: University

of C h i c a g o Press, 2 0 0 2 ) , 7 1 .
14. Amnesty International, Report on an Amnesty
November

International

Mission

to Argentina

6-15

1976, 4 8 .

15. T h e Peace C o m m i t t e e had b e e n renamed the Vicariate by the time Ford began fund­
ing it. Americas W a t c h was part o f H u m a n Rights Watch, which started, under the
n a m e Helsinki W a t c h , with a $ 5 0 0 , 0 0 0 grant from the Ford Foundation. T h e $ 3 0 mil­
lion

figure

c o m e s from

an

interview

with Alfred

Ironside

in the Office o f

C o m m u n i c a t i o n s at the Ford Foundation. According to Ironside, most o f the money

N O T E S TO P A G E S 122 TO 134

483

was spent in the 1980s. He said that "there was virtually n o n e spent on h u m a n rights
in Latin America in the fifties" and that "there were a series o f grants in the sixties
geared toward human rights in the ball park o f $ 7 0 0 , 0 0 0 . "
16. Dezalay and Garth, The Internationalization

of Palace

Wars, 6 9 .

17. David Ransom, "Ford Country: Building an Elite for Indonesia," The Trojan Horse:
Radical

Look

at Foreign

A

Aid, ed. Steve Weissman (Palo Alto, CA: Ramparts Press,

1975), 96.
18. Valdés, Pinochet

s Economists,

158, 186, 3 0 8 .

19. Ford Foundation, "History," 2 0 0 6 ,

www.fordfound.org.

20. Goenawan M o h a m a d , Celebrating

Indonesia:

1953-2003

Fifty

Years with the Ford

Foundation

(Jakarta: Ford Foundation, 2 0 0 3 ) , 56.

21. Dezalay and Garth, The Internationalization
22. Ford Foundation,

of Palace

Wars, 1 4 8 .

"History," 2 0 0 6 , www.fordfound.org.

Stonor Saunders, The Cultural

Cold

F O O T N O T E : Frances

War: The CIA and the World of Arts and

Letters

(New York: New Press, 2 0 0 0 ) .
23. Archdiocese o f Sâo Paulo, Torture
of Torture

by Brazilian

Military

in Brazil: A Shocking
Governments,

Report

1964-1979,

on the Pervasive

Use

ed. Joan Dassin, trans.

Jaime Wright (Austin: University of Texas Press, 1 9 8 6 ) , 50.
24. S i m o n e de Beauvoir and Gisèle Halimi, Djamila

Boupacha,

trans. Peter G r e e n (New

York: M a c m i l l a n , 1 9 6 2 ) , 19, 2 1 , 3 1 .
25. Marguerite Feitlowitz, A Lexicon

of Terror: Argentina

and the Legacies

of

Torture

2 6 . 1 have made slight changes in Feitlowitz's translation for clarity. Feitlowitz, A

Lexicon

(New York: Oxford University Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 113.
of Terror, 1 1 3 - 1 5 . Emphasis in original.

6. Saved by a War: Thatcherism and Its Useful Enemies
1. Translated by Peter Sillem. Carl Schmitt, Politische
von der Souverdnitdt

Théologie:

Vier Kapitel

zur

Lehre

( 1 9 2 2 , repr. Berlin: D u n c k e r & Humblot, 1 9 9 3 ) , 13.

2. Correspondence in the Hayek Collection, box 1 0 1 , folder 2 6 , Hoover Institution
Archives, Palo Alto, CA. Thatcher's letter is dated February 17. T h a n k s to G r e g
Grandin.
3. Peter Dworkin, "Chile's Brave New World of Reaganomics," Fortune,

November 2,

1981.
4.

Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

People:

Memoirs

(Chicago:

Speaking

at

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 3 8 7 .
5. Donald Rumsfeld, Secretary
to

Milton

Friedman,

of Defense

White

House,

Donald

H. Rumsfeld

Washington,

DC,

May 9, 2 0 0 2 ,

Tribute
www

.defenselink.mil.
6.

Milton Friedman, " E c o n o m i c Miracles," Newsweek,

7.

In the transcript o f the speech there is an error. Rumsfeld is quoted saying, "They're

January 2 1 , 1 9 7 4 .

going to learn the going to learn the wrong lesson." I removed the repetition to avoid
confusion. Rumsfeld, Secretary
to Milton
8.

of Defense

Donald

H. Rumsfeld

Speaking

Henry Allen, "Hayek, the Answer Man," Washington

Tribute

Post, D e c e m b e r 2, 1 9 8 2 .

9. Interview with Milton Friedman conducted O c t o b e r 1, 2 0 0 0 , for
Heights:

at

Friedman.

The Battle for the World Economy,

10. Arnold C . Harberger, Curriculum

Vitae,

Commanding

www.pbs.org.
November 2 0 0 3 , www.econ.ucla.edu.

484

N O T E S TO P A G E S 134 TO 140

11. Ibid.; Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,
12. The Political

Economy

of Policy

Reform,

607-609.

ed. John Williamson (Washington, D C :

Institute for International E c o n o m i c s , 1 9 9 4 ) , 4 6 7 .
13. C a r m e n DeNavas-Walt, Bernadette D . Proctor, Cheryl Hill L e e , U.S. Census Bureau,
Income,

Poverty and Health

Insurance

Coverage

in the United States: 2005, August 2006,

www.census.gov; Central Intelligence Agency, World Factbook

2007,

www.cia.gov.

14. Allan H. Meltzer, "Choosing Freely: T h e Friedmans' Influence on E c o n o m i c and
Social Policy," in The Legacy

of Milton

and Rose Friedman's

Free to Choose,

eds.

M . W y n n e , H. R o s e n b l u m and R. Formaini (Dallas: Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas,
2 0 0 4 ) , 2 0 4 , www.dallasfed.org.
15. John C a m p b e l l , Margaret

Thatcher:

The Iron Lady,

2 0 0 3 ) , 1 7 4 - 7 5 ; Patrick Cosgrave, Thatcher:

vol. 2 (London: Jonathan Cape,

The First Term (London: Bodley Head,

1985), 158-59.
16. Kevin Jefferys, Finest
Churchill

& Darkest

Hours:

The Decisive

Events in British

Politics

from

to Blair (London: Atlantic Books, 2 0 0 2 ) , 2 0 8 .

17. Based on M O R I poll results (Gallup had T h a t c h e r at 23 percent). "President Bush:
Overall J o b Rating," www.pollingreport.com,

accessed May 12, 2 0 0 7 ; M a l c o l m

Rutherford, " 1 9 8 2 : Margaret Thatcher's Year," Financial

Times (London), D e c e m b e r

31, 1 9 8 2 .
18. Samuel P. Huntington, The Third
Century

Wave:

Democratization

in the Late

Twentieth

(Norman, O K : University o f O k l a h o m a Press, 1 9 9 1 ) .

19. Hossein Bashiriyeh, The State

and Revolution

in Iran,

1962-1982

(New York: St.

Martin's Press, 1 9 8 4 ) , 1 7 0 - 7 1 .
20. " O n the Record," Time,
2 1 . C a m p b e l l , Margaret

February 14, 1 9 8 3 .

Thatcher:

The Iron Lady,

vol. 2, 128.

22. Leonard Downie Jr. and Jay Ross, "Britain: South Georgia Taken," Washington
April 2 6 , 1 9 8 2 ; "Jingoism Is Not the Way," Financial
23. Tony B e n n , The End

of an Era: Diaries

1980-90,

Post,

Times ( L o n d o n ) , April 5, 1982.
ed. Ruth Winstone (London:

Hutchinson, 1 9 9 2 ) , 2 0 6 .
24. Angus D e m i n g , "Britain's Iron Lady," Newsweek,
Darkest

May 14, 1 9 7 9 ; Jefferys, Finest

&

Hours, 2 2 6 .

25. B B C News, " 1 9 8 2 : First Briton Dies in Falklands Campaign," On This Day, 2 4 April,
news.bbc.co.uk.
26. Rutherford, " 1 9 8 2 . "
27. M i c h a e l Getler, "Dockers' Union Agrees to Settle Strike in Britain," Washington

Post,

July 2 1 , 1 9 8 4 .
28. " T U C at Blackpool (Miners' Strike): Labour Urged to Legislate on N U M Strike
Fines," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , September 4 , 1 9 8 5 ; Seumas M i l n e , The Enemy

Thatcher's

War against

Secret

the Miners

" W h a t Stella Left Out," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , O c t o b e r 3, 2 0 0 0 .

29. S e u m a s M i l n e , " M I 5 ' s Secret War," New Statesman
30. Coal

War: Thatcher

Turning

vs. Scargill,

Within:

(London: Verso, 2 0 0 4 ) ; Seumas M i l n e ,
& Society,

November 2 5 , 1994.

director L i a m O ' R i n n , episode 8 0 9 3 of the series

Points of History, telecast June 16, 2 0 0 5 .

31.Ibid.
32. Warren Brown, " U . S . Rules O u t Rehiring Striking Air Controllers," Washington

Post,

August 7, 1 9 8 1 ; Steve Twomey, "Reunion Marks 10 Years Outside the Tower,"
Washington

Post, August 2, 1 9 9 1 .

33. Milton Friedman, Preface, Capitalism
of C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 8 2 ) , ix.

and Freedom

( 1 9 6 2 , repr. C h i c a g o : University

N O T E S TO P A G E S U O TO U 9

485

34. J. M c L a n e , "Milton Friedman's Philosophy o f E c o n o m i c s and Public Policy,"
Conference

to Honor

Milton

Friedman

on His Ninetieth

Birthday,

November 2 5 ,

2 0 0 2 , www.chibus.com.
35. N. Bukharin and
Explanation

E . Preobrazhensky, The

of the Program

of the Communist

ABC

of

Communism:

Party of Russia,

A

Popular

trans. E d e n and C e d a r

Paul ( 1 9 2 2 , repr. Ann Arbor: University o f M i c h i g a n Press, 1 9 6 7 ) , 3 4 0 - 4 1 .
36. The Political

Economy

of Policy Reform,

19.

37. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

603.

7. The New Doctor Shock: Economic Warfare Replaces Dictatorship
1. " U . S . Operations Mission to Bolivia," Problems
Bolivia,

La Paz: United

States Operation

in the Economic

Mission

to Bolivia,

2.

Susan Sontag, Illness as Metaphor

3.

"Bolivia Drug Crackdown Brews Trouble," New York Times,

Development

of

1956, 212.

(New York: Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 1 9 7 7 ) , 8 4 .
S e p t e m b e r 12, 1984; Joel

Brinkley, "Drug Crops Are Up in Export Nations, State Dept. Says," New York

Times,

February 15, 1 9 8 5 .
4.

Jeffrey D . Sachs, The End of Poverty: Economic

Possibilities

for Our Time (New York:

Penguin, 2 0 0 5 ) , 9 0 - 9 3 .
5.

John Maynard Keynes, The Economic

Consequences

of the Peace ( 1 9 1 9 , repr. London:

Labour Research Department, 1 9 2 0 ) , 2 2 0 - 2 1 .
6.

Interview with the author, O c t o b e r 2 0 0 6 , New York City.

7.

Robert E . Norton, " T h e American O u t to Save Poland," Fortune,

8.

Interview with Jeffrey Sachs conducted J u n e 15, 2 0 0 0 , for Commanding
Battle for the World Economy,

9.

January 2 9 , 1 9 9 0 .
Heights:

The

www.pbs.org.

"A Draconian C u r e for Chile's E c o n o m i c Ills?" BusinessWeek,

January 12, 1 9 7 6 .

10. Sachs, The End of Poverty, 9 3 .
11. Sachs, Commanding

Heights.

12. Catherine M . C o n a g h a n and James M . Malloy, Unsettling
Neoliberalism

in the Central

Andes

Statecraft:

Democracy

and

(Pittsburgh, PA: University o f Pittsburgh Press,

1994), 127.
13. Sachs, The End of Poverty, 9 5 .
14. Susan Velasco Portillo, "Victor Paz: D e c r e t o es coyuntural, pero puede durar 10 6 2 0
anos," La Prensa

(La Paz), August 2 8 , 2 0 0 5 .

15.Ibid.
16. Conaghan and Malloy, Unsettling

Statecraft,

129.

17. Alberto Zuazo, "Bolivian Labor Unions Dealt Setback," United Press International,
O c t o b e r 9, 1 9 8 5 ; Juan de Onis, " E c o n o m i c Anarchy Ends," Los Angeles

Times,

November 6, 1 9 8 5 .
18. T h e official's c o m m e n t s are based on the recollections o f the m e m b e r s o f the emer­
gency e c o n o m i c team. Velasco Portillo, "Victor Paz: D e c r e t o es coyuntural, pero
puede durar 10 6 2 0 anos."
19. Ibid.
20. Harlan K. Ullman and James P. Wade, Shock

and Awe: Achieving

Rapid

Dominance

(Washington, D C : N D U Press, 1 9 9 6 ) , xxv.
21. Conaghan and Malloy, Unsettling

Statecraft,

186.

22. Peter McFarren, "48-hour Strike Hurts Country," Associated Press, September 5, 1 9 8 5 ;
Mike Reid, "Sitting O u t the Bolivian Miracle," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , M a y 9, 1987.

486

N O T E S TO P A G E S U 9 TO 155

23. Robert J. Alexander, A History of Organized

Labor

in Bolivia

(Westport, C T : Praeger,

2 0 0 5 ) , 169.
24. S a m Z u c k e r m a n ,
Chaos," American
of Struggle

"Bolivian Bankers S e e S o m e Hope After Years of E c o n o m i c
Banker,

M a r c h 13, 1987; Waltraud Queiser Morales, Bolivia:

25. Statistics c o m e from the Inter-American Development Bank. Morales, Bolivia,
26. Erick Foronda, "Bolivia: Paz Has Trouble Selling ' E c o n o m i c Miracle,' "
Press 2 1 , no. 5 (February 16, 1989): 7, cited in Morales, Bolivia,
27. Alexander, A History of Organized
28. Interview

Land

(San Francisco: Westview Press, 1 9 9 2 ) , 159.

with

Commanding

Gonzalo

Heights:

Labor

in Bolivia,

S a n c h e z de Lozada

159.

Latinamerica

160.

169.

conducted

The Battle for the World Economy,

March

2 0 , 2 0 0 1 , for

www.pbs.org.

29. Peter McFarren, "Farmers' Siege of Police Points Up Bolivia's Drug-Dealing Problems,"
Associated Press, January 12, 1 9 8 6 .
30. Peter M c F a r r e n , "Bolivia —Bleak but Now Hopeful," Associated Press, May 2 3 , 1989.
31. C o n a g h a n and Malloy write that "there is little doubt that the drug trade (like the
international aid that Paz received) helped soften the blows o f stabilization. In addi­
tion to generating i n c o m e , the injection o f 'coca-dollars' into the banking system is
believed to have helped stabilize the currency during the second half of the decade."
C o n a g h a n and Malloy, Unsettling

Statecraft,

198.

32. Tyler Bridges, "Bolivia Turns to Free Enterprise Among Hard Times," Dallas
News, June 2 9 , 1987; C o n a g h a n and Malloy, Unsettling
33. J o h n Sedgwick, " T h e World o f D o c t o r Debt," Boston
34. "Taming the Beast," The Economist,
35. Sachs, Commanding

Statecraft,

Magazine,

Morning

198.
May 1 9 9 1 .

November 15, 1 9 8 6 .

Heights.

36. Peter Passell, "Dr. Jeffrey Sachs, S h o c k Therapist," New York Times, June 27, 1993.
37. "New Austerity Package Revealed," Latin American

Regional

Reports: Andean

Group,

D e c e m b e r 13, 1 9 8 5 .
38. T h e banker was quoted anonymously. Zuckerman, "Bolivian Bankers S e e S o m e
Hope after Years o f E c o n o m i c Chaos."
39. The Political

Economy

of Policy

Reform,

ed. John Williamson (Washington, D C :

Institute for International E c o n o m i c s , 1 9 9 4 ) , 4 7 9 .
4 0 . Associated Press, "Bolivia Now Under State o f Siege," New York Times,

September 2 0 ,

1985.
4 1 . "Bolivia to Lift State o f Siege," United Press International, D e c e m b e r 17, 1985;
"Bolivia Now Under State o f Siege."
42. C o n a g h a n and Malloy, Unsettling

Statecraft,

4 3 . Reuters, "Bolivia Strike Crumbling," Globe

149.
and Mail

(Toronto), September 2 1 , 1 9 8 5 .

44. Peter M c F a r r e n , "Detainees S e n t to Internment Camps," Associated Press, August 29,
1986; "Bolivia: G o v e r n m e n t Frees Detainees, Puts O f f Plans for Mines," Inter Press
Service, September 16, 1 9 8 6 .
4 5 . Sachs, The End of Poverty, 9 6 .
4 6 . S a n c h e z de Lozada, Commanding
47. C o n a g h a n and Malloy, Unsettling

Heights.
Statecraft,

149.

8. Crisis Works: The Packaging of Shock Therapy
1. A. E . Hotchner, Papa Hemingway
2.

( 1 9 6 6 , repr. New York: Carroll & Graf, 1999), 2 8 0 .

J i m Shultz, "Deadly C o n s e q u e n c e s : T h e International Monetary Fund and Bolivia's

N O T E S TO P A G E S 156 TO 159

487

'Black February/" ( C o c h a b a m b a , Bolivia: T h e D e m o c r a c y C e n t e r , April 2 0 0 5 ) , 14,
www.democracyctr.org.
3.

Albert O . Hirschman, "Reflections on the Latin American Experience," in
Politics of Inflation
Case Studies,

and Economic

Stagnation:

Theoretical

Approaches

and

The

International

ed. L e o n N. Lindberg and Charles S. Maier (Washington, D C : Brookings

Institution, 1 9 8 5 ) , 7 6 .
4.

B a n c o Central de la Republica Argentina, Memoria

Anual

Lawrence Weschler, A Miracle,

Accounts

a Universe:

Settling

1985,

www.bcra.gov.ar;

with Torturers

(New

York: Pantheon Books, 1990), 152; "Brazil Refinancing Foreign D e b t Load," New York
Times,

July 2, 1964; Alan Riding, "Brazil's Leader Urges Negotiations on Debt," New

York Times,
5.

September 2 2 , 1 9 8 5 .

Robert Harvey, "Chile's Counter-Revolution," The Economist,
World Bank, Economic

Memorandum:

Argentina

February 2, 1 9 8 0 ;

(Washington, D C : World Bank,

1 9 8 5 ) , 17.
6.

T h e adviser was Franklin Willis. M i c h a e l Hirsh, "Follow the Money,"

Newsweek,

April 4 , 2 0 0 5 .
7.

T e r e n c e O'Hara, " 6 U . S . Banks Held Pinochet's Accounts," Washington

Post, M a r c h

16, 2 0 0 5 .
8.

United Press International, "Former C a b i n e t Minister Arrested in Argentina,"
Times,

9.

Seattle

November 17, 1 9 8 4 .

World Bank, Economic

Memorandum:

Argentina,

page 17; " D o c u m e n t a t i o n

prueba los ilfcitos de Martinez de Hoz," La Voz del Interior,
H. Hernandez, Justicia

y Deuda

Externa

Argentina

que

O c t o b e r 6, 1 9 8 4 , cited in

(Santa Fe, Argentina: Editorial

Universidad de Santa Fe, 1 9 8 8 ) , 36.
10. Hernandez, Justicia

y Deuda

Externa

Argentina,

37.

11.Ibid.
12. S h e described it as a "report about how to make investments in the Bahamas,
Luxembourg, Panama, Switzerland, and Lichtenstein. T h e r e was also a section —
quite technical —on the tax situation in these places." Marguerite Feitlowitz, A
Lexicon

of Terror: Argentina

and the Legacies

of Torture (New York: Oxford University

Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 57.
13. Norberto Galasso, De la Banca

Baring

al FMI ( B u e n o s Aires: Ediciones C o l i h u e ,

2 0 0 2 ) , 2 4 6 ; Adolfo Pérez Esquivel, "^Cuândo c o m e n z o el terror del 2 4 de marzo de
1976?" La Fogata,

M a r c h 2 4 , 2 0 0 4 , www.lafogata.org.

14. U . S . State Department, M e m o r a n d u m o f Conversation, Subject: Secretary's M e e t i n g
with

Argentine

Foreign

Minister

Guzzetti,

October

7,

1 9 7 6 , declassified,

www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.
15. S u e Branford and Bernardo Kucinski, The Debt Squads:
America

The US, the Banks,

and

Latin

(London: Zed Books, 1 9 8 8 ) , 9 5 .

16. Matthew L. Wald, "A House, O n c e Again, Is Just Shelter," New York Times,

February

6, 1 9 8 3 .
17. Jaime Poniachik, " C ô m o empezô la deuda externa," La Nacion
6,

( B u e n o s Aires), M a y

2001.

18. Donald V. C o e s , Macroeconomic

Crises:

Politics

(Washington, D C : World B a n k , 1 9 9 5 ) ,
Adjustment

and Ethnicity

in Nigeria

and Growth

in Brazil,

187; Eghosa E . Osaghae,

1964-1990
Structural

(Uppsala, Sweden: Nordiska Afrikainstitutet,

1995), 2 4 ; T . Ademola Oyejide and Mufutau I. R a h e e m , "Nigeria," in The
Road

to Reform:

Adjustment,

Income

Distribution,

and Growth

in the

World, ed. L a n c e Taylor (Cambridge, MA: M I T Press, 1 9 9 3 ) , 3 0 2 .

Rocky

Developing

488

N O T E S TO P A G E S 159 TO 167

19. International
Shock,

Monetary F u n d , Fund

Assistance

for Countries

Facing

Exogenous

August 8, 2 0 0 3 , page 37, www.imf.org.

20. B a n c o Central de la Republica Argentina, Memoria
21. "Interview

with

Arnold

Harberger,"

The

Anual

Region,

1989, www.bcra.gov.ar.

Federal

Reserve Bank o f

Minneapolis, M a r c h 1 9 9 9 , www.minneapolisfed.org.
22. T h e former C h i c a g o professor and fellow Stanley F i s c h e r was first deputy manag­
ing director o f the I M F in 1 9 9 4 , Raghuram Rajan was the I M F ' s c h i e f economist
in 2 0 0 3 , M i c h a e l Mussa was director o f the department o f research at the I M F in
1991

and Danyang X i e was senior e c o n o m i s t in the I M F ' s African department in

2003.
23. International Monetary F u n d , "Article I —Purposes," Articles
International

Monetary

Fund,

of Agreement

of the

www.imf.org.

24. " S p e e c h by Lord Keynes in Moving to Accept the Final Act at the Closing Plenary
Session, Bretton Woods, 22 July, 1944," Collected

Writings of John Maynard

Keynes,

vol. 2 6 , ed. D o n a l d Moggridge (London: M a c m i l l a n , 1 9 8 0 ) , 103.
25. J o h n Williamson, "In Search o f a Manual for Technopols," in John Williamson, ed.,
The

Political

Economy

of Policy Reform

(Washington, D C : Institute for International

E c o n o m i c s , 1 9 9 4 ) , 18.
26. "Appendix: T h e 'Washington Consensus,' " in The Political Economy
27. Williamson, The Political

Economy

28. Joseph E . Stiglitz, Globalization

of Policy Reform,
and Its Discontents

of Policy Reform, 27.

17.
(New York: W. W . Norton &

C o m p a n y , 2 0 0 2 ) , 13.
29. Davison L . B u d h o o , Enough
Resignation

Is Enough:

to the Managing

Director

Dear

Mr. Camdessus.

of the International

. . Open

Monetary

Fund,

Letter

of

foreword

by Errol K. M c L e o d (New York: New Horizons Press, 1 9 9 0 ) , 102.
30. Dani Rodrik, " T h e Rush to Free Trade in the Developing World: W h y So Late? W h y
Now? W i l l It Last?" in Voting for Reform:
Economic

Adjustment,

Democracy,

Political

Liberalization

and

ed. Stephan Haggard and Steven B . W e b b (New York: Oxford

University Press, 1 9 9 4 ) , 8 2 . Emphasis added.
31. Ibid., 8 1 .
32. ". . . [Wjhatever the merits o f trade reform, the causal link drawn between trade
regimes and propensity to m a c r o e c o n o m i c crisis was bad economics." Dani Rodrik,
"The

Limits o f Trade Policy Reform in Developing Countries," Journal

Perspectives

of

Economic

6, no. 1 (Winter 1992): 9 5 .

33. Herasto Reyes, "Argentina: historia de una crisis," La Prensa

(Panama City), January

12, 2 0 0 2 .
34. Nathaniel C . Nash, "Turmoil, T h e n Hope in Argentina," New York Times, January 3 1 ,
1991.
35. "Interview with Arnold Harberger."
36. José Natanson, Buenos

muchachos:

Vida y obra de los economistas

del

establishment

(Buenos Aires: Libros del Zorzal, 2 0 0 4 ) .
37. Paul Blustein, And the Money
the Bankrupting

of Argentina

38. Ibid., 2 4 ; interview with
Commanding

Heights:

Kept Rolling

In (and Out): Wall Street, the IMF, and

(New York: PublicAffairs, 2 0 0 5 ) , 2 1 .
D o m i n g o Cavallo conducted

The Battle

for the World

Economy,

January 3 0 , 2 0 0 2 , for
www.pbs.org; César V.

Herrera and M a r c e l o Garcia, "A 10 anos de la privatization de YPF—Anâlisis y consecuencias en la Argentina y en la C u e n c a del Golfo San Jorge (version ampliada),"
C e n t r o Regional de Estudios E c o n ô m i c o s de la Patagonia Central, January 2 3 , 2 0 0 3 ,
www.creepace.com.ar; Antonio C a m o u , "Saber técnico y politica en los orfgenes del

N O T E S TO P A G E S 167 TO 179

menemismo," Perfiles Latinoamericanos

489

7, no. 12 (June 1 9 9 8 ) ; Carlos Saul M e n e m ,

speech given during a lunch with M e x i c a n president Ernesto Zedillo, November 2 6 ,
1997,

zedillo.presidencia.gob.mx. F O O T N O T E : Interview with Alejandro O l m o s

Gaona, "Las deudas hay que pagarlas, las estafas no," LaVaca,

January 10, 2 0 0 6 ,

www.lavaca.org.
39. " M e n e m ' s Miracle," Time International,
40. Cavallo, Commanding

July 13, 1 9 9 2 .

Heights.

9. Slamming the Door on History: A Crisis in Poland, a Massacre in China
1. Leszek Balcerowicz, "Losing Milton Friedman, A Revolutionary M u s e o f Liberty,"
Daily Star (Beirut), November 2 2 , 2 0 0 6 .
2.

M i c h a e l Freedman, " T h e Radical," Forbes,

3.

Joseph Fewsmith, China

Since

February 13, 2 0 0 6 .

Tiananmen:

The Politics

of Transition

(Cambridge:

Cambridge University Press, 2 0 0 1 ) , 35.
4.

T h e embryo o f Solidarity was a semi-independent union called Free Labour Unions
of the Coast, formed in 1978. T h i s was the group that organized the strikes that even­
tually led to the creation o f Solidarity.

5.

T h o m a s A. Sancton, "He Dared to Hope," Time, January 4 , 1 9 8 2 .

6.

Ibid.

7.

"Solidarity's Programme Adopted by the First National Congress," in Peter Raina,
Poland

8.
9.

1981: Towards Social Renewal

(London: George Allen & Unwin, 1985), 3 2 6 - 8 0 .

Sancton, "He Dared to Hope."
Egil Aarvik, " T h e Nobel Peace Prize 1983 Presentation S p e e c h , " Oslo, Norway,
D e c e m b e r 10, 1 9 8 3 , www.nobelprize.org.

10. Lawrence Weschler, "A Grand Experiment," The New Yorker, November 13, 1 9 8 9 .
11. Jeffrey D . Sachs, The End of Poverty: Economic
Penguin,

2005),

Possibilities

for Our Time (New York:

120; Magdalena Wyganowska, "Transformation

o f the

Agricultural Sector and the Role o f the Donor Community," USAID Mission
September 1998,

Polish

to

Poland,

www.usaid.gov.

12. James Risen, "Cowboy o f Poland's E c o n o m y , " Los Angeles

Times,

February 9, 1 9 9 0 .

13. Sachs, The End of Poverty, 1 1 1 .
14. Weschler, "A Grand Experiment."
15. Sachs, The End of Poverty, 114.
16. Ibid.; Weschler, "A Grand Experiment."
17. Interview with Jeffrey Sachs conducted June 15, 2 0 0 0 , for Commanding
Battle for the World Economy,

Heights:

The

www.pbs.org.

18. Przemyslaw Wielgosz, "25 Years o f Solidarity," unpublished lecture, August 2 0 0 5 .
Courtesy o f the author.
19. Sachs, The End of Poverty,
Sin," The Walrus,

117. F O O T N O T E : Randy Boyagoda, "Europe's Original

February 2 0 0 7 , www.walrusmagazine.com.

20. Weschler, "A Grand Experiment"; Interview with G o n z a l o S a n c h e z de Lozada con­
ducted M a r c h 2 0 , 2 0 0 1 , for Commanding

Heights:

The Battle for the World

Economy,

www.pbs.org.
21. Weschler, "A Grand Experiment."
22. Balcerowicz, "Losing Milton Friedman."
23. "Walesa: U.S. Has Stake in Poland's Success," United Press International, August 2 5 ,
1989.

490

N O T E S TO P A G E S 179 TO 189

24. T h e quotation is from Zofia Kuratowska, "Solidarity's foremost expert on health ser­
vices and now a leading legislator." Weschler, "A Grand Experiment."
25. J o h n Tagliabue, "Poles Approve Solidarity-Led Cabinet," New York Times,

September

13, 1 9 8 9 .
26. Weschler, "A Grand Experiment"; "Mazowiecki Taken 111 in Parliament,"
Weekly

Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , September 17, 1989.

27. Anne Applebaum,

"Exhausted Polish P M ' s C a b i n e t Is Acclaimed,"

Independent

( L o n d o n ) , September 13, 1 9 8 9 .
28. Weschler, "A Grand Experiment."
29.Ibid.
30. Leszek Balcerowicz, "Poland," in The Political

Economy

of Policy Reform,

ed. John

Williamson (Washington, D C : Institute for International E c o n o m i c s , 1994), 177.
31. Ibid., 1 7 6 - 7 7 .
32. Ibid., 1 6 3 .
33. T h o m a s Carothers, " T h e E n d of the Transition Paradigm," Journal

of Democracy

13,

no. 1 (January 2 0 0 2 ) : 6 - 7 .
34. G e o r g e J . C h u r c h , " T h e Education o f Mikhail Sergeyevich Gorbachev,"

Time,

January 4 , 1 9 8 8 .
35. Francis Fukuyama, " T h e E n d of History?" The National
F O O T N O T E : Francis Fukuyama, The End of History

Interest,

S u m m e r 1989.

and the Last Man (New York:

Free Press, 1 9 9 2 ) .
36. Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky

People:

Memoirs

(Chicago:

University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 6 0 3 .
37. Fukuyama, " T h e E n d o f History?"
38.Ibid.
39. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

520-22.

4 0 . Ibid., 5 5 8 ; Milton Friedman, " I f Only the United States Were as Free as Hong Kong,"
Wall Street Journal,

July 8, 1997.

4 1 . M a u r i c e Meisner, The Deng
Socialism,

1978-1994

Xiaoping

Era: An Inquiry

into the Fate

of

Chinese

(New York: Hill and Wang, 1996), 4 5 5 ; "Deng's June 9 Speech:

'We F a c e a Rebellious C l i q u e ' and 'Dregs o f Society,' " New York Times, June 30, 1989.
42. Friedman had been invited to C h i n a in various capacities—as a conference partici­
pant, a university lecturer—but in his memoirs he characterized it as a state visit: "I
was mostly the guest o f governmental entities," Friedman writes. Friedman
Friedman, Two Lucky People,

and

601.

4 3 . Ibid., 517, 5 3 7 , 6 0 9 . Emphasis in original.
44. Ibid., 6 0 1 - 6 0 2 .
4 5 . W a n g Hui,

China's

New

Order:

Society,

Politics,

and

Economy

in

Transition

(Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 2 0 0 3 ) , 4 5 , 54.
4 6 . Ibid., 54.
47. Ibid., 57.
4 8 . Meisner, The Deng Xiaoping

Era, 4 6 3 - 6 5 .

49. "China's Harsh Actions T h r e a t e n to Set Back 10-Year Reform Drive," Wall
Journal,

Street

June 5, 1 9 8 9 .

50. "Deng's June 9 S p e e c h : 'We F a c e a Rebellious C l i q u e ' and 'Dregs o f Society.'"
F O O T N O T E : Henry Kissinger, " T h e Caricature o f D e n g as a Tyrant Is Unfair,"
Washington

Post, August 1, 1 9 8 9 .

51. Interview with Orville Schell conducted on D e c e m b e r 13, 2 0 0 5 , for PBS's
episode " T h e Tank M a n " ; full interview transcript available at www.pbs.org.

Frontline

N O T E S TO P A G E S 190 TO 203

52. Wang, Chinas

New Order,

65-66.

53. Meisner, The Deng Xiaoping
of Neoliberalism

491

Era, 4 8 2 . F O O T N O T E : David Harvey, A Brief

History

(Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2 0 0 5 ) , 1 3 5 .

54. M o Ming, " 9 0 Percent o f China's Billionaires Are Children o f Senior Officials,"
China

Digital

Times,

November 2, 2 0 0 6 , www.chinadigitaltimes.net.

55. H u m a n Rights Watch, " R a c e to the Bottom: Corporate Complicity in C h i n e s e
Internet Censorship," Human
China's

Rights Watch

18, no. 8 ( c ) (August 2 0 0 6 ) : 2 8 , 4 3 ; Wang,

New Order, 6 5 .

56. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

516.

57. Jaroslaw Urbanski, "Workers in Poland After 1989," Workers Initiative Poland, paspartoo
.w.interia.pl; Weschler, "A Grand Experiment."
58. Mark Kramer, "Polish Workers and the Post-Communist Transition, 1 9 8 9 - 9 3 , "
Asia

Studies,

Europe-

June 1 9 9 5 ; World Bank, World D e v e l o p m e n t Indicators 2 0 0 6 , www

.worldbank.org; Andrew Curry, " T h e C a s e against Poland's New President,"
Republic,

New

November 17, 2 0 0 5 ; Wielgosz, "25 Years o f Solidarity."

59. Wielgosz, "25 Years o f Solidarity."
60. David Ost, The Defeat

of Solidarity:

Anger

and Politics

in Postcommunist

Europe

(Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, 2 0 0 5 ) , 6 2 .
6 1 . Statistical

Yearly (Warsaw: Polish M a i n Statistical Office, 1 9 9 7 ) , 139.

62. Kramer, "Polish Workers and the Post-Communist Transition, 1 9 8 9 - 9 3 . "

10. Democracy Born in Chains: South Africa's Constricted Freedom
1. "South Africa; Tutu Says Poverty, Aids C o u l d Destabilise Nation," AllAfrica.com,
November 2 0 0 1 .
2.

Martin J . Murray, The Revolution

3.

"ANC Leader Affirms Support for State Control o f Industry," Times

Deferred

(London: Verso, 1 9 9 4 ) , 12.
(London),

January 2 6 , 1 9 9 0 .
4.

Ismail Vadi, The Congress

of the People

and Freedom

Charter

Campaign,

foreword by

Walter Sisulu (New Delhi: Sterling Publishers, 1 9 9 5 ) , www.sahistory.org.za.
5.

Nelson Mandela, A Long

Walk

to Freedom:

The Autobiography

of Nelson

Mandela

(New York: Little, Brown and Company, 1 9 9 4 ) , 150.
6.

" T h e Freedom Charter," adopted at the Congress o f the People, Kliptown, on June

7.

William Mervin G u m e d e , Thabo

26, 1 9 5 5 , www.anc.org.za.
Mbeki

and the Battle for the Soul of the ANC

(Cape

Town: Zebra Press, 2 0 0 5 ) , 2 1 9 - 2 0 .
8.

Mandela, A Long Walk to Freedom,

9.

S i m p l e majority rule was actually delayed

490-91.
until

1 9 9 9 . Until then,

executive

power was shared among all the political parties that won m o r e than 5 percent
of the popular vote. Unpublished interview with Nelson M a n d e l a by the
er B e n Cashdan, 2 0 0 1 ; Hein Marais, South
cal

Economy

of Transition

Africa:

Limits

to Change:

filmmak­

The

Politi­

( C a p e Town: University o f C a p e Town Press, 2 0 0 1 ) ,

91-92.
10. F O O T N O T E : Milton Friedman, "Milton Friedman —Banquet S p e e c h , " given at the
Nobel Banquet, D e c e m b e r 10, 1 9 7 6 , www.nobelprize.org.
11. Bill Keller, " C a n Both Wealth and Justice Flourish in a New South Africa?" New York
Times, May 9, 1994.
12. Mark Horton, " R o l e o f Fiscal Policy in Stabilization and Poverty Alleviation," in

492

N O T E S TO P A G E S 204 TO 211

Post-Apartheid

South

Africa:

The First

Ten Years,

ed. M i c h a e l Nowak and Luca

Antonio Ricci (Washington D C : International Monetary F u n d , 2 0 0 5 ) , 84.
13. F O O T N O T E : Juan Gabriel Valdés, Pinochet's
Chile

Economists:

The Chicago

School

in

(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1 9 9 5 ) , 3 1 , 33, quoting Pinochet's

minister o f e c o n o m y Pablo Baraona's definition o f the "new democracy"; Robert
Harvey, "Chile's Counter- Revolution: T h e Fight G o e s On," The Economist,

February

2, 1 9 8 0 (Harvey was quoting Sergio Fernandez, the minister of the interior); José
Pinera, "Wealth T h r o u g h Ownership: Creating Property Rights in C h i l e a n Mining,"
Cato Journal

2 4 , no. 3 (Fall 2 0 0 4 ) : 2 9 8 .

14. James Brew, "South Africa —Habitat: A G o o d H o m e Is Still Hard to Own," Inter Press
Service, M a r c h 11, 1 9 9 7 .
15. David M c D o n a l d , "Water: Attack the Problem Not the Data," Sunday

Independent

( L o n d o n ) , June 19, 2 0 0 3 .
16. Bill Keller, "Cracks in South Africa's W h i t e Monopolies," New York Times,

June 17,

1993.
17. G u m e d e cites Businessmap statistics asserting that "around 9 8 percent o f executive
directors o f JSE-listed companies are white, and they preside over 97 percent of the
exchange's total value." S i m o n Robinson, " T h e New Rand Lords," Time,
2 0 0 5 ; G u m e d e , Thabo
18. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

Mbeki

and the Battle

and the Battle

April 2 5 ,

for the Soul of the ANC, 2 2 0 .

for the Soul of the ANC,

112.

19. Moyiga Nduru, " S . Africa: Politician Washed Anti-AIDS Efforts Down the Drain,"
Inter Press Service, April 1 1 , 2 0 0 6 .
20. "Study: A I D S Slashes SA's Life Expectancy," Mail

& Guardian

(Johannesburg),

D e c e m b e r 11, 2 0 0 6 .
2 1 . T h e rand recovered slightly by the end o f the day, closing 7 percent lower. Jim Jones,
"Foreign Investors Take Fright at Hardline Stance," Financial

Times

(London),

February 13, 1 9 9 0 .
22. Steven Mufson, "South Africa 1990," Foreign Affairs
the World],

[Special Edition: America

and

1990/1991.

23. T h o m a s L . Friedman, The Lexus

and the Olive Branch

(New York: Random House,

2000), 113.
24. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle

for the Soul of the ANC,

69.

25. Ibid., 8 5 ; "South Africa: Issues o f Rugby and Race," The Economist,

August 2 4 , 1996.

26. Nelson Mandela, "Report by the President of the A N C to the 50th National Conference
of the African National C o n g r e s s " D e c e m b e r 16, 1997.
27. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle

for the Soul of the ANC,

33-39, 69.

28. Ibid., 7 9 .
29. Marais, South
Guidelines

Africa,

122. F O O T N O T E : A N C , Ready

for a Democratic

South Africa

Adopted

to Govern:

at the National

ANC

Policy

Conference,

May

2 8 - 3 1 , 1 9 9 2 , www.anc.org.za.
30. Ken Wells, " U . S . Investment in South Africa Quickens," Wall Street Journal,

October

6, 1 9 9 4 .
31. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle

for the Soul of the ANC,

88.

for the Soul of the ANC,

89.

32. Ibid., 8 7 .
33. Marais, South Africa,

162.

34. Ibid., 170.
35. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle

36. G i n g e r T h o m p s o n , "South African Commission Ends Its Work," New York
March 22, 2003.

Times,

N O T E S TO P A G E S 212 TO 219

493

37. A N C , " T h e State and Social Transformation," discussion document, November 1 9 9 6 ,
www.anc.org.za; Ginger T h o m p s o n , "South Africa to Pay $ 3 , 9 0 0 to E a c h Family o f
Apartheid Victims," New York Times, April 16, 2 0 0 3 ; M a n d e l a unpublished interview
with Cashdan, 2 0 0 1 .
38. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle for the Soul of the ANC,

108.

39. Ibid., 119.
40. South African Communist Party, " T h e Debt Debate: Confusion Heaped on Confusion"
November-December 1998, www.sacp.org.za; Jeff Rudin, "Apartheid Debt: Questions
and Answers," Alternative Information and Development Centre, March 16, 1999,
www.aidc.org.za. F O O T N O T E : Congress of South Africa Trade Unions, "Submission
on the Public Investment Corporation Draft Bill," June 2 5 , 2 0 0 4 , www.cosatu.org.za;
Rudin, "Apartheid Debt"; South African Communist Party, " T h e D e b t Debate."
4 1 . " T h e Freedom Charter."
42. Nomvula Mokonyane, "Budget S p e e c h for 2 0 0 5 / 0 6 Financial Year by M E C for
Housing in Gauteng," S p e e c h made in the G u a t e n g Legislature on J u n e 13, 2 0 0 5 ,
www.info.gov.za.
43. Lucille Davie and Mary Alexander, "Kliptown and the Freedom Charter," J u n e 2 7 ,
2 0 0 5 , www.southafrica.info; B l u e I Q , The Plan for a Smart
44. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle

Province—Guateng.

for the Soul of the ANC, 2 1 5 .

45. Scott Baldauf, "Class Struggle: South Africa's New, and Few, Black R i c h , "
Science

Monitor,

Christian

O c t o b e r 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 ; " H u m a n D e v e l o p m e n t Report 2 0 0 6 , " United

Nations Development Programme, www.undp.org.
46. "South Africa: T h e Statistics," Le Monde

Diplomatique,

September 2006; Michael

W i n e s and Sharon LaFraniere, " D e c a d e o f D e m o c r a c y Fills Gaps in South Africa,"
New

York Times, April 2 6 , 2 0 0 4 .

47. S i m o n Robinson, " T h e New Rand Lords."
48. M i c h a e l W i n e s , "Shantytown Dwellers in South Africa Protest the Sluggish Pace o f
Change," New York Times,

December 25, 2005.

49. Mark Wegerif, Bev Russell and Irma Grundling, Summary
the

National

Evictions

Survey

of Key Findings

(Polokwane, South Africa: Nkuzi

from

Development

Association, 2 0 0 5 ) , 7, www.nkuzi.org.za.
50. W i n e s , "Shantytown Dwellers in South Africa Protest. . ."
51. G u m e d e , Thabo

Mbeki

and the Battle

for the Soul of the ANC,

72. Internal quota­

tion: Asghar Adelzadeh, "From the R D P to G E A R : T h e Gradual E m b r a c i n g o f Neo­
liberalism in E c o n o m i c Policy," Transformation

31, 1996.

52. Ibid., 7 0 .
53. Stephen F. C o h e n , Failed
Russia

Crusade:

America

and the Tragedy

of

Post-Communist

(New York: W . W. Norton & Company, 2 0 0 1 ) , 3 0 .

11. Bonfire of a Young Democracy: Russia Chooses "The Pinochet Option"
1. Boris Kagarlitsky, Square

Wheels:

How Russian

Democracy

Got Derailed,

trans. Leslie

A. Auerbach et al. (New York: Monthly Review Press, 1 9 9 4 ) , 1 9 1 .
2.

William Keegan, The Spectre
the Fall of Communism

3.

of Capitalism:

The Future

of the World Economy

After

(London: Radius, 1 9 9 2 ) , 109.

George J. C h u r c h , " T h e Education o f Mikhail Sergeyevich Gorbachev," Time, January
4, 1988; Gidske Anderson, " T h e Nobel Peace Prize 1 9 9 0 Presentation Speech,"
www.nobelprize.org.

494

4.

N O T E S TO P A G E S 219 TO 224

Marshall Pomer, Introduction,

in The New

Russia:

Transition

Gone

Awry,

eds.

Lawrence R. Klein and Marshall Pomer (Stanford: Stanford University Press: 2 0 0 1 ) , 1.
5.

Anderson, " T h e Nobel Peace Prize 1 9 9 0 Presentation Speech"; C h u r c h , " T h e

6.

Mikhail Gorbachev, Foreword, in Klein and Pomer, eds., The New Russia,

7.

T h e unprecedented joint report called for "radical reform" and insisted that borders

Education o f Mikhail Sergeyevich Gorbachev."
xiv.

should be opened to trade simultaneously with any stabilization plan, the two-for-one
special discussed by Dani Rodrik in chapter 8. International Monetary Fund, T h e
World Bank, Organization for E c o n o m i c Cooperation and Development, European
Bank for Reconstruction and Development, The Economy
and

Recommendations

of the USSR:

Summary

(Washington, D C : World Bank, 1 9 9 0 ) ; author's interview with

Jeffrey Sachs, O c t o b e r 2 0 0 6 , New York City.
8.

"Order, Order," The Economist,

9.

Ibid.; M i c h a e l Schrage, "Pinochet's C h i l e a Pragmatic Model for Soviet Economy,"
Washington

\0. Return

December 22, 1990.

Post, August 2 3 , 1 9 9 1 .

of the Czar,

an episode o f Frontline

[television series for P B S ] , producer

Sherry Jones, telecast M a y 9, 2 0 0 0 .
11. Vadim Nikitin, " ' 9 1 Foes Linked by Anger and Regret," Moscow

Times,

August 2 1 ,

2006.
12. Stephen F. C o h e n , "America's Failed Crusade in Russia," The Nation,

February 2 8 ,

1994.
13. Author's interview with Jeffrey Sachs.
14. Peter Passell, "Dr. Jeffrey Sachs, S h o c k Therapist," New York Times, June 27, 1 9 9 3 .
15. Peter Reddaway and Dmitri Glinski, The Tragedy
Bolshevism

against

Democracy

of Russia's

Reforms:

Market

(Washington, D C : United States Institute for Peace

Press, 2 0 0 1 ) , 2 9 1 .
16. Jeffrey D . Sachs, The End of Poverty: Economic

Possibilities

for Our Time (New York:

Penguin Books, 2 0 0 5 ) , 137.
17. Reddaway and Glinski, The Tragedy
18. The Agony of Reform,
Economy

of Russia's

Reforms,

an episode o f Commanding

253.

Heights:

The Battle

for the

World

[television series for P B S ] , executive producers Daniel Yergin and Sue L e n a

T h o m p s o n , series producer W i l l i a m C r a n (Boston: Heights Productions,
Reddaway and Glinski, The Tragedy

of Russia's

Reforms,

2002);

237, 298.

19. Mikhail Leontyev, "Two Economists Will Head Russian Reform; Current Digest
of the Soviet Press," Nezavisimaya

Gazeta,

November 9, 1 9 9 1 , digest available on

December 11, 1991.
20. Chrystia Freeland, Sale
Capitalism

of the Century:

Russia's

Wild

Ride

from

Communism

to

(New York: Crown, 2 0 0 0 ) , 56.

21. Boris Yeltsin, "Speech to the R S F S R Congress of People's Deputies," October 2 8 , 1991.
22. David M c C l i n t i c k , "How Harvard Lost Russia," Institutional

Investor,

January 1,

2006.
23. Georgi Arbatov, "Origins and Consequences o f ' S h o c k Therapy,'" in Klein and Pomer,
eds., The New Russia,

171.

24. Vladimir M a u , "Russia," in The Political

Economy

of Policy

Reform,

ed. John

Williamson (Washington, D C : Institute for International E c o n o m i c s , 1994), 4 3 5 .
25. Ibid., 4 3 4 - 3 5 .
26. Joseph E . Stiglitz, Preface, in Klein and Pomer, eds., The New Russia,
27. Joseph E . Stiglitz, Globalization
Company, 2 0 0 2 ) , 136.

and Its Discontents

xxii.

(New York: W . W. Norton &

N O T E S TO P A G E S 224- TO 230

495

28. Yeltsin, " S p e e c h to the R S F S R Congress o f People's Deputies."
29. Stephen F. C o h e n , " C a n W e 'Convert' Russia?" Washington

Post, M a r c h 2 8 , 1 9 9 3 ;

Helen W o m a c k , "Russians S h e l l O u t as Cashless Society L o o m s , "

Independent

( L o n d o n ) , August 2 7 , 1 9 9 2 .
30. Russian

Economic

Russian-Style
31. The Agony of

Trends,

1997, page 4 6 , cited in T h a n e Gustafson,

Capitalism

(Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1 9 9 9 ) , 1 7 1 .
Reform.

32. G w e n Ifill, "Clinton Meets Russian on Assistance Proposal," New York Times,

March

25, 1 9 9 3 .
33. M a l c o l m Gray, "After Bloody Monday," Macleans,
"Powers o f Persuasion," Financial

O c t o b e r 18, 1993; Leyla Boulton,

Times ( L o n d o n ) , November 5, 1 9 9 3 .

34. Serge S c h m e m a n n , " T h e Fight to Lead Russia," New York Times,

M a r c h 13, 1 9 9 3 .

35. Margaret Shapiro and Fred Hiatt, "Troops Move in to Put Down Uprising After
Yeltsin Foes Rampage in Moscow," Washington

Post, O c t o b e r 4 , 1 9 9 3 .

36. John Kenneth W h i t e and Philip John Davies, Political
Old

Parties and the Collapse

of the

Orders (Albany: State University o f New York Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 2 0 9 .

37. "Testimony Statement by the Honorable Lawrence H. S u m m e r s Under Secretary for
International Affairs U . S . Treasury Department Before the C o m m i t t e e on Foreign
Relations o f the U . S . Senate, September 7, 1993."
38. Reddaway and Glinski, The Tragedy

of Russia's

Reforms,

294.

39. Ibid., 2 9 9 .
40. Celestine B o h l e n , "Rancor Grows in Russian Parliament," New York Times,

March

28, 1 9 9 3 .
4 1 . " T h e Threat T h a t Was," The Economist,

April 2 8 , 1 9 9 3 ; Shapiro and Hiatt, "Troops

Move in to Put Down Uprising After Yeltsin Foes Rampage in Moscow."
42. Serge S c h m e m a n n , "Riot in Moscow Amid New Calls for Compromise," New York
Times,

O c t o b e r 3, 1 9 9 3 .

43. Leslie H. G e l b , "How to Help Russia," New York Times,

M a r c h 14, 1 9 9 3 . F O O T ­

N O T E : Shapiro and Hiatt, "Troops Move in to Put Down Uprising After Yeltsin Foes
Rampage in Moscow."
44. Fred Kaplan, "Yeltsin in C o m m a n d as Hard-Liners Give Up," Boston

Globe,

October

5, 1 9 9 3 .
45. " T h e authorities declared that in the course o f two days, 142 people were killed
in Moscow. T h i s was a mockery—the real n u m b e r o f dead had to have b e e n several
times greater. N o one even tried to determine the precise n u m b e r who were wound­
ed and beaten. Thousands were arrested." Kagarlitsky, Square
46. Reddaway and Glinski, The Tragedy
47. Kagarlitsky, Square

Wheels,

of Russia's

Reforms,

Wheels,

218.

427.

212.

4 8 . John M . Goshko, "Victory S e e n for Democracy," Washington

Post, O c t o b e r 5, 1 9 9 3 ;

David Nyhan, "Russia Escapes a Return to the D u n g e o n o f Its Past," Boston
October 5, 1 9 9 3 ; Reddaway and Glinski, The Tragedy
49. Return of the

of Russia's

Reforms,

Globe,

431.

Czar.

50. Nikitin, " '91 Foes Linked by Anger and Regret."
5 1 . C a c i l i e Rohwedder, "Sachs Defends His Capitalist S h o c k Therapy," Wall
Journal

Europe,

Street

October 25, 1993.

52. Sachs, The End of

Poverty.

53. Arthur Spiegelman, "Western Experts C a l l for Russian S h o c k Therapy," Reuters,
October 6, 1 9 9 3 .
54. Dorinda Elliott and Betsy McKay, "Yeltsin's Free-Market Offensive,"

Newsweek,

496

N O T E S TO P A G E S 231 TO 235

O c t o b e r 18, 1 9 9 3 ; Adi Ignatius and Claudia Rosett, "Yeltsin Now Faces Divided
Nation," Asian Wall Street Journal,

O c t o b e r 5, 1 9 9 3 .

55. Stanley Fischer, "Russia and the Soviet Union T h e n and Now," in The Transition
Eastern

Europe,

Country

Studies,

vol. 1 ( C h i c a g o : University o f C h i c a g o Press: 1994), 2 3 7 .

56. Lawrence H. S u m m e r s , " C o m m e n t , " in The Transition
Studies,

in

ed. Olivier Jean Blanchard, Kenneth A. Froot and Jeffrey D . Sachs,
in Eastern

Europe,

Country

vol. 1, 2 5 3 .

57. Jeffrey Tayler, "Russia Is Finished," Atlantic
Billionaires, According to Forbes

Monthly,

May 2 0 0 1 ; " T h e World's

Magazine, Listed by Country," Associated Press,

February 2 7 , 2 0 0 3 .
58. E . S. Browning, " B o n d Investors G a m b l e on Russian Stocks," Wall Street

Journal,

March 24, 1995.
59. Legislator Sergei Yushenkov is quoting Oleg Lobov. Carlotta Gall and Thomas D e Waal,
Chechnya:

Calamity

in the Caucasus

(New York: New York University Press, 1998), 161.

60. Vsevolod V i l c h e k , "Ultimatum on B e n d e d Knees," Moscow

News, May 2, 1 9 9 6 .

6 1 . Passell, "Dr. Jeffrey Sachs, S h o c k Therapist."
62. David Hoffman, "Yeltsin's 'Ruthless' Bureaucrat," Washington

Post, November 22, 1996.

63. Svetlana P. Glinkina et al., " C r i m e and Corruption," in Klein and Pomer, eds., The
New

Russia,

2 4 1 ; Matt Bivens and Jonas Bernstein, " T h e Russia You Never Met,"

Demokratizatsiya:

The Journal

of Post-Soviet

Democracy

6, no. 4 (Fall 1998): 6 3 0 ,

www.demokratizatsiya.org.
64. Bivens and Bernstein, " T h e Russia You Never Met," 6 2 7 - 2 8 ; Total,
1998-2006,

Factbook

April 2 0 0 6 , page 2, www.total.com; T h e profit figure is for 2 0 0 0 :

Marshall I. G o l d m a n , The Piratization

of Russia:

Russian

Reform

Goes Awry (New

York: Routledge, 2 0 0 3 ) , 1 2 0 ; "Yukos Offers 12.5 Percent Stake against Debts to
State-Owned F o r m e r Unit," Associated Press, J u n e 5, 2 0 0 6 ; the $ 2 . 8 billion figure
is based on the fact that in 1 9 9 7 British Petroleum paid $ 5 7 1 million for a 10 per­
c e n t stake in Sidanko, and at that rate the 51 percent stake would have b e e n worth
m o r e than $ 2 . 8 billion: Freeland, Sale

of the Century,

1 8 3 ; Stanislav Lunev,

"Russian Organized C r i m e Spreads Beyond Russia's Borders," Prism 3, no. 8 (May
30, 1 9 9 7 ) .
65. Bivens and Bernstein, " T h e Russia You Never Met," 6 2 9 .
66. Reddaway and Glinski, The Tragedy
67. Freeland, Sale of the Century,
68. Return of the

of Russia's

Reforms,

254.

299.

Czar.

69. Bivens and Bernstein report that "allegations surfaced that Chubais and four o f his
reform lieutenants—all o f them m e n who had b e e n supported by Chubais's U S A I D funded patronage —had accepted $ 9 0 , 0 0 0 each in bribes disguised as a book advance
from U n e x i m b a n k " (one o f the main oligarchic firms that was winning lucrative pri­
vatization contracts from these m e n ) . In a similar controversy, Alfred Kokh, second in
charge o f privatization for the Yeltsin government, was paid $ 1 0 0 , 0 0 0 by a company
linked to one o f the main oligarchs to whom he was awarding privatization contracts;
fittingly, the money was supposedly for a book he was to write on the efficiency of pri­
vatized companies. Ultimately, neither man was prosecuted in connection with the
separate book deals. Bivens and Bernstein, " T h e Russia You Never Met," 6 3 6 ;
Vladimir Isachenkov, "Prosecutors

Investigate Russia's Ex-Privatization

Czar,"

Associated Press, O c t o b e r 1, 1 9 9 7 .
70. M c C l i n t i c k , "How Harvard Lost Russia."
7 1 . U . S . District Court, District o f Massachusetts, "United States of America, Plaintiff, v.

N O T E S TO P A G E S 235 TO 238

497

President and Fellows o f Harvard C o l l e g e , Andrei Shleifer and Jonathan

Hay,

Defendants: Civil Action No. 0 0 - 1 1 9 7 7 - D P W , " Memorandum

and Order,

June 2 8 ,

2 0 0 4 ; M c C l i n t i c k , "How Harvard Lost Russia."
72. M c C l i n t i c k , "How Harvard Lost Russia."
73. Dan Josefsson, " T h e Art o f Ruining a Country with a Little Professional Help from
Sweden," E T C (Stockholm) English edition, 1 9 9 9 .
74. Ernest Beck, "Soros Begins Investing in Eastern Europe," Wall Street Journal,

June 1,

1994; Andrew Jack, Arkady Ostrovsky and Charles Pretzlik, "Soros to Sell T h e Worst
Investment o f M y Life,'" Financial

Times ( L o n d o n ) , M a r c h 17, 2 0 0 4 .

75. Brian W h i t m o r e , "Latest Polls Showing Communists

Ahead," Moscow

Times,

September 8, 1 9 9 9 .
76. Return of the

Czar.

77. Helen W o m a c k , "Terror Alert in Moscow as Third B o m b i n g Kills 7 3 , "

Independent

(London), September 14, 1 9 9 9 .
78. Asian Nurbiyev, "Last Bodies Cleared from Rebels' Secret Grozny Cemetery," Agence
France-Presse, April 6, 2 0 0 6 .
79. Sabrina Tavernise, "Farms as Business in Russia," New York Times, November 6, 2 0 0 1 ;
Josefsson, " T h e Art o f Ruining a Country with a Little Professional Help from
Sweden"; "News C o n f e r e n c e by James Wolfensohn, President o f the World B a n k
Re: I M F Spring Meeting," Washington, D C , April 2 2 , 1 9 9 9 , www.imf.org; Branko
Milanovic, Income,
Market

Economy

Inequality

and Poverty

during

the Transition

from

Planned

E c o n o m i c Reform, G o v e r n m e n t o f the Russian Federation, Russian

Economic

Trends

5, no. 1 ( 1 9 9 6 ) : 5 6 - 5 7 , cited in Bertram Silverman and Murray Yanowitch, New
New

Poor,

to

(Washington, D C : World Bank, 1 9 9 8 ) , 6 8 ; Working C e n t e r for

New Russia:

Winners

and Losers

on the Russian

Road

to

Rich,

Capitalism

(Armonk, NY: M . E . Sharpe, 2 0 0 0 ) , 4 7 .
80. T h e 7 1 5 , 0 0 0 statistic comes from the Russian health and social development minis­
ter. "Russia Has M o r e T h a n 7 1 5 , 0 0 0 Homeless C h i l d r e n - H e a l t h Minister," RIA
Novosti news agency, February 2 3 , 2 0 0 6 ; Carel D e Rooy, U N I C E F , Children
Russian

Federation,

in the

November 16, 2 0 0 4 , page 5, www.unicef.org.

81. In 1987, Russia's per capita alcohol consumption was 3.9 liters. In 2 0 0 3 it reached
8.87 liters. World Health Organization Regional Office for Europe, " 3 0 5 0 Pure Alcohol
Consumption, Litres Per Capita, 1 9 8 7 , 2 0 0 3 , " European Health for All Database
( H F A - D B ) , data.euro.who.int/hfadb;
Million Addicts," Pravda
Federation," 2006

Global

"In Sad Tally, Russia Counts M o r e T h a n 4

(Moscow), February 2 0 , 2 0 0 4 ; U N A I D S , "Annex 1: Russian
Report

on the AIDS

Epidemic,

May 2 0 0 6 , page 4 3 7 , www

.unaids.org; Interview with Natalya Katsap, Manager, Media Partnerships, Transatlantic
Partners Against A I D S , June 2 0 0 6 .
82. World Health Organization Regional Office for Europe, " 1 7 8 0 S D R , Suicide and
Self-inflicted Injury, All Ages Per 1 0 0 , 0 0 0 , 1 9 8 6 - 1 9 9 4 , " European Health for All
Database ( H F A - D B ) , data.euro.who.int/hfadb;

In 1 9 8 6 , the rate o f homicide and

intentional injuries per 100,000 people was 7.3; in 1 9 9 4 it reached its high o f 32.9; in
2 0 0 4 it was down to 2 5 . 2 . World Health Organization Regional Office for Europe,
"1793

S D R , Homicide and Intentional Injury, All Ages Per 1 0 0 , 0 0 0 , 1 9 8 6 - 2 0 0 4 , " E u ­

ropean Health for All Database.
83. Nikitin, " ' 9 1 Foes Linked by Anger and Regret"; Stephen F. C o h e n , " T h e New
American Cold War," The Nation,
World Factbook

July 10, 2 0 0 6 ; Central Intelligence Agency, "Russia,"

1992 (Washington, D C : CIA, 1 9 9 2 ) , 2 8 7 ; Central Intelligence Agency,

"Russia," World Factbook

2007,

www.cia.gov.

498

N O T E S TO P A G E S 239 TO 252

8 4 . C o l i n M c M a h o n , "Shortages Leave Russia's East O u t in the Cold," Chicago

Tribune,

November 19, 1 9 9 8 .
8 5 . Arbatov, "Origins and C o n s e q u e n c e s o f ' S h o c k Therapy,'" 177.
86. Richard Pipes, "Russia's C h a n c e , " Commentary

9 3 , no. 3 (March 1992): 30.

87. Richard E . Ericson, " T h e Classical Soviet-Type Economy: Nature o f the System and
Implications for Reform," Journal

of Economic

Perspectives

5, no. 4 (Autumn 1991): 25.

8 8 . Tayler, "Russia Is Finished"; Richard Lourie, " S h o c k o f Calamity," Los Angeles

Times,

March 2 1 , 1999.
8 9 . Josefsson, " T h e Art o f Ruining a Country with a Little Professional Help from
Sweden."
9 0 . Tatyana

Koshkareva and

Rustam

Narzikulov,

Nezavisimaya

Gazeta

(Moscow),

O c t o b e r 3 1 , 1997; Paul Klebnikov and Carrie Shook, "Russia and Central Europe:
T h e New Frontier," Forbes,
9 1 . Adam Smith, The Wealth

July 2 8 , 1997.

of Nations,

ed. Edwin C a n n a n (New York: Modern Library,

1937), 532.
9 2 . 1 am indebted to David Harvey for informing this analysis. David Harvey, A
History

of Neoliberalism

9 3 . M i c h a e l S c h u m a n , "Billionaires in the Making," Forbes,
Brief

Brief

(New York: Oxford University Press, 2 0 0 5 ) .

History of Neoliberalism,

July 18, 1 9 9 4 ; Harvey, A

103.

9 4 . " Y P F B : Selling a National Symbol," Institutional

Investor,

Friedland, " M o n e y Transfer," Wall Street Journal,

M a r c h 1, 1997; Jonathan

August 15, 1 9 9 5 .

9 5 . Friedland, " M o n e y Transfer."
9 6 . Paul Blustein, And the Money Kept Rolling
the Bankrupting

of Argentina

In (and Out): Wall Street, the IMF,

and

(New York: PublicAffairs, 2 0 0 5 ) , 2 4 , 2 9 ; Nathaniel C .

Nash, "Argentina's President, Praised Abroad, Finds Himself in Trouble at Home,"
New York Times,

June 8, 1 9 9 1 ; Tod Robberson, "Argentine President's Exit Inspires

Mixed Emotions," Dallas

Morning

News, O c t o b e r 18, 1 9 9 9 .

9 7 . Paul Brinkley-Rogers, " C h a o s Reigns as President Flees Uprising," Daily

Telegraph

(London), December 22, 2 0 0 1 .
9 8 . Jean Friedman-Rudovsky, "Bolivia Calls Ex-President to Court," Time, February 6, 2007.

12: The Capitalist Id: Russia and the New Era of the Boor Market
1. J o h n Maynard Keynes, "From Keynes to Roosevelt: O u r Recovery Plan Assayed," New
York Times,

December 31, 1933.

2. Ashley M . Herer, "Oprah, B o n o Promote Clothing L i n e , iPod," Associated Press,
O c t o b e r 13, 2 0 0 6 .
3. T . Christian Miller, Blood

Money:

Wasted

Billions,

Lost Lives,

and Corporate

Greed

in Iraq (New York: Little, Brown and Company, 2 0 0 6 ) , 123. F O O T N O T E p. 2 4 8 :
John Cassidy, "Always with Us," The New Yorker, April 11, 2 0 0 5 .
4.

Peter Passell, "Dr. Jeffrey Sachs, S h o c k Therapist," New York Times, June 27, 1 9 9 3 .

5. Jeffrey S a c h s , "Life in the E c o n o m i c E m e r g e n c y Room," in The Political
of Policy Reform,

Economy

ed. John Williamson (Washington, D C : Institute for International

Economics, 1994), 516.
6.

"Roosevelt Victor by 7 , 0 5 4 , 5 2 0 Votes," New

York

Times,

D e c e m b e r 2 5 , 1932;

Raymond Moley, After Seven Years (New York: Harper & Brothers, 1 9 3 9 ) , 3 0 5 .
7. Carolyn Eisenberg, Drawing
1944-1949

the Line:

The American

Decision

(New York: Cambridge University Press, 1 9 9 6 ) .

to Divide

Germany,

N O T E S TO P A G E S 254 TO 263

8.

The Political

9.

Sachs, "Life in the E c o n o m i c E m e r g e n c y R o o m , " 5 0 3 - 5 0 4 , 5 1 3 .

Economy

of Policy Reform,

10. John Williamson, The Political

Economy

499

44.
of Policy Reform,

19, 2 6 .

11. John Williamson and Stephan Haggard, " T h e Political Conditions for E c o n o m i c
Reform," in The Political

Economy

of Policy Reform,

12. Williamson, The Political

Economy

of Policy Reform,

13. John Toye, The Political

Economy

of Policy Reform,

565.
20.
41.

14. Bruce Little, "Debt Crisis Looms, Study Warns," Globe

and Mail

(Toronto), February

16, 1993; T h e T V report was on W 5 on C T V , hosted by Eric Mailing. Linda M c Q u a i g ,
Shooting

the Hippo:

Death

by Deficit

and Other Canadian

Myths (Toronto: Penguin,

1995), 3.
15. T h e information in this paragraph is drawn from M c Q u a i g , Shooting

the Hippo,

18,

4 2 - 4 4 , 117.
16. Ibid., 4 4 , 4 6 .
17. "How to Invent a Crisis in Education," Globe and Mail (Toronto), September 15, 1995.
18. Information in the next two paragraphs is drawn from M i c h a e l B r u n o , Deep
and Reform:

What Have We Learned?

Crises

(Washington, D C : World Bank, 1 9 9 6 ) , 4 , 6, 13,

25. Emphasis in original.
19. Ibid., 6. Emphasis added.
20. T h e figure for World Bank membership refers to 1 9 9 5 . T h e r e are now 185 m e m b e r
countries.
21. Information in the next four paragraphs is drawn from Davison L. Budhoo, Enough
Enough:

Dear Mr. Camdessus

of the International

Monetary

. . . Open Letter of Resignation
Fund

to the Managing

Is

Director

(New York: New Horizons Press, 1990), 2 - 2 7 .

22. Most of Budhoo's allegations center on the discrepancies in the calculations for
Trinidad and Tobago's Relative Unit Labor Cost, which is an extremely important eco­
nomic indicator that measures countries' productivity. He writes, " O n the basis o f cal­
culations made by our divisional statistician last year after the F u n d mission returned
from the field, the Relative Unit Labour Cost in Trinidad and Tobago increased by 6 9
percent only, instead o f the 145.8 percent as stated in our 1985 reports, and the 142.9
percent as claimed in the 1 9 8 6 F u n d documents. Between 1 9 8 0 - 8 5 the R U L C actu­
ally rose by a mere 66.1 percent instead o f our assertion o f 164.7 percent made in the
1986 reports. Over 1 9 8 3 - 8 5 relative unit labour costs moved up by only 14.9 percent,
not by the 36.9 percent that was mooted to the world community in 1 9 8 6 . In 1 9 8 5 ,
instead of rising by the 9 percent that we had stated in the R E D and Staff Report, the
R U L C Index fell by 1.7 percent. And in 1 9 8 6 relative unit labour costs slid downward
spectacularly by 4 6 . 5 percent although there is no record o f this in the 1987 report or
anywhere else in official Fund documentation." Ibid., 17.
23. "Bitter Calypsos in the Caribbean," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , July 3 0 , 1 9 9 0 ; Robert

Weissman, "Playing with Numbers: T h e I M F ' s Fraud in Trinidad and Tobago,"
Multinational

Monitor

11, no. 6 (June 1990).

24. Lawrence Van Gelder, "Mr. Budhoo's Letter o f Resignation from the I.M.F. (50 Years
Is Enough)," New York Times,

March 20, 1996.

13. Let It Burn: The Looting of Asia and "The Fall of a Second Berlin Wall"
1. Anita Raghavan, "Wall Street Is Scavenging in Asia-Pacific," Wall
February 10, 1 9 9 8 .

Street

Journal,

500

2.

N O T E S TO P A G E S 263 TO 270

R. W i l l i a m Liddle, "Year O n e o f the Yudhoyono-Kalla Duumvirate," Bulletin
Indonesian

Economie

Studies

of

4 1 , no. 3 ( D e c e m b e r 2 0 0 5 ) : 337.

3.

" T h e Weakest Link," The Economist,

4.

Irma Adelman, "Lessons from Korea," in The New Russia: Transition

February 8, 2 0 0 3 .
Gone Awry, eds.

Lawrence R. Klein and Marshall Pomer (Stanford, CA: Stanford University Press,
2 0 0 1 ) , 129.
5.

David McNally, "Globalization on Trial" Monthly

6.

"Apec Highlights Social Impact o f Asian Financial Crisis," Bernama news agency,
May

7.

Review,

25, 1998.

Hur Nam-Il, " G o l d Rush . . . Korean Style," Business
Pressure Mounts on Korean Won —Report," Korea

8.

September 1 9 9 8 .

"Elderly Suicide Rate on the Increase," Korea

Korea,

Herald

Herald

M a r c h 1998; "Selling

(Seoul), May 12, 1998.
(Seoul), October 27, 1999;

" E c o n o m i c Woes Driving M o r e to Suicide," Korea Times (Seoul), April 2 3 , 1998.
9.

T h e crisis hit in 1 9 9 4 , but the loan did not c o m e through until early 1 9 9 5 .

10. "Milton Friedman Discusses the I M F , " CNN

Moneyline

with Lou Dobbs,

January 2 2 ,

1998; George P. Shultz, W i l l i a m E . S i m o n and Walter B . Wriston, " W h o Needs the
IMF,"

Wall Street Journal,

February 3, 1 9 9 8 .

11. Milken Institute, "Global Overview," Global

Conference

1998, Los Angeles, March

12, 1 9 9 8 , www.milkeninstitute.org.
12. Bill C l i n t o n , "Joint Press C o n f e r e n c e with Prime Minister Chrétien," November 2 3 ,
1997,

www.clintonfoundation.org.

13. M i l k e n Institute, "Global Overview."
14. José Pinera, " T h e T h i r d Way' Keeps Countries in the Third World," prepared for the
C a t o Institute's 16th Annual Monetary C o n f e r e n c e cosponsored with The

Economist,

Washington, D C , O c t o b e r 2 2 , 1998; José Pinera, " T h e Fall o f a S e c o n d Berlin Wall,"
O c t o b e r 2 2 , 1 9 9 8 , www.josepinera.com.
15. " U . S . Senate C o m m i t t e e on Foreign Relations Holds Hearing on the Role of the I M F
in the Asian Financial Crisis," February 12, 1 9 9 8 ; "Text-Greenspan's S p e e c h to New
York E c o n o m i c Club," Reuters News, D e c e m b e r 3, 1997.
16. M . Perez and S. Tobarra, "Los paîses asiâticos tendrân que aceptar cierta
que no era necesaria hasta ahora," El Pais International

Edition

flexibilidad

(Madrid), D e c e m b e r

8, 1 9 9 7 ; " I M F C h i e f Calls for Abandon of'Asian M o d e l , ' " Agence France-Presse,
D e c e m b e r 1, 1 9 9 7 .
17. Interview with Mahathir
Heights:

The Battle

Mohamad

conducted

for the World Economy,

July 2, 2 0 0 1 , for

Commanding

www.pbs.org.

18. Interview with Stanley Fischer conducted May 9, 2 0 0 1 , for Commanding

Heights,

www.pbs.org.
19. Stephen Grenville, " T h e I M F and the Indonesian Crisis," background paper, Inde­
pendent Evaluation Office o f the I M F , M a y 2 0 0 4 , page 8, www.imf.org.
20. Walden Bello, " T h e I M F ' s Hidden Agenda," The Nation

(Bangkok), January 2 5 ,

1998.
2 1 . Fischer, Commanding

Heights;

Times,

Joseph Kahn, "I.M.F.'s Hand Often Heavy, a Study

Says," New

York

O c t o b e r 2 1 , 2 0 0 0 . F O O T N O T E : Paul Blustein,

Chastening:

Inside the Crisis That Rocked

the Global

Financial

System and

The

Humbled

the IMF (New York: PublicAffairs, 2 0 0 1 ) , 6 - 7 .
22. T h e I M F agreement with South Korea explicitly demanded "easing restrictions in the
labor market over redundancies (to enable businesses to move from one industry to
another)." Cited in Martin Hart-Landsberg and Paul Burkett, " E c o n o m i c Crisis and

N O T E S TO P A G E S 270 TO 273

Restructuring in South Korea: Beyond the Free Market-Statist Debate," Critical
Studies

501

Asian

3 3 , no. 3 ( 2 0 0 1 ) : 4 2 1 ; Alkman Granitsas and D a n Biers, " E c o n o m i e s : T h e

Next Step: T h e I M F Has Stopped Asia's Financial Panic," Far Eastern

Economic

Review, April 2 3 , 1998; Cindy Shiner, " E c o n o m i c Crisis Clouds Indonesian's Reforms,"
Washington

Post, September 10, 1 9 9 8 .

23. Soren Ambrose, "South Korean Union Sues the I M F , " Economic

Justice News 2, no. 4

(January 2 0 0 0 ) .
24. Nicola Bullard, Taming

the Tigers: The IMF and the Asian Crisis (London: Focus on

the Global South, M a r c h 2, 1999), www.focusweb.org; Walden Bello, A
Tragedy:

The Collapse

of Democracy

in Thailand

Siamese

(London: Focus on the Global

South, September 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 ) , www.focusweb.org.
25. Jeffrey Sachs, "Power Unto Itself," Financial

Times ( L o n d o n ) , D e c e m b e r 1 1 , 1997.

26. M i c h a e l Lewis " T h e World's Biggest Going-Out-of-Business Sale," New York
Magazine,

Times

May 3 1 , 1 9 9 8 .

27. Ian Chalmers, "Tommy's Toys Trashed," Inside

Indonesia

56 ( O c t o b e r - D e c e m b e r

1998).
28. Paul Blustein and
Washington

Sandra Sugawara, "Rescue Plan for Indonesia

in Jeopardy,"

Post, January 7, 1998; Grenville, " T h e I M F and the Indonesian Crisis," 10.

29. McNally, "Globalization on Trial."
30. "Magic Arts o f Jakarta's ' W i t c h - D o c t o r , ' " Financial

Times

( L o n d o n ) , N o v e m b e r 3,

1997.
31. Susan S i m , "Jakarta's Technocrats vs. the Technologists," Straits Times

(Singapore),

November 30, 1997; Kahn, "I.M.F.'s Hand Often Heavy, a Study Says."
32. International Monetary Fund, The IMF's Response

to the Asian Crisis, January 1 9 9 9 ,

www.imf.org.
33. Paul Blustein, "At the I M F , a Struggle Shrouded in Secrecy," Washington
March

3 0 , 1 9 9 8 ; Martin

Feldstein, " R e f o c u s i n g the

Post,

I M F , " Foreign

Affairs,

March-April 1998; Jeffrey S a c h s , " T h e I M F and the Asian Flu," American

Prospect,

March-April 1 9 9 8 .
34. South Korea went from 2.6 to 7.6 percent, Indonesia from 4 to 12 percent. Similar
patterns occurred in the other countries. International L a b o u r Organization, " I L O
Governing Body to E x a m i n e Response to Asia Crisis," press release, M a r c h 16, 1 9 9 9 ;
Mary Jordan, "Middle Class Plunging Back to Poverty," Washington

Post, S e p t e m b e r

6, 1 9 9 8 ; McNally, "Globalization on Trial"; F l o r e n c e L o w e - L e e , " W h e r e Is Korea's
Middle Class?" Korea

Insight

2, no. 11 ( N o v e m b e r 2 0 0 0 ) : 1; James D . Wolfensohn,

"Opening Address by the President o f the World B a n k Group," Summary
of

the Fifty-Third

Annual

Meeting

of the Board

of Governors

Proceedings

(Washington, D C :

International Monetary F u n d , O c t o b e r 6 - 8 , 1 9 9 8 ) , 3 1 , www.imf.org.
35. "Array o f C r i m e s Linked to the Financial Crisis, M e e t i n g Told," New Straits

Times

(Kuala L u m p u r ) , June 1, 1 9 9 9 ; Nussara Sawatsawang, "Prostitution—Alarm
Sound Amid Child Sex Rise," Bangkok

Bells

Post, D e c e m b e r 2 4 , 1 9 9 9 ; Luz Baguioro,

"Child Labour Rampant in the Philippines," Straits Times

(Singapore), February 12,

2 0 0 0 ; "Asian Financial Crisis Rapidly Creating H u m a n Crisis: World Bank," Agence
France-Presse, September 2 9 , 1 9 9 8 .
36. Laura Myers, "Albright Offers Thais Used F-16s, Presses Banking Reforms," Associated
Press, March 4 , 1999.
37. Independent Evaluation Office o f the I M F , The IMF and Recent
Crises:

Indonesia,

Korea,

Brazil

Capital

(Washington, D C : International Monetary

Account
Fund,

502

N O T E S TO P A G E S 274 TO 277

September 12, 2 0 0 3 ) : 4 2 - 4 3 , vvww.imf.org; Grenville, " T h e I M F and the Indonesian
Crisis," 8.
38. Craig Mellow, "Treacherous T i m e s , " Institutional

Investor International

Edition,

May

1999.
39. Raghavan, "Wall Street Is Scavenging in Asia-Pacific."
4 0 . Rory McCarthy, "Merrill Lynch Buys Yamaichi Branches, Now Japan's Biggest Foreign
Broker," Agence France-Presse, February 12, 1 9 9 8 ; "Phatra Thanakit Announces
Partnership with Merrill Lynch," Merrill Lynch press release, June 4 , 1998; United
Nations Conference on Trade and Development, World Investment Report 1998: Trends
and

Determinants

(New York: United Nations, 1998): 337; James Xiaoning Zhan and

Terutomo Ozawa, Business
Period

Restructuring

in Asia: Cross-Border

M(5As in the

Crisis

(Copenhagen: C o p e n h a g e n Business S c h o o l Press, 2 0 0 1 ) , 100; "Advisory

Board for Salomon," Financial

Times

( L o n d o n ) , M a y 18, 1 9 9 9 ; "Korea Ssangyong

Sells Info Unit Shares to Carlyle," Reuters News, January 2, 2001; "JP Morgan—Carlyle
C o n s o r t i u m to B e c o m e Largest S h a r e h o l d e r o f KorAm," Korea

Times

(Seoul),

September 9, 2 0 0 0 .
4 1 . Nicholas D . Kristof, "Worsening Financial F l u in Asia Lowers Immunity to U.S.
Business," New York Times,

February 1, 1 9 9 8 .

4 2 . Lewis, " T h e World's Biggest Going-Out-of-Business S a l e " ; Mark L. Clifford,
"Invasion o f the Bargain Snatchers," BusinessWeek,

M a r c h 2, 1 9 9 8 .

4 3 . United Nations C o n f e r e n c e on Trade and Development, World
1998,

3 3 6 ; Z h a n and Ozawa, Business

Restructuring

Investment

Report

in Asia, 9 9 ; "Chronology-GM

Takeover Talks with Daewoo Motor Creditors," Reuters, April 3 0 , 2 0 0 2 .
44. Z h a n and Ozawa, Business

Restructuring

in Asia, 9 6 - 1 0 2 ; Clifford, "Invasion o f the

Bargain Snatchers."
4 5 . Alexandra Harney, " G M C l o s e to Taking 6 7 % Stake in Daewoo for $ 4 0 0 M , "
Financial

Times

( L o n d o n ) , S e p t e m b e r 2 0 , 2 0 0 1 ; Stephanie Strom, "Korea to Sell

Control o f Banks to U . S . Investors," New York Times,

January 1, 1999.

4 6 . C h a r l e n e Barshefsky, "Trade Issues with Asian Countries," Testimony before the
S u b c o m m i t t e e on Trade o f the House C o m m i t t e e on Ways and Means, February 2 4 ,
1998.
47. " I n t e r n a t i o n a l

Water—Ayala

Consortium

Wins

Manila

Water

Privatization

Contract," Business W i r e , January 2 3 , 1 9 9 7 ; " B e c h t e l W i n s Contract to Build O i l
Refinery in Indonesia," Asia Pulse news agency, S e p t e m b e r 2 2 , 1 9 9 9 ; "Mergers o f
S. Korean Handset Makers with Foreign C o s on the Rise," Asia Pulse news agency,
N o v e m b e r 1, 2 0 0 4 ; United Nations C o n f e r e n c e on Trade and Development,
Investment

Report

1998,

3 3 7 ; Z h a n and Ozawa, Business

Restructuring

in

World
Asia,

96-99.
4 8 . Z h a n and Ozawa, Business

Restructuring

in Asia,

9 6 - 1 0 2 ; Robert Wade and Frank

Veneroso, " T h e Asian Crisis: T h e High D e b t Model Versus the Wall Street-TreasuryI M F C o m p l e x , " New Left Review

2 2 8 (March-April 1 9 9 8 ) .

49. "Milton Friedman Discusses the I M F , " C N N Moneyline

with Lou Dobbs,

January 22,

1998.
50. In 1 9 9 5 , the suicide rate was 11.8 per 100,000 people; in 2005 it was 26.1 per 100,000,
an increase o f 121 percent. World Factbook
Agency, 1997); World

Factbook

2007,

1997 (Washington, D C : Central Intelligence

www.cia.gov; " S . Korea Has Top Suicide Rate

among O E C D Countries: Report," Asia Pulse news agency, September 18, 2006;
" S . Korean Police Confirm Actress Suicide," Agence France-Presse, February 12, 2007.
51. United Nations H u m a n Settlements Program, 2005

Annual

Report

(Nairobi: UN-

N O T E S TO P A G E S 277 TO 290

HABITAT, 2 0 0 6 ) , 5 - 6 , www.unchs.org; Rainer Maria Rilke, Duino
Sonnets

to Orpheus,

Elegies

503

and

the

trans. A. Poulin Jr. (Boston: Houghton Mifflin, 1 9 7 7 ) , 5 1 .

52. "Indonesia Admits to Rapes during Riots," Washington

Post, D e c e m b e r 2 2 , 1 9 9 8 .

53. " T h e Weakest Link"; T h o m a s L . Friedman, The Lexus and the Olive Tree (New York:
Farrar, Straus and, Giroux, 1 9 9 9 ) , 4 5 2 - 5 3 .
54. " T h e Critics o f Capitalism," Financial
55. Fischer, Commanding

Heights;

Times ( L o n d o n ) , November 2 7 , 1 9 9 9 .

Blustein, The Chastening,

6-7.

14. Shock Therapy in the U.S.A.: The Homeland Security Bubble
1. T o m Baldwin, "Revenge o f the Battered Generals," Times ( L o n d o n ) , April 18, 2 0 0 6 .
2.

Reuters, "Britain's Ranking on Surveillance Worries Privacy Advocate," New
Times,

3.
4.

York

November 3, 2 0 0 6 .

Daniel Gross, " T h e Homeland Security B u b b l e , " Slate.com, June 1, 2 0 0 5 .
Robert Burns, "Defense C h i e f Shuns Involvement in Weapons and Merger Decisions
to Avoid Conflict o f Interest," Associated Press, August 2 3 , 2 0 0 1 .

5.

John Burgess, "Tuning in to a Trophy Technology," Washington

Post, M a r c h 2 4 , 1 9 9 2 ;

" T I S Worldwide Announces the Appointment o f the Honorable D o n a l d Rumsfeld to
its Board o f Advisors," P R Newswire, April 2 5 , 2 0 0 0 ; Geoffrey L e a n and Jonathan
Owen, "Donald Rumsfeld Makes $ 5 M Killing on Bird F l u Drug,"

Independent

(London), M a r c h 12, 2 0 0 6 .
6.

George W. Bush, "Bush Delivers Remarks with Rumsfeld, Gates," C Q Transcripts
W i r e , November 8, 2 0 0 6 .

7.

Joseph L. Galloway, "After Losing War G a m e , Rumsfeld Packed U p His Military and
Went to War," Knight-Ridder, April 2 6 , 2 0 0 6 .

8.

Jeffrey H. Birnbaum, "Mr. C E O G o e s to Washington," Fortune,

9.

Donald H. Rumsfeld, "Secretary Rumsfeld's Remarks to the Johns Hopkins, Paul
H. Nitze S c h o o l o f Advanced International
.defenselink.mil; T o m Peters, The Circle

M a r c h 19, 2 0 0 1 .

Studies," D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 5 , www

of Innovation

(New York: Alfred A. Knopf,

1997), 16.
10. Information

on the next 2 pages is drawn from

Donald

H. Rumsfeld,

"DoD

Acquisition and Logistics E x c e l l e n c e Week Kickoff—Bureaucracy to Battlefield,"
speech made at the Pentagon, September 10, 2 0 0 1 , www.defenselink.mil.
11. Carolyn Skorneck, "Senate C o m m i t t e e Approves New Base Closings, Cuts $1.3
Billion from Missile Defense," Associated Press, S e p t e m b e r 7, 2 0 0 1 ; Rumsfeld, " D o D
Acquisition and Logistics E x c e l l e n c e W e e k Kickoff."
12. Bill H e m m e r

and Jamie Mclntyre, "Defense

Pentagon's Bureaucracy," C N N Evening

Secretary Declares War on

the

News, September 10, 2 0 0 1 .

B . D o n a l d Rumsfeld, "Tribute to Milton Friedman," Washington, D C , May 9, 2 0 0 2 ,
www.defenselink.mil; Milton Friedman and Rose D . Friedman, Two Lucky
Memoirs

14. Friedman and Friedman, Two Lucky People,

391.

15. William Gruber,

Politics, Business," Chicago

"Rumsfeld

Reflects on

Tribune,

October 2 0 , 1 9 9 3 ; Stephen J . Hedges, "Winter C o m e s for a Beltway Lion,"
Tribune,

People:

(Chicago: University o f C h i c a g o Press, 1 9 9 8 ) , 3 4 5 .

Chicago

November 12, 2 0 0 6 .

16. Greg Schneider, "Rumsfeld Shunning Weapons Decisions," Washington
24, 2001; Andrew Cockburn, Rumsfeld:

His Rise, Fall, and Catastrophic

Post, August
Legacy

(New

York: Scribner, 2 0 0 7 ) , 8 9 - 9 0 ; Randeep Ramesh, " T h e Two Faces o f Rumsfeld,"

504

N O T E S TO P A G E S 290 TO 296

Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , M a y 9, 2 0 0 3 ; R i c h a r d

C o n n e c t i o n , " Fortune,

B e h a r , "Rummy's

17. Joe Palca, "Salk Polio Vaccine Conquered Terrifying Disease," National
Morning

Edition,

North

Korea

Public

Radio:

M a y 12, 2 0 0 3 .

April 12, 2 0 0 5 ; David M . Oshinsky, Polio: An American

Story (Oxford:

Oxford University Press, 2 0 0 5 ) , 2 1 0 - 1 1 . F O O T N O T E : Carly Weeks, "Tamiflu Linked
to 10 Deaths," Gazette (Montreal), November 30, 2 0 0 6 ; Dorsey Griffith, "Psychiatric
Warning Put on Flu Drug," Sacramento
18. Knowledge

Ecology

International,

Bee, November 14, 2 0 0 6 .
"KEI

Request

for

Investigation

into

Anticompetitive Aspects o f Gilead Voluntary Licenses for Patents on Tenofivir and
Emtricitabine," February 12, 2 0 0 7 , www.keionline.org.
19. John Stanton, "Big Stakes in Tamiflu Debate," Roll Call,

D e c e m b e r 15, 2 0 0 5 .

20. Information in the next two paragraphs is drawn from T . Christian Miller,
Money:

Wasted

Billions,

Lost Lives and Corporate

Greed

Blood

in Iraq (New York: Little,

Brown and Company, 2 0 0 6 ) , 7 7 - 7 9 .
2 1 . Joan Didion, " C h e n e y : T h e Fatal Touch," The New York Review of Books,

October 5,

2006.
22. D a n Briody, Halliburton

Agenda:

The Politics

of Oil and Money

(New Jersey: John

Wiley & Sons, 2 0 0 4 ) , 1 9 8 - 9 9 ; David H. Hackworth, "Balkans G o o d for Texas-Based
Business," Sun-Sentinel

(Fort Lauderdale), August 16, 2 0 0 1 .

23. Antonia Juhasz, Bush Agenda:

Invading

the World,

One Economy

at a Time

(New

York: Regan Books, 2 0 0 6 ) , 120.
24. Jonathan D . Salant, " C h e n e y : I'll Forfeit Options," Associated Press, September 1,
2000.
25. "Lynne C h e n e y Resigns from L o c k h e e d Martin Board," Dow Jones News Service,
January 5, 2 0 0 1 .
26. T i m Weiner, " L o c k h e e d and the Future o f Warfare," New York Times,

November 2 8 ,

2 0 0 4 . F O O T N O T E : Jeff M c D o n a l d , "City Looks at County's Outsourcing
Blueprint," San Diego

Union-Tribune,

as

July 2 3 , 2 0 0 6 .

27. S a m Howe Verhovek, "Clinton Reining in Role for Business in Welfare Effort," New
York

Times,

M a y 1 1 , 1 9 9 7 ; Barbara Vobejda, "Privatization

Curbed," Washington

of Social Programs

Post, May 10, 1997.

28. M i c h e l l e Breyer and M i k e Ward, "Running Prisons for a Profit," Austin
Statesman,
American

American-

September 4 , 1 9 9 4 ; Judith G r e e n e , "Bailing O u t Private Jails," The
Prospect,

September 10, 2 0 0 1 ; Madeline Baro, "Tape Shows Inmates Bit by

Dogs, Kicked, Stunned," Associated Press, August 19, 1 9 9 7 .
29. Matt Moffett, "Pension Reform Pied Piper Loves Private Accounts," Wall
Journal,

Street

M a r c h 3, 2 0 0 5 .

30. "Governor George W. Bush Delivers Remarks on G o v e r n m e n t Reform," FDCH
litical

Transcripts,

Po­

Philadelphia, June 9, 2 0 0 0 .

31. Jon Elliston, "Disaster in the Making," Tucson

Weekly,

September 2 3 , 2 0 0 4 .

32. J o e M . Allbaugh, "Current F E M A Instructions & Manuals Numerical

Index,"

Testimony o f Federal E m e r g e n c y M a n a g e m e n t Agency Director Joe M . Allbaugh
before the Veterans Affairs, Housing and Urban Development and Independent
Agencies S u b c o m m i t t e e o f the Senate Appropriations C o m m i t t e e , May 16, 2 0 0 1 .
33. John F. Harris and D a n a Milbank, "For Bush, New Emergencies Ushered in a New
Agenda," Washington
Office, Aviation
mance,

Post, September 2 2 , 2 0 0 1 ; United States General Accounting

Security:

Long-Standing

Problems

Impair

Airport

Screeners'

Perfor­

June 2 0 0 0 , page 2 5 , www.gao.gov.

34. National

Commission

on Terrorist Attacks upon the

United

States, The

9/11

N O T E S TO P A G E S 296 TO 303

Commission

Report:

Upon the United

Final

States,

Report

of the National

Commission

on Terrorist

505

Attacks

2 0 0 4 , page 8 5 , vvww.gpoaccess.gov.

35. Anita Manning, " C o m p a n y Hopes to Restart Production o f Anthrax Vaccine," USA
Today, November 5, 2 0 0 1 .
36. J . M c L a n e , " C o n f e r e n c e to Honor Milton Friedman on His Ninetieth Birthday,"
Chicago

Business,

November 2 5 , 2 0 0 2 , www.chibus.com.

37. Joan Ryan, " H o m e o f the Brave," San Francisco

Chronicle,

October 23, 2001; George

W. Bush, "President Honors Public Servants," Washington, D C , O c t o b e r 15, 2 0 0 1 .
38. G e o r g e W . Bush, "President

Discusses W a r on Terrorism," Atlanta,

Georgia,

November 8, 2 0 0 1 .
39. Harris and Milbank, "For Bush, New E m e r g e n c i e s Ushered in a New Agenda."
40. Andrew Bacevich, "Why Read Clausewitz W h e n S h o c k and Awe C a n M a k e a C l e a n
Sweep o f Things?" London

Review

of Books,

June 8, 2 0 0 6 . F O O T N O T E : Scott

Shane and Ron Nixon, "In Washington, Contractors Take on Biggest R o l e Ever," New
York Times,

February 4 , 2 0 0 7 .

4 1 . Evan Ratliff, "Fear, Inc.," Wired,

December 2005.

42. Shane and Nixon, "In Washington, Contractors Take on Biggest Role Ever."
43. Matt Richtel, "Tech Investors C u l l Start-ups for Pentagon," Washington

Post, M a y 7,

2007; Defense Venture Catalyst Initiative, "An Overview o f the Defense Venture
Catalyst Initiative," devenci.dtic.mil.
44. Ratliff, "Fear, Inc."
45. Jason Vest, "Inheriting a Shambles at Defense" Texas Observer

(Austin), D e c e m b e r 1,

2 0 0 6 ; Ratliff, "Fear, Inc."; Paladin Capital Group, "Lt. G e n e r a l (Ret) U S A F Kenneth
A. Minihan," Paladin Team, D e c e m b e r 2, 2 0 0 3 ,
46. Office o f Homeland Security, National

www.paladincapgroup.com.

Strategy for Homeland

page 1, www.whitehouse.gov; Ron Suskind, The One Percent
America's

Pursuit of Its Enemies

Since

Security,
Doctrine:

July 2 0 0 2 ,
Deep

"Terror Fight Spawns Startups," Red Herring,

D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 5 .

47. United States House o f Representatives, C o m m i t t e e on G o v e r n m e n t
Minority Staff, Special Investigations Division, Dollars,
Contracting

Inside

9/11 (New York: S i m o n & Schuster, 2 0 0 6 ) ;

Under the Bush Administration,

Not

Sense:

ReformGovernment

Prepared for Rep. Henry A. W a x m a n ,

June 2 0 0 6 , page 5, www.democrats.reform.house.gov; T i m Shorrock, " T h e Corporate
Takeover o f U . S . Intelligence," Salon,

June

1, 2 0 0 7 , www.salon.com;

M o n a h a n and E l e n a Herrero B e a u m o n t , "Big T i m e Security," Forbes,
Central Intelligence Agency, World Fact Book

2007,

Rachel

August 3, 2 0 0 6 ;

www.cia.gov; " U S G o v e r n m e n t

Spending in States Up 6 Pet in F Y ' 0 3 , " Reuters, O c t o b e r 7, 2 0 0 4 ; Frank R i c h , " T h e
Road from K Street to Yusufiya," New York Times,

June 2 5 , 2 0 0 6 .

48. M o n a h a n and Herrero Beaumont, "Big T i m e Security"; Ratliff, "Fear, Inc."
49. T h e figure comes from Roger Cressey, a former Bush counterterrorism official now
President o f G o o d Harbor Consulting. Rob Evans and Alexi Mostrous, "Britain's
Surveillance Future," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , November

2, 2 0 0 6 ; Mark Johnson,

"Video, Sound Advances Aimed at War on Terror," Associated Press, August 2, 2 0 0 6 ;
Ellen McCarthy, "8 Firms V i e for Pieces o f Air Force Contract," Washington

Post,

September 14, 2 0 0 4 .
50. Brian Bergstein, "Attacks Spawned a Tech-Security Market T h a t Remains Young Yet
Rich," Associated Press, September 4 , 2 0 0 6 .
51. Mure Dickie, "Yahoo Backed on Helping C h i n a T r a c e Writer," Financial
(London), November

Times

10, 2 0 0 5 ; Leslie Cauley, " N S A Has Massive Database o f

Americans' Phone Calls," USA Today,

May 1 1 , 2 0 0 6 ; "Boeing T e a m Awarded S B I n e t

506

N O T E S TO P A G E S 303 TO 310

Contract by Department o f Homeland Security," press release, September 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 ,
www.boeing.com.
52. Robert O'Harrow Jr., No Place

to Hide (New York: Free Press, 2 0 0 5 ) .

53. "Terror Fight Spawns Startups."
54. Justine Rood, " F B I Terror Watch List ' O u t o f Control'," The Blotter

blog on ABC

News, J u n e 13, 2 0 0 7 , www.abcnews.com; E d Pilkington, "Millions Assigned Terror
Risk S c o r e on Trips to the U S , " Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , D e c e m b e r 2, 2 0 0 6 .

55. Rick Anderson, "Flog Is M y Co-Pilot," Seattle

Weekly,

Mayer, " T h e C.I.A.'s Travel Agent," The New Yorker,

November 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 ; Jane
O c t o b e r 30, 2 0 0 6 ; Brian

Knowlton, "Report Rejects European Denial of C I A Prisons," New York

Times,

November 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 ; Mayer, " T h e C.I.A.'s Travel Agent"; Stephen Grey, Ghost

Plane:

The

True Story of the CIA Torture Program

(New York: St. Martin's Press, 2 0 0 6 ) , 8 0 ;

Pat Milton, " A C L U File: Suit Against Boeing Subsidiary, Saying It Enabled Secret
Overseas Torture," Associated Press, M a y 3 1 , 2 0 0 7 .
56. Andrew B u n c o m b e , "New Maximum-Security Jail to O p e n at G u a n t â n a m o Bay," In­
dependent

( L o n d o n ) , July 30, 2 0 0 6 ; Pratap Chatterjee, "Intelligence in Iraq: L-3

Supplies Spy Support," CorpWatch,

August 9, 2 0 0 6 , www.corpwatch.com.

57. M i c h e l l e Faul, "Guantânamo Prisoners for Sale," Associated Press, May 3 1 , 2005; John
Simpson, "No Surprises in the War on Terror," BBC News, February 13, 2006; John
Mintz, "Detainees Say T h e y Were Charity Workers," Washington

Post, May 2 6 , 2002.

58. T h e prisoner in question was Adel Fattough Ali Algazzar. Dave Gilson, " W h y Am I
in C u b a ? " Mother
War

Jones,

September—October 2 0 0 6 ; Simpson, "No Surprises in the

on Terror"; Andrew O . Selsky, "AP: S o m e G i t m o Detainees Freed Elsewhere,"

USA Today,

D e c e m b e r 15, 2 0 0 6 .

59. Gary Stoller, " H o m e l a n d Security Generates Multibillion Dollar Business," USA
Today,

S e p t e m b e r 10, 2 0 0 6 .

60. Sarah Anderson, J o h n Cavanagh, C h u c k Collins and E r i c Benjamin, "Executive
Excess 2 0 0 6 : Defense and Oil Executives Cash in on Conflict," August 30, 2 0 0 6 , page
1, www.faireconomy.org.
6 1 . R a t l i f f , " F e a r , Inc."
62. O'Harrow, No Place

to Hide,

9.

15. A Corporatist State: Removing the Revolving Door, Putting in an Archway
1. J i m Krane, "Former President Bush Battles Arab Critics o f His Son," Associated Press,
November 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 .
2.

Scott S h a n e and R o n Nixon, "In Washington, Contractors Take on Biggest Role
Ever," New York Times,

3.
4.

February 4 , 2 0 0 7 .

Jane Mayer, "Contract Sport," The New Yorker, February 16, 2 0 0 4 .
" H R 5 1 2 2 : John Warner National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2 0 0 7
(Enrolled as Agreed to or Passed by Both House and Senate)," thomas.loc.gov.

5.

"Remarks of S e n . Patrick Leahy on National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal
Year 2 0 0 7 , C o n f e r e n c e

Report, Congressional

Record," States News Service,

September 29, 2006.
6.
7.

G i l e a d S c i e n c e s , "Stock Information: Historical Price Lookup," www.gilead.com.
Interview with Stephen Kinzer, Democracy

Now! April 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 , www.democracy

now.org.
8.

T h e phrase "interrelated and mutually reinforcing" c o m e s from the historian James

N O T E S TO P A G E S 311 TO 317

A. Bill. Stephen Kinzer, Overthrow: Americas

Century of Regime

Change

from

507

Hawaii

to Iraq (New York: T i m e s Books, 2 0 0 6 ) , 122.
9.

Robert Burns, "Defense C h i e f Shuns Involvement in Weapons and Merger Decisions
to Avoid Conflict o f Interest," Associated Press, August 2 3 , 2 0 0 1 ; Matt Kelley,
"Defense Secretary Sold Up to $91 Million in Assets to C o m p l y with Ethics Rules,
Complains about Disclosure Form," Associated Press, June 18, 2 0 0 2 ; Pauline Jelinek,
"Rumsfeld Asks for Deadline Extension," Associated Press, July 17, 2 0 0 1 .

10. John Stanton, "Big Stakes in Tamiflu Debate," Roll Call,

D e c e m b e r 15, 2 0 0 5 .

11. Rumsfeld's 2 0 0 5 disclosure report shows that he holds "shares worth up to $ 9 5 . 9 m ,
from which he got an i n c o m e o f up to $ 1 3 m , owned land worth up to $ 1 7 m , and
made $ l m from renting it out." Geoffrey L e a n and Jonathan O w e n ,
Rumsfeld Makes $ 5 m Killing on Bird F l u Drug," Independent

"Donald

( L o n d o n ) , M a r c h 12,

2 0 0 6 ; Kelley, "Defense Secretary Sold up to $91 Million in Assets . . ."
12. Burns, "Defense C h i e f Shuns I n v o l v e m e n t . . ."
13. Stanton, "Big Stakes in Tamiflu Debate."
H . N e l s o n D . Schwartz, "Rumsfeld's Growing Stake in Tamiflu," Fortune,

October 31,

2005.
15. Gilead Sciences, "Stock Information: Historical Price Lookup," www.gilead.com.
16. Cassell Bryan-Low, " C h e n e y Cashed in Halliburton Options Worth $ 3 5 Million,"
Wall Street Journal,

September 2 0 , 2 0 0 0 .

17. Ken Herman, "Cheneys Earn $ 8 . 8 Million to Bushes' $ 7 3 5 , 0 0 0 , " Austin
Statesman,

American-

April 15, 2 0 0 6 ; Halliburton, Investor Relations, "Historical Price Lookup,"

www.halliburton.com.
18. Sarah Karush, " O n c e Privileged in Iraq, Russian O i l C o m p a n i e s Hope to C o m p e t e
on Equal Footing After Saddam," Associated Press, M a r c h 14, 2 0 0 3 ; Saeed S h a h , "Oil
Giants S c r a m b l e for Iraqi Riches," Independent
19. "Waiting for the G r e e n Light," Petroleum

( L o n d o n ) , M a r c h 14, 2 0 0 3 .

Economist,

O c t o b e r 1, 2 0 0 6 .

20. Lean and Owen, "Donald Rumsfeld Makes $ 5 m Killing on Bird F l u Drug."
21. Jonathan Weisman, "Embattled Rep. Ney Won't Seek Reelection," Washington

Post,

August 8, 2 0 0 6 ; Sonya Geis and Charles R. B a b c o c k , "Former G O P Lawmaker Gets
8 Years," Washington

Post, M a r c h 4 , 2 0 0 6 ; Judy B a c h r a c h , "Washington Babylon,"

Vanity Fair, August 1, 2 0 0 6 .
22. E r i c Lipton, "Former Antiterror Officials F i n d Industry Pays Better," New York

Times,

June 18, 2 0 0 6 .
23. E l l e n Nakashima, "Ashcroft Finds Private-Sector Niche," Washington

Post, August

12, 2 0 0 6 ; Lipton, "Former Antiterror Officials F i n d Industry Pays Better"; G o o d
Harbor Consulting, L L C , www.goodharbor.net; Paladin Capital Group, " R . James
Woolsey—VP," Paladin T e a m , www.paladincapgroup.com;

Booz Allen Hamilton,

"R James Woolsey," www.boozallen.com; Douglas Jehl, "Insiders' New F i r m Consults
on Iraq," New York Times,

September 3 0 , 2 0 0 3 ; "Former F E M A Head to Start

Consulting Business on E m e r g e n c y Planning," Associated Press, November 2 4 , 2 0 0 5 .
24. "Former F E M A Head Discussed Wardrobe during Katrina Crisis," Associated Press,
November 3, 2 0 0 5 .
25. Seymour M . Hersh, " T h e Spoils o f the G u l f War," New Yorker, S e p t e m b e r 6, 1 9 9 3 .
26. Michael Isikoff and Mark Hosenball, "A Legal Counterattack," Newsweek,

April 16,

2 0 0 3 ; John C o u n c i l , "Baker Botts' 'Love S h a c k ' for Clients," Texas Lawyer,

M a r c h 6,

2 0 0 6 ; Erin E . Arvedlund, "Russian O i l Politics in a Texas Court," New York
February 15, 2 0 0 5 ; Robert Bryce, "It's a Baker Botts World," The Nation,
2004.

Times,

October 11,

508

N O T E S TO P A G E S 317 TO 327

27. Peter Smith and James Politi, "Record Pay-Outs from Carlyle and K K R , "

Financial

Times ( L o n d o n ) , O c t o b e r 2 0 , 2 0 0 4 .
28. "Cutting James Baker's Ties," New York Times,

D e c e m b e r 12, 2 0 0 3 .

29. T h e information in the next two paragraphs is drawn from Naomi Klein, "James
Baker's D o u b l e Life: A Special Investigation," The Nation,

posted online October 12,

2 0 0 4 , www.thenation.com.
30. David Leigh, "Carlyle Pulls O u t of Iraq D e b t Recovery Consortium,"

Guardian

(London), October 15, 2 0 0 4 ; United Nations Compensation Commission, "Payment of
Compensation," press releases, 2 0 0 5 - 2 0 0 6 , www.unog.ch; Klein, "James Baker's Double
Life"; World Bank, "Data Sheet for Iraq," October 2 3 , 2 0 0 6 , www.worldbank.org.
31. E r i c Schmitt, "New G r o u p W i l l Lobby for C h a n g e in Iraqi Rule," New York
N o v e m b e r 15, 2 0 0 2 ; George P. Shultz, "Act Now," Washington

Times,

Post, September 6,

2 0 0 2 ; Harry Esteve, "Ex-Secretary Stumps for Gubernatorial Hopeful,"

Oregonian

(Portland), February 12, 2 0 0 2 ; David R. Baker, " B e c h t e l Pulling O u t after 3 Rough
Years o f Rebuilding Work," San Francisco

Chronicle,

November 1, 2 0 0 6 .

32. T i m Weiner, " L o c k h e e d and the Future o f Warfare," New York Times,

November 2 8 ,

2 0 0 4 ; Schmitt, "New G r o u p Will Lobby for C h a n g e in Iraqi Rule"; John Laughland,
"The

Prague Racket," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , November 2 2 , 2 0 0 2 ; John B . Judis,

"Minister without Portfolio," The American

Prospect,

M a y 2 0 0 3 ; Lockheed Martin,

Investor Relations, "Stock Price Details," www.lockheedmartin.com.
33. B o b Woodward, State of Denial

(New York: S i m o n & Schuster, 2 0 0 6 ) , 4 0 6 - 4 0 7 .

34. James D a o , "Making a Return to the Political Stage," New York Times, November 2 8 ,
2 0 0 2 ; Leslie H. G e l b , "Kissinger M e a n s Business," New York Times,
Jeff Gerth, "Ethics Disclosure Filed with Panel," New York Times,
35. James Harding, "Kissinger S e c o n d Take," Financial

Times

April 2 0 , 1986;

M a r c h 9, 1989.

(London), D e c e m b e r 14,

2002.
36. Seymour M . Hersh, " L u n c h with the Chairman," The New Yorker, M a r c h 17, 2 0 0 3 .
37. Ibid.; T h o m a s Donnelly and Richard Perle, "Gas Stations in the Sky," Wall
Journal,

Street

August 14, 2 0 0 3 . F O O T N O T E : R. Jeffrey Smith, "Tanker Inquiry Finds

Rumsfeld's Attention Was Elsewhere," Washington

Post,

C a p a c c i o , "Boeing Proposes Bonds for 7 6 7 Lease Deal," Seattle

June 2 0 , 2 0 0 6 ; Tony
Times, March 4 , 2 0 0 3 .

38. Hersh, " L u n c h with the C h a i r m a n " ; T o m Hamburger and D e n n i s B e r m a n , " U . S .
Adviser Perle Resigns as Head o f Defense Board," Wall

Street

Journal,

March

28, 2 0 0 3 .
39. Interview with Richard Perle, C N N : Late Edition

with Wolf Blitzer,

M a r c h 9, 2 0 0 3 .

4 0 . Judis, "Minister without Portfolio"; David S. Hilzenrath, "Richard N. Perle's Many
Business Ventures Followed His Years as a Defense Official," Washington

Post, May

24, 2 0 0 4 ; Hersh, " L u n c h with the C h a i r m a n " ; T . Christian Miller, Blood
Wasted

Billions,

Lost Lives and Corporate

Greed

Money:

in Iraq (New York: Little, Brown and

Company, 2 0 0 6 ) , 7 3 .

16. Erasing Iraq: In Search of a "Model" for the Middle East
1. Andrew M . Wyllie, "Convulsion Therapy o f the Psychoses," Journal
Science

of

Mental

8 6 ( M a r c h 1940): 2 4 8 .

2.

Richard C o h e n , " T h e Lingo o f Vietnam," Washington

3.

"Deputy Secretary Wolfowitz Interview with S a m Tannenhaus, Vanity Fair," News
Transcript, M a y 9, 2 0 0 3 , www.defenselink.mil.

Post, November 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 .

N O T E S TO P A G E S 328 TO 336

4.

F O O T N O T E : 2007

index

of

Economic

Foundation and The Wall Street Journal,
5.

Freedom

(Washington, D C :

509

Heritage

2 0 0 7 ) , 3 2 6 , wvvw.heritage.org.

T h o m a s L. Friedman, " T h e L o n g B o m b , " New York Times,

M a r c h 2, 2 0 0 3 ; Joshua

Muravchik, "Democracy's Q u i e t Victory," New York Times,

August 19, 2 0 0 2 ; Robert

Dreyfuss, "Just the Beginning," American

Prospect,

Norris, Collision

and Kosovo

Course:

N A T O , Russia,

April 1, 2 0 0 3 . F O O T N O T E : John
(Westport, C T : Praeger, 2 0 0 5 ) ,

xxii-xxiii.
6.

George W . Bush, "President Discusses Education, Entrepreneurship & H o m e Own­
ership at Indiana Black Expo," Indianapolis, Indiana, July 14, 2 0 0 5 .

7.

Edwin C h e n and Maura Reynolds, "Bush Seeks U.S.-Mideast Trade Z o n e to Bring

8.

Harlan Ullman, " ' S h o c k and Awe' Misunderstood," USA Today, April 8, 2 0 0 3 .

9.

Peter Johnson, "Media's War Footing Looks Solid," USA Today,

Peace, Prosperity to Region," Los Angeles

Times,

M a y 10, 2 0 0 3 .
February 17, 2 0 0 3 .

10. T h o m a s L. Friedman, "What Were T h e y T h i n k i n g ? " New York Times,

O c t o b e r 7,

2005.
11. United States Department o f State, " M e m o r a n d a o f Conversation," J u n e 10, 1 9 7 6 ,
declassified, www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.
12. George W. Bush, speech made at 2 0 0 5 Inauguration, January 2 0 , 2 0 0 5 .
B . N o r m a n Friedman, Desert

Victory:

The War for Kuwait

(Annapolis, M D : Naval

Institute Press, 1 9 9 1 ) , 185; M i c h a e l R. Gordon and Bernard E . Trainor, Cobra
Inside

Story of the Invasion

and Occupation

of Iraq

II: The

(New York: Pantheon Books,

2006), 551.
H . A n t h o n y Shadid, Night Draws

Near: Iraq's

People

in the Shadow

of America's

War

(New York: Henry Holt, 2 0 0 5 ) , galley, 9 5 . Q u o t e d with the author's permission.
15. Harlan K. Ullman and James P. Wade, Shock

and Awe: Achieving

Rapid

Dominance

(Washington, D C : N D U Press Book, 1996), 55; Ron Suskind, The One Percent
Deep

Inside

America's

Pursuit

of Its Enemies

Since

9/11

Doctrine:

(New York: S i m o n &

Schuster, 2 0 0 6 ) , 1 2 3 , 2 1 4 .
16. Ullman and Wade, Shock

and Awe, xxv, 17, 2 3 , 2 9 .

17. M a h e r Arar, ' " I Am Not a Terrorist—I Am Not a M e m b e r o f Al-Qaida,'"
Sun,

Vancouver

November 5, 2 0 0 3 .

18. "Iraq Faces Massive U . S . Missile Barrage," C B S News, January 2 4 , 2 0 0 3 .
19. " U . S . Tests Massive B o m b , " CNN:

Wolf Blitzer

Reports,

March 11, 2003.

20. Ibid.
21. Rajiv Chandrasekaran
Washington

and

Peter B a k e r , "Allies Struggle for Supply L i n e s , "

Post, M a r c h 3 0 , 2 0 0 3 ; Jon L e e Anderson, The Fall of Baghdad

York: Penguin Press, 2 0 0 4 ) , 199; Gordon and Trainor, Cobra
Charles Duelfer, Comprehensive
WMD,

Report

of the Special

(New

II, 4 6 5 . F O O T N O T E :

Advisor

to the DCI on

Iraq's

vol. 1, September 3 0 , 2 0 0 4 , 11, www.cia.gov.

22. Shadid, Night Draws Near, 7 1 .
23. Suzanne Goldenberg, "War in the Gulf: In an Instant W e Were Plunged into Endless
Night," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , April 4 , 2 0 0 3 .

24. "Restoring a Treasured Past," Los Angeles

Times, April 17, 2 0 0 3 .

25. Charles J . Hanley, "Looters Ransack Iraq's National Library," Associated Press, April
15,2003.
26. M i c h a e l D . L e m o n i c k , "Lost to the Ages," Time,
E n d of Civilization," Salon,

April 2 8 , 2 0 0 3 ; Louise Witt, " T h e

April 17, 2 0 0 3 , www.salon.com.

27. T h o m a s E . Ricks and Anthony Shadid, "A Tale o f Two Baghdads," Washington
June 2, 2 0 0 3 .

Post,

510

N O T E S TO P A G E S 337 TO 345

28. Frank R i c h , "And Now: 'Operation Iraqi Looting,"' New York Times, April 27, 2 0 0 3 .
29. Donald H. Rumsfeld, " D o D News Briefing—Secretary Rumsfeld and G e n . Myers,"
April 1 1 , 2 0 0 3 , www.defenselink.mil;

S i m o n Robinson, "Grounding

Planes the

W r o n g Way," Time, July 14, 2 0 0 3 .
30. Rajiv Chandrasekaran, Imperial

Life

in the Emerald

City: Inside

Iraq's

Green

Zone

(New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2 0 0 6 ) , 1 1 9 - 2 0 .
31. Ibid., 1 6 5 - 6 6 .
32. World Bank, World Development

Report

1990 (Oxford: World Bank, 1990), 1 7 8 - 7 9 ;

New M e x i c o Coalition for Literacy, New M e x i c o Literacy Profile, 2 0 0 5 - 2 0 0 6
Programs, www.nmcl.org. F O O T N O T E : Chandrasekaran, Imperial

Life in the

Emerald

City, 5.
33. Shafiq Rasul, Asif Iqbal and R h u h e l Ahmed, Composite
Afghanistan

and Guantânamo

Statement:

Detention

in

Bay (New York: C e n t e r for Constitutional Rights, July

26, 2 0 0 4 ) , 9 6 , 9 9 , www.ccr-ny.org.
34. Ibid., 9, 1 0 , 2 1 , 2 6 , 7 2 .
35. John F. Burns, "Looking Beyond His Critics, B r e m e r Sees Reason for Both Hope and
Caution," New York Times,

J u n e 2 9 , 2 0 0 4 ; Steve Kirby, " B r e m e r Says Iraq Open for

Business," Agence France-Presse, M a y 2 5 , 2 0 0 3 .
36. T h o m a s B . Edsall and Juliet Eilperin, "Lobbyists Set Sights on Money-Making
Opportunities in Iraq," Washington

Post, O c t o b e r 2, 2 0 0 3 .

17. Ideological Blowback: A Very Capitalist Disaster
1. According to Jeffrey Goldberg, R i c e made the c o m m e n t at a dinner in a Georgetown
restaurant. He writes, " T h e remark stunned the other guests. [Brent] Scowcroft, as
he later told friends, was flummoxed by Rice's 'evangelical tone.' " Jeffrey Goldberg,
"Breaking Ranks," The New Yorker, O c t o b e r 3 1 , 2 0 0 5 .
2.

Fareed Zakaria, " W h a t Bush G o t Right," Newsweek,

3.

Phillip Kurata, "Eastern Europeans Urge Iraq to Adopt Rapid Market Reforms,"

M a r c h 14, 2 0 0 5 .

Washington F i l e , Bureau o f International Information Programs, U.S. Department o f
State, S e p t e m b e r 2 6 , 2 0 0 3 , usinfo.state.gov; "Iraq Poll Finds Poverty M a i n Worry,
Sadr Popular," Reuters, M a y 2 0 , 2 0 0 4 .
4.

Joseph Stiglitz, " S h o c k without the Therapy," Business

Day (Johannesburg), February

20, 2 0 0 4 ; Jim Krane, " U . S . Aims to Keep Iraq Military Control," Associated Press,
M a r c h 13, 2 0 0 4 .
5.

Interview with Richard Perle, CNN:

Anderson

Cooper

2 0 0 6 ; Interview with David Frum, C N N : Late Edition

3 6 0 Degrees,

November 6,

with Wolf Blitzer,

November

19, 2 0 0 6 .
6.

L. Paul B r e m e r III, M y Year in Iraq: The Struggle

to Build

a Future

of Hope

(New

York: S i m o n & Schuster, 2 0 0 6 ) , 2 1 .
7.

Interview with Paul B r e m e r , PBS: The Charlie

8.

Noëlle Knox, "Companies Rush to A c c o u n t for Staff," USA Today,
2001;

Rose Show, January 11, 2 0 0 6 .

Recover, Even Benefit Post-September 11," Barron's,
9.

September 13,

Harlan S. Byrne, "Disaster Relief: Insurance Brokers A O N , Marsh Look to
November 19, 2 0 0 1 .

G e n e r a l Garner's plan for Iraq was straightforward enough: fix the infrastructure, hold
quick and dirty elections, leave the shock therapy to the International Monetary Fund
and concentrate on securing U . S . military bases on the model o f the Philippines. "I
think we should look right now at Iraq as our coaling station in the Middle East," he

N O T E S TO P A G E S 345 TO 349

511

told the B B C . Interview with General Jay Garner, conducted by G r e g Palast, "Iraq for
Sale," B B C T V , M a r c h 19, 2 0 0 4 , www.gregpalast.com; T h o m a s Crampton, "Iraq
Official Warns on Fast E c o n o m i c Shift," International

Herald

Tribune

(Paris),

October 14, 2 0 0 3 ; Rajiv Chandrasekaran, "Attacks Force Retreat from Wide-Ranging
Plans for Iraq," Washington

Post, D e c e m b e r 2 8 , 2 0 0 3 .

10. "Let's All G o to the Yard Sale," The Economist,
11. Coalition Provisional Authority, Order Number

September 2 7 , 2 0 0 3 .
3 7 Tax Strategy for 2003,

September 19,

2 0 0 3 , www.iraqcoalition.org; Coalition Provisional Authority, Order Number
Investment,

39 Foreign

D e c e m b e r 2 0 , 2 0 0 3 , www.iraqcoalition.org; Dana Milbank and Walter

Pincus, " U . S . Administrator Imposes Flat Tax System on Iraq," Washington

Post,

November 2, 2 0 0 3 ; Rajiv Chandrasekaran, " U . S . Funds for Iraq Are Largely Unspent,"
Washington

Post, July 4 , 2004. F O O T N O T E : Mark Gregory, "Baghdad's 'Missing

Billions,'" BBC News, November 9, 2 0 0 6 ; David Pallister, "How the U S S e n t $ 1 2 b n in
Cash to Iraq. And Watched It Vanish," Guardian

(London), February 8, 2 0 0 7 .

12. Central Bank o f Iraq and the Coalition Provisional Authority, "Saddam-Free D i n a r
B e c o m e s Iraq's Official Currency," January 15, 2 0 0 4 , www.cpa-iraq.org; " H a l f o f
Iraqis Lack Drinking Water—Minister," Agence France-Presse, November 4 , 2 0 0 3 ;
Charles Clover and Peter Spiegel, "Petrol Q u e u e s Block Baghdad as Black Market
Drains Off," Financial
13. D o n a l d

H.

Times ( L o n d o n ) , D e c e m b e r 9, 2 0 0 3 .

Rumsfeld,

"Prepared

Statement

for

the

Senate

Appropriations

Committee," Washington, D C , September 2 4 , 2 0 0 3 , www.defenselink.mil; Borzou
Daragahi, "Iraq's Ailing Banking Industry Is Slowly Reviving," New York

Times,

D e c e m b e r 3 0 , 2 0 0 4 ; Laura M a c l n n i s , "Citigroup, U . S . to Propose Backing Iraqi
Imports," Reuters, February 17, 2 0 0 4 ; Justin B l u m , "Big O i l C o m p a n i e s Train Iraqi
Workers Free," Washington

Post, November 6, 2 0 0 4 .

14. Congressional Budget Office, Paying for Iraq's Reconstruction:

An Update,

December

2 0 0 6 , page 15, www.cbo.gov; Chandrasekaran, " U . S . Funds for Iraq Are Largely
Unspent."
15. George W . Bush, "President Bush Addresses United Nations G e n e r a l Assembly," New
York City, September 2 3 , 2 0 0 3 ; George W . Bush, "President Addresses the Nation,"
September 7, 2 0 0 3 .
16. James G l a n z , " V i o l e n c e in Iraq Curbs Work o f 2 Big Contractors," New York

Times,

April 2 2 , 2 0 0 4 .
17. Rajiv Chandrasekaran, "Best-Connected Were S e n t to Rebuild Iraq,"

Washington

Post, September 17, 2 0 0 6 ; Holly Yeager, "Halliburton's Iraq Army Contract to End,"
Financial

Times ( L o n d o n ) , July 13, 2 0 0 6 .

18. Office o f Inspector General, U S A I D , Audit
Program,

of

USAID/Iraq's

Economic

Reform

Audit Report N u m b e r E - 2 6 6 - 0 4 - 0 0 4 - P , September 2 0 , 2 0 0 4 , pages 5 - 6 ,

www.usaid.gov; U S A I D , "Award/Contract," R A N - C - 0 0 - 0 3 - 0 0 0 4 3 - 0 0 , www.usaid.gov;
Mark Brunswick, "Opening o f Schools to Test Iraqis' Confidence," Star

Tribune

(Minneapolis), September 17, 2 0 0 6 . F O O T N O T E : James Rupert, "Schools a Bright
Spot in Iraq," Seattle

Times, June 3 0 , 2 0 0 4 .

19. Ron Wyden, "Dorgan, Wyden, W a x m a n , Dingell C a l l to E n d Outsourcing o f
Oversight for Iraq Reconstruction," press release, M a y 5, 2 0 0 4 , wyden.senate.gov;
"Carolinas Companies F i n d Profits in Iraq," Associated Press, M a y 2, 2 0 0 4 ; James
Mayfield, "Understanding Islam and T e r r o r i s m — 9 / 1 1 , " August 6, 2 0 0 2 , was at
www.texashoustonmission.org, accessed January 7, 2 0 0 5 ; Sis Mayfield, "Letters from
President Mayfield," February 2 7 , 2 0 0 4 , was at
accessed January 7, 2 0 0 5 .

www.texashoustonmission.org,

512

N O T E S TO P A G E S 349 TO 358

20. Rajiv Chandrasekaran, "Defense Skirts State in Reviving Iraqi Industry,"

Washington

Post, M a y 14, 2 0 0 7 .
21. T h i s a c c o u n t o f Gaidar's c o m m e n t s comes from Mark Masarskii, an adviser on entrepreneurship to the Moscow government. J i m Krane, "Iraq's Fast Track to Capitalism
Scares Baghdad's Businessmen," T h e Associated Press, D e c e m b e r 3, 2 0 0 3 ; Lynn D .
Nelson and Irina Y. Kuzes, "Privatization and the New Business Class," in Russia
Transition:

Politics,

Privatization,

and Inequality,

in

ed. David L a n e (London: Longman,

1 9 9 5 ) , 129. F O O T N O T E : Kevin Begos, " G o o d Intentions M e e t Harsh Reality,"
Winston-Salem

Journal,

D e c e m b e r 19, 2 0 0 4 .

22. D a h r Jamail and Ali al-Fadhily, " U . S . Resorting to 'Collective Punishment,'" Inter
Press Service, September 18, 2 0 0 6 .
23. Gilbert B u r n h a m et al., "Mortality after the 2 0 0 3 Invasion o f Iraq: A Cross-Sectional
Cluster S a m p l e Survey," Lancet

3 6 8 ( O c t o b e r 12, 2 0 0 6 ) : 1 4 2 1 - 2 8 .

24. Ralph Peters, "Last Gasps in Iraq," U S A Today,
25. Oxford Research International, National

November 2, 2 0 0 6 .

Survey of Iraq,

February 2 0 0 4 , page 2 0 ,

news.bbc.co.uk; D o n a l d Maclntyre, "Sistani Most Popular Iraqi Leader, U S Pollsters
Find," Independent

( L o n d o n ) , August 3 1 , 2 0 0 4 .

26. B r e m e r , M y Year in Iraq, 7 1 .
27. " T h e Lost Year in Iraq," P B S Frontline,

O c t o b e r 17, 2 0 0 6 .

28. Patrick G r a h a m , "Beyond Fallujah: A Year with the Iraqi Resistance," Harper's,

June

1,2004.
29. Rajiv Chandrasekaran, Imperial

Life

in the Emerald

City: Inside

Iraq's

Green

Zone

(New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 2 0 0 6 ) , 1 1 8 .
30. Alan Wolfe, "Why Conservatives Can't Govern," Washington

Monthly, July/August 2006.

31. Ariana E u n j u n g C h a , "In Iraq, the Job Opportunity o f a Lifetime," Washington
May

Post,

23, 2004.

32. Chandrasekaran, Imperial

Life in the Emerald

City, 2 1 4 - 1 8 ; T . Christian Miller, "U.S.

Priorities Set Back Its Healthcare Goals in Iraq," Los Angeles Times, October 30, 2 0 0 5 .
33. J i m Krane, "Iraqi Businessmen Now F a c e Competition," Associated Press, D e c e m b e r
3, 2 0 0 3 .
34. Chandrasekaran, Imperial

Life in the Emerald

City, 2 8 8 .

35. "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2 0 0 7 , " Congressional
Senate,

Record-

June 14, 2 0 0 6 , page S 5 8 5 5 .

36. Griff Witte, "Despite Billions Spent, Rebuilding Incomplete," Washington

Post,

November 12, 2 0 0 6 ; D a n Murphy, " Q u i c k S c h o o l Fixes Won Few Iraqi Hearts,"
Christian

Science

Monitor,

June 28, 2004.

37. Griff Witte, "Contractors Rarely Held Responsible for Misdeeds in Iraq,"

Washington

Post, November 4 , 2 0 0 6 ; T . Christian Miller, "Contractor's Plans Lie Among Ruins
of Iraq," Los Angeles

Times,

April 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 ; James G l a n z , "Inspectors Find Rebuilt

Projects C r u m b l i n g in Iraq," New York Times, April 2 9 , 2 0 0 7 ; James G l a n z , "Billions
in Oil Missing in Iraq, U . S . Study Says," New York Times,

M a y 12, 2 0 0 7 .

38. E-mail interview with Kristine Belisle, deputy assistant inspector general

for

Congressional and Public Affairs, special inspector general for Iraq reconstruction,
D e c e m b e r 15, 2 0 0 6 .
39. G r i f f W i t t e , "Invoices D e t a i l Fairfax Firm's B i l l i n g for Iraq Work,"

Washington

Post, M a y 1 1 , 2 0 0 5 ; C h a r l e s R. B a b c o c k , " C o n t r a c t o r Bilked U . S . on Iraq Work,
Federal Jury Rules," Washington

Post, M a r c h 10, 2 0 0 6 ; Erik E c k h o l m , "Lawsuit

Accuses a C o n t r a c t o r o f Defrauding U . S . Over Work in Iraq," New York
October 9, 2004.

Times,

N O T E S TO P A G E S 358 TO 367

40. Renae M e r l e , "Verdict against Iraq Contractor Overturned," Washington

513

Post, August

19, 2 0 0 6 ; Erik E c k h o l m , " O n T e c h n i c a l Grounds, Judge Sets Aside Verdict o f Billing
Fraud in Iraq Rebuilding," New York Times, August 19, 2 0 0 6 .
4 1 . Dahr Jamail and Ali al-Fadhily, "Bechtel Departure Removes More Illusions," Inter Press
Service, November 9, 2 0 0 6 ; Witte, "Despite Billions Spent, Rebuilding Incomplete."
42. Anthony Shadid, Night Draws

Near: Iraq's

People

in the Shadow

of America's

War

(New York: Henry Holt, 2 0 0 5 ) , 173, 175.

18. Full Circle: From Blank Slate to Scorched Earth
1. Bertolt Brecht, " T h e Solution," Poems,

1913-1956,

ed. John Willett and Ralph

M a n h e i m ( 1 9 7 6 , repr. New York: M e t h u e n , 1 9 7 9 ) , 4 4 0 .
2.

Sylvia Pfeifer, " W h e r e Majors Fear to Tread," Sunday Telegraph

( L o n d o n ) , January 7,

2007.
3.

L. Paul B r e m e r III, "New Risks in International Business," Viewpoint,

November 2,

2 0 0 1 , was at www.mmc.com, accessed M a y 2 6 , 2 0 0 3 .
4.

Maxine

McKew,

"Confessions

of

an

American

Hawk,"

The

Diplomat,

October-November 2005.
5.

L. Paul B r e m e r III, My Year in Iraq: The Struggle

to Build

a Future

of Hope

(New

York: S i m o n & Schuster, 2 0 0 6 ) , 9 3 .
6.

Interview with Paul B r e m e r conducted June 2 6 , 2 0 0 6 , and August 18, 2 0 0 6 , for " T h e
Lost Year in Iraq," P B S Frontline,

7.

O c t o b e r 17, 2 0 0 6 .

William Booth and Rajiv Chandrasekaran, "Occupation Forces Halting Elections
Throughout Iraq," Washington
E . Trainor, Cobra

Post, June 2 8 , 2 0 0 3 ; M i c h a e l R. Gordon and Bernard

IT. The Inside

Story of the Invasion

and the Occupation

of

Iraq

(New York: Pantheon Books, 2 0 0 6 ) , 4 9 0 ; W i l l i a m Booth, "In Najaf, New Mayor Is
Outsider Viewed with Suspicion," Washington
8.

Post, M a y 14, 2 0 0 3 .

Ariana Eunjung C h a , "Hope and Confusion
Washington

Mark Iraq's D e m o c r a c y Lessons,"

Post, November 2 4 , 2 0 0 3 ; Booth and Chandrasekaran,

"Occupation

Forces Halting Elections Throughout Iraq."
9.

Christopher Foote, W i l l i a m Block, Keith C r a n e , and S i m o n Gray, Economic
and

Prospects

in Iraq,

Policy

Public Policy Discussion Papers, no. 0 4 - 1 (Boston: Federal

Reserve Bank of Boston, May 4 , 2 0 0 4 ) , 37, www.bosfed.org.
10. Salim L o n e , "Iraq: T h i s Election Is a S h a m , " International

Herald

Tribune

(Paris),

January 2 8 , 2 0 0 5 .
11. "Al-Sistani's Representatives T h r e a t e n
Monitoring

International

Reports,

Demonstrations,

Clashes in Iraq," B B C

report by Lebanese Hezbollah T V Al-Manar,

January 16, 2 0 0 4 ; Nadia Abou El-Magd, " U . S . C o m m a n d e r Urges Saddam Holdouts
to Surrender," Associated Press, January 16, 2 0 0 4 .
12. M i c h a e l Moss, "Iraq's Legal System Staggers B e n e a t h the Weight o f War," New York
Times,

D e c e m b e r 17, 2 0 0 6 .

13. Gordon and Trainor, Cobra

II, 4 , 555; Julian Borger, "Knives C o m e O u t for Rumsfeld

as the Generals Fight Back," Guardian
14. Jeremy Scahill, Blackwater:

(London), March 31, 2003.

The Rise of the World's

Most Powerful

Mercenary

Army

(New York: Nation Books, 2 0 0 7 ) , 199.
15. Peter Maass, " T h e Way o f the C o m m a n d o s , " New York Times,

M a y 1, 2 0 0 5 ; "Jim

Steele B i o , " Premiere Speakers Bureau, www.premierespeakers.com; M i c h a e l Hirsh
and John Barry, " T h e Salvador Option,'" Newsweek,

January 8, 2 0 0 5 .

5H

N O T E S TO P A G E S 367 TO 373

16. " E m a i l from Cpt. W i l l i a m Ponce," P B S Frontline:
www.pbs.org;
Washington

The Torture Question,

August 2 0 0 3 ,

Josh W h i t e , "Soldiers' 'Wish Lists' o f D e t a i n e e Tactics Cited,"

Post, April 19, 2 0 0 5 .

17. Brigadier G e n e r a l Janis Karpinski, c o m m a n d e r in charge o f Abu Ghraib, says Miller
said this to her. Scott Wilson and Sewell C h a n , "As Insurgency Grew, S o Did Prison
Abuse," Washington

Post, May 10, 2 0 0 4 .

18. O n e month later, S a n c h e z sent another m e m o clarifying and somewhat tempering
the earlier m e m o but creating much confusion in the field about which procedures
applied. Ricardo S. S a n c h e z , Memorandum,
Counter-Resistance

Policy,

Subject:

CJTF-7

Interrogation

and

September 14, 2 0 0 3 , www.aclu.org.

19. T h e information in the next three paragraphs is drawn from H u m a n Rights Watch,
No Blood,
6-14,

No Foul:

Soldiers'

Accounts

of Detainee

Abuse

in Iraq,

July 2 0 0 6 , pages

www.hrw.org.

20. Ibid., 2 6 , 2 8 .
21. Richard P. Formica, "Article 1 5 - 6 Investigation o f C J S O T F - A P and 5th S F Group
Detention Operations," finalized on November 8, 2 0 0 4 , declassified, www.aclu.org.
22. U S M C Alleged

Detainee

Abuse

Cases

Since

11 Sep 0 1 , unclassified, July 8, 2 0 0 4 ,

www.aclu.org.
23. "Web Magazine Raises Doubts Over a Symbol o f Abu Ghraib," New York

Times,

M a r c h 14, 2 0 0 6 ; Interview with Haj Ali, "Few Bad M e n ? " P B S Now, April 2 9 , 2 0 0 5 .
24. "Haj Ali's Story," PBS Now W e b site, www.pbs.org; Chris Kraul, "War Funding Feud
Has Iraqis Uneasy," Los Angeles

Times, April 2 8 , 2 0 0 7 .

25. H u m a n Rights W a t c h , Leadership
Detainees

Failure:

Firsthand

by the U.S. Army's 82nd Airborne

Division,

Accounts

of Torture

of

Iraqi

September 2 0 0 5 , pages 9, 12,

www.hrw.org.
26. H u m a n Rights W a t c h , The New Iraq? Torture and Ill-Treatment
Custody,

of Detainees

in Iraqi

January 2 0 0 5 , pages 2 , 4 , www.hrw.org; Bradley G r a h a m , "Army Warns Iraqi

Forces on Abuse o f Detainees," Washington

Post, M a y 2 0 , 2 0 0 5 ; Moss, "Iraq's Legal

System Staggers B e n e a t h the Weight o f War."
27. Maass, " T h e Way o f the C o m m a n d o s . "
28. Interview with Allan Nairn, Democracy

Now! January 10, 2 0 0 5 , www.democracynow

.org; S o l o m o n M o o r e , "Killings Linked to Shiite Squads in Iraqi Police Force," Los
Angeles

Times,

November 2 9 , 2 0 0 5 .

29. Moss, "Iraq's Legal System Staggers B e n e a t h the Weight of War"; Thanassis
C a m b a n i s , "Confessions Rivet Iraqis," Boston

Globe,

M a r c h 18, 2 0 0 5 ; Maass, " T h e

Way o f the C o m m a n d o s . "
30. Ibid; J o h n F. Burns, "Torture Alleged at Ministry Site Outside Baghdad," New York
Times,

November 16, 2 0 0 5 ; M o o r e , "Killings Linked to Shiite Squads in Iraqi Police

Force."
31. A n n e Collins, In the Sleep Room:
Canada

The Story of the CIA Brainwashing

Experiments

in

(Toronto: Lester and Orpen Dennys, 1 9 8 8 ) , 174.

32. M a x i n e

McKew,

"Confessions

of

an

American

Hawk,"

The

Diplomat,

October-November 2005.
33. Charles Krauthammer, "In Baker's Blunder, a C h a n c e for Bush," Washington
D e c e m b e r 15, 2 0 0 6 ; Frederick W . Kagan, Choosing

Post,

Victory: A Plan for Success

in

Iraq, Phase I Report, January 4 , 2 0 0 7 , page 3 4 , www.aei.org.
34. D a h r Jamail and Ali Al-Fadhily, "Iraq: Schools C r u m b l i n g Along with Iraqi Society,"
Inter

Press

Service, D e c e m b e r

18, 2 0 0 6 ;

Charles

Crain,

"Professor

Approximately 3 0 0 Academics Have B e e n Assassinated," U S A Today,

Says

January 17,

N O T E S TO P A G E S 373 TO 379

515

2 0 0 5 ; M i c h a e l E . O ' H a n l o n and Jason H. C a m p b e l l , Brookings Institution,

Iraq

Index: Tracking

Variables

of Reconstruction

& Security

in Post-Saddam

Iraq,

February

22, 2 0 0 7 , page 35, www.brookings.edu; R o n R e d m o n d , "Iraq Displacement," press
briefing, Geneva, November 3, 2 0 0 6 , www.unhcr.org; "Iraq's Refugees Must B e
Saved from Disaster," Financial

Times ( L o n d o n ) , April 19, 2 0 0 7 .

35. "Nearly 2 0 , 0 0 0 People Kidnapped in Iraq T h i s Year: Survey," Agence France-Presse,
April 19, 2 0 0 6 ; H u m a n Rights W a t c h , The New Iraq? 32, 5 4 , www.hrw.org.
36. H S B C was originally supposed to open branches across Iraq. Instead it bought a 7 9
percent stake in Iraq's Dar es-Salaam bank. John M . Broder and James Risen,
"Contractor Deaths in Iraq Soar to Record," New York Times,

M a y 19, 2 0 0 7 ; Paul

Richter, "New Iraq Not Tempting to Corporations," Los Angeles

Times,

Yochi J . Dreazen, "An Iraqi's Western Dream," Wall Street Journal,
"Syria and Iraq: Unbanked and Unstable," Euromoney,

July 1, 2 0 0 4 ;

M a r c h 14, 2 0 0 5 ;

S e p t e m b e r 2 0 0 6 ; Ariana

E u n j u n g C h a and Jackie Spinner, " U . S . C o m p a n i e s Put Little Capital into Iraq,"
Washington

Post, May 15, 2 0 0 4 .

37. Andy Mosher and Griff Witte, " M u c h U n d o n e in Rebuilding Iraq, Audit Says,"
Washington

Post, August 2, 2 0 0 6 ; Julian Borger, "Brutal Killing o f Americans in Iraq

Raises Questions over Security Firms," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , April 2, 2 0 0 4 ; Office o f

the Special Inspector General for Iraq Reconstruction, Review of Administrative
Orders for Iraq Reconstruction

Contracts,

Task

O c t o b e r 2 3 , 2 0 0 6 , page 1 1 , www.sigir.mil.

38. Griff Witte, "Despite Billions Spent, Rebuilding Incomplete," Washington

Post,

November 12, 2 0 0 6 .
39. Aqeel Hussein and C o l i n Freeman, " U S to R e o p e n Iraq's Factories in $ 1 0 m U-turn,"
Sunday

Telegraph

( L o n d o n ) , January 2 9 , 2 0 0 7 .

40. Josh W h i t e and Griff Witte, "To S t e m Iraqi V i o l e n c e , U . S . Looks to Factories,"
Washington

Post, D e c e m b e r 12, 2 0 0 6 .

4 1 . James A. Baker III, L e e H. Hamilton, Lawrence S. Eagleburger, et al., Iraq
Group

Report,

Study

D e c e m b e r 2 0 0 6 , page 57, www.usip.org.

42. Pfeifer, " W h e r e Majors Fear to Tread."
43. "Iraq's Refugee Crisis Is Nearing Catastrophe," Financial

Times

( L o n d o n ) , February

8, 2 0 0 7 ; Joshua Gallu, "Will Iraq's Oil Blessing B e c o m e a C u r s e ? " Der
D e c e m b e r 2 2 , 2 0 0 6 ; D a n n y Fortson, Andrew Murray-Watson
"Future o f Iraq: T h e Spoils of War," Independent

Spiegel,

and T i m W e b b ,

( L o n d o n ) , January 7, 2 0 0 7 .

44. Iraqi Labor Union Leadership, "Iraqi Trade Union S t a t e m e n t on the O i l Law,"
D e c e m b e r 1 0 - 1 4 , 2 0 0 6 , www.carbonweb.org.
45. Edward Wong, "Iraqi C a b i n e t Approves Draft o f O i l Law," New York Times,

February

26, 2 0 0 7 .
46. Steven

L. Schooner, "Contractor

Atrocities at Abu

Ghraib:

Compromised

Accountability in a Streamlined Outsourced Government," Stanford
Review

Law &

Policy

16, no. 2 ( 2 0 0 5 ) : 552.

47. Jeremy Scahill, Blackwater:

The Rise of the World's

Most Powerful

Mercenary

Army

(New York: Nation Books, 2 0 0 7 ) , 123.
48. Jim Krane, "A Private Army Grows Around the U . S . Mission in Iraq and Around the
World," Associated Press, O c t o b e r 30, 2 0 0 3 ; Jeremy Scahill, "Mercenary Jackpot," The
Nation, August 2 8 , 2 0 0 6 ; Jeremy Scahill, "Exile on K Street," The Nation,
2006; Mark Hemingway, "Warriors for Hire," Weekly Standard,

February 2 0 ,

D e c e m b e r 18, 2 0 0 6 .

49. Griff Witte, "Contractors Were Poorly Monitored, G A O Says," Washington

Post, April

30, 2 0 0 5 .
50. T . Christian Miller, Blood

Money:

Wasted

Billions,

Lost Lives,

and Corporate

Greed

516

N O T E S TO P A G E S 379 TO 391

in Iraq (New York: Little, Brown and Company, 2 0 0 6 ) , 87. F O O T N O T E : George R.
Fay, A R 1 5 - 6 Investigation
Intelligence

Brigade,

of the Abu Ghraib

Detention

Facility

and 20Sth

Military

pages 19, 5 0 , 52, www4.army.mil.

51. R e n a e M e r l e , "Army Tries Private Pitch for Recruits," Washington

Post, September 6,

2006.
52. Andrew Taylor, "Defense Contractor C E O s S e e Pay D o u b l e S i n c e 9/11 Attacks,"
Associated Press, August 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 ; Steve Vogel and R e n a e M e r l e , "Privatized Walter
Reed Workforce Gets Scrutiny," Washington

Post, M a r c h 10, 2 0 0 7 ; D o n n a Borak,

"Walter R e e d D e a l Hindered by Disputes," Associated Press, M a r c h 19, 2 0 0 7 .
53. According to T h o m a s Ricks, ' W h e n the U.S. troop level was about 150,000, and the
allied troop contributions totaled 2 5 , 0 0 0 , there were about 6 0 , 0 0 0 additional civilian
contractors supporting the effort." T h a t means there were 175,000 coalition soldiers to
6 0 , 0 0 0 contractors, a ratio o f 1 contractor to every 2.9 soldiers. Nelson D . Schwartz,
"The

Pentagon's Private Army," Fortune,

The American

M a r c h 17, 2 0 0 3 ; T h o m a s E . Ricks, Fiasco:

Military Adventure in Iraq (New York: Penguin, 2 0 0 6 ) , 37; Renae Merle,

"Census Counts 1 0 0 , 0 0 0 Contractors in Iraq," Washington

Post, D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 6 .

54. Ian B r u c e , "Soldier o f Fortune Deaths G o Missing in Iraq," Herald

(Glasgow),

January 13, 2 0 0 7 ; Brian Brady, "Mercenaries to Fill Iraq Troop Gap," Scotland
Sunday

on

(Edinburgh), February 2 5 , 2 0 0 7 ; M i c h e l l e Roberts, "Iraq War Exacts Toll on

Contractors," Associated Press, February 2 4 , 2 0 0 7 .
55. United Nations Department o f Public Information, "Background Note: 31 D e c e m b e r
2 0 0 6 , " United Nations Peacekeeping Operations, www.un.org; James Glanz and
Floyd Norris, "Report Says Iraq Contractor Is Hiding Data from U.S.," New York
Times,

O c t o b e r 2 8 , 2 0 0 6 ; Brady, "Mercenaries to Fill Iraq Troop Gap."

56. F O O T N O T E : James Boxell, " M a n o f Arms Explores New Areas o f Combat,"
Financial

Times

(London), March 11, 2007.

57. Special Inspector G e n e r a l for Iraq Reconstruction, Iraq Reconstruction:
Contracting

and Procurement,

Lessons

in

July 2 0 0 6 , pages 9 8 - 9 9 , www.sigir.mil; George W.

Bush, State o f the Union Address, Washington, D C , January 2 3 , 2 0 0 7 .
58. G u y D i n m o r e , " U S Prepares List o f Unstable Nations," Financial

Times

(London),

March 29, 2005.

19. Blanking the Beach: "The Second Tsunami"
1. Seth Mydans, "Builders Swoop in, Angering T h a i Survivors," International
Tribune
2.

Herald

(Paris), M a r c h 10, 2 0 0 5 .

ActionAid International et al., Tsunami

Response:

A Human

Rights

Assessment,

January 2 0 0 6 , page 13, www.actionaidusa.org.
3.

Sri Lanka:

4.

John Lancaster, "After T s u n a m i , Sri Lankans Fear Paving o f Paradise,"

A Travel Survival

Kit (Victoria, Australia: Lonely Planet, 2 0 0 5 ) , 2 6 7 .
Washington

Post, June 5, 2 0 0 5 .
5.

National Physical Planning Department, Arugam
Reconstruction

Towards Prosperity,

Bay Resource

Development

Plan:

Final Report, pages 4 , 5, 7, 18, 33, April 2 5 , 2 0 0 5 ;

Lancaster, "After T s u n a m i , Sri Lankans Fear Paving of Paradise."
6.

"South Asians Mark T s u n a m i Anniversary," United Press International, June 2 6 , 2 0 0 5 .

7.

U S A I D / S r i L a n k a , " U S A I D Elicits ' R e a l Reform' o f Tourism," January 2 0 0 6 , www
.usaid.gov.

N O T E S TO P A G E S 392 TO 397

517

8.

Ibid.

9.

E-mail interview with Karen Preston, public relations manager, Leading Hotels o f
the World, August 16, 2 0 0 6 ; Ajay Kapur, Niall M a c l e o d , and Narendra Singh,
"Plutonomy: Buying Luxury, Explaining G l o b a l Imbalances," Citigroup: Industry
Note, Equity Strategy, O c t o b e r 16, 2 0 0 5 , pages 2 7 , 3 0 .

10. United

Nations

Environment

Programme,

"Sri Lanka E n v i r o n m e n t

Profile,"

National Environment Outlook, www.unep.net.
11. Tittawella was director general o f the Public Enterprises Reform Commission o f Sri
Lanka from 1997 to 2 0 0 1 , during which time he oversaw the privatization o f Sri
Lanka T e l e c o m (August 1997) and Sri Lankan Air Lines ( M a r c h 1 9 9 8 ) . After the 2 0 0 4
elections, he was named chairman and C E O o f the government-run

Strategic

Enterprises M a n a g e m e n t Agency, which continued the project o f privatization under
the updated language o f "public-private partnerships." Public Enterprises Reform
Commission o f Sri Lanka, "Past Divestitures," 2 0 0 5 , www.perc.gov.lk; " S E M A to
Rejuvenate Key State Enterprises," June 15, 2 0 0 4 , www.priu.gov.lk.
12. M o v e m e n t for National Land and Agricultural Reform, Sri Lanka, A Proposal
People's

Planning

Commission

for Recovery

After Tsunami,

for a

www.monlar.org.

13. "Privatizations in Sri Lanka Likely to Slow B e c a u s e o f E l e c t i o n Results," Associated
Press, April 5, 2 0 0 4 .
14. "Sri Lanka Begins T s u n a m i Rebuilding Amid Fresh Peace Moves," Agence F r a n c e Presse, January 19, 2 0 0 5 .
15. M o v e m e n t for National Land and Agricultural Reform, Sri Lanka, A Proposal
People's

Planning

Commission

for Recovery

After Tsunami,

for a

www.monlar.org; "Sri

Lanka Raises Fuel Prices Amid Worsening E c o n o m i c Crisis," Agence France-Presse,
June 5, 2 0 0 5 ; "Panic Buying Grips Sri Lanka Amid O i l Strike Fears," Agence FrancePresse, M a r c h 2 8 , 2 0 0 5 .
16. James Wilson and Richard Lapper, "Honduras M a y Speed Sell-Offs After Storm,"
Financial

Times

(London), November 1 1 , 1 9 9 8 ; Organization o f American States,

"Honduras," 1 9 9 9 National

Trade

Estimate

Report

on Foreign

Trade

165, www.sice.oas.org; Sandra Cuffe, Rights Action, A Backwards,
of

Development:

Honduras

Global

and Guatemala,

Actors,

Mining

and

Barriers,

page

Upside-Down

Community-Based

Kind

Resistance

in

February 2 0 0 5 , www.rightsaction.org.

17. Mexico's T e l m e x Unveils G u a t e m a l a T e l e c o m Alliance," Reuters, O c t o b e r 2 9 , 1 9 9 8 ;
Consultative Group for the Reconstruction and Transformation o f Central America,
Inter-American Development Bank, "Nicaragua," Central
Mitch:

The Challenge

www.iadb.org;

of Turning

a Disaster

into

America

After

an Opportunity,

Hurricane
May 2000,

Pamela Druckerman, "No Sale: D o You W a n t to Buy a P h o n e

C o m p a n y ? " Wall Street Journal,

July 14, 1 9 9 9 .

18. "Mexico's T e l m e x Unveils Guatemala T e l e c o m Alliance"; "Spain's Fenosa Buys
Nicaragua Energy Distributors," Reuters, September 12, 2 0 0 0 ; " S a n Francisco G r o u p
Wins Honduras Airport Deal," Reuters, M a r c h 9, 2 0 0 0 ; " C E O - G o v t . to
Remaining Enitel Stake T h i s Year," Business

News Americas,

Sell

February 14, 2 0 0 3 .

19. Quotation from Eduardo Stein Barillas. "Central America After Hurricane Mitch,"
World E c o n o m i c Forum Annual Meeting, Davos, Switzerland, January 3 0 , 1 9 9 9 .
20. Alison R i c e , T s u n a m i C o n c e r n , Post-Tsunami
Disaster?

Tourism

and Reconstruction:

A

Second

O c t o b e r 2 0 0 5 , page 1 1 , www.tourismconcern.org.uk.

21. T A F R E N , "An Agenda for Sri Lanka's Post-Tsunami Recovery," Progress & News, July
2 0 0 5 , page 2.

518

N O T E S TO P A G E S 397 TO 405

22. U S A I D Sri Lanka, "Fishermen and Tradesmen to Benefit from U . S . Funded $33
Million Contract for Post-Tsunami Infrastructure Projects," press release, September
8, 2 0 0 5 , www.usaid.gov; United States G o v e r n m e n t Accountability Office, U S A I D
Signature
Cost

Tsunami

and

Reconstruction

Schedule

Estimates,

Efforts

in Indonesia

and Face

Further

and Sri Lanka

Risks,

Exceed

Initial

Report to Congressional

C o m m i t t e e , G A O - 0 7 - 3 5 7 , February 2 0 0 7 ; National Physical Planning Department,
Arugam

Bay Resource

Development

Plan:

Reconstruction

Towards

Prosperity,

Final

Report, April 2 5 , 2 0 0 5 , page 18.
23. United States Embassy, " U . S . Provides $1 Million to Maintain Tsunami Shelter
Communities," M a y 18, 2 0 0 6 , www.usaid.gov.
24. Randeep Ramesh, "Indian Tsunami Victims Sold T h e i r Kidneys to Survive,"
(London), January 18, 2 0 0 7 ; ActionAid International et al., Tsunami

Guardian

Response,

www.actionaidusa.org; Nick M e o , "Thousands o f Indonesians Still in Tents,"
and

Mail

17;
Globe

(Toronto), D e c e m b e r 2 7 , 2 0 0 5 .

25. ActionAid International et al., Tsunami

Response,

9.

26. Central Intelligence Agency, "Maldives," The World Factbook

2007,

www.cia.gov.

27. C o c o Palm D h u n i Kolhu, www.cocopalm.com; Four Seasons Resort, Maldives at
Landaa Giraavaru, www.fourseasons.com; Hilton Maldives Resort and Spa, Rangali
Island, www.hilton.com; " D h o n i Mighili Island," Private Islands O n l i n e , www.private
islandsonline.com.
28. Roland B u e r c k , "Maldives Opposition Plan Protest," B B C News,
Asian

Human

Rights C o m m i s s i o n ,

" E x t r a j u d i c i a l Killings,

April 2 0 , 2 0 0 7 ;
Disappearances,

Torture and O t h e r Forms o f Gross H u m a n Rights Violations Still E n g u l f Asia's
Nations," D e c e m b e r 8, 2 0 0 6 , www.ahrchk.net; Amnesty International, "Republic
of

Maldives: R e p r e s s i o n

o f Peaceful

Political O p p o s i t i o n , "

July 3 0 , 2 0 0 3 ,

www.amnesty.org.
29. Ashok Sharma, "Maldives to Develop 'Safe' Islands for Tsunami-Hit

People,"

Associated Press, January 19, 2 0 0 5 .
30. Ministry o f Planning and National Development, Republic o f Maldives,
Recovery and Reconstruction

National

Plan, Second Printing, March 2 0 0 5 , page 29, www.tsunam

imaldives.mv.
31. Ibid.; ActionAid International et al., Tsunami

Response,

18.

32. T h e leases are for twenty-five years, but the fine print o f the bids allows them to be
extended to fifty under certain ownership structures. Ministry o f Tourism and Civil
Aviation, Bidding

Documents:

For Lease

of New Islands

to Develop

as Tourist

Resorts

( M a l e : Republic o f Maldives, July 16, 2 0 0 6 ) , 4 , www.maldivestourism.gov.
33. P e n c h a n Charoensuthipan,

"Survivors Fighting for Land Rights," Bangkok

Post,

D e c e m b e r 14, 2 0 0 5 ; Mydans, "Builders Swoop in, Angering T h a i Survivors."
34. Asian Coalition for Housing Rights, " T h e T s u n a m i in Thailand: January-March
2 0 0 5 , " www.achr.net.
35. S h i m a l i Senanayake and Somini Sengupta, "Monitors Say Troops Killed Aid Workers
in Sri Lanka," New York Times, August 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 ; Amantha Perera, "Tsunami Recovery
Skewed by Sectarian Strife," Inter Press Service, January 3, 2 0 0 7 .
36. Shimali Senanayake, "An E t h n i c War Slows T s u n a m i Recovery in Sri Lanka," New
York Times,

O c t o b e r 19, 2 0 0 6 .

37. Roland Paris, At

War's

End:

Building

Cambridge University Press, 2 0 0 4 ) , 2 0 0 .

Peace

After

Civil

Conflict

(Cambridge:

N O T E S TO P A G E S 406 TO 412

519

20. Disaster Apartheid: A World of Green Zones and Red Zones
1. Hein Marais, "A Plague o f Inequality," Mail

& Guardian

(Johannesburg), M a y 19,

2006.
2.

"Names and Faces," Washington

3.

Adolph Reed Jr., "Undone by Neoliberalism," The Nation,

4.

Jon Elliston, "Disaster in the Making," Tucson
Innovative

Post, September 19, 2 0 0 5 .

Emergency Management,

S e p t e m b e r 18, 2 0 0 6 .

Weekly,

" I E M Team

September 23, 2004;

to D e v e l o p

Catastrophic

Hurricane Disaster Plan for New Orleans & Southeast Louisiana," press release, June
3, 2 0 0 4 , www.ieminc.com.
5.

Ron Fournier and Ted Bridis, "Hurricane

Simulation Predicted 6 1 , 2 9 0

Dead,"

Associated Press, September 9, 2 0 0 5 .
6.

Paul Krugman, "A C a n ' t D o Government," New York Times, September 2, 2 0 0 5 ; Martin
Kelly, "Neoconservatism's Berlin Wall," T h e G - G n o m e Rides O u t blog, September 1,
2 0 0 5 , www.theggnomeridesout.blogspot.com; Jonah Goldberg, " T h e Feds," the C o m e r
blog on the National Review Online, August 3 1 , 2 0 0 5 , www.nationalreview.com.

7.

Milton Friedman, " T h e Promise of Vouchers," Wall Street Journal,

D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 5 ;

John R. Wilke and Brody Mullins, "After Katrina, Republicans Back a Sea o f
Conservative Ideas," Wall Street Journal,

September 15, 2 0 0 5 ; Paul S. Teller, deputy

director, House Republican Study C o m m i t t e e , "Pro-Free-Market Ideas for Responding
to Hurricane Katrina and High Gas Prices," e-mail sent on September 13, 2 0 0 5 .
8.

Intergovernmental Panel on C l i m a t e C h a n g e , Climate
Science

9.

Basis,

Change

2007: The

Physical

Summary for Policymakers, February 2 0 0 7 , page 16, www.ipcc.ch.

Teller, "Pro-Free-Market Ideas for Responding to Hurricane Katrina and High Gas
Prices."

10. E r i c Lipton and Ron Nixon, "Many Contracts for Storm Work Raise Questions," New
York Times,
Fraud," St.

September 2 6 , 2 0 0 5 ; Anita Kumar, "Speedy R e l i e f Effort O p e n s D o o r to
Petersburg

Times,

Black(water)," The Nation,

September

18, 2 0 0 5 ; J e r e m y S c a h i l l , "In

the

June 5, 2 0 0 6 ; S p e n c e r S. Hsu, " $ 4 0 0 Million F E M A

Contracts Now Total $ 3 . 4 Billion," Washington

Post, August 9, 2 0 0 6 .

11. Shaw Group, "Shaw Announces Charles M . Hess to Head Shaw's F E M A Hurricane
Recovery Program," press release, September 2 1 , 2 0 0 5 , www.shawgrp.com; "Fluor's
Slowed Iraq Work Frees It for G u l f Coast," Reuters, S e p t e m b e r 9, 2 0 0 5 ; T h o m a s B .
Edsall, "Former F E M A C h i e f Is at Work on G u l f Coast," Washington
8, 2 0 0 5 ; David Enders, "Surviving New Orleans," Mother

Jones,

Post, S e p t e m b e r

S e p t e m b e r 7, 2 0 0 5 ,

www.motherjones.com.
12. United States House o f Representatives, C o m m i t t e e on G o v e r n m e n t Reform —
Minority Staff, Special Investigations Division, Waste, Fraud
Katrina

Contracts,

13. Rita J . King, Corp Watch, Big, Easy
Gulf

Coast,

and Abuse

in

Hurricane

on the

American

August 2 0 0 6 , page i, www.oversight.house.gov.
Money:

Disaster

Profiteering

August 2 0 0 6 , www.corpwatch.org; D a n Barry, "A City's Future, and a

Dead Man's Past," New York Times, August 2 7 , 2 0 0 6 .
14. Patrick Danner, "AshBritt Cleans U p in Wake o f Storms," Miami

Herald,

December

5, 2 0 0 5 .
15. "Private Companies Rebuild Gulf," PBS NewsHourwith

Jim Lehrer,

October 4, 2005.

16. Scott S h a n e and Ron Nixon, "In Washington, Contractors Take on Biggest Role
Ever," New York Times,

February 4 , 2 0 0 7 .

17. Mike Davis, " W h o Is Killing New Orleans?" The Nation,

April 10, 2 0 0 6 .

520

N O T E S TO P A G E S 413 TO 420

18. Leslie Eaton, "Immigrants Hired After Storm S u e New Orleans Hotel Executive," New
York Times,

August 17, 2 0 0 6 ; King, Corp Watch, Big, Easy

Money;

Gary Stoller,

"Homeland Security Generates Multibillion Dollar Business," USA Today,

September

11, 2 0 0 6 . F O O T N O T E : Judith Browne-Dianis, Jennifer Lai, Marielena Hincapie et
al.,

And

Injustice

for All: Workers'

Lives

in the Reconstruction

of New

Orleans,

Advancement Project, July 6, 2 0 0 6 , page 2 9 , www.advancementproject.org.
19. Rick Klein, "Senate Votes to Extend Patriot Act for 6 Months," Boston

Globe,

December 22, 2005.
20. Jeff D u n c a n , " T h e Unkindest Cut," Times-Picayune

(New Orleans), March 2 8 , 2 0 0 6 ;

Paul Nussbaum, "City at a Crossroads," Philadelphia

Inquirer,

August 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 .

2 1 . E d Anderson, "Federal M o n e y for Entergy Approved," Times-Picayune

(New Orleans),

D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 6 ; Frank D o n z e , " 1 4 6 N . O . Transit Layoffs Planned,"

Times-Picayune

(New Orleans), August 2 5 , 2 0 0 6 ; Bill Quigley, "Robin Hood in Reverse: T h e Looting
of the G u l f Coast," justiceforneworleans.org, November 14, 2 0 0 6 .
22. Asian Coalition for Housing Rights, "Mr. Endesha Juakali," www.achr.net.
23. B o b Herbert, "Our C r u m b l i n g Foundation," New York Times, April 5, 2 0 0 7 .
24. Help Jet, www.helpjet.us.
25. Seth Borenstein, "Private Industry Responding to Hurricanes," Associated Press, April
15, 2 0 0 6 .
26. James G l a n z , "Idle Contractors Add Millions to Iraq Rebuilding," New York

Times,

October 25, 2006.
27. Mark Hemingway,

"Warriors for Hire," Weekly

Standard,

D e c e m b e r 18, 2 0 0 6 .

F O O T N O T E : Jeremy Scahill, "Blackwater Down," The Nation,

O c t o b e r 10, 2 0 0 5 ;

C e n t e r for Responsive Politics, "Oil & Gas: Top Contributors to Federal Candidates
and Parties," E l e c t i o n C y c l e 2 0 0 4 , www.opensecrets.org;

C e n t e r for Responsive

Politics, "Construction: Top Contributors to Federal Candidates and Parties," Election
C y c l e 2 0 0 4 , www.opensecrets.org.
28. Josh Manchester, "Al Qaeda
TCSDaily,

for the G o o d Guys: T h e Road to

Anti-Qaeda,"

D e c e m b e r 19, 2 0 0 6 , www.tcsdaily.com.

29. Bill Sizemore and J o a n n e Kimberlin, "Profitable Patriotism," The

Virginian-Pilot

(Norfolk), July 2 4 , 2 0 0 6 .
30. King, CorpWatch, Big, Easy
Army," New York Times,

Money;

Leslie Wayne, "America's For-Profit Secret

O c t o b e r 13, 2 0 0 2 ; Greg Miller, "Spy Agencies Outsourcing

to Fill Key Jobs," Los Angeles

Times,

September 17, 2 0 0 6 ; S h a n e and Nixon, "In

Washington, Contractors Take on Biggest Role Ever."
31. T h e corporations on the advisory committee include L o c k h e e d Martin, Boeing and
Booz Allen. Stephen E . Flynn and Daniel B . Prieto, C o u n c i l on Foreign Relations,
Neglected

Defense:

Mobilizing

the Private Sector to Support

Homeland

Security,

CSR

N o . 13, M a r c h 2 0 0 6 , page 2 6 , www.cfr.org.
3 2 . M i n d y Fetterman, "Strategizing on Disaster Relief," USA Today,

October 12, 2 0 0 6 ;

Frank Langfitt, "Private Military F i r m Pitches Its Services in Darfur," National
Radio:

All Things

Considered,

Public

May 26, 2006.

33. Peter Pae, "Defense Companies Bracing for Slowdown," Los Angeles

Times,

October

2, 2 0 0 6 .
34. J o h a n n a N e u m a n and Peter Spiegel, "Pay-as-You-Go Evacuation Roils Capitol Hill,"
Los Angeles

Times,

July 19, 2 0 0 6 .

35. T i m Weiner, " L o c k h e e d and the Future o f Warfare," New York Times,
2004.

November 2 8 ,

N O T E S TO P A G E S 420 TO 427

521

36. Information in the next two paragraphs is drawn from John R o b b , "Security: Power to
the People," Fast Company,

March 2006.

37. Juvenile, " G o t Ya Hustle On," on the album Reality

Check,

Atlanta/WEA label, 2 0 0 6 .

38. Bill Quigley, "Ten Months After Katrina: Gutting New Orleans," CommonDreams.org,
June 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 , www.commondreams.org.
39. Doug Nurse, "New City Bets Millions on Privatization," Atlanta

Journal-Constitution,

November 12, 2 0 0 5 .
40. Annie Gentile, "Fewer Cities Increase Outsourced
County,

Services," American

City

6*

September 1, 2 0 0 6 ; Nurse, "New City Bets Millions on Privatization."

4 1 . Doug Nurse, "City Hall I n c . a Growing Business in North Fulton," Atlanta
Constitution,

Journal-

September 6, 2 0 0 6 ; D o u g Gross, "Proposal to Split Georgia C o u n t y

Drawing Cries o f Racism," Seattle

Times,

January 2 4 , 2 0 0 7 .

42. United Nations Office for the Coordination o f Humanitarian Affairs, "Humanitarian
Situation Report—Sri Lanka," September 2 - 8 , 2 0 0 5 , www.reliefweb.int.

21. Losing the Peace Incentive: Israel as Warning
1. Christopher Caldwell, " T h e Walls T h a t Work T o o Well," Financial

Times ( L o n d o n ) ,

November 18, 2 0 0 6 .
2.

Martin Wolf, "A Divided World of E c o n o m i c Success and Political Turmoil,"

Financial

Times (London), January 3 1 , 2 0 0 7 ; "Ex-Treasury C h i e f S u m m e r s Warns on Market
Risks," Reuters, M a r c h 2 0 , 2 0 0 7 .
3.

Richard Aboulafia, Teal Group, "Guns-to-Caviar Index," 2 0 0 7 .

4.

United States House o f Representatives, Committee on Government Reform—Minority
Staff, Special Investigations Division, Dollars,
the

Bush Administration,

Not Sense: Government

Contracting

Under

Prepared for Rep. Henry A. Waxman, June 2 0 0 6 , page 6,

www.oversight.house.gov; T i m Weiner, "Lockheed and the Future of Warfare," New York
Times, November 2 8 , 2004; Matthew Swibel, "Defensive Play," Forbes, June 5, 2 0 0 6 .
5.

Dow Jones U.S. Heavy Construction Index closed at $ 1 4 3 . 3 4 on S e p t e m b e r 10, 2 0 0 1 ,
and closed at 507.43 on June 4 , 2 0 0 7 . D J _ 2 3 5 7 , "Historical Quotes," money.cnn.com;
James G l a n z , "Iraq Reconstruction Running Low on Funds," International
Tribune

Herald

(Paris), O c t o b e r 3 1 , 2 0 0 5 ; E l l e n Nakashima, "A Wave o f Memories,"

Washington

Post,

D e c e m b e r 2 6 , 2 0 0 5 ; Ann M . S i m m o n s , Richard Fausset and

Stephen Braun, "Katrina Aid Far from Flowing," Los Angeles

Times, August 2 7 , 2 0 0 6 ;

Helene Cooper, "Aid C o n f e r e n c e Raises $ 7 . 6 Billion for L e b a n e s e Government,"
New
6.

York Times, January 2 6 , 2 0 0 7 .

Shawn McCarthy, "Exxon's 'Outlandish' Earnings Spark Furor," Globe

and

Mail

(Toronto), February 2, 2 0 0 7 .
7.

Jonathan Curiel, " T h e Conspiracy to Rewrite 9 / 1 1 , " San

Francisco

Chronicle,

September 3, 2 0 0 6 ; Jim Wooten, "Public Figures' Rants W i d e n Racial Chasm,"
Atlanta
8.

Journal-Constitution,

January 2 2 , 2 0 0 6 .

E M - D A T , T h e O F D A / C R E D International Disaster Database, " 2 0 0 6 Disasters in
Numbers," www.em-dat.net; Peter Bergen and Paul Cruickshank, " T h e Iraq Effect:
War Has Increased Terrorism Sevenfold Worldwide," Mother

9.

McCarthy, "Exxon's 'Outlandish'

Jones, March-April 2 0 0 7 .

Earnings Spark Furor"; W i l l i a m Hartung and

Michelle Ciarrocca, " T h e Military-Industrial-Think Tank C o m p l e x , "
Monitor,

Multinational

January-February 2 0 0 3 ; Robert O'Harrow Jr., "LexisNexis to Buy Seisint for

522

N O T E S TO P A G E S 428 TO 436

$ 7 7 5 Million," Washington

Post, July 15, 2 0 0 4 ; R a c h e l M o n a h a n and E l e n a Herrero

B e a u m o n t , " B i g T i m e Security," Forbes,

August 3, 2 0 0 6 .

10. " R e c a p o f Saturday, July 9, 2 0 0 5 , " Fox News: The Cost of Freedom,

www.foxnews.com.

11. D a n G i l l e r m a n , " T h e E c o n o m i c Opportunities o f Peace," press statement, Chambers
of C o m m e r c e , S e p t e m b e r 6, 1 9 9 3 , cited in G u y Ben-Porat, "A New Middle East?:
Globalization, Peace and the ' D o u b l e M o v e m e n t , ' " International

Relations

19, no. 1

( 2 0 0 5 ) : 50.
12. Efraim Davidi, "Globalization and E c o n o m y in the Middle East—A Peace o f Markets
or a Peace o f Flags?" Palestine-Israel

Journal

7, nos. 1 and 2 ( 2 0 0 0 ) : 33.

13. S h l o m o Ben-Ami, A Place for All (Tel Aviv: Hakibbutz Hameuchad, 1 9 9 8 ) , 113, cited
in Davidi, "Globalization and E c o n o m y in the Middle East," 38.
14. Americans for Peace Now, " T h e Russians," Settlements

in Focus 1, no. 16 ( D e c e m b e r

23, 2 0 0 5 ) , www.peacenow.org.
15. Gerald Nadler, "Exodus or Renaissance?" Washington

Times, January 19, 1992; Peter

Ford, " W e l c o m e and Woes Await Soviet Jews in Israel," Christian

Science

Monitor,

July 2 5 , 1991; Lisa Talesnick, "Unrest W i l l Spur Russian Jews to Israel, Official Says,"
Associated Press, O c t o b e r 5, 1 9 9 3 ; "Israel's Alienated Russian Voters Cry Betrayal,"
A g e n c e France-Presse, May 8, 2 0 0 6 .
16. Greg Myre, "Israel E c o n o m y Hums Despite Annual Tumult," International
Tribune

Herald

(Paris), D e c e m b e r 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 ; "Israel Reopens Gaza Strip," United Press

International, M a r c h 2 2 , 1 9 9 2 .
17. Peter Hirschberg,

"Barak S e t t l e m e n t Policy R e m a i n s Virtually the

Netanyahu's," Jerusalem

Report,

S a m e as

December 4, 2000.

18. Americans for Peace Now, " T h e Russians."
19. David Simons, "Cold Calculation o f Terror," Forbes,

May 2 8 , 2002; Zeev Klein,

"January-May Trade Deficit Shoots up 16% to $3.59 Billion," Globes

(Tel Aviv), June 12,

2001; Neal Sandler, "As if the Intifada Weren't Enough," BusinessWeek,

June 18, 2 0 0 1 .

20. "Rocket fuel" quote is from S h l o m o Maital, a professor at Israel's Technion Institute
of M a n a g e m e n t . Nelson D . Schwartz, "Prosperity without Peace," Fortune,
2 0 0 5 ; S h l o m o Ben-Ami, Scars

of War, Wounds

of Peace:

The Israeli-Arab

June 13,
Tragedy

(Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2 0 0 6 ) , 2 3 0 .
21. United Nations Special Coordinator in the O c c u p i e d Territories, Quarterly
Economic
Ami, Scars

and Social

Conditions

of War, Wounds

Autopsy," Current

in the West Bank and Gaza

of Peace,

Report

on

Strip, April 1, 1997; B e n -

2 3 1 ; Sara Roy, "Why Peace Failed: An Oslo

History 1 0 1 , no. 6 5 1 (January 2 0 0 2 ) : 13.

22. Chris M c G r e a l , "Deadly Thirst," Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , January 13, 2 0 0 4 .

23. "Norman Finkelstein & Former Israeli Foreign Minister S h l o m o Ben-Ami Debate,"
Democracy

Now! February 14, 2 0 0 6 , www.democracynow.org.

24. According to the Israeli business newspaper Globes,

between 2 0 0 1 to 2 0 0 3 Israel was

looking at "a cumulative 8.5 per c e n t drop in per capita growth," a stunning decline.
Zeev Klein, " 2 0 0 2 Worst Year for Israeli E c o n o m y S i n c e 1953," Globes

(Tel Aviv),

D e c e m b e r 3 1 , 2 0 0 2 ; Sandler, "As if the Intifada Weren't Enough."
2 5 . A r o n Heller and James Bagnall, "After the Intifada: W h y Israel's T e c h Titans Are
Challenging Canadian Entrepreneurs as a G l o b a l Force," Ottawa

Citizen,

April 2 8 ,

2 0 0 5 ; Schwartz, "Prosperity without Peace."
26. Susan Karlin, " G e t Smart," Forbes,

D e c e m b e r 12, 2 0 0 5 .

27. Ran Dagoni, "O'seas C o s , Gov'ts to Inspect Israeli Anti-Terror Methods," Globes

(Tel

Aviv), January 2 2 , 2 0 0 6 ; B e n Winograd, " U . S . Airport Directors Study Tough Israeli
Security Measures Ahead o f S u m m e r Travel," Associated Press, May 8, 2 0 0 7 ; State of

N O T E S TO P A G E S 436 TO 440

523

Israel, Ministry of Public Security, "International H o m e l a n d Security C o n f e r e n c e ,
2 0 0 6 , " M a r c h 19, 2 0 0 6 , www.mops.gov.il.
28. Heller and Bagnall, "After the Intifada"; Yaakov Katz, "Defense Officials Aim High
at Paris Show," Jerusalem

Post, June 10, 2 0 0 7 ; Hadas M a n o r , "Israel in Fourth Place

among Defense Exporters," Globes

(Tel Aviv), June 10, 2 0 0 7 ; Steve Rodan and Jose

Rosenfeld "Discount Dealers," Jerusalem
"The

Post,

September 2, 1 9 9 4 ; Gary D o r s c h ,

Incredible Israeli S h e k e l , as Israel's E c o n o m y C o n t i n u e s to B o o m , " T h e

Market O r a c l e , M a y 8, 2 0 0 7 , www.marketoracle.co.uk.
29. Schwartz, "Prosperity without Peace."
30. Ibid.; Nice Systems, "Nice Digital Video Surveillance Solution Selected by Ronald
Reagan Washington National Airport," press release, January 2 9 , 2 0 0 7 , www.nice.com;
Nice Systems, " T i m e Warner (Charlotte)," Success Stories, www.nice.com.
31. James Bagnall, "A World o f Risk: Israel's T e c h Sector Offers Lessons on Doing
Business in the New Age of Terror," Ottawa

Citizen,

August 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 ; E l e c t a Draper,

"Durango Office Keeps Watch in War on Terror," Denver

Post, August 14, 2 0 0 5 .

32. S u p e r C o m , " S u p e r C o m Signs $ 5 0 m National Multi Id Agreement with a European
Country," press release, S e p t e m b e r 19, 2 0 0 6 ; S u p e r C o m , "City o f Los Angeles to
Deploy

Supercom's

IRMS

Mobile Credentialing

and

Handheld

Verification

System," press release, November 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 ; S u p e r C o m , " S u p e r C o m Signs $ 1 . 5 m
ePassport Pilot Agreement with European Country," press release, August 14, 2 0 0 6 ,
www.supercomgroup.com.
33. C h e c k Point, "Facts at a G l a n c e , " www.checkpoint.com.
34. David Machlis, " U S Gets Israeli Security for Super Bowl," Jerusalem

Post, February 4 ,

2 0 0 7 ; New Age Security Solutions, "Partial C l i e n t List," www.nasscorp.com.
35. Kevin Johnson, "Mansions

Spared

on

Uptown's

High

Ground,"

USA

Today,

September 12, 2 0 0 5 .
36. International Security Instructors, "About" and "Clients," www.isiusa.us.
37. "Golan Group L a u n c h e s Rigorous V I P Protection Classes," press release, April 2 0 0 7 ;
Golan Group, "Clients," www.golangroup.com.
38. Schwartz, "Prosperity without Peace"; Neil Sandler, "Israeli Security Barrier Provides
High-Tech Niche," Engineering

News-Record,

May 3 1 , 2 0 0 4 .

39. David Hubler, " S B I n e t Trawls for Small-Business Partners," Federal

Computer

Week,

October 2, 2 0 0 6 ; Sandler, "Israeli Security Barrier Provides High-Tech N i c h e . "
40. Schwartz, "Prosperity without Peace."
4 1 . Elbit Systems Ltd. and Magal Security Systems Ltd, "Historical Prices," Yahoo!
Finance,
Tribune

finance.yahoo.com;

Barbara Wall, "Fear Factor," International

Herald

(Paris), January 2 8 , 2 0 0 6 ; E l e c t a Draper, "Verint Systems Emerges as Leader

in Video Surveillance Market."
42. T h o m a s L. Friedman, "Outsource the C a b i n e t ? " New York Times,

February 2 8 , 2 0 0 7 ;

Ruth Eglash, "Report Paints G l o o m y Picture o f Life for Israeli Children,"

Jerusalem

Post, D e c e m b e r 2 8 , 2 0 0 6 .
43. Karen Katzman, " S o m e Stories You May Not Have Heard," report to the Jewish
Federation o f Greater Washington, www.shalomdc.org;
Terrorists, W e Are Virtuous," London
44.Tel

Aviv S t o c k E x c h a n g e

Review

Ltd., T A S E

of Books,
Main

Yitzhak Laor, "You Are

August 17, 2 0 0 6 .

Indicators,

August

31, 2006,

www.tase.co.il; Friedman, "Outsource the C a b i n e t ? " ; Reuters, " G D P Growth Figure
Slashed," Los Angeles

Times,

M a r c h 1, 2 0 0 7 ; G r e g Myre, "Amid Political Upheaval,

Israeli E c o n o m y Stays Healthy," New York Times,
Group, West Bank

and Gaza

Update,

D e c e m b e r 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 ; World B a n k

September 2006,

www.worldbank.org.

524

N O T E S TO P A G E S 440 TO 447

4 5 . Susan Lerner, "Israeli C o m p a n i e s S h i n e in Big Apple," Jerusalem

Post, September 17,

2 0 0 6 ; O s a m a Habib, "Labor Minister Says War L e d to Huge Jump in N u m b e r of
Unemployed," Daily

Star (Beirut), O c t o b e r 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 .

4 6 . Interview with D a n Gillerman, C N N : Lou Dobbs

Tonight,

July 14, 2 0 0 6 .

47. Karin Brulliard, " 'Gated C o m m u n i t i e s ' for the War-Ravaged," Washington

Post, April

23, 2 0 0 7 ; D e a n Yates, "Baghdad Wall Sparks Confusion, Divisions in Iraq," Reuters,
April 2 3 , 2 0 0 7 .
4 8 . Rory M c C a r t h y , " O c c u p i e d G a z a like Apartheid South Africa, Says U N Report,"
Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , February 2 3 , 2 0 0 7 .

49. M i c h a e l W i n e s , "Shantytown Dwellers in South Africa Protest the Sluggish Pace o f
C h a n g e , " New York Times,

December 25, 2005.

Conclusion: Shock Wears Off: The Rise of People's Reconstruction
1. Juan Forero, "Bolivia Indians Hail the Swearing In o f O n e o f T h e i r Own as
President," New York Times,
2.

January 2 3 , 2 0 0 6 .

T o m Kerr, Asian Coalition for Housing Rights, "People's Leadership in Disaster
Recovery: Rights, Resilience and Empowerment," Phuket disaster seminar, October
3 0 - N o v e m b e r 3, 2 0 0 6 , Phuket City, www.achr.net.

3.

Antillano belongs to the Land C o m m i t t e e o f La Vega, Caracas. Hablemos
PoderlTalking

del

of Power, documentary directed by Nina Lopez, produced by Global

W o m e n ' s Strike, 2 0 0 5 , www.globalwomenstrike.net.
4.

T e r e n c e Corcoran, "Free Markets Lose T h e i r Last Lion," National

Post (Toronto),

November 17, 2 0 0 6 .
5.

J i m W e b b , "Class Struggle," Wall Street Journal,

6.

Geoffrey York, "Beijing to Target Rural Poverty," Globe

November 15, 2 0 0 6 .
and Mail

(Toronto), March 6,

2 0 0 6 ; Larry Rohter, "A W i d e n i n g G a p Erodes Argentina's Egalitarian Image," New
York

Times,

D e c e m b e r 2 5 , 2 0 0 6 ; World Institute for Development E c o n o m i c s

Research, "Pioneering Study Shows Richest Two Percent Own Half World Wealth,"
press release, D e c e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 6 , www.wider.unu.edu; Sarah Anderson et al.,
Excess 2006: Defense

and Oil Executives

Cash in on Conflict,

Executive

August 30, 2 0 0 6 , page 1,

www.faireconomy.org; W e b b , "Class Struggle."
7.

Raul G a r c e s , "Former Uruguayan Dictator Arrested," Associated Press, November 17,
2 0 0 6 ; "Argentine Judge Paves Way for New Trial o f Ex-Dictator Videla," Agence
France-Presse, S e p t e m b e r 5, 2 0 0 6 ; "Former Argentine Leader Indicted for 2001 Bond
Swap," MercoPress, S e p t e m b e r 2 9 , 2 0 0 6 , www.mercopress.com.

8.

"Former Latin American Leaders Facing Legal Troubles," Miami

Herald,

January 18,

2007.
9.

Andrew Osborn, " T h e A - Z o f Oligarchs," Independent

( L o n d o n ) , May 2 6 , 2 0 0 6 .

10. Paul Waldie, "Hollinger: Publisher or ' B a n k of Conrad Black'?" Globe

and

(Toronto), February 7, 2 0 0 7 ; "Political Activist Grover Norquist," National
Radio

Morning

Edition,

Mail
Public

M a y 2 5 , 2 0 0 1 ; Jonathan Weisman, "Powerful G O P Activist

Sees His Influence Slip over Abramoff Dealings," Washington
11. G e o r g e W . Bush, The National

Security

Strategy

Post, July 9, 2 0 0 6 .

of the United

States,

September

2 0 0 2 , www.whitehouse.gov.
12. Jane Bussey, "Democrats Won Big by Opposing Free-Trade Agreements,"
Herald,

Miami

November 2 0 , 2 0 0 6 ; Robin Toner and Janet Elder, "Most Support U.S.

Guarantee o f Health Care," New York Times,

M a r c h 2, 2 0 0 7 .

N O T E S TO P A G E S 448 TO 457

13. Corporaciôn

L a t i n o b a r o m e t r o , Latinobarômetro

Report

2006,

525

www.latinobaro

metro.org.
14. Susan George and Erik Wesselius, " W h y F r e n c h and D u t c h Citizens Are Saying
N O , " Transnational Institute, May 2 1 , 2 0 0 5 , vvww.tni.org.
15. Lou Dobbs, C N N : Lou Dobbs

Tonight,

April 14, 2 0 0 5 .

16. Martin Arnold, "Polish Plumber Symbolic o f all F r e n c h Fear about Constitution,"
Financial
17. Andrew

Times ( L o n d o n ) , M a y 2 8 , 2 0 0 5 .
Curry,

" T h e C a s e Against Poland's

New

President," New

November 17, 2 0 0 5 ; Fred Halliday, "Warsaw's Populist Twins,"
September 1, 2 0 0 6 , www.opendemocracy.net;

Republic,

openDemocracy,

Ian Traynor, "After

Communism:

Ambitious, E c c e n t r i c —Polish Twins Prescribe a Dose o f Harsh Reality,"

Guardian

(London), September 1, 2 0 0 6 . F O O T N O T E : Ken Livingstone, "Facing Phobias,"
Guardian

( L o n d o n ) , M a r c h 2, 2 0 0 7 .

18. Perry Anderson, "Russia's Managed Democracy," London

Review

of Books,

January

25, 2 0 0 7 .
19. Vladimir Radyuhin, "Racial Tension on the Rise in Russia," The Hindu,
16, 2 0 0 6 ; Amnesty International, Russian

Federation:

Violent

Racism

September

Out of

Control,

May 4 , 2 0 0 6 , www.amnesty.org.
20. Helen Womack, "No Hiding Place for Scared Foreigners in Racist Russia," Sydney
Morning

Herald,

May 6, 2 0 0 6 .

21. Henry A. Kissinger, Memorandum
6—Chile,

to the President,

Subject:

NSC Meeting,

November

November 5, 1 9 7 0 , declassified, www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.

22. Jack C h a n g , "Fear of Privatization Gives Brazilian President a Lead in Runoff,"
Knight Ridder, O c t o b e r 2 6 , 2 0 0 6 ; Hector Tobar, "Nicaragua
Blackouts," Los Angeles

Times,

Sees R e d

Over

October 30, 2006.

23. Nikolas Kozloff, " T h e Rise o f Rafael Correa," CounterPunch,

November 2 6 , 2 0 0 7 ;

Simon R o m e r o , "Leftist Candidate in E c u a d o r Is Ahead in Vote, Exit Polls Show,"
New

York Times,

November 27, 2 0 0 6 .

24. "Argentine President Marks Third Year in Office with Campaign-Style Rally," B B C
Monitoring International Reports, M a y 2 6 , 2 0 0 6 .
25. D a n

Keane, "South

American

Leaders

Dream

o f Integration,

Continental

Parliament," Associated Press, D e c e m b e r 9, 2 0 0 6 .
26. D u n c a n C a m p b e l l , "Argentina and Uruguay S h u n U S Military Academy,"

Guardian

(London), April 6, 2 0 0 6 ; "Costa Rica Quits U S Training at E x - S c h o o l o f the
Americas," Agence France-Press, M a y 19, 2 0 0 7 .
27. Roger Burbach, "Ecuador's G o v e r n m e n t Cautiously Takes Its First Steps," N A C L A
News, February 19, 2 0 0 7 , www.nacla.org.
28. Chris Kraul, "Big Cooperative Push in Venezuela," Los Angeles Times, August 2 1 , 2 0 0 6 .
29. E m i r Sader, "Latin American Dossier: Free Trade in Reciprocity," Le
Diplomatique,

Monde

February 2 0 0 6 .

30. George W . Bush, The National

Security

Strategy

of the United

States

of

America,

M a r c h 2 0 0 6 , page 30, www.whitehouse.gov; interview with Stanley F i s c h e r conduct­
ed May 9, 2 0 0 1 , for Commanding

Heights:

The Battle

for the World

Economy,

www.pbs.org.
31. Jorge Rueda, "Chavez Says Venezuela W i l l Pull out o f the I M F , World Bank,"
Associated Press, May 1, 2 0 0 7 ; Fiona Ortiz, "Argentina's Kirchner Says N o New I M F
Program," Reuters, M a r c h 1, 2 0 0 7 ; Christopher Swann, B l o o m b e r g News, "Hugo
Chavez Exploits Oil Wealth to Push I M F Aside," International
March 1, 2 0 0 7 .

Herald

Tribune (Paris),

526

N O T E S TO P A G E S 457 TO 466

32. Ibid.; "Ecuador Expels World Bank Representative," Agence France-Press, April 27,
2 0 0 7 ; Reuters, "Latin Leftists M u l l Quitting World Bank Arbitrator," Washington

Post,

April 2 9 , 2 0 0 7 ; E o i n Callan and Krishna G u h a , "Scandal Threatens World Bank's
Role," Financial

Times

( L o n d o n ) , April 2 3 , 2 0 0 7 .

33. Michael Wines, "Shantytown Dwellers in South Africa Protest the Sluggish Pace of
Change," New York Times, D e c e m b e r 2 5 , 2005; Brendan Smith et a l , "China's Emerging
Labor Movement," Commondreams.org, October 5, 2006,

www.commondreams.org.

F O O T N O T E : Ibid.
34. Jean Baudrillard, Power inferno

(Paris: G a l i l é e , 2 0 0 2 ) , 8 3 .

35. Central Intelligence Agency, H u m a n Resource Exploitation Training Manual —
1983, www.gwu.edu/~nsarchiv.
36. Andrew England, "Siniora Flies to Paris as L e b a n o n Protests Called Off,"
Times

Financial

( L o n d o n ) , January 2 3 , 2 0 0 7 ; Kim Ghattas, "Pressure Builds for Lebanon

Reform," B B C News, January 2 2 , 2 0 0 7 ; Lysandra Ohrstrom, "Reconstruction C h i e f
Says He's Stepping Down," Daily

Star (Beirut), August 2 4 , 2 0 0 6 .

37. H e l e n e Cooper, "Aid Conference Raises $ 7 . 6 Billion for Lebanese Government," New
York Times,

January 2 6 , 2 0 0 7 ; Osama Habib, "Siniora Unveils Reform Plan Aimed at

Impressing Paris III Donors," Daily

Star (Beirut), January 3, 2 0 0 7 ; Osama Habib,

"Plans for T e l e c o m Sale Move Ahead," Daily Star (Beirut), September 30, 2 0 0 6 .
38. M o h a m a d Bazzi, "People's Revolt in Lebanon," The Nation,
Schuh, "On

the

CounterPunch,

E d g e o f Civil War: T h e C e d a r

January 8, 2 0 0 7 ; Trish

Revolution G o e s

South,"

January 2 3 , 2 0 0 7 , www.counterpunch.org.

39. Mary H e n n o c k , "Lebanon's E c o n o m i c Champion," BBC News, February 14, 2 0 0 5 ;
Randy Gragg, "Beirut," Metropolis,

November 1 9 9 5 , pages 2 1 , 2 6 ; "A Bombed-Out

Beirut Is Being Born Again —Fitfully," Architectural

Record

188, no. 4 (April 2 0 0 0 ) .

4 0 . Bazzi, "People's Revolt in Lebanon."
4 1 . Ana Nogueira and Saseen Kawzally, "Lebanon Rebuilds (Again),"

Indypendent,

August 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 , www.indypendent.org; Kambiz Foroohar, "Hezbollah, with $ 1 0 0
Bills, Struggles to Repair L e b a n o n Damage," Bloomberg News, September 2 8 , 2 0 0 6 ;
O m a y m a Abdel-Latif, "Rising From the Ashes," Al-Ahram
4 2 . David Frum, "Counterfeit News," National

Weekly,

August 3 1 , 2 0 0 6 .

Post (Toronto), August 2 6 , 2 0 0 6 .

4 3 . "Spain's Aznar Rules O u t Talks with Basque Group E T A , " Associated Press, M a r c h
11,2004.
44. E l a i n e Sciolino, "In Spain's Vote, a S h o c k from D e m o c r a c y (and the Past)," New York
Times,

March 21, 2004.

4 5 . Santisuda Ekachai, "This Land Is O u r Land," Bangkok

Post, M a r c h 2, 2 0 0 5 .

4 6 . T o m Kerr, Asian Coalition for Housing Rights, "New Orleans Visits Asian Tsunami
Areas — S e p t e m b e r 9 - 1 7 , 2 0 0 6 , " www.achr.net.
47. Ibid.
4 8 . Kerr,

"People's

Leadership

in

Disaster

Recovery:

Rights,

Resilience

and

Empowerment."
49. Kerr, "New Orleans Visits Asian T s u n a m i Areas."
50. Richard A. Webster, " N . O . Survivors Learn Lessons from Tsunami Rebuilders," New
Orleans

Business,

November 13, 2 0 0 6 .

51. Residents o f Public Housing, "Public Housing Residents Take Back T h e i r Homes,"
press release, February 11, 2 0 0 7 , www.peoplesorganizing.org.
52. Q u o t e from Joseph Recasner. Steve Ritea, " T h e D r e a m Team," Times-Picayune
Orleans), August 1, 2 0 0 6 .

(New

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS
I think there may be some literary rule against dedicating two books to the
same person. I need to break that rule for this book. This project would sim­
ply not have been physically, intellectually or emotionally possible without
my husband, Avi Lewis. He is my collaborator in all things: editor, travel
partner (to Sri Lanka, South Africa, New Orleans), life enhancer. We did
this together.
The task would also have defeated me without the extraordinary work of my
research assistant, Debra Levy. Debra gave her life over to this book for three
years, pausing only to have a child. Her dazzling research skills have left their
mark on every page. She unearthed new and exciting information, managed
and organized unwieldy sources, conducted several interviews, then factchecked the entire manuscript. I am so unspeakably grateful to have been
joined at every stage by such a dedicated and talented colleague. Debra extends
her love and appreciation to Kyle Yamada and Ari Yamada-Levy, as do I.
Two editors, working in an unusually collaborative and rewarding edito­
rial relationship, shaped this manuscript in ways too profound to describe:
Frances Coady for Metropolitan Books and Louise Dennys at Knopf
Canada. Frances and Louise, who are also my close friends and mentors,
pushed me to take the thesis into entirely new areas and granted me the
months of necessary time to follow through on their rigorous challenges.
Louise has been my faithful editor and fierce defender since No Logo, and I
remain in awe of her ability to tone me down and toughen me up simulta­
neously. When I handed in the revised and much expanded draft, Frances
restructured and refined it with stunning commitment at every stage. The
fact that the publishing world still has space for intellectual titans like these
two women gives me hope for the future of books.
The manuscript was further sharpened thanks to incisive feedback from
Helen Conford at Penguin UK, who worked closely with us from the earliest
days. Alison Reid's boundless passion for this project as well as her attentiveness to polishing the text make the title "copy editor" wholly inadequate. I
am in her debt.
My brilliant agent, Amanda Urban, believed in this book when it was

528

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

supposed to be only about Iraq, and her faith and loyalty grew through each
missed deadline and every revised and expanded outline. She also happens to
have the sharpest, coolest team going: Margaret Halton, Kate Jones, Elizabeth
Iveson, Daisy Meyrick, Karolina Sutton and Liz Farrell. Surrounded by the
women of I C M Books, one feels ready for anything. We are all grateful for the
groundwork laid by Nicole Winstanley and Bruce Westwood.
Jackie Joiner is the office manager for Klein Lewis Productions. For two
years she acted as human shield, keeping the world at bay so I could focus.
Then, when the draft was complete, Jackie set us all in motion like a mag­
nificent orchestra conductor. To say more about Jackie's daily feats of cre­
ative administration would invite envy, so I will leave it there.
The I C M team found perfect publishing homes for this book around the
world, thereby giving me the luxury to put together an international team of
researchers and fact-checkers, without whom Debra and I could never have
completed a project of this scope. Each researcher took on crucial pieces of
the puzzle, drawing on his or her own specialized skills and areas of ex­
pertise.
My dear friend Andréa Schmidt, with whom I travelled in Iraq, was a con­
stant intellectual companion, not just supplying me with fat binders of
hyperorganized readings on the grimmest of subjects but educating me and
pushing me to go further and deeper into the horror. The sections on torture
in particular are very much the product of our never-ending conversation.
She also read drafts of the manuscript and gave me some of the most impor­
tant feedback.
Aaron Maté was my primary researcher in 2003-05, when my journalism
focused almost exclusively on Iraq's economic transformation. It was a bless­
ing to work with Aaron, a great intellect and terrific journalist. Aaron's im­
print is unmistakable in the chapters on Iraq, as well as on Israel/Palestine.
Fernando Rouaux and Shana Yael Shubs, both up-and-coming Latin
American studies scholars, uncovered a largely unexplored cache of eco­
nomic writings on the interrelationship between crisis and neoliberal re­
forms. It was this material that revealed to me the centrality of the shock
doctrine at the highest reaches of the international financial institutions. Fer­
nando conducted several background interviews for me in Buenos Aires, and
Shana translated dozens of documents and articles from Spanish to English.
They also rigorously fact-checked the chapters of the book on Argentina.
The wonderful Amanda Alexander was my primary researcher on the
South Africa chapter, fact-finding, fact-checking and transcribing interview

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

529

tapes, along with the enormously helpful Audrey Sasson. Amanda also con­
ducted key research on China's shock therapy period. Several other re­
searchers joined the team at various points: Bruno Anili, Emily Lodish
(particularly on Russia), Hannah Holleman (the Asian financial crisis), Wes
Enzinna (including last-minute interviews in Bolivia), Emma Ruby-Sachs,
Grace Wu and Nepomuceno Malaluan.
Debra Levy, a librarian herself, wishes to thank her personal back-office:
the patient and resourceful staffs of the University of Oregon libraries,
Corvallis-Benton County Public Library and the Eugene Public Library.
My reporting in the field also relied on many researchers, translators, fix­
ers and friends—too many to mention, but here is a start. In Iraq: Salam
Onibi, Linda Albermani and Khalid al-Ansary, one of the best journalists in
Baghdad, as well as my friend and fellow traveler Andrew Stern. In South
Africa: Patrick Bond, Heinrich Bohmke, Richard Pithouse, Raj Patel and, as
always, the brilliant and unstoppable Ashwin Desai. Special thanks to Ben
Cashdan and his crew for sharing their interviews with Nelson Mandela and
Archbishop Desmond Tutu, and for much else. In New Orleans: Jordan Fla­
herty, Jacquie Soohen and Buddy and Annie Spell. In Sri Lanka: Kumari
and Dileepa Witharana were my and Avi's spiritual and intellectual guides,
not to mention translators. Sarath Fernando, Kath Noble and the rest of the
team at MONLAR were our home base and the reason we made the trip in
the first place. When I returned to Canada, Stuart Laidlaw transcribed hours
of interviews, and Loganathan Sellathurai and Anusha Kathiravelu tran­
scribed and translated from Tamil and Sinhala.
Boris Kagarlitsky helped with the Russia chapter. Przemyslaw Wielgosz,
Marcin Starnawski and Tadeusz Kowalik all spent time educating me about
Poland's transition. Marcela Oliviera linked me up with participants in Bo­
livia anti-shock therapy movements. Tom Kerr at the Asian Coalition for
Housing Rights was our bridge to tsunami reconstruction in Thailand.
The genesis of this book was a year spent living in Argentina, where a
group of newfound friends taught me about the bloody roots of the Chicago
School project, often by sharing their own wrenching stories and family his­
tories. Those patient teachers are, among others, Marta Dillon, Claudia
Acuna, Sergio Ciancaglini, Nora Strejilevich, Silvia Delfino, Ezequiel
Adamovsky, Sebastian Hacher, Cecilia Sainz, Julian A. Massaldi-Fuchs, Esteban Magnani, Susana Guichal and Tomâs Bril Mascarenhas. They changed
the way I saw the world. The analysis of torture that appears in this book was
shaped by dozens of interviews conducted with people who experienced

530

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

prison abuse themselves, and also by those who have dedicated their lives to
counseling survivors. I want in particular to thank Federico Allodi and Miralinda Friere, both founders of the Canadian Centre for the Victims of Torture, as well as Shokoufeh Sakhi, Carmen Sillato and Juan Miranda.
Some of the people closest to me are writers specializing in themes
touched on in this book, and several of them read drafts of the manuscript
and spent hours talking through ideas. Kyo Maclear was always slipping me
books and forwarding articles, and her feedback on the first draft informed
my understanding of the layering of colonialism; Seumas Milne, who turned
The Guardians

op-ed page into a truly global debating forum, was my tutor

on the Thatcher years and my political counsel on much else; Michael Hardt
sent me back to the drawing board and put up with my emergent Keynesianism; Betsy Reed, my editor at The Nation, helped me frame the thesis and edited my first article on disaster capitalism, as well as dozens of columns; the
fearless Jeremy Scahill read early chapters and swapped panic and research
about the state of war (and life) privatization; Katharine Viner was the light at
the end of the tunnel and is making The Guardian

the launch pad for this

book. Most of all, these dear friends, who also happen to be colleagues, kept
me company and inspired me during years of lonely writing.
I am not an economist, but my brother, Seth Klein, director of the indispensable British Columbia Canadian Centre for Policy Alternatives, is my
sector weapon. He put up with calls at odd hours requesting impromptu tutorials in monetarist theory and carefully edited the first draft, pushing me
and protecting me as best he could. Ricardo Grinspun, a brilliant economist
specializing in Latin America at York University (cited in the text), was kind
enough to read the manuscript and provide important specialized feedback.
So did Stephen McBride, director of the Centre for Global Political Economy at Simon Fraser University. I am honored that both took time out of
their overloaded schedules to accept another student, and neither should be
held responsible for any errors on my part.
My parents, Bonnie and Michael Klein, gave me terrific feedback on
drafts and took excellent care of me when I moved to their neck of the woods
for the writing. Both have passionately protected the idea of a public sphere
outside the market for their entire lives, Michael in health care and Bonnie
in the arts. My hero of a mother-in-law, Michèle Landsberg, read the manuscript and cheered me on, as only she can. The insistence of my father-inlaw, Stephen Lewis, on placing the AIDS pandemic firmly within the
context of free-market fundamentalism emboldened me to write this book.

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

531

Many other stellar publishers and their teams have thrown their support
behind this project, including Brad Martin at Random House of Canada,
John Sterling at Henry Holt and Sara Bershtel at Metropolitan in New York,
Stefan McGrath and the creative and intelligent team at Penguin UK, Peter
Sillem at S. Fischer Verlag, Carlo Brioschi at Rizzoli, Erik Visser at De
Geus, Claudia Casanova at Paidôs, Jan-Erik Petterson at Ordfront, Ingeri
Engelstad at Oktober, Roman Kozyrev at Dobraya Kniga, Marie-Catherine
Vacher at Actes Sud and Lise Bergevin and everyone at Leméac.
All of us owe a huge debt to the unflappable Adrienne Phillips, acting
managing editor at Knopf Canada. Not only did she keep this unwieldy team
on track but, along with Margaret Halton and Jackie Joiner, she made it pos­
sible for the book to come out in seven languages simultaneously, something
of a publishing miracle. I am also enormously grateful to Lisa Fyfe for her
powerful jacket design, to Doris Cowan for her careful proofreading and to
Beate Schwirtlich for her expert typesetting. Barney Gilmore is, once again,
the master indexer. Mark A. Fowler is the very best kind of libel lawyer and
was a pleasure to argue with. I also thank Sharon Klein, Tara Kennedy, Mag­
gie Richards, Preena Gadher and Rosie Glaisher, as well as all the translators
who will bring this text to readers around the world.
In addition to the researchers who worked directly on this project, many
activists and writers helped me along the way. The incredible team members
at Focus on the Global South in Bangkok were the first to identify "recon­
struction" as the new frontier of neocolonialism, an extension of their long­
time work on the exploitation of crises. I am particularly grateful to the
acuity of Shalmali Guttal and Walden Bello. For their outstanding investi­
gations exposing disaster capitalism in New Orleans, I am indebted to Chris
Kromm and the team at the Institute for Southern Studies as well as to the
writings and activism of the human rights lawyer Bill Quigley. Soren Am­
brose, formerly of Fifty Years Is Enough, was a tremendous resource on the
international financial institutions. My research on contemporary prisoner
abuse was greatly aided by Michael Ratner and the courageous team at the
Center for Constitutional Rights, as well as John Sifton and Human Rights
Watch, the reports of Amnesty International and Jameel Jaffer at the Ameri­
can Civil Liberties Union.
Many of the declassified documents cited in the text were unearthed by
the extraordinary people at the National Security Archive. Another impor­
tant resource has been the interviews from PBS's 2002 documentary trilogy
Commanding

Heights:

The Battle for the World Economy.

Most of the

532

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

quotations that appear in the text did not make it into the films, but the pro­
ducers made the rare decision to put their raw interview transcripts online. I
am also grateful to Amy Goodman and the entire team at Democracy Now!
Their groundbreaking interviews are not only an addictive source of daily
news (www.democracynow.org), but a precious ongoing research tool.
Hundreds of other investigative journalists and authors whose work I draw
on are acknowledged in the text and the endnotes. An extensive bibliography
can be accessed through www.naomiklein.org, with direct links to many
original documents. A few books were of such tremendous and repeated
help that endnotes and bibliographies don't suffice to indicate their impor­
tance: Stephen F. Cohen's Failed Crusade, Alfred McCoy's A Question of
Torture, Anthony Shadid's Night Draws Near, Rajiv Chandrasekaran's Impe­
rial Life in the Emerald

City, Marguerite Feitlowitz's A Lexicon of Terror,

Michael McCaughan's True Crimes: Rodolfo Walsh, Lawrence Weschler's A
Miracle,

a Universe,

Greg Grandin's Empire's

Workshop,

T. Christian

Miller's Blood Money, Antonia Juhasz's Bush Agenda, Juan Gabriel Valdés's
Pinochet's Economists,

Peter Reddaway and Dmitri Glinski's The Tragedy of

Russia's Reforms, William Mervin Gumede's Thabo Mbeki and the Battle for
the Soul of the ANC, Joseph E. Stiglitz's Globalization

and Its Discontents,

Judith Butler's Precarious Life, John Perkins's Confessions
Hitman,

Peter Kornbluh's The Pinochet

of an

Economic

File and John Pilger's The New

Rulers of the World, among many of his other works. I am also in debt to
many documentary filmmakers whose footage helped me to understand
events that I was not able to witness firsthand. Patricio Guzman's definitive
trilogy The Battle of Chile demands particular mention.
Several theorists and chroniclers of neoliberalism have shaped my think­
ing well beyond what citations can reflect: David Harvey (particularly A
Brief History of Neoliberalism),

and pretty much everything ever written by

John Berger, Mike Davis and Arundhati Roy. When I read and reread the
work of Eduardo Galeano I feel as if everything has been said. I hope that he
will forgive my attempts here to put a few asterisks in the margin, just to em­
phasize the point.
I also want to honor five exquisitely diverse models of the engaged, en­
raged intellectual, each one a personal hero of mine, who passed away while
I was writing this book. The loss of Susan Sontag, John Kenneth Galbraith,
Molly Ivins, Jane Jacobs and Kurt Vonnegut will, for me as for so many oth­
ers, be difficult to bear.
The following people all lent a hand: Misha Klein, Nancy Friedland, An-

ACKNOWLEDGMENTS

533

thony Amove, John Montesano, Esther Kaplan, John Cusack, Kashaelle
Gagnon, Stefan Christoff, Kamil Mahdi, Pratap Chatterjee, Sara Angel,
Manuel Rozenthal, John Jordan, Justin Podur, Jonah Gindin, Ewa
Jasiewicz, Maude Barlow, Justin Alexander, Jeremy Pikser, Ric Young,
Arthur Manuel, Joe Nigrini, David Wall, John Greyson, David Meslin,
Carly Stasko, Brendan Martin, Bill Fletcher, David Martinez, Joseph HuffHannon, Ofelia Whiteley, Barr Gilmore and my patient colleagues at the
New York Times Syndicate, Gloria Anderson and Mike Oricchio.
Roger Hodge sent me to Iraq for Harpers,

on assignment for the piece

that turned into this book, and Sharon Oddie Brown and Andreas Schroeder
set me up in their perfect writer's cabin when I returned. I am, as always,
grateful to Katrina vanden Heuvel, Peter Rothberg and Hamilton Fish for
making The Nation feel like home.
It may take a village to raise a child, but looking at this long list, I realize
that it took a global conspiracy to make this book. I'm so fortunate to have
been supported by this amazing web of humanity.

INDEX

Abdullah, A h m e d , 3 3 6

Ali, H a j , 3 7 0

Abramoff, Jack, 3 1 4 , 4 4 6

Allan M e m o r i a l Institute, 2 8 - 2 9 , 3 5 , 3 7 ,

Abu G h r a i b (prison), 2 6 , 1 1 3 , 3 2 6 , 3 6 7 ,
3 6 8 , 3 6 9 , 3 7 0 , 379

4 0 , 4 4 , 47
Allawi, Ali Abdul-Amir, 8

Accenture, 3 0 3

Allbaugh, Joseph, 2 9 5

Action Against Hunger, 4 0 3

A l l e n d e , Salvador, 6 3 - 6 5 , 7 5 , 8 3 , 9 6 ,

ActionAid ( N G O ) , 3 9 9 , 4 0 1
Acuna, Claudia, 1 2 5 , 3 2 7
Ad H o c C o m m i t t e e on C h i l e ( U . S .
corporate), 6 4

103, 197
al-Qaeda, 3 0 5 , 3 5 6 , 4 1 7
Alsogaray, M a r i a Julia, 2 4 3
A m a n Resorts, 3 9 2

Adam Smith Institute ( U . K . ) , 3 4 8

A m e r i c a n Civil Liberties U n i o n , 3 6 9

addiction (alcohol and drug),

A m e r i c a n Enterprise Institute, 6 , 1 5 ,

in Russia, 2 3 8

322, 328

Afghanistan, 2 1 1

The American

African National Congress ( A N C ) ,

American Society o f Civil E n g i n e e r s , 4 1 5

195-216,450-51,458.
See also F r e e d o m C h a r t e r
Agresto, J o h n , 3 3 7 - 3 8
Ahmed, Rhuhel, 339
aid (developmental/foreign). See debt

Prospect

(magazine), 2 9 4

Americas W a t c h , 121
a m n e s i a , as a side effect o f electroshock,
2 7 - 2 9 , 31
Amnesty International, 4 6 , 1 1 8 - 1 9
A m o c o (oil c o m p a n y ) , 2 4 3

(government); disaster relief;

A M R Corp., 243

foreign aid

A N C . See the African National

AIDS

Congress ( A N C )

crisis, in Russia, 2 3 8

A n c h e l , David, 2 5

patents for medicines treating, 2 8 4 , 2 9 0

Anderson, Jack, 6 5

in South Africa, 2 0 3 , 2 0 6

Andrews, Cassandra, 8

AIG (Corp.), 2 7 4

Anglo A m e r i c a n ( C o r p . ) , 2 0 8

Albats, Yevgenia, 2 3 7

anthrax, O c t o b e r '01 scare, 2 9 6

Albright, M a d e l e i n e , 2 7 3

antiglobalization, 3 9 3 , 4 0 2

Alexander, J a n e , 3 0 0
A Lexicon

of Terror, 127

Alfonsfn, R a u l , 1 5 6 , 1 6 0 , 165
Algeria, torture in, 4 1 , 1 2 5 - 2 6

sparked by disaster capitalism,
278-280.
See also globalization
Antillano, Andres, 4 4 3

536

INDEX

Appeal T e l e c o m ( K o r e a ) , 2 7 6
A Question

of Torture

( M c C o y ) , 41

B a n k o f America, 6 4
B a n k Boston, 167

Arafat, Yasser, 4 2 9

B a n k L e u m i (Israel), 4 4 0

Arar, M a h e r , 3 3 3

B a n z e r , Hugo, 1 4 3 , 1 4 5 - 4 6

Arbatov, G e o r g i , 2 3 9

Barak, E h u d , 4 3 0 , 4 3 3

Arbenz G u z m a n , J a c o b o , 59

B a r d ô n , Alvaro, 2 0 4

Arendt, M a r i a n , 173

Barron's,

Argentina, 6 3 , 8 7 , 2 3 4 , 4 5 5 , 4 5 7

Barshefsky, C h a r l e n e , 2 7 6

aftermath o f the 1 9 7 6 c o u p in, 8 7 - 9 1 ,
9 4 - 9 6 , 9 8 , 100-101
its C h i c a g o S c h o o l revolution, 10,
165-167, 330

84

Battles, M i k e , 9
Baudrillard, J e a n , 4 5 8
Bayer, Osvaldo, 112
Bazzi, M o h a m a d , 4 6 0

Argentine Agrarian Leagues, 1 0 9

BearingPoint (consultants), 3 4 8

Argentine Tribunal against Impunity, 127

B e c h t e l (corporation), 13, 1 4 1 , 2 4 4 , 2 7 6 ,

Armitage, R i c h a r d , 3 6 1 , 3 7 2

309,319, 326, 3 4 7 , 3 5 5 , 3 5 7 , 3 5 8 ,

Artigas, José Gervasio, 1 0 4

374,410,418,421,453

A S E A Brown Bovai, 2 9 0

B e c k e r , Gary, 4 9 - 5 0

AshBritt,411

Bedregal, G u i l l e r m o , 1 4 6 - 4 8

Ashcroft, J o h n , 3 1 5

Begg, M o a z z a m , 113

Ashcroft G r o u p , 3 1 5

Behavior Pattern R e c o g n i t i o n

A s h m o r e Investment M a n a g e m e n t , 2 7 4
the Asia crisis, 4 2 6

(system), 4 3 7
Belafonte, Harry, 4 0 6

history of, 2 6 7 - 7 6

Belka, M a r e k , 3 4 2

lingering aftereffects of, 2 7 7 - 8 0

Bell, D a n i e l , 51

the Asian D e v e l o p m e n t B a n k , 391

Bell C a n a d a , 2 7 6

M u n d , Anders, 2 3 5 , 2 4 0

Bello, Walden, 2 6 9

A T & T , 303

Ben-Ami, S h l o m o , 4 3 0 , 4 3 3 - 3 4

Atlantic

Monthly,

The, 2 4 0

B e n n , Tony, 137

Australia, 3 0 3 , 1 1 4 , 2 5 3 , 2 7 3

Berezovsky, Boris, 4 4 6

authoritarian ideologies, 1 9 - 2 0

the "Berkeley M a f i a " (Indonesia), 6 8 - 9 ,

Automated Targeting System ( A T S ) , 3 0 4
Aven, Pyotr, 2 2 2 , 2 2 6
Aznar, José M a r i a , 4 6 2 - 6 3

79, 1 2 2 - 2 3 , 134, 271
Berlin W a l l , end o f the, 1 7 1 , 1 8 1 , 197
Bernstein, Jonas, 2 3 3
betrayal, as a m e a n s to break

B a c e v i c h , Andrew, 2 9 8

solidarity, 112

Bachelet, Michelle, 4 5 2

bin Talal, Alwaleed, 2 7 5

Baker, J a m e s 111,318, 3 7 6

Bioport (vaccine producer), 2 9 6

financial conflicts o f interest and, 3 1 8
Baker, K e n , 14

Birmingham, Michael, 3 2 5 - 2 7
Bivens, Matt, 2 3 3

Baker, R i c h a r d , 4

Black, Conrad, 4 4 6

B a k e r Botts (law firm), 3 1 7

Black

B a l c e r o w i c z , Leszek, 1 7 1 , 1 7 9 , 1 8 1 , 2 5 4
Baldwin, M a i t l a n d , 35
Balkan W a r , Halliburton's role in,
292, 348
Baltimore

Sun,

Book

of Communism

(Courtois, et

al.), 2 0
Blackwater, 13, 2 8 5 , 3 5 5 , 3 6 6 , 3 7 9 , 4 1 0 ,
416-17,420
politics of, 4 1 7

39

Blair, Tony, 3 6 5 , 3 8 0

B a n g k o k Investment ( C o r p . ) , 2 7 4

Blandford, Dave, 4 1 6

INDEX
Blitzer, Charles, 2 3 0

Brian, D a n i e l l e , 3 1 9

Blitzer, Wolf, 321

"Brick, the" ( C h i l e a n e c o n o m i c

"blowback," 3 5 1 - 5 9 , 3 6 2 , 3 6 5 - 6 8 ,
4 4 0 - 4 3 . See also societies, resis­
t a n c e to forced c h a n g e in
Blue I Q (South Africa), 2 1 4

537

m a n u a l ) , 7 1 , 1 4 8 , 163
as official policy, 7 7 - 7 9
Brinkley, Paul, 3 7 5
British G a s , 1 3 9

Blustein, Paul, 2 6 9

British T e l e c o m , 1 3 9 , 2 7 6

Boal, Augusto, 1 0 4 - 5

Browder, W i l l i a m , 171

bodyguards, e m p l o y m e n t of, 2 8 7

Brown, M i c h a e l , 3 1 5 , 4 0 9

Boeing, 3 0 3 - 4 , 3 1 1 , 3 2 1 , 4 3 8

Brown & R o o t (Halliburton subsidiary),

Bolivar, S i m o n , 1 0 4
Bolivia, 2 3 4 , 4 5 4 - 5 6

291,322
Bruno, Michael, 2 5 9 - 6 0

e c o n o m i c devastation in, 1 4 2 - 4 5

Brutus, D e n n i s , 2 1 2

elections in, 143

B u d h o o , Davison, 1 6 4 , 2 6 0 - 6 2

governmental collapse in, 1 3 6

Bulgari, 3 9 2

"shocks" applied to, 1 4 5 - 4 9 , 1 5 3 - 5 4 ,

Bunjan, Khun, 273
Burson-Marsteller (public relations

183-84
Bolivian Alternative for the Americas
(ALBA), 4 5 6
B o n d , Patrick, 2 0 3
Bono, 246

firm), 8 9 , 1 1 0
Bush, G e o r g e H . W . , 2 1 9 , 2 7 5 ,
289, 308, 342
administration of, 1 7 6 - 7 7 , 2 4 9 , 2 9 1

Booth, J e r o m e , 2 7 4
Booz Allen Hamilton, 3 0 2 , 3 1 5 , 4 1 6 , 4 6 0
Bordaberry, Juan M a r i a , 1 6 0 , 4 4 5
borders, security at, 3 0 3

Bush, George W., 11, 135, 3 0 8 , 3 2 8 ,
3 3 1 , 3 6 2 , 365
administration of, 5, 12, 19, 8 4 , 1 6 8 ,
240, 2 9 5 , 3 1 4 , 4 0 9 - 1 8

Borges, Jorge Luis, 137

advocates privatizations, 2 8 9 , 2 9 4

Bortnowska, Halina, 181

expands powers o f the executive

Boston

Globe,

228-29

Bowart, Walter, 30
Bowen, Stuart, 3 7 5

branch, 2 9 8 , 3 0 8 - 9
open use o f torture by, 4 2 - 4 6
"signing statements" used by, 4 3

Bovversox, Jon C , 3 7 5

Bush, Jeb, 2 9 4

boycotts, public use of, 1 9 8

B u s h , Laura, 2 8 1

B P (British Petroleum), 2 3 3 , 3 1 3 , 3 4 6 , 3 7 6

Business R o u n d t a b l e , 4 1 8

"brainwashing," 3 4

Business

Week,

8 2 - 3 , 89, 145, 275, 433

Brazil, 5 5 , 6 3 , 9 2 , 1 4 3 , 1 5 9 , 1 9 8 , 2 5 4 ,
451,455-56,549
aftermath o f the 1 9 6 4 c o u p in, 6 6 , 8 7 ,
106, 108, 156
its C h i c a g o S c h o o l revolution, 6 0 , 3 3 0
Brazil:

Never Again (report), 9 2 , 1 0 8

Brecht, Bertolt, 3 6 0
Bremer, L . Paul, III, 8, 3 1 6 , 3 2 6 , 3 3 1 ,
337,378,419
arrives in Iraq, 3 3 9 , 3 4 3
e c o n o m i c czar in Iraq, 3 4 3 - 4 8 ,
351-52,355,359, 367,376
warns o f free-trade blowback, 3 6 0 - 6 1

Caballero, Florencio, 3 8 - 3 9
C A C I International I n c . , 3 7 8 - 7 9 , 4 1 6
C a l d w e l l , Christopher, 4 2 3
Camdessus, M i c h e l , 2 6 0 , 2 6 8
C a m e r o n , Dr. E w e n , 2 5 - 3 3 , 3 5 - 4 1 ,
44-45,47-50,71,331,372,463
Canada,

54,114,253,257-59,

417,438
"free trade" e l e c t i o n in, 11
C a n i z a r o , Joseph, 4
capital controls, 2 3 6 , 2 6 9 , 2 7 3
Capital C o r r e c t i o n a l Resources, 2 9 4

538

INDEX

capitalism, 4 , 6, 9, 5 4 , 1 1 3 , 1 7 6 , 1 7 9 ,
1 9 2 , 2 2 1 - 2 2 , 2 5 0 , 306

Cheney, Dick, 42, 253, 274, 2 9 1 - 9 3 ,
3 0 0 , 3 1 1 , 3 2 0 , 3 2 2 , 3 3 0 , 342

equated with freedom, 1 8 , 4 4 8

advocates privatizations, 2 8 9 , 2 9 1

as an ideological monopoly, 2 5 2 , 2 7 9

b e c o m e s C E O o f Halliburton,

ideology and, 12, 2 0 , 5 1 , 5 3 , 1 0 2 - 3 ,
235
"mafia of," 2 4 0 , 3 1 6

financial

" m i x e d " versus "pure," 5 3 , 5 4 , 1 2 0
opposition to unfettered versions of,
See also disaster capitalism;
e c o n o m i c s ; "neoliberalism"
and Freedom

conflicts o f interest and,

313-14,316
Cheney, Liz, 329
C h e n e y , L y n n e , defense industry

278,444,449,453

Capitalism

291-92
defense industry i n c o m e and, 2 9 2 - 9 3

(Friedman's

manifesto), 18, 5 6 , 7 7 , 8 4
Carlyle G r o u p , 2 7 4 , 3 1 7 - 1 8 , 3 4 8 , 381
Carothers, T h o m a s , 182

i n c o m e and, 2 9 3
C h e s a p e a k e Innovation C e n t e r , 307
Chevron, 3 1 3 , 3 4 6 , 4 1 8 , 4 2 5
C h i a r e l l i , Peter W., 4 8 , 3 7 5
C h i c a g o Boys, 7 7 - 8 1 , 1 2 7 - 2 8 , 1 3 1 .
See also C e n t e r for Latin American

Carrefour, 2 7 5

E c o n o m i c Studies ( C h i c a g o ) ;

Cassidy, J o h n , 2 4 8

disaster capitalism, ideology and;

Castello Branco, Humberto, 6 6
Castro, F i d e l , 6 4
C a t h o l i c C h u r c h , its role in Poland,
172,174
C a t h o l i c University ( C h i l e ) , 6 0 - 6 2 , 7 0 ,
7 8 , 1 0 4 , 122
C a t o Institute, 1 5 , 1 4 1 , 2 6 7 , 3 2 2
Cavallo, Domingo, 158, 1 6 5 - 6 8 , 2 4 4 ,
259,445-46
C D . Howe Institute ( C a n a d a ) , 2 5 7
C e n t e r for L a t i n A m e r i c a n E c o n o m i c

University o f C h i c a g o
C h i c a g o S c h o o l ( e c o n o m i c orthodoxy),
7, 1 0 - 1 1 , 15, 18, 2 0 , 4 9 - 5 3 , 5 5 - 5 6 ,
351-52,354,359,405,410,427,
430,435,444-45
U . S . State D e p t . promotion of, 6 0 - 6 2 .
See also "Washington C o n s e n s u s "
( e c o n o m i c policies)
children, treatment o f when parents are
detained, 1 1 4
Chile

Studies ( C h i c a g o ) , 6 0 , 122

d e p e n d e n t upon copper i n c o m e , 85

C e n t e r for Security Policy ( U . S . ) , 4 2 7

its C h i c a g o S c h o o l revolution, 7, 12,

C e n t e r s for Disease C o n t r o l and
Prevention, 2 9 7
C e n t r a l Intelligence A g e n c y ( U . S . ) .
See C I A
Cerletti, Ugo, 25
C H 2 M Hill I n c . , 3 4 8 , 3 9 7 , 4 1 0 , 4 1 7 , 4 2 2
Chandrasekaran, Rajiv, 3 3 8 , 3 5 4
Charity Hospital (New O r l e a n s ) , 4 0 7 - 8 ,
414

330
post-coup "shocks" applied to, 7 1 ,
76-78,81-84
returns to a restricted "democracy,"
204
torture in, 4 1
China
avoids Asian crisis, 2 6 9
market e c o n o m y for, 1 3 4

Charles Schwab, 2 6 6

market liberalization in, 1 8 4 , 189

Chase Manhattan, 89, 158

protests in, 4 5 8

Chavez, Hugo, 6 7 , 4 4 7 , 4 5 4 - 5 5

China's

C h e c h n y a , as a diversionary war, 2 3 2 ,

C h i n e s e merchants, riots against, 2 7 7

237
C h e c k Point (Israeli security c o m p a n y ) ,
437

New Order

( W a n g et al.), 187

ChoicePoint, 303
Christopher, Warren, 2 2 9
C h u b a i s , Anatoly, 2 3 2

INDEX
C I A (Central Intelligence Agency, U . S . )
activities o f against Allende, 6 4 - 6 5 ,
68, 70, 96, 98
activities o f against Sukarno, 6 7 - 7 0
juntas, 9 1 , 9 5 , 1 0 0
d'état

C o l u m b i a University, 2 4 0
Commanding

Heights

(PBS

d o c u m e n t a r y ) , 152

activities o f supporting Southern C o n e
coups

539

initiated by, 5 9 , 7 6

"extraordinary rendition" and, 4 3 , 4 5 ,
91

C o m m i t t e e for the Liberation o f Iraq,
316, 319
C o m m u n i s m , as an ideology, 1 9 - 2 0
c o m m u n i t y cooperatives, 4 5 5
Computer Sciences, 293
C o m s u r , 145

funding by for the International
C o m m i s s i o n o f Jurists, 1 1 8
interest o f in the "psychic driving"
experiments, 2 5 - 3 8
links with the Ford Foundation by the,
123

Comverse, 4 3 7
c o n s u m e r i s m , boosterism for, 8 7 , 1 1 5 ,
392
c o n s u m e r products and c h o i c e s , 2 0 ,
5 1 - 5 3 , 180, 267
contracts. See U . S . government

staff losses o f to the private sector, 4 1 7

contracts

torture and the, 1 5 - 1 6 , 3 8 - 4 2 , 4 5 - 4 6

C o n w a y , Bill, 3 1 7

Citibank, 5 6 , 1 5 8 , 1 6 7 , 2 6 6

Corcoran, Terence, 4 4 3 - 4 4

Citicorp, 243

corporatism, 1 5 , 1 8 - 2 0 , 8 6 , 2 9 5 - 9 6 ,

Citigroup, 3 4 6 , 3 9 2 , 4 3 8
Clark, Kathleen, 3 1 8

298-301, 316-17, 354-59, 392-95,
397-405

C l a r k e , Richard, 3 1 5

growing mistrust of, 2 8 0 , 4 4 9

class (social), marked disparities in,

the imposition of, 2 3 0 - 3 1

421-22,440, 441-42,445,462
class distinctions (social), 4 1 3 - 1 6 , 4 1 9 ,
4 3 2 . See also

disaster

reconstruction; wealth, marked
disparities in
"cleansing." See cultures, "cleansing" o f
climate-change, denial of, 4 2 7
Clinton, William J . , 2 2 5 , 2 2 7 , 2 4 8 , 2 5 0 ,
266

international politics as an instrument
of, 3 1 0
private p r o m o t i o n of, 4 2 1 - 2 2
reparations appropriate from acts of,
211-12
See also "hollow" corporations;
multinational

corporations

C o r r , E d w i n , 147
C o r r e a , Rafael, 4 5 2 , 4 5 4 , 4 5 7

administration of, 2 6 6 , 2 9 3
closure ( o f Israel's borders), effects of,
432,433-34

corruption (in corporations)
governments and, 2 7 9 , 3 1 4 - 1 6 ,
319-322,

Coalition Provisional Authority ( C P A ,
Iraq), 3 4 2 , 3 4 8 , 3 5 7 - 5 8
staffing problems of, 3 5 3 - 5 5
Coca-Cola, 275, 320
Codelco,85

355-58,411-12,440,453

ideology and, 2 4 1 , 4 4 5 - 4 7
lawlessness and, 2 4 1 - 4 4
corruption (in government), 1 5 7 - 5 8 ,
162, 1 7 2 - 7 3 , 186, 3 8 9 , 4 4 5 , 4 6 2
b l a m e d for harsh e c o n o m i c o u t c o m e s ,

Cogeneration, 2 7 6
Cohen, Richard, 325
Cohen, Stephen, 2 1 7 , 221

240-41
exposed by e c o n o m i c shock therapy,
278-80

Collins, A n n e , 30

in Iraq, 351

Collision

opportunities for, 2 9 8 - 9 9 , 3 1 4 - 1 6 ,

Course

(Norris), 3 2 8

colonialism, e c o n o m i c exploitation and,
5 5 , 5 7 , 144, 2 4 1 - 4 2 , 2 4 4 - 4 5

411-12
Russian, 2 3 2 - 3 4

540

INDEX

corruption (in society), b l a m e d for harsh
e c o n o m i c situations, 2 4 0 - 4 1
C o u n t e r i n t e l l i g e n c e F i e l d Activity
(CIFA; U.S.), 300

in Poland, 1 7 5 - 7 8
in Russia, 1 5 7 , 2 1 9
in S o u t h Africa, 2 1 1 - 1 3
in Uruguay, 1 5 6

Courtois, S t é p h a n e , 19

debt crisis, 2 5 8 - 5 9 , 4 5 5 . See also debt

C P A . See C o a l i t i o n Provisional Authority
( C P A , Iraq)

(government); interest rates, a key
trigger for disaster capitalism

Creative Associates (education
consulting), 348

debt shock, 1 5 9 - 1 6 1 , 2 1 3 , 2 8 0 , 4 5 3
D e f e n s e Authorization Act ( U . S . , 2 0 0 6 ) ,

Credit Suisse First Boston ( b a n k ) , 2 3 1
crises

308-9
D e f e n s e Policy Board ( U . S . ) , 3 1 6 ,

a u g m e n t i n g the seriousness of, 2 5 8 - 5 9

320-21

efforts urged to e n c o u r a g e , 2 5 5

D e f e n s e Venture Catalyst Initiative, 3 0 0

p r o m o t i n g an a p p e a r a n c e of, 2 6 0 - 6 1

d e h u m a n i z a t i o n , its role in torture,

Crisis C o n s u l t i n g P r a c t i c e , 3 4 4 , 3 6 0
the crisis hypothesis, 141
Cruz, Penelope, 2 4 6
C u b a , 9 4 , 4 5 6 . See also

335-36
de Klerk, F. W . , 1 9 9 - 2 0 0 , 2 0 4 , 2 1 2
de la Parra, M a r c o Antonio, 111

Guantânamo

de la R u a , Fernando, 2 4 4

C u b a n Sugar C a n e C o r p . , 5 9

D e La Rue, 346

C u b i c D e f e n s e Applications, 3 7 9

de V i c e n t i , A z u c e n a , 121

cultures, the " c l e a n s i n g " of, 5 0 , 1 0 4 - 7

democracy

Cunningham, Randy "Duke," 3 1 4
C u s t e r Battles (private security firm), 9
alleged fraud and, 3 5 7 - 5 8

failures o f in Iraq, 3 5 0 - 5 1
first b l o o m s in Iraq, 3 6 2 - 6 3
potentially i n c o m p a t i b l e with freemarket e c o n o m i c s , 1 0 2 - 3 , 1 3 1 - 3 2 ,

Daewoo, 267, 2 7 5 - 7 6

136,140,151,153-54,156,184-85,

DaimlerChrysler Corp., 109

188-89,193, 202-17, 223-31,234,

Daleo, Graciela, 158

239-241,269-71

Daniels, Mitch, 295

the urge for, 1 7 3 - 7 4

Davis, M i k e , 4 1 2

See also "neoliberalism," its antipathy

Davos D i l e m m a , 4 2 3 , 4 2 5 , 4 2 8

to d e m o c r a c y

de Beauvoir, S i m o n e , 1 2 6

D e n g Xiaoping, 1 8 4 , 1 8 9 , 2 3 2 , 2 7 3 , 4 5 1

D e Beers ( C o r p . ) , 2 0 7 - 8

deniability, provision o f for illegal acts,

de Castro, Sergio, 6 2 , 7 0 , 7 7 , 7 9 - 8 1 , 8 5 ,
111
debt (government)
in Argentina, 1 5 6 - 5 9
b a l l o o n i n g of, 1 5 6
in Brazil, 1 5 6 , 1 5 9
Canadian, 2 5 7 - 5 9
in C h i l e , 1 5 7 - 5 8

42
D e p a r t m e n t o f H o m e l a n d Security
(U.S.), 1 3 , 3 0 0 - 3 0 1 , 3 1 4 - 1 5 , 4 1 7 ,
438
depression ( e c o n o m i c ) , 2 6 4 . See
deregulation, 5 6 - 5 7 , 7 7
e n f o r c e m e n t of, 9, 15, 1 6 3 , 167, 1 8 9

in C h i n a , 157

D e s a i , Ashwin, 2 1 0

forgiveness of, 2 4 7

"developmentalism," 5 5 - 5 6 , 4 5 1

a key trigger for disaster capitalism,
1 5 6 , 1 5 9 , 161, 176
in L e b a n o n , 4 6 1
partial relief of, 1 4 4 , 1 6 3 , 1 7 7 , 1 8 0 - 8 1

also

G r e a t Depression

p l a n n e d expansion o f in C h i l e , 6 3 - 6 4
steps taken against, 5 7 - 5 8 , 8 7 - 8 8 , 103
"disappearing," as a terror tool, 9 0 , 1 0 0 ,
152-53,189,191,366

INDEX
disaster apartheid, 4 1 9 , 4 2 1 , 4 4 1 - 4 2
disaster capitalism, 6

541

e c o n o m i c power
disguised as unimportant, 2 9 9 , 311

basic workings of, 17

removed from political control,

conflicts o f interest due to, 4 1 7 - 1 9
G r e e n Z o n e s and, 4 1 4 - 1 5
ideology and, 1 8 - 2 1 , 2 9 , 4 7 - 4 8 ,
1 2 7 - 2 8 , 1 4 0 - 4 1 , 177, 1 8 1 - 8 3 ,
190-91,274-76, 288-89

199-205,211-16
e c o n o m i c shock therapy
"collateral d a m a g e " resulting from,
237-38
for Honduras, 3 9 5

in Iraq, 3 4 4 - 5 9 , 3 7 7 - 7 8 , 3 8 1 - 8 2

for the Maldives, 3 9 9 - 4 0 1

in Sri L a n k a , 3 8 8 - 9 0

perceived i m p o r t a n c e of, 2 5 5 ,

Poland's a b a n d o n m e n t of, 1 9 2 - 9 3
post-Katrina, 4 1 0 - 1 5

362-63
post-9/11,298-99

post-9/11,298,311-12

reaction against, 4 4 7 - 4 9

post-tsunami, 3 9 9 - 4 0 5

for Sri L a n k a , 3 9 4 - 9 5 , 3 9 6 - 9 9

reactions to, 2 7 8 - 7 9

See also corruption (in government);

tactics for, 1 5 5 , 1 6 0 , 1 8 1 - 8 3 , 1 8 7 , 1 9 0 ,

deregulation, e n f o r c e m e n t of;
disaster capitalism; I M F , e c o n o m i c

258-62,311-15
See also capitalism; crises; d e m o c r a c y ,
potentially i n c o m p a t i b l e with free-

s h o c k therapy d e m a n d e d by;
poverty; privatization, e n f o r c e m e n t

market e c o n o m i c s ; "disaster

of; shock therapy; social spending,

capitalism c o m p l e x " ; privatization;

enforced cuts to; wealth; World

"structural adjustment," disaster

B a n k , e c o n o m i c shock therapy

capitalism and

d e m a n d e d by

"disaster capitalism c o m p l e x , " 12, 14,
302,311-12,316-17,

321-22,417,

e c o n o m i c s , 53
c o m p u t e r models of, 51

420,424-28,436,440-42,445,455,

protectionist, 55

460-61,466

"trickle-down" logic and, 2 0 6 , 2 1 4 - 1 5 ,

disaster e c o n o m i c s . See e c o n o m i c s
disaster reconstruction, exclusion o f
victims from participation in,
346-49,359,

399,401-2,412-13

disaster relief, 3 9 7 - 9 9
misappropriation of, 3 2 0 , 3 9 8 - 9 9 ,
410
privatization of, 1 3 - 1 4 , 2 4 2 , 3 4 2

398,445
o f the "security" industry and its
products,

305-7,435-42

See also capitalism; C h i c a g o S c h o o l
( e c o n o m i c orthodoxy); free-market
e c o n o m i e s ; "Washington
C o n s e n s u s " ( e c o n o m i c policies)
Ecuador, 136, 1 5 1 , 4 5 2 , 4 5 4 , 4 5 7

Dobbs, Lou, 266, 4 4 8

Edwards, S e b a s t i a n , 161

Dorgan, Byron, 3 5 6

Eisenberg, Carolyn, 2 5 2

Dossari, J u m a h al-, 4 6

E i s e n h o w e r , Dwight D . , 12, 5 7 - 5 8 , 2 9 0 ,

Doyle, Len, 6 8

310

drug trade, in Bolivia, 150

E l Salvador, 3 7 1 , 4 5 4

Dugard, J o h n , 4 4 2

Elbit, 4 3 8 - 3 9

Dulles, Allen, 58

E l e c t r o n i c D a t a Systems, 2 9 3

Dulles, J o h n Foster, 5 8 , 3 1 0

electroshock

DynCorp, 348, 356, 421

as "therapy," 112 (see also electroshock

Eagleburger, L a w r e n c e , 2 4 9

as torture, 16, 3 8 , 4 1 , 4 6 , 9 2 - 9 4 , 1 0 9 ,

therapy)
East T i m o r , 2 7 8

3 6 7 , 3 7 0 - 7 2 (see also a m n e s i a )

542

INDEX

e l e c t r o s h o c k therapy, 2 5 , 3 1 , 3 5 - 3 7
Elstner, J o h n , 3 0 7

unreliability of, 4 6 5

Emmanuel, Victor, 110
End

of History

and the Last Man,

Fernandez, R o q u e , 1 6 6
The

( F u k u y a m a ) , 182
End

of Poverty,

hollow government and, 4 0 8 - 9 , 4 1 7

The ( S a c h s ) 1 5 3 , 2 3 0

F e r n a n d o , Sarath, 3 9 7
Ferreyra, Lilia, 9 4 , 9 6
Feulner, E d , 2 8 9 , 2 9 5

E n d e r s , David, 4 1 1

Fiat, 1 0 7 , 1 0 9

Enron, 2 4 1 , 2 4 3 , 2 9 6 , 3 6 7 , 4 4 6

Financial

Entergy, 4 1 4

Times

(London), 137, 2 7 8 ,

457

environment

F i r e s t o n e T i r e & Rubber, 141

degradation of, 2 8 0 , 3 9 5 - 9 6 , 4 2 6 - 2 8
protection of, 133
e n v i r o n m e n t a l regulations, assaults
upon, 4 1 0 , 4 2 6

Fischer, Stanley, 2 3 1 , 2 5 3 , 2 6 8 , 2 7 9 , 4 3 5 ,
456
Fleischer, M i c h a e l , 3 4 9 , 355
Fluor, 3 2 0 , 4 1 1 , 4 1 8 - 1 9 , 421

Erhard, Ludwig, 8 2 - 8 3

F o n t a i n e , Arturo, 7 7

Ericson, Richard, 2 4 0

Food and D r u g Administration ( U . S . ) ,

Ericsson, 2 7 5

289, 296

E s c o b a r , F i l e m o n , 153

Forbes,

Espinosa, M a r i a Fernanda, 4 5 4

Ford, Edsel, 1 2 4

231, 241-42, 435

E t c h e c o l a t z , M i g u e l Osvaldo, 1 0 0 , 1 1 0

Ford, Gerald, 2 8 4 , 3 3 0

European Union, 192, 198, 2 3 9

Ford, Henry, 1 2 4

Even-Ezra, Jacob, 4 3 9

Ford Foundation, 6 0 - 6 1 , 6 8 , 1 2 1 - 2 4

Export-Import B a n k . See U . S . ExportImport B a n k
ExxonMobil, 309, 313, 326, 3 4 6 , 4 2 5 ,
427,438

Ford M o t o r C o . , 1 0 7 - 9 , 1 2 3 , 127, 158
foreign aid
potential i m p o r t a n c e of, 2 4 6 , 2 5 4 - 5 5
for Russia, 2 4 7
withholding o f to amplify crises,

Falklands W a r ( 1 9 8 2 ) , 10, 1 3 6 - 4 0 , 1 5 6

258-59, 267-69

farmers, assaults upon, 1 0 9

Fortune,

Farrakhan, L o u i s , 4 2 6

Foundation for H u m a n Rights (South

Fast Company,

420

18, 6 8 , 132, 2 8 5 , 4 3 6 - 3 7

Africa), 2 1 1

Fay, G e n . G e o r g e , 3 7 9

Four Seasons, 3 9 2 , 4 0 0

F B I ( U . S . Federal B u r e a u o f

Fox News, 3 2 1 , 4 2 8

Investigation), 4 4 , 9 9 , 2 9 4 , 3 0 2 - 3 ,

Franco, Francisco, 4 6 3

339,436,438

Frank, André. See G u n d e r Frank, André

F D A . See Food and D r u g Administration
(U.S.)
"fear up," 3 3 3 - 3 4
Federal E m e r g e n c y M a n a g e m e n t
A g e n c y ( U . S . ) . See F E M A

Fraser Institute ( C a n a d a ) , 2 5 7
fraud (in and o f government). See
corruption (in government)
freedom, 5
equated with capitalism, 4 4 8

Federal O i l and G a s C o u n c i l (Iraq), 3 7 7

Friedman's interpretation of, 185

Feierstein, D a n i e l , 9 8

personal and individual, 5 1 - 5 2

Feith, D o u g l a s , 3 2 2

F r e e d o m C h a r t e r ( S o u t h Africa's),

Feitlowitz, Marguerite, 1 1 0 , 127

195-98, 2 0 0 - 2 0 1 , 2 0 3 - 4 , 206,

F E M A (Federal E m e r g e n c y

208-9,212-16,451,458

Management Agency), 2 9 5 , 315,
339,412,421-22,462

Free to Choose
179

( P B S T V miniseries), 1 4 1 ,

INDEX
F r e e d o m o f Information Act ( U . S . ) , 2 8 ,
39-40
free-market e c o n o m i e s , problems seen

543

F r u m , David, 1 1 , 3 4 4 , 4 6 2
F u k u y a m a , Francis, 1 8 , 1 8 2 - 8 4 , 1 9 5 ,
253

with, 5 1 - 5 2
free trade, 14
forced, 1 6 3 - 6 5 , 1 8 3 , 1 8 6 , 2 0 7

Gaidar, Yegor, 2 2 2 - 2 3 , 2 2 5 , 2 2 9 ,
233-34, 342-43, 349

opposition to, 4 4 8

Galbraith, J o h n K e n n e t h , 53

virtues c l a i m e d for, 2 6 6 - 6 7

G a l e a n o , E d u a r d o , 7, 7 3 , 1 0 4 - 5 , 1 1 6 ,

Free Trade Area o f the Americas, 2 7 9 , 4 5 6
Freire, Paulo, 1 0 4
Frente Amplio (Uruguayan coalition
party), 4 4 7
Freud, S i g m u n d , 3 0 , 1 0 4 , 3 7 2
F r i e d m a n , M i l t o n , 14, 8 2 , 1 3 2 , 1 7 1 , 2 3 9 ,
2 5 5 , 2 6 6 , 297, 345,453
anger at Nixon's e c o n o m i c policies,
132-34

453
G a l e n a s Pacifico ( B u e n o s Aires m a l l ) ,
115
G a l t i e r i , G e n . L e o p o l d o , 137
G a n d h i , M . K., 1 2 9
Gardiner, S a m , 3 0 8
G a r n e r , Jay, 3 4 5
G a r t e n , Jeffrey, 2 7 5
Garvey, M a r c u s , 1 9 6

awarded the Nobel Prize, 117

G a r z o n , Judge Baltasar, 102

C h i c a g o S c h o o l e c o n o m i c s and,

gas (natural), 2 2 7 , 2 4 4 , 2 7 6 , 3 5 9 , 4 4 5 ,

50-56

4 5 2 , 4 5 6 . See also oil

death of, 5 1 , 4 4 4

gasoline, 3 4 2 - 4 3 , 4 1 0 . See also oil

disaster capitalism and, 9 - 1 1 , 7 1 ,

G A T T ( G e n e r a l A g r e e m e n t on Tariffs

1 4 0 - 4 1 , 155, 1 5 9 - 6 0 , 2 4 1 - 4 2 ,
298-99
followers of, 6 1 , 1 6 5 , 4 1 0
given an opportunity to test C h i c a g o
School economics, 5 9 - 6 0
idealistic views of, 1 7 - 1 8 , 5 0 - 5 3 ,
56-57, 77, 116, 1 4 4 - 4 5 , 161-62,
201,257, 276-77

and T r a d e ) , 2 0 0 , 2 0 3
G a y o o m , M a u m o o n Abdul, 4 0 0 - 4 0 1
G a z p r o m (Russian energy c o m p a n y ) ,
233,317
G e l b , Leslie, 2 2 8
Gelb, Stephen, 2 0 9
G e n e r a l A g r e e m e n t on Tariffs and Trade.
See

GATT

introduction to, 4 - 7

General Electric, 2 7 5 , 3 1 2 , 4 2 7

mentors Rumsfeld, 2 8 9

G e n e r a l M i l l s (corporation), 141

as merely a " t e c h n i c a l advisor," 113

G e n e r a l Motors C o r p . , 1 0 8 , 1 4 1 , 3 4 6 ,

his responsibility for h u m a n rights

374

violations suggested, 7 3 , 9 9 , 1 1 6 - 1 8 ,

Geneva Conventions, 4 2 - 4 3 , 3 6 8 - 6 9

191,273

g e n o c i d e , interpretations of, 1 0 0 - 1 0 2 ,

shock doctrine and, 7 5 , 8 0 - 8 1 , 8 3 - 8 5 ,

104-7, 114

87,113, 140-41, 164,168, 182-87,

G e o r g e , Susan, 4 4 8

2 2 2 , 2 8 9 , 3 5 1 , 4 1 0 , 4 1 4 (see also

G e r m a n y , post-war reconstruction in,

F r i e d m a n , M i l t o n , disaster
capitalism and)

251-52
Gerrity, Ned, 6 5

urges market "freedoms," 2 0 - 2 1

G e t t y O i l , 141

voting rights and the e c o n o m i c s of,

G e u n a , G r a c i e l a , 107

134-35

Gibson, M c G u i r e , 336

Friedman, Rose, 1 3 5 , 1 8 6

Gilead Sciences, 2 9 0 - 9 1 , 309, 3 1 1 - 1 4

Friedman, T h o m a s , 1 3 , 2 0 7 , 2 7 8 , 3 2 8 ,

Gillerman, Dan, 4 2 9 , 4 4 0

330

G i n g r i c h , Newt, 3 9 3

5U

INDEX

Gittinger, J o h n , 38

Gulfstream, 2 9 0

G i u l i a n i , Rudy, 3 1 5

Gumede, William, 2 0 4 - 5 , 2 0 8 - 9 , 216

G i u l i a n i Partners, 3 1 5

G u n d e r Frank, André, 6 1 , 8 3 - 8 4 , 1 0 4 - 5 ,

Glinski, D m i t r i , 2 2 9
globalization, 1 4 , 8 6 - 8 7 , 2 6 4 - 6 5 , 2 9 9 ,
303,328,

395,402,455,457

c l a i m e d as a sign o f e c o n o m i c health,
266-67,429-30

238, 261
guns-and-caviar. See Davos D i l e m m a
Gusev, Vladimir, 2 3 9
Gusinsky, Vladimir, 4 4 6
G u z z e t t i , C é s a r Augusto, 9 7 , 1 1 3 , 158

praise for, 2 7 8
said to b e inevitable, 2 1 6

Habib, Mamdouh, 4 4

See also

Haggard, S t e p h e n , 1 3 4 , 1 6 9

antiglobalization

Golan Group, 4 3 8

Halimi, G i s è l e , 1 2 6

gold standard, 2 0 7

Halliburton, 13, 3 1 1 , 3 1 3 , 3 1 7 , 3 2 2 , 3 4 7 ,

Goldberg, Jonah, 4 0 9
G o l d e n , Bill, 3 0 5

355,413,455
government, guaranteed loans to, 2 9 2

Goldman Sachs, 243

Iraq contracts for, 3 7 9 , 381

G o n z a l e s , Alberto, 4 3

military base operations by, 3 4 8 , 3 5 9

G o o d Harbor C o n s u l t i n g , 3 1 5

military roles played by, 291

Gorbachev, Mikhail, 174, 176, 180, 182,
218-21,223,

225-26,450

Gordon, Michael, 363
G o r i n , Grigory, 2 1 8
G o t t l i e b , Sidney, 3 8

overcharging by, 3 3 7
profits to from military spending, 2 8 5 ,
291-92
See also Brown & R o o t
Hamas, 327, 4 4 0

Goulart, Joâo, 6 3 , 6 6

Hamdan, Kamal, 4 5 9

Graham, Douglas, 319

Hammes, Thomas, 352

G r a h a m , Patrick, 3 5 2

Hani, C h r i s , 2 0 5

G r a n d m o t h e r s o f the Plaza de M a y o

Hansol, 2 7 7

(Argentina), 1 1 4
G r e a t Depression, 1 0 , 2 0 , 5 4 , 5 7 , 8 7 ,
141,265

Harberger, Arnold, 4 9 , 5 3 , 6 1 , 6 4 , 6 9 , 8 0 ,
84, 87, 113, 117, 134, 1 6 1 , 1 6 5
Harbury, Jennifer, 4 2

greed ( e c o n o m i c ) , 1 2 9 , 2 3 5 , 2 4 0 , 3 0 3 ,
351

Hariri, Rafiq, 4 6 0
Harper's,

352

G r e e n s p a n , Alan, 2 6 8

Harris, J o h n , 2 9 7

Green Zone, 46, 292, 341-43, 348, 353,

Harrold, Peter, 3 9 2

356,358,

364-66,411,413-14

for c o m m u n i t i e s , 4 2 0 - 2 2 , 4 4 1
Grinspun, Ricardo, 149

Harvard Institute for International
Development, 2 2 3 , 2 3 4
Harvey, David, 190

Gross, D a n i e l , 2 8 3

H a t o u m , Raida, 4 6 2

G r o s s m a n , Steven, 4 3 6

Haveman, James, 3 5 4

G u a n t â n a m o (prison), 13, 2 6 , 4 4 - 4 5 , 9 3 ,
113,338
Guardian

(London), 399

Guatemala

Hay, Jonathan, 2 3 4
Hayek, Friedrich von, 17, 5 3 - 5 4 , 8 4 ,
131-32, 135-36, 138, 222
Health Net, 3 8 0

C I A operations in, 5 9

H e b b , Dr. D o n a l d , 3 4 - 3 6 , 3 9 - 4 1

torture in, 4 1

Heldreth, Gary, 4 1 2

Guevara, C h e , 6 4 , 1 0 4 , 1 5 5 , 1 9 8 , 4 4 3

Heller, Walter, 6 2

G u i d o t t i , Pablo, 1 6 6

Helms, Richard, 6 4

INDEX
Help Jet ( e m e r g e n c y vacations

firm),

415-16
Hemingway, Ernest, 155
Heritage Foundation, 14, 2 5 5 , 2 8 9 , 2 9 5 ,

545

Hussein, S a d d a m , 1 2 5 , 2 4 0 , 3 1 3 ,
318-19, 329, 334-36, 342-44, 351,
361, 366, 370, 372
Hyundai, 2 6 7

355,410
Hersh, S e y m o u r , 3 2 0 - 2 1

IAP Worldwide Services I n c . , 3 8 0

Hewlett-Packard, 2 7 5

I B M , 158

Hezbollah, 3 2 7 , 4 1 7 , 4 4 0 , 4 6 0

ideologies, the dangers of, 1 9 - 2 1

aids L e b a n e s e recovery, 4 6 1 - 6 2
Hillman, G e r a l d , 3 2 0 , 3 2 2

I M F (International M o n e t a r y F u n d ) , 6,
9 - 1 0 , 6 7 , 1 4 7 , 1 5 5 - 5 6 , 159, 161-67,

Hirsekorn, R i c k , 4 2 2

176-77, 181, 183, 194, 198,

HIV. See A I D S

2 0 0 - 2 0 1 , 2 0 3 , 2 1 6 , 2 1 9 - 2 0 , 226,

Hollinger International, 4 4 6

231, 233, 239, 242, 244, 247, 249,

hollow corporations, 2 8 5

2 5 3 - 5 4 , 2 6 0 - 7 9 , 328, 343, 352, 393,

hollow government, 2 9 4 , 2 9 8 , 4 1 8
in Iraq, 3 4 8 , 3 5 4 , 3 5 8 - 5 9
hollow wars, 2 9 8
homelessness, 1 3 5 , 2 3 8 , 3 8 5
Honduras, torture and assassinations in,

396,446,456-57
its Asia-Crisis therapy b o o m e r a n g s ,
272
c l a i m s credit for handling the Asia
Crisis, 2 7 6

38,41

crisis a u g m e n t a t i o n by the, 2 6 0 - 6 2

Honeywell, 3 1 2

e c o n o m i c shock therapy d e m a n d e d

H o n g Kong, 1 3 4 , 1 8 5 - 8 6 , 4 2 9
Hoover Institution, 2 6 6

by, 1 6 3 , 1 6 5 , 1 8 3 , 2 1 6 , 2 1 9 - 2 0 , 2 2 6 ,
231,242, 247, 266-71

Horgan, David, 3 6 0

founding principles of, 1 6 2 - 6 3

Horner, G e n . C h u c k , 3 2 9

government debts owed to, 1 5 6

Howard, J o h n , 6 8

holds Poland's e c o n o m y at ransom,

H S B C (bankers), 3 4 6 , 3 7 4
h u m a n rights
abuses o f in Iraq, 3 6 4 , 3 6 6 - 7 2

176
in Iraq, 3 4 3
antipathy to d e m o c r a c y in the, 2 7 0

defined conveniently, 1 1 7 - 1 8 , 123

neoconservatives working at, 1 6 1 , 2 0 0

grassroots international m o v e m e n t for,

opposition to the, 2 7 9 - 8 0

118-19

powers within and over the, 2 6 9

U N Universal D e c l a r a t i o n of, 1 1 8 , 121

state opposition to the, 4 5 6 - 5 7

u n e x a m i n e d motives for abuses of,

See also I n d e p e n d e n t Evaluation

119-25
versus politics and e c o n o m i c s , 1 2 5 - 2 6
H u m a n Rights W a t c h , 3 6 7 - 6 8 , 3 7 0
humiliation, 2 7 0 , 3 6 8
backlash following, 4 5 0
torture and, 1 1 2 - 1 1 3 , 3 6 7 - 6 8
Hunt O i l , 3 2 0
Huntington, S a m u e l , 1 3 6
Hurricane Katrina 5, 6, 8, 3 1 5 , 4 0 6 ,

Office ( o f the I M F )
Imperial

Life in the Emerald

City

(Chandrasekaran), 338
I n d e p e n d e n t Evaluation Office ( o f the
I M F ) , report of, 2 7 3
index, puzzling self-reference to, 5 4 5
India, post-tsunami e c o n o m i c effects in,
399
Indonesia

408-15,417-18, 421-22,426,438,

aftermath o f the 1 9 6 5 c o u p in, 6 7 - 7 0

462

e c o n o m i c depression in, 2 6 4 - 6 6

reconstruction following, 4 6 5 - 6 6
Hurricane M i t c h , 3 9 5 - 9 6

post-tsunami e c o n o m i c effects in, 3 9 9
yields to I M F d e m a n d s , 2 6 9 - 7 1

546

INDEX

inflation

Iraq, 1 2 6 , 2 2 4 , 2 3 4

in Argentina, 1 6 0 - 6 1

civilian casualties in, 3 5 0

in Bolivia, 1 4 3 , 1 4 8

civilian prisoners in, 3 6 6

in C h i l e , 7, 7 9 , 85

d e m o c r a c y ordered stopped in, 3 6 3 - 6 5

in G e r m a n y , 1 4 3 - 4 4

disappearance of, 3 7 3 - 7 4

hidden sources of, 2 6 4 - 6 6

e c o n o m i c shocks to, 3 4 2 - 5 4 , 3 6 0 - 6 1

a key trigger for disaster capitalism,

failed reconstruction in, 3 4 9 - 5 9

155,259-60

kidnappings in, 3 7 3

low values o f seen as primary, 50

life on the ground in, 3 2 5 - 2 7

in Poland, 175

looting o f and in, 3 3 6 - 3 7

seen as a sign o f market restrictions,
5 1 , 7 9 , 8 1 , 113

military operations in, 3 3 4 - 3 5
m i s m a n a g e m e n t o f war in, 4 4 4

in T h a t c h e r ' s U . K . , 135

new constitution for, 3 5 2

in the U . S . , 1 3 3 , 141

oil ownership in, 3 7 6 - 7 7

information t e c h n o l o g y services ( U . S .
government), privatization of, 2 9 3
Innovative E m e r g e n c y M a n a g e m e n t ,
409
Inspector G e n e r a l ' s Office ( U . S . ) ,
investigates fraud in Iraq, 3 5 7
Instinctive S h o o t i n g International, 4 3 8
Institute for Policy Studies ( W a s h i n g t o n ) ,
98

religious conflict in, 3 5 0 , 3 5 9
selected for invasion, 3 2 9 - 3 0
the shock doctrine in, 7
shock experienced by contrasted to
that o f Russia, 2 3 9 - 4 1
troop "surge" in, 3 7 6
See also Coalition Provisional
Authority
Iraq (government), debt relief and the,

Institute o f G l o b a l i z a t i o n Studies
(Moscow), 227

317-18
Iraq Study G r o u p , 3 1 7 , 3 7 6

i n s u r a n c e industry, 14, 3 4 4

Iraqi Governing C o u n c i l , 3 6 2 , 3 6 4

Inter-American D e v e l o p m e n t B a n k ,

Israel

158

closures and, 4 3 3

Interbrew, 2 7 5

conflict in, 1 2 6

interest rates, a key trigger for disaster

e c o n o m i c s o f violence in, 4 2 8 - 2 9

capitalism, 1 5 9 , 2 5 7
International C o m m i s s i o n o f Jurists, 1 1 8
International H o m e l a n d S e c u r i t y
Conference, 4 3 6

as a G r e e n Z o n e , 4 4 1 - 4 2
high-tech e c o n o m i c s in, 4 3 2 , 4 3 4 - 3 5
military spending in, 4 3 5
politics o f security e c o n o m i c s in, 4 3 9

International L a b o r Organization, 2 7 2

Russian migration to, 4 3 0 - 3 1

International M o n e t a r y F u n d . See I M F

social and political unrest in, 4 2 8 - 3 4

International N i c k e l C o . , 5 9
International R e p u b l i c a n Institute, 3 6 4

Jackson, B r u c e , 3 1 9 , 3 2 2

International S e c u r i t y Instructors, 4 3 8

Jackson, M i c h a e l P., 4 1 7

International T e l e p h o n e and Telegraph

Jara, V i c t o r , 1 0 4 - 5

(ITT), 6 4 - 6 6 , 78, 88, 320
interrogation, privatized, 3 0 4 - 5
intolerance, rising levels of, 2 6 4 , 3 5 0 ,
448-49

Jaruzelski, G e n . W o j c i e c h , 1 7 4
Jeppesen International Trip Planning,
304
Jiang Z e m i n , 1 8 6

InVision, 4 2 7

J o h n Paul I I , Pope, 172

Iqbal,Asif, 3 3 9

J.P. M o r g a n & C o m p a n y , 5 9 , 167, 2 7 4

Iran, 4 1 , 1 3 6

Juakali, E n d e s h a , 4 1 5 , 4 6 5

INDEX
Kaczyriski, Jaroslaw, 4 4 9

Kumara, H e r m a n , 3 9 5

Kaczyriski, L e c h , 4 4 9

Kumaratunga, C h a n d r i k a , 3 9 4

Kadane, Kathy, 6 7

Kumari, 3 8 5 , 387, 3 8 9 - 9 0 , 3 9 8

Kagarlitsky, Boris, 2 2 7 - 2 9

Kupperman, Charles, 319

Kaifu, Toshiki, 2 1 9

Kurnaz, Murat, 4 6

Kalaiselvam, Seenivasagam, 3 8 9 - 9 0

Kuwait, 2 3 2 , 3 1 7 - 1 8 , 3 2 8 , 3 5 6 , 3 7 5 ,

547

379-80

Kapur, Ajay, 392
Kastner, G a i l , 2 5 - 3 0 , 3 2 , 4 6 - 4 8 , 4 6 3
Kastner, Zella, 2 8

laissez-faire e c o n o m i c s . See capitalism;

Katrina. See H u r r i c a n e Katrina

C h i c a g o S c h o o l ; corporatism (in

Kawzally, S a s e e n , 4 6 2

government); disaster capitalism

Kellogg Brown and R o o t ( K B R ) , 3 2 2 ,
410,413

L a m y , Pascal, 4 4 8
land reform, 1 3 6 , 1 4 4 - 4 5

Kellogg's, 2 8 9

farmers' attempts to achieve, 6 3 , 1 0 9 ,

Kelly, M a r t i n , 4 0 9

127

Kelly, Roberto, 7 0

S o u t h African promise of, 1 9 7 , 1 9 9 ,

Kennedy, Cyril J . C , 2 5

203,214-15

Kenyon, 4 1 1

Landless Peoples M o v e m e n t ( M S T ,

Keyes, Derek, 2 0 2

Brazil), 4 5 5

Keynes, J o h n Maynard, 17, 2 0 , 54, 5 9 ,
141, 1 4 3 - 4 4 , 151, 1 5 3 , 1 6 2 - 6 3 , 2 4 6 ,
252, 264, 2 9 5 , 4 0 5

Laor, Yitzhak, 4 4 0
Larroulet, Cristiân, 7 8
Lawson, Nigel, 1 3 9

Keynesianism, 17, 5 3 - 5 6 , 5 8 - 5 9 , 1 3 1 ,

Lay, K e n , 4 4 6

1 4 3 - 4 5 , 1 4 9 , 153, 1 8 2 , 2 5 0 - 5 3 ,

Leahy, Patrick, 3 0 9

297-98, 354

Lebanon, 1 8 2 , 4 4 0

its opposition from C h i c a g o S c h o o l

resistance to shock therapy in,

neoconservatives, 5 3 , 5 5 - 5 6 , 7 8 , 133

460-62

Khodorkovsky, M i k h a i l , 2 3 3 , 4 4 6

Ledeen, Michael, 2 8 1 , 3 2 8 - 2 9

Kia Motors, 2 7 4

Letelier, F r a n c i s c o , 6 5

kidnappings, 4 5 , 9 0 - 9 1 , 9 4 , 1 0 0 - 1 0 1 ,

Letelier, O r l a n d o , 6 5 , 7 1 , 7 6 , 8 6 , 9 8 ,

107-9, 112, 152, 1 7 9 , 3 0 4 , 4 1 4
surges o f in Iraq, 3 7 3

211,444
assassination of, 9 8 - 1 0 0 , 1 1 6 - 1 7

Kinzer, Stephen, 3 0 9 - 1 0 , 3 1 3

Lewis, Anthony, 1 1 6

Kirchner, Nestor, 4 5 2 , 4 5 7

LexisNexis, 4 2 7

Kissinger, Henry, 6 5 , 8 8 - 8 9 , 9 7 , 1 5 8 ,

Lexus

189,316,319-22,330-31,451

and the Olive

Tree,

The

(Friedman), 2 7 8

Kissinger Associates, 3 2 0

L G , 267, 275

Klein, Fritz, 1 1 4

L G Energy, 2 7 5

Knight, Frank, 50

Lighthouse Disaster Relief, 4 1 2

Kongwatmai, Ratree, 4 6 4

Likud Party (Israel), 4 3 5

Kowalik, Tadeusz, 193

Lipton, David, 1 7 7 , 2 6 9

KPMG, 348,355,359

Lipton, E r i c , 3 1 4

Krueger, A n n e , 2 5 4

Livingston, K e n , 4 4 9
Liwsky, Norberto, 1 1 0

Krugman, Paul, 4 0 9
Kubark

Counterintelligence

Interrogation

lobbyists ( U . S . ) , increased numbers o f

(handbook), 3 9 - 4 2 , 4 8 , 7 1 , 9 2 , 3 2 3 ,

seeking government contracts,

368-69

301-2

548

INDEX

Lobov, O l e g , 2 3 2

the Marshall Plan, 2 1 6 , 2 4 9 - 5 2 , 3 4 6 - 4 7 ,

L o c k h e e d M a r t i n (defense contractor),
293,311,319, 321-22, 381,420,
424-25

350-51
M a r s h & M c L e n n a n (insurance
company), 344

L O G C A P (privatization program), 2 9 1

M a r t e n s , Robert J . , 6 7

Lone, Salim, 364

M a r t i n e s Soler, José Antonio, 4 6 3

Lonely

M a r t i n e z de Hoz, José Alfredo, 8 8 - 8 9 ,

Planet

(travel guide), 3 8 6

L o n g , Huey, 2 5 1

1 0 9 , 157

looting. See Iraq, looting o f and in

M a r x , Karl, 1 0 4

L o p e z , Jorge Julio, 1 0 0

M a r x i s m ( e c o n o m i c orthodoxy), 53

Los Angeles

Times,

240

Loser, C l a u d i o , 1 6 2 , 1 6 6

state-amplified fears of, 5 9 , 7 9 , 9 6 ,
100, 110, 208

Lourie, Richard, 2 4 0

Massera, Admiral, 9 6 , 4 4 5

Lowy Fred, 3 7 2

Mattis, J i m , 3 6 3

L-3 C o m m u n i c a t i o n s , 3 7 9 , 4 1 6

M a u , Vladimir, 2 2 4

L u c e n t Industries, 3 1 5

Mayet, Ike, 2 0 1

Lukoil (Russia), 3 4 6

Mayfield, J a m e s , 3 4 9

L u l a da Silva, L u i z Inâcio, 4 5 1

Mazowiecki, Tadeusz, 1 7 5 , 1 8 0 , 193

L y o n n a i s e des E a u x , 2 7 6

Mbeki, Thabo, 199, 2 0 4 - 5 , 2 0 8 - 1 1 , 213,
4 5 1 . S e e also Thabo

Maass, Peter, 3 7 0
M a c h e l , S a m o r a , 197

Battle

M c C o y , Alfred W . , 4 1

M a d h i Army ( S h i a , Iraq), 3 5 9

McDonald's, 346

M a d r e s o f the Plaza de M a y o

M c G e h e e , Ralph, 6 9

Magal, 4 3 8 - 3 9

and the
ANC

(Gumede)

M a c h i a v e l l i , N i c c o l ô , 7, 75

(Argentina), 1 2 0

Mbeki

for the Soul of the

M c G i l l University, 2 6 , 2 8 - 2 9 , 3 4 - 3 5 ,
4 0 - 4 1 , 4 9 , 92, 368

M a h d i Army, 3 5 9 , 3 6 5 , 3 7 8 , 4 1 7

M C I C o m m u n i c a t i o n s Corp., 2 4 3

M a h m o u d , Faraj, 3 7 0

Mclntyre, Jamie, 334

Major, John, 2 1 9 , 275

M c P h e r s o n , Peter, 3 3 7

M a k e D e m o c r a c y Work ( S o u t h Africa
plan), 2 4 0 - 4 1 2 0 0 - 2 0 1
Malaysia

M c Q u a i g , Linda, 257
media ( c o m m u n i c a t i o n s ) , links to
disaster capitalists, 4 2 7

e c o n o m i c depression in, 2 6 5

Meisner, M a u r i c e , 1 8 5 , 1 8 9

e c o n o m i c success of, 2 6 7

M e l t z e r , Allan, 1 3 4 - 3 5 , 1 4 0

resists d e m a n d s o f I M F , 2 6 8

Menatep (bank), 233

Maldives, post-tsunami e c o n o m i c effects
in, 3 9 9 - 4 0 1
M a n d e l a , Nelson, 1 9 4 - 9 5 , 1 9 7 - 9 9 ,
203-9,212,216,

M e n e m , Carlos, 1 6 5 , 1 6 7 - 6 8 , 2 4 3 - 4 4 , 2 5 9
M e r c e d e s - B e n z C o r p . , 7 8 , 1 0 9 , 158
mercenary soldiers, in Iraq, 3 7 9 , 381
Merrill L y n c h & C o . , 2 7 4

M a n u e l , Trevor, 2 0 7

Merry, W a y n e , 2 3 4

M a o Tse-tung, 1 7 4 , 1 8 5 , 1 8 9

M e x i c o , unpopularity o f a corporatist

Marais, H e i n , 4 0 6

state in, 4 5 2

M a r c o s , Ferdinand E . , 1 2 5 , 1 6 0

M i c h a e l D . Brown L L C , 3 1 5

marketing, merged with intelligence

M i c h n i k , Adam, 1 7 8

gathering, 3 0 3 , 3 0 5 - 7
Marks, J o h n , 3 0

Microsoft, 5 2 5 , 2 9 3 , 3 0 1 , 4 3 6
as a m o d e l m o d e r n corporation, 2 8 5

INDEX
Mikhailov, Aleksandr, 2 3 8

Murrow, Edward R., 2 9 0

Milbank, Dana, 297

Musa, Yasmine, 332

military activity, privatization of, 1 2 - 1 4

Mussa, M i c h a e l , 1 6 6

Military C o m m i s s i o n s A c t ( U . S . , 2 0 0 6 ) ,

Mussolini, B e n i t o , 8 6

43
the military-industrial c o m p l e x , 12, 2 9 0 ,

549

Muttitt, G r e g , 3 7 6
Mydans, S e t h , 4 6 3

424
M i l k e n Institute, 2 6 6

Namibia, 182

Miller, Geoffrey, 3 6 7

Nasr, Hassan Mustafa O s a m a , 4 5

Miller, T . C h r i s t i a n , 2 9 1

Nasrallah, Sheik Hassan, 4 6 2

Milne, Seumas, 138

Nation,

Milosvic, S l o b o d a n , 3 2 8

National Counterterrorism C e n t e r ( U . S ) ,

Minihan, Ken, 300
m i n i m u m wage, 5 3 , 57, 1 4 9 , 2 0 3 . See
also wages
Miranda, Juan, 9 3
Mitrione, D a n , 9 2
M K U l t r a (project/manual), 3 3 , 3 8 - 3 9 ,
4 1 . See also "psychic driving"
Modzelewski, Karol, 192

The, 9 9 , 3 1 8

304
National D e f e n s e University, 3 2 9
National G u a r d ( U . S . ) , troops of, 4 , 2 8 5 ,
309
National Institute for P u b l i c Policy
(U.S.), 427
National Party ( o f S o u t h Africa),
199-202, 205

Moffit, R o n n i , 9 9

National

Mohamad, Mahathir, 2 6 8

National S e c u r i t y A g e n c y ( U . S . ) , 3 0 0 ,

monetary crises
in Bolivia, 1 4 2 - 4 3
seen as opportunities for c h a n g e , 1 4 0
in South Africa, 2 0 6 - 7 , 2 0 9

Post, ( C a n a d a ) , 4 4 3

303
nationalization o f industries, 5 5 , 6 3 ,
8 5 - 8 6 , 1 4 4 , 195
Naylor, C o l i n , 1 3 9

Monsanto, 127, 2 8 9

N B C (broadcast network), 4 2 7

M o n t Pèlerin Society, 5 4 , 85

N e i m a n , Vitaly, 2 2 9

the M o n t o n e r o movement, 6 3 , 9 4 ,

neoconservatism, 1 1 , 1 5 , 2 5 3

9 6 - 9 7 , 107
Moody's, 2 5 7
Morales, E v o , 1 5 0 , 4 4 3 , 4 5 2 - 5 4 , 4 5 7

basic tenets guiding, 5 6 - 5 7
See also

"neoliberalism"

"neoliberalism," 14, 2 5 3

M o r g a n Stanley, 2 6 6 - 6 7 , 2 7 4 , 2 7 6

as brutal, 9 5 - 9 6 , 4 0 8

Mormon Church, 349, 363

greed and, 2 4 0 - 4 1

Mossadegh, M o h a m m a d , 5 8 - 5 9

lawlessness and, 2 4 1

Motorola, 2 7 6

reactions against, 2 7 8 - 7 9 , 4 4 8 - 4 9 ,

Mozambique, 197, 1 9 9 , 2 1 3
MPRI,417
Mulroney, Brian, 2 1 9
multinational corporations

455,459
u n i n t e n d e d c o n s e q u e n c e s o f ignored
by, 2 7 8
See also C h i c a g o S c h o o l ( e c o n o m i c

interests of, 5 6 - 5 7

orthodoxy); d e m o c r a c y , potentially

opposed by S u k a r n o , 6 7

i n c o m p a t i b l e with free-market

opposition to Allende a m o n g , 6 4 , 7 0

economics,

Muravchik, Joshua, 3 2 8

Neruda, Pablo, 1 0 4

murder rates, in Russia, 2 3 8

Nestlé, 2 7 5

Murillo, Inès, 3 8 - 3 9

Netanyahu, B e n j a m i n , 4 3 5

Murray, Hugh, 2 0 8

Netjets, 4 2 0

550

INDEX

Nevzlin, L e o n i d , 4 4 6

Office o f G o v e r n m e n t E t h i c s ( U . S . ) , 312

New Age S e c u r i t y S o l u t i o n s , 4 3 7

Office o f R e c o n s t r u c t i o n and

New Bridge Strategies, 3 1 6 , 3 3 9 , 3 7 4 , 4 1 1
New D e a l (post-Depression), 17, 2 0 , 5 4 ,
56-57,251

appropriation o f access to and control

New O r l e a n s

over, 15, 19, 1 2 2 , 3 1 3 , 3 2 6 , 3 4 5 ,

its fate seen as a national portent, 4 2 1 ,

377,410
exploitation of, 2 3 3 - 3 4 , 3 4 6 , 3 7 7

441
loss o f p u b l i c schools in, 5
post-Katrina, 4 0 6 - 1 5
New York Times,

5, 1 0 , 3 8 , 4 3 , 8 4 , 1 4 3 ,

151,202, 262, 275,278, 299,314,
317, 370
New York Times
New Yorker,

Iraq as a desirable source for, 3 1 3 , 3 2 6 ,
3 2 9 , 3 4 5 , 361

survivor wishes c o n c e r n i n g , 9

Newsweek,

Stabilization ( U . S . ) , 381
oil, 6 9 , 3 4 2

nationalized control over, 2 0 , 5 5 , 5 8 ,
88, 166
the pricing of, 1 3 3 , 1 4 5 , 147, 4 2 4 - 2 5 ,
456

Magazine,

The, 3 7 0

179, 248, 304, 320
1 1 7 , 2 3 0 , 341

N G O s , 236, 391, 397, 3 9 9 , 4 0 3 , 4 1 8 , 4 6 4
as disaster capitalism scapegoats,
403-4

privatization o f control over, 167,
232-33,243,271,345
profits m a d e from, 2 3 3 - 3 4 , 2 4 2 , 2 8 8 ,
313,328, 346,425-26
oil industry, 14, 3 0 9 , 3 1 3 , 3 4 6 , 4 2 5 - 2 7 .
See also names

Nicaragua, 1 3 6 , 3 9 5 - 9 6 , 4 5 2 , 4 5 7
N i c e Systems, 4 3 7

.

of specific

O l i n , J o h n M . , 183

N i j a m (Sri L a n k a n fisherman), 4 0 2

Oliver, David, 3 4 5

Nike, as a m o d e l m o d e r n hollow

O l m o s G a o n a , Alejandro, 167

corporation, 2 8 5 , 4 1 8

oil

companies

O'Neill, Paul, 3 8 3

Nissan, 2 7 5

One Percent

Nitisastro, W i d j o j o , 2 7 1

"open land," 4 0 2

Nixon, R i c h a r d , 6 3 - 6 5 , 6 9 , 8 1 , 2 8 3 , 4 5 1

O p e r a ç à o L i m p e z a (Brazil), 1 0 4

e c o n o m i c actions of, 1 3 2 - 3 3

Doctrine,

The (Suskind), 332

Operation Bandeirantes. See O B A N

N o b o a , Âlvaro, 4 5 2

"Operation C o n d o r , " 9 1 , 102

Nogueira, Ana, 4 6 2

O p p e n h e i m e r , Harry, 2 0 8

Norilsk N i c k e l , 2 3 2

O p t i o n , Edward Jr., 30

Norquist, Grover, 4 4 6

Ortega, D a n i e l , 4 5 2

Norris, J o h n , 3 2 8

Ortiz, D i a n n a , 4 2

North Korea, acquires n u c l e a r

Orwell, G e o r g e , 23

technology, 2 9 0
Northrop G r u m m a n , 2 9 3 , 3 1 2

O s l o P e a c e Accords (Israeli-Palestinian),
429-32

Novak, Roger, 2 9 9

Overthrow

Novak Biddle Venture Partners, 2 9 9

"ownership society," 8 4 , 1 3 5 , 2 9 4

Novartis, 2 7 5

Oxfam, 4 0 3

Nunca

Mais

(Argentina c o m m i s s i o n

(Kinzer), 3 0 9

Oxford R e s e a r c h International, 3 5 0

report), 1 0 7 . See also Brazil: Never
Again

Pacific Architects and E n g i n e e r s , 381
Padayachee, V i s h n u , 2 0 0 - 2 0 2 , 2 0 5 , 2 1 6

O B A N (Operation B a n d e i r a n t e s ) , 1 0 8

Padilla, José, 4 4

O c h s n e r M e d i c a l C e n t e r (New O r l e a n s ) ,

Page-Russell, 3 2 , 3 5 , 4 1

407-8

Paladin Capital G r o u p , 3 1 5

INDEX
Palestine, the conflict in, 1 2 6 , 4 2 9 , 4 3 9
Palestinian people and e c o n o m y , 3 2 7 ,
431,433,441-42,461
Pan American Airways, 8 8
Panitchpakdi, S u p a c h a i , 2 7 0

P i n o c h e t , G e n . Augusto, 7, 1 0 4 , 1 2 2 ,
131, 156, 2 2 0 , 2 2 3 , 2 2 9 , 2 3 2 , 2 4 7 ,
273,351,445-446,450
advised by F r i e d m a n as e c o n o m y
worsens, 8 0 - 8 3

Paris, R o l a n d , 4 0 4

death of, 8 5 , 1 0 0

Parsons, 3 4 7 - 4 8 , 3 5 5 , 4 1 0

forced to retreat e c o n o m i c a l l y , 85

patents

overthrows his military rivals, 7 8

controversy over laws regarding,
290-91
misuse of, 2 4 2

his reign o f terror, 7 7 - 7 8 , 8 9 - 9 0 ,
92-93,99-100,105-6
his "war" on Allende, 7 5 - 7 6

Patinkin, D o n , 5 2 , 2 5 9

Pipes, R i c h a r d , 2 4 0

Patriot Act ( U . S . ) , constitutionality of, 3 0 6

Platform, 3 7 6

Patterson, Albion, 5 9 - 6 0 , 1 0 4

Pohanka, B o b , 3 0 0

Pavlovsky, Eduardo, 1 0 9

Poland, 1 7 1 - 1 8 2 , 1 8 6 , 1 9 1 - 9 3 , 2 1 9 ,

Paz Estenssoro, V i c t o r , 1 4 3 , 1 4 5 - 4 6 , 1 5 0 ,
152,451
p e a c e , e c o n o m i c disincentives for, 4 4 1
Peace C o m m i t t e e ( C h i l e ) , 1 2 0
p e a c e k e e p i n g (international), 1 2 - 1 3 ,
380,418
Pelosky, Jay, 2 6 6 - 6 7 , 2 7 4
pension funds, 150
S o u t h African injustice and, 2 5 5 - 5 6 ,
212-13
pension plans, 9 6 , 3 0 1 , 8 3 , 2 5 1
privatization of, 57, 1 6 7 , 2 4 3 , 2 9 4 , 4 4 9
PepsiCo, 141
Peres, S h i m o n , 4 3 0
Perle, R i c h a r d , 3 1 5 - 1 6 , 3 2 0 - 2 2 , 3 4 4
Perôn, Isabel, 8 7
Peron, Juan, 5 5 , 6 3 , 9 4 , 1 0 3 , 1 4 5 , 165
Perry, Jamar, 3 - 4 , 17
Perry, Jeff (pseudonym), 3 6 8 - 6 9

551

2 4 7 - 4 8 , 2 5 4 , 342
paraded as successful free-economy, 193
rejects effects o f shock therapy, 2 2 7 ,
448-49
Polanyi, Karl, 2 3
political donations, hollow government
and, 3 4 8 , 4 1 2
Ponce, William, 367
Popov, Gavriil, 2 2 2
Porsche, 3 9 2
Potanin, Vladimir, 2 3 3
Pou, Pedro, 1 6 6
poverty, 5 4 - 5 5 , 6 6 , 1 4 4 , 1 5 3 , 1 6 2 , 2 1 5 ,
279,336,433,440
created by e c o n o m i c shock therapy,
82, 86, 89, 9 5 - 9 6 , 119, 168, 179,
191-92, 2 2 4 - 2 5 , 2 3 7 - 3 9 , 272
indifference to, 6 1 - 6 2

See also

disaster capitalism; wealth

Peru, 1 0 1 , 1 3 6 , 1 5 1 , 2 5 4

Powergen, 2 7 5

Peters, R a l p h , 3 5 0

Prado, F e r n a n d o , 147

Peters, T o m , 2 8 5

Prebisch, Raul, 55, 59

Pfizer C h e m i c a l , 6 5

price shocks, developing countries and,

p h a r m a c e u t i c a l industry, military
protections for the, 3 0 9
Philippines, the

159
PricewaterhouseCoopers, 3 9 6
Prince, Erik, 378

e c o n o m i c depression in, 2 6 5

prison psychology, 2 1 0

torture in, 4 1

prisons

yield to I M F demands, 2 6 8
Phillip Morris C o . , 127
Phuket, Indonesia, 3 8 6
Pinera, José, 7 8 , 8 4 , 2 5 4 , 2 6 7 - 6 8 , 2 9 4

abuse allowed in, 2 9 4
privatization of, 2 8 8 , 2 9 4
private enterprise, i m p o r t a n c e attached
to, 5

552

INDEX

privatization, 57, 7 9

recruiting (military), privatization of, 3 8 0

beneficiaries of, 1 2 - 1 3

Red Cross, 4 5 , 2 8 8 , 3 6 8 , 3 7 0 , 4 1 6

corruption and, 2 4 3

Red Herring,

e n f o r c e m e n t of, 9 - 1 1 , 15, 1 6 3 ,

Reddaway, Peter, 2 2 9

166-67, 180, 1 8 3 , 1 8 6 , 2 0 9 , 223,
2 3 0 , 2 3 2 - 3 3 , 2 4 7 , 2 5 9 , 276

303

R e d l e n e r , Irwin, 3 1 6
R e e d , Adolph Jr., 4 0 9

growing mistrust of, 2 7 9 - 8 0

Regaining

in G u a t e m a l a , 3 9 6

"rendition" o f "persons o f interest," 3 0 4 ,

Sri Lanka

(program), 3 9 3 - 9 4

hidden costs of, 2 9 6

3 0 6 , 3 3 3 . See also C I A ,

in Honduras, 3 9 5

"extraordinary rendition" and

in Iraq, 3 4 2 , 3 4 8 , 3 5 3 , 3 5 5 , 3 7 7
in Israel, 4 4 0

R e n u k a (Sri L a n k a n tsunami survivor),
398, 462

in L e b a n o n , 4 5 9

Repsol, 167

in Nicaragua, 3 9 6

R e s e a r c h Triangle Institute ( R T I ) ,

opposition to, 4 5 1

348-49,355,363

at the Pentagon, 2 8 7

R e z a , S h a h Pahlavi, 1 4 9

o f services to wealthy suburbs, 4 2 2

Rice, Condoleezza, 3 4 1 - 4 2 , 4 6 0

in Sri L a n k a , 3 9 3 - 9 5

R i c e , Marilyn, 31

surge o f by the U . S . government and
military, 3 7 8 - 8 2 , 4 4 4

Ridge, T o m , 315
Ridge G l o b a l , 3 1 5

in T h a t c h e r ' s U.K., 1 3 5 , 1 3 9

Riggs B a n k , 157

o f torture and "security," 1 0 8

Rilke, R a i n e r M a r i a , 2 7 7

See also disaster relief, privatization of;

Robb, John, 4 2 0

government services, privatization

Robert, Karen, 1 0 9

of; military activity, privatization o f

Rockefeller, David, 8 9

Procter & G a m b l e , 3 4 0 , 3 7 4

Rockefeller, Nelson, 8 9

protectionism, virtues c l a i m e d for, 2 6 7

Rodrik, D a n i , 1 6 4 - 6 5 , 2 5 4

"psychic driving," 3 1 - 3 2 , 4 7

Rogers, W i l l i a m , 8 8 , 9 7

Purina (corporation), 6 4

Roosevelt, Franklin D . , 5 4 , 2 4 6 , 2 5 1 ,

Puryear, Jeffrey, 61
Putin, Vladimir, 2 3 7 , 2 4 0 , 4 4 9

297-98
on "war millionaries," 3 1 4
Rosen, Len, 4 3 6

Q a e d a , a k See al-Qaeda.

Rosenberg, Alfred, 1 0 4

Quigley, B i l l , 4 2 1

Rosencof, M a u r i c i o , 9 3
Roy, Sara, 4 3 3

R a b i n , Yitzhak, 4 2 9
racism, rising levels of, 2 6 4

Royal D u t c h / S h e l l (oil c o m p a n y ) , 2 3 3 ,
243, 3 4 6 , 4 3 8

R a h i m , A h m e d al-, 3 4 8

Rozanski, Judge Carlos, 1 0 0 - 1 0 1

R a m a p h o s a , Cyril, 1 9 9

R T I . See R e s e a r c h Triangle Institute

Ratakul, Pichit, 4 4 3

Rubin, Bob, 248

Rather, D a n , 3 3 4

Rumsfeld, D o n a l d , 1 1 , 4 3 , 1 1 6 , 1 3 3 , 2 7 4 ,

Reagan, Ronald, 11, 18, 132, 139, 1 4 1 ,
151, 1 6 3 , 2 1 9 , 272, 289, 2 9 6 - 9 7 ,
320, 4 4 4
administration of, 1 9 4 , 1 4 2 , 3 3 7 , 3 4 4
R e a g a n o m i c s , 1 4 , 18, 1 3 2 , 141
reconstruction. See disaster relief

3 1 1 , 3 2 1 - 2 2 , 3 2 9 - 3 0 , 3 3 2 , 3 3 4 , 366,
3 7 9 , 381
corporate background of, 2 8 9 - 9 1
financial

conflicts o f interest and,

311-14,316
his hollow parallel spy agency, 3 0 0

INDEX
remakes the Pentagon, 2 8 3 - 8 9

schools, vouchers for and privatization

resignation of, 3 0 8
his reverence for M i l t o n F r i e d m a n ,
133
Russia, 87

of, 5, 8 4 , 4 1 0
Schrage, Michael, 2 2 0
Schultz, Theodore W., 5 9 - 6 0
S C Johnson & Son, 275

black market e c o n o m y of, 2 2 2

Schwarzenegger, Arnold, 18

C h i c a g o S c h o o l influences in, 15

Seagram's, 331

e c o n o m i c shock therapy and, 4 3 0

Searle P h a r m a c e u t i c a l s , 2 8 9

e c o n o m i c s h o c k therapy imposed on,
216, 2 2 3 - 2 9 , 342

Sears, 2 5 1
secrecy, 4 3 , 7 0 , 9 0 , 9 5 , 1 1 5 , 1 1 8 , 1 2 4 , 1 4 6 ,

market collapse in, 2 3 6 - 3 7 , 2 4 7 ,
252-53

553

157, 2 0 8 - 9 , 2 2 3 , 3 0 4 , 4 3 7 , 4 5 0 , 5 4 2
secret police, 4 5 , 9 0 , 9 4 , 1 0 0 , 1 1 9 , 1 7 5 ,

See also Soviet U n i o n

179, 1 8 9 , 4 4 9

Rutskoi, Aleksandr, 2 2 7

Seisint, 3 6 4 , 5 1 4 , 3 0 3 , 4 2 7

S a c h s , Jeffrey, 1 4 3 - 4 6 , 1 4 9 - 5 3 , 1 5 5 , 1 5 9 ,

sensory-deprivation experiments, 3 4 , 4 0

Selowsky, M a r c e l o , 161
167, 2 2 1 - 2 3 , 2 3 0 , 2 3 2 , 2 3 6 , 2 4 6 - 5 5 ,
272

September 1 1 , 2 0 0 1 , 2 9 5 - 9 8
disaster capitalism and, 2 9 9 - 3 0 2 , 3 0 6 - 7 ,

advice o f to Solidarity, 1 7 6 - 8 1 , 191
Sader, E m i r , 4 5 6

315-16, 322,344,435,439,441
as excuse to impose u n p o p u l a r

Sadli, M o h a m m a d , 2 6 3 , 2 7 1

policies, 9 - 1 4 , 1 6 , 4 2 - 4 3 , 1 3 9 , 2 7 5 ,

S a e n z , Orlando, 7 0 , 8 0 - 8 1
Sadr, M o q t a d a al-, 3 5 9 , 3 6 5 , 3 7 3 , 3 7 8
Safe Island Program (Maldives), 4 0 1

2 9 8 - 9 9 , 303, 329
lessons to b e learned from, 4 5 8
See also Davos D i l e m m a

Safi, Ali Abdel Hakim al-, 3 6 5

Serco, 380

St. Bernard Public Housing (New

Service Corporation International, 4 1 1

Orleans), 4 1 5

Shanahan, John N. T., 323

Salient Stills, 3 0 2

S h a r o n , Ariel, 4 3 3 - 3 4

Salk, Jonas, 2 9 0

Shaw Group, 4 1 0 - 4 1 2

S a l o m o n Brothers I n c . , 2 4 3

S h e l l . See Royal D u t c h / S h e l l

Samsung, 2 6 7 , 2 7 5

shelters, permanently temporary, 2 1 5 ,

San Francisco International Airport, 3 9 6
S a n c h e z de Lozada, G o n z a l o ( " G o n i " ) ,
1 4 5 - 4 6 , 1 4 8 , 1 5 0 , 154, 1 5 6 , 1 6 3 ,

391,398,442
Shleifer, Andrei, 2 3 4
S h o c k and Awe (military d o c t r i n e ) , 3,

178, 2 4 3 - 4 4 , 2 4 7 , 4 4 5

7 - 9 , 176

S a n c h e z , Ricardo, 3 6 8

Shock

Sandy Springs, G e o r g i a , 4 2 1 - 2 2 , 4 4 1

the shock doctrine, 7 - 9 , 1 5 - 1 7 , 2 1 , 1 4 0 ,

and Awe ( d o c u m e n t ) , 3 2 9 , 3 3 2

Saudi Arabia, 3 1 7 , 3 2 7 - 2 9

191,224, 278, 288, 326,451,

Saunders, Frances Stonor, 123

455-56,459

Save the C h i l d r e n , 4 0 3
Scahill, Jeremy, 3 6 6
Scandinavia
social d e m o c r a c y in, 1 7 6 , 2 1 9 , 4 5 0
e c o n o m i c successes in, 4 5 0

failures of, 3 6 8
shock therapy
applied in Russia, 2 3 0
its d e p e n d e n c e on disorientation, 4 5 9
i n o c u l a t i o n against, 4 5 9 , 4 6 3

Scheflin, Alan, 30

presumed necessity of, 2 3 9 - 4 0 , 2 5 4 , 3 7 4

S c h e l l , Orville, 1 8 9

See also e c o n o m i c s h o c k therapy;

Schmitt, C a r l , 131

e l e c t r o s h o c k therapy

554

INDEX

Shultz, George, 133, 2 6 6 , 3 1 6 , 3 1 9 - 2 0 ,
322

Reserve B a n k of, 2 0 1
"shocks" applied to, 2 0 9

Sidanko, 2 3 3

Southern C o n e , 5 5 , 5 8 , 6 2 - 6 3 , 8 7 , 1 1 8 ,

Sifton, J o h n , 3 6 7

1 2 4 , 1 4 7 . See also Argentina; C h i l e ;

S i l i c o n Valley G r a p h i c s , 3 1 2

Uruguay

Siniora, Fouad, 4 6 0

S o u t h Korea

Sisulu, Walter, 2 1 3

e c o n o m i c depression in, 2 6 5

Sithe I n d e p e n d e n c e F u n d i n g C o r p . , 2 7 6

e c o n o m i c success of, 2 6 6 - 6 7

Sitto,Nouri, 3 5 5 - 5 6

yields to I M F demands, 2 6 8 - 7 1
Soviet U n i o n

Sjaastad, Larry, 8 7 , 157

breakup in, 1 8 1 - 8 2 , 1 9 7 , 2 1 9 - 2 1 , 2 2 4 ,

Skokov, Yury, 2 2 3

225-26

Slovo, J o e , 2 1 3
S m i t h , Adam, 1 3 5 , 2 4 1 , 2 4 5

e c o n o m i c shock therapy d e m a n d e d of,

S m i t h , Gerard, 2 6 3

219

S m i t h Barney, 2 7 4 , 3 9 2

social d e m o c r a c y in the, 2 1 9 - 2 2 1

Snobelen, John, 259

See also Russia

S n y m a n , Rassool, 2 0 3

Spade D e f e n s e Index (stocks), 4 2 5

social class. See class distinctions (social)

Spain, 1 4 3 , 2 5 4

socialism ( d e m o c r a t i c ) , fears of, 4 5 1
social safety nets, funding cuts to, 7, 9, 57,

resistance to fascism in, 4 6 3
Sparks, M i s t e r , 1 9 4

77, 8 2 , 1 4 8 , 1 6 3 , 1 6 6 , 1 8 0 , 2 2 5 , 2 3 0 ,

Spielberg, Steven, 2 4 6

257-59, 269-270,413,439,444

Sri Lanka, 8, 1 7 , 2 1 1

social spending

e c o n o m i c development plans for,

enforced cuts to, 9 , 7 7 - 7 8 , 163 (see also
social safety nets, funding cuts to)
privatization and, 8 4

396-98

social workers, assaults u p o n , 1 0 9 - 1 0
societies, resistance to forced c h a n g e in,
106-7, 220, 227, 350, 352-53, 374,
4 4 4 , 4 4 7 - 4 9 , 4 6 6 , 5 6 1 . See

391-95
e c o n o m i c shock therapy for, 3 9 4 ,

also

"blowback"
S o c i e t y for the Investigation o f H u m a n
E c o l o g y , 35

effects o f shock therapy in, 4 0 4 - 5
immediately after the tsunami, 3 9 0 - 9 1
at the t i m e o f the tsunami, 3 8 5 - 8 7
Sri Lanka Tourist Board, 3 9 2
Ssangyong Information and
Communication, 275
Stalin, Joseph V , 1 0 1 , 1 7 4

Solandt, O m o n d , 33

Stals, C h r i s , 2 0 2

solidarity ( h u m a n ) , portrayed as a

Standard & Poor's, 2 5 7

disease, 112
Solidarity (Polish U n i o n ) , 1 7 2 - 8 1 , 1 8 6 ,
191-93, 224, 227, 342, 3 9 5 , 4 4 9 - 5 1
Solidere, 4 6 0 - 6 2

Stark, G e n . Sergio Arellano, 77
Starwood, 3 4 6
State of Denial

(Woodward), 3 1 9 - 2 0

Steed, Michael, 302

S o m o z a D e b a y l e , Anastasio, 1 3 6

Steele, James, 367, 3 7 0 - 7 1

Sontag, Susan, 142

Stern, Andrew, 3 2 5 , 3 2 7 , 4 0 6

S o o k a , Yasmin, 2 0 3 , 2 1 0 - 1 1

Stiglitz, Joseph, 1 6 3 , 2 2 4 , 3 3 4

Soros, G e o r g e , 1 7 7 , 2 3 5 - 3 6

Stolz, R i c h a r d , 3 9

Sosa, M e r c e d e s , 1 0 4 - 5

"structural adjustment," disaster

Sotheby's, 3 9 2
S o u t h Africa, 8 7 , 4 5 8
ends apartheid, 1 8 2 , 1 9 7 - 2 0 5

capitalism and, 1 6 1 , 1 6 3 - 6 4 , 1 6 6 - 6 8
subcontracting, waste and injustice
associated with, 3 5 6 - 5 8 , 4 1 2 - 1 3

INDEX
Suharto, G e n . R a d e n , 6 7 - 6 9 , 1 3 4 ,

electroshock; torture; unions

270-71,277-78,333-34
Suharto, T o m m y , 2 7 1

(labour), assaults u p o n )
Terrorism

suicide, 3 3 , 5 4 , 1 5 5 , 2 9 0
attempted, 4 6

in the Grip of Justice

terrorists, attempts to find, 3 0 3 - 4 ,
327-28,435-36
Tesco, 275

suicide b o m b e r s , 3 2 7 , 3 8 6 , 4 0 4 , 4 3 0

Texaco, 4 3 8

Sukarno, A c h m e d , 5 8 , 6 7 - 6 8

T h a b i t , Adnan, 371

Sullivan & C r o m w e l l , 58

Thabo

Summers, Lawrence, 2 1 8 , 226, 2 3 1 , 2 4 8 ,
253,424

(Al

Iraqiya T V show), 371

rates o f in Russia, 2 3 8
rates o f in S o u t h K o r e a , 2 6 5 , 2 7 7

555

Mbeki
Control

and the Battle
of the ANC

for the

(Gumede), 205

Thailand, 2 7 6 - 7 8

SuperCom, 437

e c o n o m i c depression in, 2 6 5 , 2 7 2 - 7 3

surveillance, o f the public, 302

e c o n o m i c success of, 2 6 6 - 6 7

Suskind, R o n , 332

post-tsunami e c o n o m i c effects in, 3 9 9 ,

Sutton, Frank, 122

402,483

Swire, Peter, 307

resistance to s h o c k therapy in,

Talbott, Strobe, 3 2 8

yields o f I M F demands, 3 2 3 - 2 6

463-64
Tamiflu, 2 9 0 - 9 1 , 3 0 9 , 3 1 2 , 4 1 9

T h a m e s W a t e r (utility), 2 7 6

Tamil Tigers, 3 8 6 , 4 0 4

T h a t c h e r , Margaret, 1 0 , 1 8 , 1 3 1 - 3 2 , 1 5 6 ,

Tant, Hugh, 3 5 8
Task F o r c e to Rebuild the Nation (Sri
Lanka), 3 9 6 - 9 7

174, 2 0 8
administration of, 163
and the "ownership society," 1 3 5 ,

Tel Aviv Stock E x c h a n g e , 4 2 8 , 4 4 0

138-39, 164-66

Telefonica, 167

T h o m a s , Gordon, 30

T e l m e x (phone c o m p a n y ) , 3 9 6

Thomas, Richard, 283

"Tequila Crisis," 1 6 8 , 2 4 2 , 2 6 6

T i a n a n m e n S q u a r e , confrontations in,

terror

10, 1 7 1 , 1 8 4 , 1 8 7 - 8 8 , 1 9 0 - 9 1 , 1 9 3 ,

denial o f its use and support for,
118-21

197, 2 2 2 , 4 5 8
Time,

18, 1 6 7 , 2 1 8

effectiveness of, 1 2 6

Tintner, Gerhard, 116

fostered deliberately, 9 - 1 0 , 1 6 - 1 7 , 19,

Tittawella, M a n o , 3 9 3

6 9 , 7 1 , 7 7 - 7 8 , 84, 8 9 , 9 2 , 9 5 - 9 7 ,

Tizard, Sir Henry, 33

9 9 - 1 0 1 , 110, 1 8 8 - 8 9 , 1 9 1 , 3 3 9 ,

Tofiq, M o h a m a d , 3 4 3 , 3 4 9

371-72,447,459

T o m a s e l l a , Sergio, 1 2 6 - 2 7

See also W a r on Terror
terrorism
attacks of, 2 3 6 - 3 7 , 3 6 1 , 4 2 4 - 2 5 ,
428

torture
c i r c u m s t a n c e s favoring the use of, 7,
15-16, 368
as "curing," 1 1 1 - 1 2

conditions amplifying, 3 5 5 - 5 6 , 4 2 6

d e h u m a n i z a t i o n and, 3 3 5 - 3 6

corporate sponsored, 1 0 7 - 8

manuals and methods of, 1 5 - 1 6 , 2 8 ,

as an excuse for arrests, 1 0 6 - 7

35, 3 7 - 4 6 , 3 6 8 - 7 3

as an excuse for lawbreaking, 4 3 2

as a m e a n s to elicit information, 1 2 6

as a form o f shock, 2 1 , 3 3 2 - 3 3

as a m e a n s o f extortion, 3 7 3

government supported, 1 2 0 - 2 5 (See
also C I A ; cultures, "cleansing" of;

methods for surviving, 37
as m e t a p h o r for disaster capitalism, 15

556

INDEX

widespread use of, 9 3 - 9 5 , 1 2 5 - 2 7

in T h a i l a n d , 2 7 2

See also under

in the U.K., 135

and specific

electroshock; terrorism;
nations

(e.g. C h i l e ,

in the U . S . , 1 3 3 , 141

torture in)

Uneximbank, 233

Total, 2 3 2 , 313

UNICEF, 13,238

Townley, M i c h a e l , 1 0 0

Uniform C o d e o f Military Justice ( U S A ) ,

Toye, J o h n , 2 5 6

42

Trainor, Bernard, 3 6 3

Union Carbide, 320

Travelers G r o u p , 2 7 4

U n i o n Fenosa, 3 9 6 , 4 5 2

Trinidad and T o b a g o , I M F ' s treatment of,

unionism, corporatism as the nemesis of,
86

261-62
Triple C a n o p y , 4 2 0

unions (labor)

T r i r e m e Partners, 3 2 0

assaults upon, 5, 1 0 2 , 1 0 6 - 9 , 1 3 5 , 1 3 8 ,

Troiani, Pedro, 1 0 8 - 9

152-53, 247, 270, 2 9 6 , 4 1 0

Truglia, V i n c e n t , 2 5 7 - 5 8

in C o m m u n i s t Poland, 172

Truth and R e c o n c i l i a t i o n C o m m i s s i o n
Truth, Torture and the American

post-9/11 status of, 2 9 7
their influence on government policy,

( S o u t h Africa), 1 9 4 , 2 1 0 - 1 1
Way

(Harbury), 4 2
the tsunami ( D e c e m b e r 2 0 0 4 ) , 8
aid m o n e y and, 3 8 8 - 8 9 , 3 9 0 - 9 1

251
United Fruit C o m p a n y , 5 9 , 3 1 0
United Nations, 1 0 1 , 1 6 2 - 6 3 , 2 8 8 , 3 4 2 ,
418,442

devastation from, 3 8 7

C h a r t e r o f the, 1 1 9

local relief work following, 3 9 0 - 9 1

Iraqi anger over its support for Bremer,

T s u n a m i Survivors and Supporters
(Thailand), 4 0 2
the T u p a m a r o s m o v e m e n t , 9 6 - 9 7
Turkey, I M F loans and, 4 5 7
T u t u , Archbishop D e s m o n d , 1 9 4 , 2 1 1

364
sanctions imposed by, 3 3 9
See also U N I C E F
United Nations C o n v e n t i o n on
Genocide, 101, 114
United Nations E c o n o m i c C o m m i s s i o n

U l l m a n , Harlan, 3 2 9 , 3 3 4
Undurraga, Sergio, 7 0
unemployment
in Argentina, 8 9 , 167
in Bolivia, 1 4 9

for L a t i n America, 5 5
United Nations High C o m m i s s i o n for
Refugees, 3 7 3
United Nations Universal D e c l a r a t i o n o f
H u m a n Rights, 1 1 8 , 121

in C h i l e , 8 0 , 8 2 , 8 5

United States. See U . S .

in G e r m a n y , 8 3

University o f California (Berkeley), 6 8 ,

in Indonesia, 2 7 2 , 2 7 7

134

in Iraq, 3 4 9 - 5 3

University o f C h i c a g o , 7, 7 1 , 8 3 , 1 1 6 , 182

low values o f seen as primary, 5 0 , 5 4

University o f C h i l e , 6 0 , 8 3 , 1 0 4

in Malaysia, 2 7 7

University o f Indonesia, 6 8 , 122

in the Philippines, 2 7 3

University o f the S o u t h (Argentina), 105

in Poland, 191

University o f T u c u m a n (Argentina), 1 3 4

in Russia, 2 3 7

Uruguay, 3 7 , 5 5 , 8 7 , 9 1 - 9 3 , 9 6 - 9 7 ,

as a sign o f market restrictions, 5 1 , 5 3 ,
81
in S o u t h Africa, 2 1 4
in S o u t h Korea, 2 7 2 , 2 7 7

1 0 4 - 5 , 111, 119, 156, 1 6 0 , 3 3 0 , 4 4 5 ,
447,454
aftermath o f the 1 9 7 3 c o u p in, 8 7 ,
9 1 - 9 2 , 1 0 4 - 5 , 156

INDEX
its C h i c a g o S c h o o l revolution, 3 3 0 ,
445

Volcker, Paul, 1 5 9
"Volcker S h o c k , " 1 5 9 , 1 6 8 , 2 5 7 . See

U . S . Export-Import B a n k , government

precarious debt load of, 4 1 8 - 1 9

also

debt shock; interest rates, a key

debts owed to, 1 5 6 , 1 5 8
U . S . government

557

trigger for disaster capitalism
Volvo, 2 7 5
voting rights, as a threat to unfettered

privatization o f services provided by,

capitalist, 1 3 4

286-89, 291-94
spending on privatized services,
300-301

W a d e , Robert, 2 7 6
wages, 2 0 , 5 0 , 5 2 , 5 8 , 8 2 , 1 3 4 , 1 4 7 , 2 6 3 ,

U . S . government contracts, 2 9 1 - 9 9 , 3 5 6
awarded without c o m p e t i t i o n or

412
declines in, 8 7 , 8 9 , 1 0 7 , 1 1 1 , 1 1 9 , 1 4 9 ,

oversight, 1 5 , 2 9 1 , 2 9 8 , 3 5 6 - 5 8 ,
410-12,424-25

188,449
See also m i n i m u m wage; poverty;

increased numbers of, 1 2 - 1 3 , 3 0 2 ,
380-82,406,412-13,416,418,427
See also disaster capitalism
U . S . military forces
"hollow" corporatism and the, 2 8 5 - 8 7

wealth
W a g n e r , Billy, 4 1 6
Walesa, L e c h , 1 7 1 - 7 5 , 1 7 8 - 8 0 , 1 9 2 - 9 3
Walker, David M . , 3 0 8
Wall Street, its profits from the Asia

privatization o f services for, 2 8 7 , 2 9 1
U . S . Treasury D e p a r t m e n t , 2 3 3 , 2 4 6 , 4 5 6

crisis, 2 7 4 - 7 6
Wall

augments Asia crisis, 2 6 6
e c o n o m i c shock therapy d e m a n d e d
by, 2 4 2

Journal,

4 , 18, 7 3 , 189,

410
Wal-Mart, 3 4 0 , 357, 3 6 6 , 3 7 4 , 4 1 1 , 4 1 6

holds Poland's e c o n o m y at ransom,

W a l s h , Rodolfo, 9 4 - 9 7 , 1 0 3 - 5 , 1 2 5 , 2 7 2 ,

176

327,446-47,451

powers within and over, 2 6 9
USAID, 5 9 , 6 2 , 104, 2 2 3 , 234, 347,

Walsh, Vicki, 95
Walter R e e d M e d i c a l C e n t e r ( U . S . ) , 3 7 8 ,

391-92, 398,403
USA Today,

Street

2 0 8 , 2 3 0 - 3 1 , 2 4 3 , 2 7 4 , 3 1 3 , 396,

350

U S I S , 317, 348

380
Walters, Barbara, 1 7 9
Wang Hui, 187, 1 8 9 - 9 0
war

Valdés, Juan G a b r i e l , 6 2

corporate profits from, 1 3 - 1 4

Varley, J o h n , 3 9 2 , 3 9 8 , 4 0 5

as mass torture, 3 3 1 - 3 2

Vasiliev, Dimitry, 2 2 3

as a performance p i e c e , 3 3 2

Vdovin, Yuri, 4 4 9

privatization of, 3 8 2

Velasco Portillo, Susan, 1 4 6

prosecution o f (see military activity)

Veneroso, Frank, 2 7 6

as a "rational policy," 3 2 7

Venezuela, 1 5 1 , 2 6 2 , 3 8 2 , 4 4 7 , 4 5 4 - 5 7
Verint Systems, 3 0 3
surveillance e q u i p m e n t by, 4 3 7 , 4 3 9
Videla, Jorge, 4 4 5
V i e t n a m , torture in, 4 1

"War on Terror," 1 2 - 1 3 , 2 0 , 4 3 , 2 8 4 , 2 9 4 ,
298, 3 0 0 - 3 0 1 , 3 0 3 , 311, 315,
321-22,331
market forces affecting, 3 0 5 - 7 , 4 3 0 ,
435-39

Villani, M a r i o , 9 8 , 112

Washington, Viola, 4 6 5

Vinnell, 348

"Washington C o n s e n s u s " ( e c o n o m i c

violence, post-disaster risks of, 4 0 4 - 5

policies), 1 6 3 , 1 6 5 , 1 8 4 , 2 0 0 , 2 0 9 ,

Vivendi, 167

2 1 6 , 2 5 5 , 2 5 9 , 267, 279, 328,448

558

INDEX

Washington

Post, 4 5 , 8 5 , 2 2 0 , 2 2 6 - 2 9 ,

269, 2 7 1 , 2 9 7 , 3 1 9 , 3 2 5 , 3 3 6 , 3 5 4
"water-boarding," 4 4 , 1 2 6
W a x m a n , Henry, 4 2 4
wealth

World B a n k , 6 7 , 1 5 5 - 5 7 , 3 8 8 , 3 9 1 , 3 9 3 ,
396, 3 9 8 , 4 0 1 , 4 0 3
e c o n o m i c shock therapy d e m a n d e d
by, 1 6 3 , 1 6 6 , 2 1 6 , 2 1 9 , 2 3 0
founding principles of, 163

a m o n g disaster capitalists, 3 0 7

government debts owed to, 157

greed and, 2 3 5

in Iraq, 3 4 3

increasing inequalities of, 8 6 , 8 9 , 9 5 ,

m a n d a t e o f ignored, 2 5 9

362, 405
marked disparities in, 1 5 , 18, 1 4 9 , 1 8 6 ,
190-92, 196-97, 198,214-15,
224-25, 231, 237-39, 272-73, 277,
279, 388-89, 3 9 2 , 4 0 0 , 4 0 8 , 4 1 9 - 2 0 ,
440,445-462
redistribution of, 2 0 6
reduction o f disparities in, 55
See also poverty; wages
weapons o f mass destruction ( W M D s ) ,
327, 3 3 4

neoconservatives working at, 1 6 1 , 2 0 0 ,
203
state opposition to, 4 5 9 - 6 0
World E c o n o m i c Forum (Davos), 2 1 6 ,
396,423
World Trade Organization ( W T O ) , 9,
203, 2 7 9 , 4 2 4 , 4 5 7
e c o n o m i c shock therapy d e m a n d e d
by, 2 6 7
opposition to and within, 2 7 9 - 8 0
World Vision, 4 0 3

Webb, Jim, 4 4 4 - 4 5

Wriston, Walter, 5 6 , 2 6 6

Weinstein, Harvey, 3 0

W u j e c , Henryk, 1 8 0

welfare services, privatization of,

Wyllie, Andrew M . , 3 2 5

293-94
Weschler, Lawrence, 179

X-ray security m a c h i n e s , 4 2 0

Westcoast Energy, 2 7 6
Western H e m i s p h e r e Institute for
Security C o o p e r a t i o n , 4 5 4

Yahoo, 303
Yamaichi Securities, 2 7 4

W i e l g o s z , Przemyslaw, 1 7 8

Yee, James, 45

Willett, S a b i n , 4 5

Yeltsin, Boris, 10, 1 5 4 , 2 2 0 - 3 7 , 2 3 8 - 3 9 ,

Williams, Gloria, 4 6 5

242, 248, 252, 2 5 4 - 5 5 , 3 4 2 , 4 3 0 - 3 1 ,

Williamson, John, 152, 1 5 5 - 5 6 , 163,

451

169,254-57,259-60,451
Willis, Frank, 3 5 7
W i l l s , Garry, 4 2
Winfrey, O p r a h , 2 4 6
Wired,

declares a state o f emergency,
225-26
replaced by Putin, 2 3 7
Yukos (oil c o m p a n y ) , 2 3 2 , 4 4 6

302

Wolf, M a r t i n , 4 2 3

Zakaria, Fareed, 341

Wolfe, M i c h a e l , 3 5 4

Zanartu, M a r i o , 61

Wolfowitz, Paul, 3 2 7 , 3 4 2 , 4 5 7

Z h a o Ziyang, 1 8 6 , 188

Woodward, B o b , 3 2 0

Zikode, S'bu, 2 1 6

Woolsey, J a m e s , 3 1 5 , 4 3 7

Zondag, C o r n e l i u s , 142

ABOUT THE AUTHOR
N a o m i Klein is the award-winning author o f the bestselling books No
Logo and Fences
Take.

and Windows

and c o c r e a t o r o f the d o c u m e n t a r y film The

H e r books have b e e n translated into twenty-eight languages and

received awards. H e r c o l u m n for The Guardian
c a t e d around the world.

and The Nation

is syndi­


